<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20020705171621.txt.gz
TIME:20020705171621
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 2, 2002 BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) TEXAS 1-10560 74-2211011 (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (I.R.S. Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 3000 TECHNOLOGY DRIVE, ANGLETON, TEXAS 77515 (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (979) 849-6550
Item 5. Other Events. On July 2, 2002, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing it had signed a stock purchase agreement in which Benchmark will acquire the stock of ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited and ACT Manufacturing UK Ltd. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits. (c) Exhibits. The following material is furnished pursuant to item 5 as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K. EXHIBIT NUMBER DESCRIPTION ------- ----------- Exhibit 2.1 Asset and Share Purchase Agreement by and between Benchmark Electronics, Inc., ACT Manufacturing, Inc., ACT Manufacturing Securities Corp., ACT Manufacturing U.S. Holdings, LLC and CMC Industries, Inc. dated July 2, 2002 Exhibit 99.1 Press release dated July 2, 2002 S I G N A T U R E Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. Dated: July 5, 2002 By: /S/DONALD E. NIGBOR ----------------------------- Donald E. Nigbor Chief Executive Officer

EXHIBIT 2.1 ================================================================================ ASSET AND SHARE PURCHASE AGREEMENT by and between BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. and ACT MANUFACTURING, INC., ACT MANUFACTURING SECURITIES CORP., ACT MANUFACTURING U.S. HOLDINGS, LLC, and CMC INDUSTRIES, INC. Dated as of July 2, 2002 ================================================================================
TABLE OF CONTENTS (i)
(ii)
(iii)
(iv)
ASSET AND SHARE PURCHASE AGREEMENT ASSET AND SHARE PURCHASE AGREEMENT (this "AGREEMENT"), dated as of July 2, 2002, by and between Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the "PURCHASER"), and ACT Manufacturing, Inc., a Massachusetts corporation (the "COMPANY"), ACT Manufacturing Securities Corp., a Massachusetts corporation ("ACT SECURITIES"), ACT Manufacturing U.S. Holdings, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company "ACT LLC"), and CMC Industries, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("CMC", and together with the Company, ACT Securities and ACT LLC, collectively, the "SELLERS"). The Sellers and the Purchaser are at times referred to herein each as a "PARTY" and, collectively, as the "PARTIES." Other capitalized terms used herein are defined in Article I. W I T N E S S E T H: - - - - - - - - - - WHEREAS, on December 21, 2001 (the "FILING DATE"), the Sellers filed the Chapter 11 Cases with the Bankruptcy Court under Chapter 11 of the Bankruptcy Code, and have continued in possession of their assets and in the management of their businesses pursuant to Sections 1107 and 1108 of the Bankruptcy Code; WHEREAS, the Purchaser desires to purchase certain assets and assume certain contracts of the Sellers, and the Sellers desire to sell such assets and assign such contracts to the Purchaser on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and in accordance with Sections 105, 363, 365 and 1146 of the Bankruptcy Code and other applicable provisions of the Bankruptcy Code; WHEREAS, the Company owns all of the issued and outstanding capital stock (the "ACT-UK SHARES") of ACT Manufacturing Holdings UK Limited, a company organized under the laws of England and Wales ("ACT-UK"), which owns all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of ACT Manufacturing UK Limited, a company organized under the laws of England and Wales; WHEREAS, the Company owns 68,370,918 shares, constituting at least 99.77% of the issued and outstanding capital stock (the "ACT-THAILAND SHARES") of ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited, a company organized under the laws of Thailand ("ACT-THAILAND", and together with ACT UK, the "PURCHASED SUBSIDIARIES"), which owns all of the issued and outstanding share capital of GSS Array Technology, Inc., a Delaware corporation, GSS Array Technology Limited, a company organized under the laws of England and Wales, ACT Manufacturing (S) Pte. Ltd., a company organized under the laws of the Republic of Singapore ("ACT-SINGAPORE"), Array Technology International, Inc., a company organized under the laws of the British Virgin Islands and Array Technology Holdings, Inc., a company organized under the laws of the British Virgin Islands; WHEREAS, the Purchaser desires to purchase, and the Company desires to sell, the ACT-UK Shares and ACT-Thailand Shares (collectively, the "PURCHASED SHARES") on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement and in accordance with Sections 105, 363, 365 and 1146 of the Bankruptcy Code and other applicable provisions of the Bankruptcy Code; 1
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and in consideration of the representations, warranties, and covenants herein contained, and for other good and valuable consideration described herein, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Parties hereto agree as follows: ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS "ACCOUNTING STANDARDS" when referring to UK GAAP means statements of standard accounting practice (including financial reporting standards) issued pursuant to Section 256 of the Companies Act by the Accounting Standard Board Limited (no. 2526824) or such other body prescribed by the Secretary of State from time to time pursuant to Section 256, Company Act 1985. "ACQUIRED ASSETS" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(a). "ACQUIRED ASSETS EXCLUSION RIGHT" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.3. "ACQUIRED ASSETS PURCHASE PRICE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.1(a). "ACT-FRANCE" has the meaning set forth in the definition of Excluded Subsidiaries. "ACT-IRELAND" has the meaning set forth in the definition of Excluded Subsidiaries. "ACT LLC" has the meaning set forth in the preamble. "ACT SECURITIES" has the meaning set forth in the preamble. "ACT-SINGAPORE" has the meaning set forth it the fourth recital. "ACT-THAILAND" has the meaning set forth in the fourth recital. "ACT-THAILAND SHARES" has the meaning set forth in the fourth recital. "ACT-UK" has the meaning set forth in the third recital. "ACT-UK SHARES" has the meaning set forth in the third recital. "AFFILIATE" means, with respect to any Person, any other Person which, directly or indirectly, through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, such first Person. As used herein, the term "control" (including, with correlative meanings, the terms "controlled by" and "under common control with"), as used with respect to any Person, means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise. "AGREEMENT" has the meaning set forth in the preamble. "ANCILLARY AGREEMENTS" means the Escrow Agreement and, if applicable, the (x) the Bill of Sale and/or (y) the Assignment and Assumption Agreement. 2
"APPROVAL ORDER" means a form of order substantially in the form set forth in Exhibit D. "ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.3(ii). "ASSUMED CONTRACTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.2(a). "ASSUMED CONTRACTS PURCHASE PRICE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.2. "ASSUMED INTERCOMPANY RECEIVABLES" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.4. "ASSUMED LIABILITIES" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.2(b). "BANKRUPTCY ACTIONS" means any claim or cause of action arising under the Bankruptcy Code including, without limitation, claims or causes of action arising under sections 506(a), 542, 544, 546, 547, 548, 549 and 550 of the Bankruptcy Code and equivalent or analogous state law actions. "BANKRUPTCY CODE" means the Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978, as heretofore and hereinafter amended, and codified as 11 U.S.C. Section 101, ET SEQ. "BANKRUPTCY COURT" means the United States Bankruptcy Court for the District of Massachusetts, Western Division, or any other court, having jurisdiction over the Chapter 11 Cases from time to time. "BILL OF SALE" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.2(i). "BUSINESS" means any and all business activities of any kind that are conducted by the Sellers and/or the Purchased Subsidiaries as of the Closing Date, but excluding the business of the Excluded Subsidiaries. "BUSINESS DAY" means any day except a Saturday, a Sunday or other day on which commercial banks are required or authorized to close in Boston, Massachusetts. "CHAPTER 11 CASES" means the Chapter 11 cases of Sellers pending in the Bankruptcy Court, Case Nos. 01-47641-JBR through 01-47644-JBR. "CLOSING" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.1. "CLOSING DATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.1. "CLOSING PAYMENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.1(d). "CMC" has the meaning set forth in the preamble. "CODE" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, together with the Treasury regulations promulgated thereunder. "COMPANY" has the meaning set forth in the preamble. 3
"CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT" has the meaning; set forth in Section 8.2. "CONTRACT" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.3. "CREDIT AGREEMENT" means the Credit Agreement dated as of June 29, 2000, as amended, among the Company, as Parent Borrower, Credit Suisse First Boston, as Syndication Agent, Societe General, as Documentation Agent, The Chase Manhattan Bank, as Administrative Agent, and the several Lenders from time to time parties thereto, as the same is in effect from time to time. "DEPOSIT" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.1(c). "DETERMINATION DATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(a)(iii). "DIP CREDIT AGREEMENT" means the Revolving Credit and Guaranty Agreement, dated as of January 25, 2002, as amended, among the Sellers and JP Morgan Chase Bank and each of the other lenders party thereto, providing for a debtor-in-possession credit facility in an amount of up to $20 million, as the same is in effect from time to time. "DOLLARS" or "$" means the currency of the United States of America, unless otherwise specified. "EQUIPMENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(a)(iii). "ESCROW AGREEMENT" has the meaning as set forth in Section 3.1(c). "EXCLUDED ASSETS" means all of the assets, properties and business of the Sellers other than the Acquired Assets, if any, the Assumed Contracts, if any, and the Purchased Shares. "EXCLUDED SUBSIDIARIES" means ACT Securities, ACT LLC, Advanced Component Technologies Limited, a corporation organized under the laws of Ireland ("ACT-IRELAND"), ACT France Holdings SAS, a corporation organized under the laws of France ("ACT-FRANCE") and each of its direct and indirect Subsidiaries, and CMC and each of its direct and indirect Subsidiaries. "FILING DATE" has the meaning set forth in the first recital. "FISHER ROSEMOUNT ACQUISITION AGREEMENT" means the Business Sale Agreement between ACT-UK, Fisher-Rosemount Manufacturing Limited, Fisher-Rosemount Europe Middle East & Africa GmbH, Fisher Rosemount Limited and Company dated July 2, 2001. "GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY" means any foreign, United States federal, state or local government, political subdivision or governmental, regulatory or administrative authority, body, agency, board, bureau, commission, department, instrumentality or court, quasi-governmental authority, self-regulatory organization or stock exchange. "GUARANTOR" has the meaning set forth in the preamble. 4
"HONEYWELL SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT" means the Honeywell Settlement Agreement and Release among ACT-Thailand, the Company and Honeywell International, Inc. dated April 8, 2002. "HSR ACT" means the Hart- Scott- Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder. "INDEBTEDNESS" of any Person means and includes (i) indebtedness for borrowed money or indebtedness issued or incurred in substitution or exchange for indebtedness for borrowed money, (ii) amounts owing as deferred purchase price for property or services, including all seller notes and "earn-out" payments, (iii) indebtedness evidenced by any note, bond, debenture, mortgage or other debt instrument or debt security, (iv) commitments or obligations by which such Person assures a creditor against loss (including contingent reimbursement obligations with respect to letters of credit), (v) indebtedness secured by a Lien on assets or properties of such Person, other than Permitted Liens, (vi) obligations or commitments to repay deposits or other amounts advanced by and owing to third parties, (vii) obligations under any interest rate, currency or other hedging agreement or (viii) guarantees or other contingent liabilities (including so called take-or-pay agreements) with respect to any indebtedness, obligation, claim or liability of any other Person of a type described in clauses (i) through (vii) above Indebtedness shall not, however, include accounts payable to trade creditors and accrued expenses arising in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and shall not include the endorsement of negotiable instruments for collection in the ordinary course of business. "INVENTORY" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(a)(i). "INVENTORY PROJECTION" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.7(c). "KNOWLEDGE OF THE PURCHASER" or "KNOWN TO THE PURCHASER" means the actual knowledge of any one or more of the Purchaser and its Affiliates. "KNOWLEDGE OF THE SELLERS" or "KNOWN TO THE SELLERS" means the actual knowledge of any one or both of John A. Pino and Christopher Gorgone, in their capacities as officers of the Sellers; provided, that with respect to the Purchased Entities "KNOWLEDGE OF THE SELLERS" means the actual knowledge of the Sellers based solely upon one or more certificates dated as of the date hereof of an officer or other management personnel of the Purchased Subsidiaries, without independent investigation. "LAW" or "LAWS" means any and all statute, laws, ordinances, proclamations, regulations, orders, decrees, consent decrees and rules of any Governmental Authority, in each case, as amended and in effect from time to time. "LEMELSON LICENSE" means the license agreement between the Company and The Lemelson Foundation Partnership dated February 7, 2000 as amended by an amendment dated November 28, 2000. "LIENS" means all liens, claims, judgments, licenses, subleases, encumbrances, mortgages, pledges, security interests, conditional sales agreements, charges, options, rights of first refusal, reservations, restrictions or other encumbrances or defects in title of any kind. 5
"MATERIAL ADVERSE EFFECT" or "MATERIAL ADVERSE CHANGE" means (i) when used with respect to any Transaction Party, any change or effect that is materially adverse (A) to the business, assets, liabilities, condition (financial or otherwise), or results of operations of such Transaction Party and/or (B) on the ability (including any material delay) to perform its respective obligations, if any, hereunder or under any Ancillary Agreement to which it is a party, or (ii) when used with respect to the Purchaser any materially adverse change in or effect on (including any material delay) the ability of the Purchaser to perform its obligations hereunder or under any Ancillary Agreement to which it is a party, in each case, excluding any such changes or effects resulting from, relating to or arising in connection with or out of (a) changes in general economic conditions, (b) changes generally affecting the industry of the Sellers, (c) the public announcement or proposed consummation of this Agreement, (d) the status of Sellers as entities operating under the Bankruptcy Code, including without limitation the loss or decrease in business from existing or potential customers, or (e) the acts or omissions of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates. "NATWEST FACILITY" means the letter of advice of borrowing terms for ACT-UK from NatWest Corporate Banking Services dated July 2, 2001 together with all related agreements, arrangements or understandings in connection with any indebtedness or facilities held by ACT-UK or ACT Manufacturing UK Limited with the NatWest Bank. "ORDER" means any judgment, order, injunction, decree, writ, permit or license of any Governmental Authority or any arbitrator. "PARTY" or "PARTIES" has the meaning set forth in the Preamble. "PERMITTED LIENS" means (a) Liens for Taxes not yet due and payable or due but not delinquent and (b) statutory Liens arising by operation of Law (such as carriers', warehouse-men's, mechanics' liens and other similar Liens arising in the ordinary course of business). "PERSON" means and includes any individual, any legal entity, including, without limitation, any partnership, joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, trust, or unincorporated organization, and any Governmental Authority. "PURCHASE PRICE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.1(a). "PURCHASED ENTITIES" means, collectively, the, Purchased Subsidiaries and their respective Subsidiaries and "PURCHASED ENTITY" means any of the Purchased Entities. "PURCHASED SHARES" has the meaning set forth in the fifth recital. "PURCHASED SHARES PURCHASE PRICE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.2. "PURCHASED SUBSIDIARIES" has the meaning set forth in the fourth recital. "PURCHASER" has the meaning set forth in the Preamble. "RECEIVABLES" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.1(a)(ii). 6
"RECEIVABLES PROJECTION" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.7(b). "SALES PROCEDURES ORDERS" are set forth in Exhibit C. "SELLERS" has the meaning set forth in the preamble. "SINGAPORE FACILITY AGREEMENT" means the Facility Agreement dated April 25, 2001 between ACT-Singapore and Standard Chartered Bank, Singapore Branch. "SUBSIDIARY" means, with respect to any Person, (i) any corporation more than 50% of whose stock of any class or classes having by the terms thereof ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the directors of such corporation (irrespective of whether or not at the time stock of any class or classes of such corporation shall have or might have voting power by reason of the happening of any contingency) is owned by such Person directly or indirectly through one or more Subsidiaries of such Person and (ii) any partnership, association, joint venture or other entity in which such Person directly or indirectly through one or more Subsidiaries of such Person has more than a 50% equity interest. "TAX" or "TAXES" means (i) any foreign, United States federal, state or local income, gross receipts, license, payroll, employment, excise, severance, stamp, occupation, premium, windfall profits, environmental, customs duties, capital stock, franchise, profits, withholding, social security (or similar), unemployment, disability, real property, personal property, sales, use, transfer, registration, value added, alternative or add-on minimum, estimated or other tax of any kind whatsoever, including all estimated taxes, deficiency assessments and any interest, penalty or addition thereto; (ii) any liability by Contract or agreement for the payment of any amount of the type described in clause (i) as a result of the Company of any Subsidiary of the Company being a successor to or transferee of any other Person; and (iii) any liability for the payment of any amount described in clause (i) as a result of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company being a member of any affiliated, consolidated, combined, unitary or similar group. "THAI BALANCE SHEET" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.12(a). "THAI CREDIT AGREEMENT" means the Credit Facilities Agreement between ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited, the Thai Farmers Bank Public Company Limited and the Bank of Ayudhya Public Company Limited, dated as of March 29, 2001 as amended by Amendment No. 1 dated as of April 19, 2001. "THAI GAAP" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.12(a). "THAILAND KEY EMPLOYEE RETENTION PLAN" means the Key Employee Retention Plan relating to the retention of employees employed by ACT-Thailand or any Subsidiary. "THAI MAY BALANCE SHEET" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.12(a). "TRANSACTION PARTIES" means, collectively, the Sellers, ACT-UK and its direct and indirect Subsidiaries, and ACT-Thailand and its direct and indirect Subsidiaries and "TRANSACTION PARTY" means any of the Transaction Parties. 7
"TRANSFER TAXES" shall mean any federal, state, county, local, foreign and other transfer, conveyance, bulk-transfer, documentary transfer, recording or similar Tax, fee or charge imposed upon the sale, transfer or assignment of property or any interest therein, or the recording thereof, but such term shall not include any Tax on, based upon or measured by any income, gain or profit from such sale, assignment or transfer. "UK BALANCE SHEET" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.13(a). "UK GAAP" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.13(a). "UK KEY EMPLOYEE RETENTION PLAN" means the Key Retention Plan relating to the retention of employees employed by ACT-UK or any Subsidiary. "UK MAY BALANCE SHEET" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.13(a). "US GAAP" means the United States generally accepted accounting principles, applied consistently. ARTICLE II PURCHASE AND SALE OF ACQUIRED ASSETS Section 2.1 PURCHASE AND SALE OF ACQUIRED ASSETS. (a) Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, the Purchaser shall purchase from the Sellers, and the Sellers shall grant, transfer, sell, convey, assign and deliver to the Purchaser, as a good faith purchaser for value within the meaning of Section 363(m) of the Bankruptcy Code, free and clear of all Liens, other than Permitted Liens, the following assets of the Sellers (collectively, the "ACQUIRED ASSETS"): (i) all raw materials, work-in process, finished goods, supplies and inventory of the Sellers (collectively, the "INVENTORY"), and all computer records and other records relating to the foregoing; (ii) all (x) accounts receivable of the Sellers (subject to offsets and amounts owed to customers associated with such receivables, which shall be credited and applied by the Purchaser against such receivables) and (y) notes receivable (excluding those notes receivable set forth on Schedule 2.1(a)(ii)) with maturities of less than ninety (90) days of the Sellers (subject to offsets and amounts owed to customers associated with such notes, which shall be credited and applied by the Purchaser against such notes), in each case less than ninety (90) days past due as of the Closing Date (the validity or amount of which is not in dispute by the relevant obligor) (collectively, the "RECEIVABLES"), provided, that Receivables shall exclude the Assumed Intercompany Receivables; and provided further that once Purchaser receives (net of offsets and amounts owed to customers) Eight Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($8,200,000) of proceeds from the collection of the Receivables and the sale of the Inventory, Purchaser shall assign to the Sellers a fifty percent (50%) interest in all its rights, title and interest in any other Receivables and Inventory (and proceeds thereon) in excess of Eight Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($8,200,000); 8
(iii) all personal property and interests therein owned by the Sellers, including, without limitation, vehicles, machinery, equipment, furniture, office equipment, tools and other tangible property, (collectively, the "EQUIPMENT"), and all computer records and other records relating to the foregoing. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement to the contrary, the Purchaser shall remove or otherwise dispose of the Inventory and Equipment located at the Sellers' premises by the later of (a) the Closing Date, or (b) August 15, 2002 or (c) such later date determined by the Bankruptcy Court as the deadline to assume or reject those leases of non-residential real property that are the subject of the Sellers' July 1, 2002 motion to extend time to assume or reject such leases (the "DETERMINATION DATE"). In the event that Purchaser has not removed or disposed of any Inventory or Equipment by the Determination Date then Purchaser shall deliver a written notice to Sellers specifying such Inventory and Equipment that has not been removed or disposed of, and execute all such deeds, bills of sale, enforcements, assignments and other good and sufficient instruments of sale transfer, conveyance and assignment as shall be necessary to transfer, convey and assign to the Sellers such remaining Inventory and Equipment and Sellers shall accept such assignment and conveyance of such remaining Inventory and Equipment. Section 2.2 PURCHASE AND SALE OF ASSUMED CONTRACTS. Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, the Purchaser shall purchase from the Sellers, and the Sellers shall grant, transfer, sell, convey, assign and deliver to the Purchaser, as a good faith purchaser for value within the meaning of Section 363(m) of the Bankruptcy Code, free and clear of all Liens, other than Permitted Liens, all rights of the Sellers under all executory contracts and unexpired leases, if any, set forth on Schedule 2.2(a) and all contract rights thereunder except for such contracts that are no longer in effect (the "ASSUMED CONTRACTS"). (b) In the event of the purchase and sale hereunder of any Assumed Contracts, then upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement (including but not limited to the Sellers' satisfaction of their respective assumption obligations with respect to the Assumed Contracts pursuant to Section 5.1(c)), from and after the Closing, the Purchaser will assume and agree to pay, perform and discharge when due the following (collectively, the "ASSUMED LIABILITIES"): (i) the payment or satisfaction of any amounts necessary to cure any defaults and arrearages that exist on the Closing Date under the Assumed Contracts; (ii) all liabilities, commitments and obligations of any and all of the Sellers arising or due from and after the Closing Date under or in connection with the Assumed Contracts; and (iii) all liabilities, commitments and obligations under the Thai Credit Agreement and Singapore Facility Agreement. Section 2.3 PURCHASE AND SALE OF PURCHASED SHARES. Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, the Company agrees to sell, assign, transfer and deliver to the Purchaser on the Closing Date, and the Purchaser agrees to purchase from the Company on the 9
Closing Date, the ACT-UK Shares and the ACT-Thailand Shares, in each case, free and clear of all Liens. The certificates representing the Purchased Shares shall be duly endorsed in blank, or accompanied by either stock powers duly executed in blank by the Company or such other instruments of transfer as are reasonably acceptable to the Purchaser in each case, with all necessary Transfer Tax and other revenue stamps, acquired at the Purchaser's expense (or if paid by the Company, to be reimbursed by the Purchaser at the Closing) affixed and canceled. Section 2.4 CANCELLATION OF INTER-COMPANY OBLIGATIONS. Except for those inter-company obligations set forth in further detail on Schedule 2.4 (collectively, the "ASSUMED INTERCOMPANY RECEIVABLES"), all accounts receivable, notes receivable, inter-company payables, causes of action, lawsuits, claims and demands of any kind or nature (including, without limitation, Bankruptcy Actions and all causes of action, lawsuits, claims and demands that any Seller and/or its bankruptcy estate may have against all current and former officers and directors of each Purchased Entity, in their capacity as such, arising subsequent to December 20, 2001, that are not covered by the Sellers' officers and directors insurance policies and that are subject to an indemnification obligation of a Purchased Entity, whether by Contract (in existence on the date hereof), applicable Law or the relevant organizational documents of such Purchased Entity (in existence on the date hereof)) or other obligations or other amounts owing or due from one or more of the Purchased Entities to one or more of the Sellers and the Excluded Subsidiaries, or from one or more of the Sellers and Excluded Subsidiaries to one or more of the Purchased Entities, shall, at Closing, be cancelled and of no further force or effect; provided, that it is expressly understood and agreed that the Purchaser has not cancelled, waived or released any offsets or amounts owed by the payee associated with the Assumed Intercompany Receivables to one or more of the Sellers. The Purchaser shall pay, or cause to be paid, at the Closing the Assumed Intercompany Receivables owing to ACT France and ACT-Ireland as set forth on Schedule 2.4. The Company and the Purchaser shall during the sixty (60) calendar day period after the Closing use their commercially reasonable efforts to calculate the final amount of the remaining Assumed Intercompany Receivables, net of offset or amounts owed by the payee associated with such Assumed Intercompany Receivables. At the end of such sixty (60) calendar day period, the Purchaser shall pay, or cause to be paid, the unpaid balance of the Assumed Intercompany Receivables or any portion thereof not in dispute. ARTICLE III PURCHASE PRICE; PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE; ALLOCATION OF PURCHASE PRICE Section 3.1 PURCHASE PRICE; PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE. The purchase price payable to the Company (on behalf of the Sellers) by the Purchaser in full consideration for the sale, conveyance, transfer and assignment of the Acquired Assets shall be Seven Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,200,000.00) in cash (the "ACQUIRED ASSETS PURCHASE PRICE"). (b) In full consideration for the purchase by the Purchaser of the ACT UK Shares, the ACT-Thailand Shares and of the assignment of the Assumed Contracts, Purchaser shall pay to the Company on the Closing Date, an aggregate of Forty-Five Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($45,200,000) in cash (the "PURCHASED SHARES PURCHASE PRICE"). The aggregate amount of the Acquired Assets Purchase Price and the Purchased Shares Purchase Prices is referred to herein as the "PURCHASE PRICE". 10
(c) Upon execution of this Agreement, the Purchaser shall deposit Three Million Four Hundred Forty-Four Thousand Dollars ($3,444,000.00) with an escrow agent in cash by a cashiers check from a United States bank or by wire transfer of immediately available funds or by a combination of the foregoing (the "DEPOSIT") as an initial earnest money deposit. The Deposit, and all accrued interest and other earnings thereon, shall be (i) maintained by the escrow agent pursuant to the terms of an escrow agreement (the "ESCROW AGREEMENT") substantially in a form reasonably satisfactory to the Company and the Purchaser, (ii) released to the Company (on behalf of the Sellers) (x) if the Closing takes place or, (y) in accordance with Section 11.3 and the terms of the Escrow Agreement or (iii) released to the Purchaser in accordance with Section 11.3 and the terms of the Escrow Agreement. (d) On the Closing Date, the Purchaser will deliver, or cause to be delivered, as consideration for the Assumed Contracts (if applicable) and the Purchased Shares, by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account or accounts identified in writing by the Company at least three (3) Business Days prior to the Closing Date, an amount calculated as follows: the amount payable by the Purchaser at the Closing shall be the Purchase Price LESS the Deposit and all accrued interest and other earnings thereon. The payment to be made by the Purchaser to the Company (on behalf of the Sellers) on the Closing Date calculated in accordance with Section 3.1(d), shall be referred to herein as the "CLOSING PAYMENT." Section 3.2 ALLOCATION OF PURCHASE PRICE FOR BIDDING PURPOSES. Solely for the purpose of the Sale Procedures and for determining the Closing Payment, the Parties initially have allocated the Purchase Price among the Acquired Assets, the Assumed Contracts and the Purchased Subsidiaries as set forth on Schedule 3.2. Other than as described in the immediately preceding sentence, the Parties acknowledge and agree that this allocation is non-binding and may be changed from time to time at the mutual agreement of the Parties, and shall have no force or effect for Tax or any other purposes. In addition, (i) no Party makes any admission or agreement that such allocation in any way establishes, determines or represents the actual value or appraisal of any of the Sellers or the Purchased Subsidiaries or their respective assets or businesses and (ii) the allocation shall not be binding upon, nor shall it express or imply any agreement, conclusion or determination of value by or among, any secured or unsecured creditor of the Sellers. Section 3.3 SPECIAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO ACQUIRED ASSETS. (a) At any time prior to five (5) Business Days after the date of this Agreement, the Company on behalf of the Sellers shall have the right in its sole discretion to identify and designate all (but not less than all) of the Acquired Assets as Excluded Assets (the "ACQUIRED ASSETS EXCLUSION RIGHT"). In the event that the Sellers exercises the Assigned Assets Exclusion Right, the Purchaser shall have no obligation to purchase the Acquired Assets, including without limitation, to pay the Acquired Assets Purchase Price. (b) In the event that the Sellers do not exercise the Acquired Assets Exclusion Right, no later than five (5) Business Days after the execution of this Agreement, the Company, on behalf of the Sellers, shall deliver to the Purchaser a written schedule prepared in good faith and based on purchase orders actually received by a Seller that have not been withdrawn and such 11
purchase orders include the customers' authorization to ship the relevant products upon completion of the order, which shall set forth in reasonable detail (including, without limitation, payors, amounts and aging) all Receivables. In addition immediately upon the execution of this Agreement, the Sellers shall use commercially reasonable efforts to collect any and all Receivables and may first deduct a ten percent (10%) servicing and collection fee from such Receivables and shall deposit the balance collected in a mutually agreed upon escrow bank account with an independent third party upon terms and conditions agreed by the Parties. The proceeds of the Receivables shall be released from the escrow bank account on the Closing Date and allocated between Purchaser on the one hand and Sellers on the other hand in the manner set forth in Section 2.1(a)(ii). (c) In the event that the Sellers do not exercise the Acquired Assets Exclusion Right, no later than five (5) Business Days after the date of this Agreement, the Company, on behalf of the Sellers, shall deliver to the Purchaser a written schedule prepared in good faith and based on the reasonable estimates of the Company, which shall set forth in reasonable detail (including, without limitation, part numbers and quantities) a projection all items constituting Inventory as of the date of this Agreement. The Company, on behalf of the Sellers, shall also provide the Purchaser with a written schedule prepared in good faith and based on the reasonable estimates of the Company, which shall set forth in reasonable detail a projection of all sales of Inventory for cash from the date hereof through the Closing Date, which schedule shall have annexed to it a copy of each invoice supporting each such sale of Inventory for cash. For purposes of this Section 3.3(b), the phrase "sales of Inventory for cash" shall mean and refer to all sales (including any bulk sale, liquidation, auction or other similar transfer) and other disposals of Inventory which are not recorded, and under the Sellers' accounting practices consistently applied would not be recorded, on the books and records of any Seller as an account receivable. The Company shall deliver to the Purchaser prior to the Closing the Inventory (or make the Inventory available to the Purchaser) and any information or documentation reasonably requested by the Purchaser to verify the amounts and computations set forth on the projections. In addition immediately upon the execution of this Agreement, the Purchaser shall use commercially reasonable efforts to sell and dispose of any and all Inventory and may first deduct a ten percent (10%) servicing and collection fee from the proceeds of such sale of Inventory and shall deposit the balance of the proceeds collected in a mutually agreed upon escrow bank account with an independent third party upon terms and conditions agreed by the Parties. The proceeds of the Inventory shall be released from the escrow bank account on the Closing Date and allocated equally between Purchaser on the one hand and Sellers on the other hand in the manner set forth in Section 2.1(a)(ii). (d) No later than five (5) Business Days after the date of this Agreement, the Company, on behalf of the Sellers, shall deliver to the Purchaser a fixed asset register prepared in good faith and based on reasonable estimates of the Company which shall set forth in reasonable detail a projection of all items constituting Equipment as of the Closing Date. The Company shall deliver to the Purchaser prior to the Closing any information or documentation reasonably requested by the Purchaser to verify the amounts and computations set forth on the projections. (e) The provisions of Sections 3.3(b), (c) and (d) shall have no force or effect in the event that Sellers exercise the Acquired Assets Exclusion Right. 12
ARTICLE IV CLOSING Section 4.1 CLOSING. Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, the closing of the purchase and sale of the Acquired Assets, the Assumed Contracts and the Purchased Shares (the "CLOSING") will be at 10:00 A.M. Eastern Daylight Time at the offices of Testa, Hurwitz & Thibeault, LLP, 125 High Street Boston, Massachusetts 02110, or at such other location agreed to by the Purchaser and the Company in writing, on the second Business Day to occur following the date on which all of the conditions precedent in Articles IX and X (except for such conditions that can only be satisfied on the Closing Date) have been satisfied or waived by the appropriate Party, or such other date as may be agreed upon by the Parties in writing (the date of the Closing being herein referred to as the "CLOSING DATE"). Section 4.2 DELIVERIES BY THE SELLERS AT THE CLOSING. At the Closing, the Sellers will: (i) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Purchaser, such deeds, bills of sale, enforcements, assignments, and other good and sufficient instruments of sale, transfer, conveyance and assignment as shall be necessary to sell, transfer, convey and assign to the Purchaser, in accordance with the terms hereof, title to the Acquired Assets free and clear of all Liens (other than Permitted Liens), including without limitation, a bill of sale agreement (the "BILL OF SALE") substantially in the form of EXHIBIT A. (ii) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Purchaser certificates representing the Purchased Shares free and clear of all Liens duly endorsed in blank or accompanied by signed and undated stock powers in accordance with Section 2.3; (iii) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Purchaser duly executed copies of all consents from Governmental Authorities referred to in Section 9.6, except to the extent the Bankruptcy Court orders otherwise; (iv) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Purchaser all consents, orders and approvals of the Bankruptcy Court (including, without limitation, a certified copy of the Approval Order) necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated herein; (v) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Purchaser the certificates referred to in Sections 9.2, 9.3 and 9.9; (vi) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Purchaser certified copies of the resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Sellers authorizing the sale of the Acquired Assets (if applicable), the Assumed Contracts (if applicable) and the Purchased Shares, the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Ancillary Agreements and all other documents and agreements delivered in connection herewith by the Sellers and consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby; (vii) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Purchaser such other duly executed documents, instruments and certificates as may be necessary, appropriate or reasonably requested by Purchaser to be delivered by the Sellers pursuant to this Agreement (it being understood that in no event shall any Seller be required to cause either Purchased 13
Subsidiary or any of their respective Subsidiaries to enter into an employment agreement with any executive officer, director or employee of such Person in connection with the closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement); (viii) as applicable, cause the share registry and director and shareholder minute books of each Purchased Entity to be delivered to the Purchaser or its nominee and the share registry of each of ACT-UK and ACT-Thailand shall have been updated (or a power of attorney shall have been executed) to reflect the ownership of the ACT-UK Shares and ACT-Thailand Shares, respectively, by the Purchaser effective as of the Closing Date; (ix) cause to be delivered to the Purchaser a certificate setting forth the name of each director and officer of each Purchased Entity and shall have annexed thereto a duly executed letter of resignation effective as of the Closing Date from each such director and officer; and (x) as applicable, cause to be delivered to Purchaser all books and records of each Purchased Entity in the possession of each Seller and each Excluded Subsidiary. It is understood and agreed that in the event the Company elects to exercise the Acquired Assets Exclusion Right, then each of the foregoing items that relates to the Acquired Assets need not be delivered to the Purchaser by the Sellers at the Closing. Section 4.3 DELIVERIES BY THE PURCHASER AT THE CLOSING. At the Closing, the Purchaser will: (i) pay to the Company (on behalf of the Sellers) the Closing Payment by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account or accounts specified by the Company in accordance with Section 3.1(d) and shall cause the escrow agent to release to the Company (on behalf of the Sellers) the Deposit and all accrued interest and other earnings thereon in accordance with the Escrow Agreement; (ii) if the purchase and sale of the Assumed Contracts is due to occur, deliver or cause to be delivered to Sellers an assignment and assumption agreement (the "Assignment and Assumption Agreement"), duly executed by Purchaser; (iii) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Company such other duly executed documents, instruments and certificates required to be delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to this Agreement; (iv) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Sellers the certificate referred to in Sections 10.2 and 10.3; and (v) deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Sellers certified copies of the resolutions of the Board of Directors of Purchaser authorizing the purchase of the Acquired Assets (if applicable), the Assumed Contracts (if applicable) and the Purchased Shares, the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Ancillary Agreements and all 14
other documents and agreements delivered in connection herewith by the Purchaser and consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. Section 4.4 FURTHER ASSURANCES. After the Closing and without further consideration, each Party will from time to time, at the reasonable request of any other Party, execute and deliver such other instruments of conveyance and transfer and such other instruments, documents and agreements and take such other actions as such other Party may reasonably request or as may be reasonably requested by any applicable Governmental Authorities or third parties, in each case in order to more effectively or more expeditiously consummate any of the transactions contemplated hereby and to vest in the Purchaser the right, title and interest in, to and under the Acquired Assets (if applicable), the Assumed Contracts (if applicable) and the Purchased Shares, and to assist the Purchaser in the collection and reduction to possession of the Acquired Assets (if applicable), the Assumed Contracts (if applicable) and the Purchased Shares (and the exercise of rights with respect thereto); provided that the requesting Party will prepare any additional documents and instruments and will handle any submittal, applications, processing, recording and registrations at its sole cost. ARTICLE V BANKRUPTCY COURT MATTERS Section 5.1 BANKRUPTCY COURT ORDERS (a)Subject to the Sellers' obligations to comply with any order of the Bankruptcy Court (including, without limitation, the Sale Procedures Order as set forth in Exhibit B), the Sellers and the Purchaser will promptly make any filings, take all actions and use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain any and all other approvals and orders necessary or appropriate for consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby. (b) The Sellers shall promptly provide the Purchaser with drafts of all documents, motions, orders, filings or pleadings that the Sellers propose to file with the Bankruptcy Court which relate to the consummation or approval of this Agreement and will provide the Purchaser or its counsel with reasonable opportunity to review such filings. The Sellers will also promptly provide the Purchaser or its counsel with written notice and copies of any other or further notice of appeal, motion or application filed in connection with any appeal from or application for reconsideration of, any of such orders and any related briefs. (c) The Sellers shall use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain the entry of an order authorizing the Sellers to assume and assign to the Purchaser the Assumed Contracts and to convey the Purchased Shares to Purchaser at the Closing pursuant to Sections 363 and 365 of the Bankruptcy Code. ARTICLE VI REPRESENTATIONS OF THE SELLERS Section 6 REPRESENTATIONS OF THE SELLERS. Each of the Sellers jointly and severally represents and warrants to Purchaser as follows: Section 6.1 EXISTENCE AND GOOD STANDING. Each Transaction Party is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and solely with respect to the Purchased Entities and where such concept exists in good standing under the Laws of its respective jurisdiction of organization, 15
except that ACT LLC, which is a limited liability company duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the State of Delaware and except where the failure to be in good standing has not had, is not, or would not reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect with respect to such Transaction Party. Each of the Purchased Entities is duly qualified as a foreign corporation and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by Law, except where the failure to be so qualified or in good standing has not had, is not, or would not reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect with respect to such Transaction Party. Each Transaction Party has the corporate power and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as is presently conducted. This Section 6.1 is qualified by Schedule 6.1. Section 6.2 AUTHORIZATION AND VALIDITY OF AGREEMENT. Each Seller has full corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements to which it is a party, to perform its obligations hereunder and thereunder and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements by each of the Sellers and the consummation by each of the Sellers of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby, has been duly authorized and approved by all necessary corporate action on the part of each of the Sellers and no other corporate, shareholder or equity owner action on the part of any Seller is necessary to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements to which it is a party and the consummation by each of the Sellers of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. This Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements to which it is a party have been duly executed and delivered by each of the Sellers and, assuming the due execution and delivery thereof by the Purchaser, are valid and binding obligations of each of the Sellers enforceable against each of the Sellers in accordance with their respective terms upon the entry of the Approval Order. Section 6.3 CONSENTS AND APPROVALS; NO VIOLATIONS. Except as set forth in Schedule 6.3, assuming (i) that any filings required under the HSR Act are made and the waiting periods thereunder have been terminated or have expired, (ii) the receipt of the requisite approvals or clearances of applicable foreign antitrust authorities, if any, and (iii) the receipt of the necessary approvals of the Bankruptcy Court (including, without limitation, the Sale Procedures Order and Approval Order), the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements to which it is a party by each of the Sellers and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby will not result in a violation or breach of, conflict with, constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default (or give rise to any right of termination, cancellation, payment or acceleration) under, or result in the creation of any Lien on any of the properties or assets of any Transaction Party under (a) the respective charter or By-laws or other constituent documents of the Transaction Parties, (b) any Law or Order by which any Transaction Party is bound or by which any of their respective properties or assets are bound, (c) any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any material note, bond, mortgage, indenture, guarantee, license, franchise, permit, agreement, understanding arrangement, contract, commitment, lease, franchise agreement or other instrument or obligation (whether oral or written) (each, including all amendments thereto, a "CONTRACT") to which any Seller is a party, or by which they or any of their respective properties or assets is bound and (d) will not require on the part of the Sellers any filing with, or permit, consent, waiver or approval of, or the giving of any notice to, any Governmental Authority on or prior to the Closing Date excluding from the 16
foregoing clauses (b) and (d) violations, filings, notices, consents and approvals, the absence of which would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect to such Seller. Section 6.4 COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS. Except as disclosed in Schedule 6.4, to the Knowledge of the Sellers, each of the Purchased Entities has been and is being conducted in compliance with all applicable Laws and Orders, except where the failure to so comply has not had, or would not reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect on the applicable Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole. Section 6.5 BROKER'S OR FINDER'S FEES. Except as set forth on Schedule 6.5, no agent, broker, Person or firm acting on behalf of the Sellers or any of their Affiliates is, or will be, entitled to any commission or broker's or finder's fees from any Transaction Party, or from any Affiliate of any Transaction Party (or any of their respective successors and assigns), in connection with any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, except for Lazard Freres & Co. LLC, whose fees and expenses will be paid by the Company in accordance with the orders of the Bankruptcy Court upon the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby. Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither Purchaser nor any Purchased Entity shall be liable for any commission or broker's or finder's fees upon the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby (other than with respect to any such party acting on behalf of Purchaser or any of its Affiliates). Section 6.6 LITIGATION. Except for the Chapter 11 Cases, and except as set forth in Schedule 6.6, to the Knowledge of the Sellers as of the date hereof there is no action, suit, proceeding in equity or at law, arbitration or administrative or other proceeding by or before any Person (including, without limitation, any Governmental Authority), pending or, to the Knowledge of the Sellers, threatened in writing against any Purchased Entity which, if adversely determined, has had, is, or would reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect on the applicable Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole. Except as set forth in Schedule 6.6, to the Knowledge of the Sellers, none of the Purchased Entities is subject to any judgment, Order or decree entered in any lawsuit or proceeding, other than lawsuits or proceedings which have not, or would not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have, a Material Adverse Effect on the applicable Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole. Section 6.7 ACQUIRED ASSETS. (a) Except as set forth on SCHEDULE 6.7(a), the Company or one of the other Sellers has good and valid right, title and interest in the Acquired Assets. At the Closing (provided that the Acquired Asset Exclusion Right has not been exercised), subject to compliance with applicable provisions of the Bankruptcy Code and the entry by the Bankruptcy Court of the Sale Procedures Order and the Approval Order, the Sellers will convey to the Purchaser their right, title and interest in and to the Acquired Assets and all proceeds thereof, free and clear of all Liens. (b) Annexed to SCHEDULE 6.7(b) is an estimate of the projected balance of Receivables (net of offsets) as of May 31, 2002 (the "MAY RECEIVABLES"), which estimate was based on a projection of sales and collections through May 31, 2002 prepared in May, 2002 in good faith by or on behalf of the Company (the "RECEIVABLES PROJECTION"). The May Receivables balance reflected on the Receivables Projection was prepared based on purchase orders actually received 17
by a Seller that have not been withdrawn at the time of preparation and such purchase orders include the customers' authorization to ship the relevant products upon completion of the order. (c) Annexed to SCHEDULE 6.7(c) is an estimate of the projected balance of Inventory (net of reserves) as of May 31, 2002 which estimate was based on a projection of Inventory (i) used in existing customer products and (ii) not used in existing customer products prepared in May, 2002, in good faith by or on behalf of the Company (the "INVENTORY PROJECTION"). The allocation of the May 31, 2002 Inventory balance between used in existing customer products and not used in existing customer products reflected on the Inventory Projection was prepared based on good faith estimates of anticipated Inventory usage in fulfilling customer orders. (d) Annexed to SCHEDULE 6.7(d) is an estimate of the balance of the Equipment (net of reserves) as of May 31, 2002 which estimate is based on a projection of the Equipment through May 31, 2002 prepared in good faith by or on behalf of the Company. Section 6.8 INSURANCE COVERAGE. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the Company has furnished or made available to the Purchaser or its counsel or financial advisors, a list of, and true and complete copies of, all insurance policies relating to assets or liabilities of the Purchased Entities, all of which are set forth on Schedule 6.7. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, as of the date hereof, such policies are in full force and effect, all premiums thereon from and after the Filing Date have been paid, and the Purchased Entities are otherwise in compliance in all material respects with the terms and provisions of such policies. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, as of the date hereof, there is no material claim by any Seller or any Purchased Subsidiary pending under any of such policies as to which coverage has been questioned, denied or disputed by the underwriters of such policies or bonds. Section 6.9 OWNERSHIP OF THE PURCHASED SHARES. (a) The Company is the lawful owner, beneficially and of record, of the ACT Thailand Shares, free and clear of all Liens except as set forth on Schedule 6.8(a). The delivery to Purchaser of the ACT-Thailand Shares pursuant to this Agreement will transfer to Purchaser good and valid title to the ACT-Thailand Shares free and clear of all Liens. (b) The Company is the lawful owner, beneficially and of record, of the ACT-UK Shares, free and clear of all Liens except as set forth on Schedule 6.8(b). The delivery to Purchaser of the ACT-UK Shares pursuant to this Agreement will transfer to Purchaser good and valid title to all of the issued and outstanding share capital of ACT-UK, free and clear of all Liens. Section 6.10 SHARE CAPITAL. (a) ACT-Thailand has authorized share capital of Baht 720,500,000 consisting of 72,050,000 ordinary shares of Baht 10 per share and paid up share capital of Baht 685,291,360 consisting of 68,529,136 ordinary shares, par value of Baht ten per share. All such outstanding shares of capital stock have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and subscribed. Except as set forth on Schedule 6.10(a), there are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, rights, subscriptions, claims of any character, agreements, obligations, convertible or exchangeable securities, or other commitments contingent or otherwise, relating to the share capital of, or other equity or voting interest in, ACT-Thailand, pursuant to which ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries is or may become obligated to issue, deliver or sell or cause to be issued, delivered or sold, ordinary shares, any other share capital of 18
or other equity or voting interest in, ACT-Thailand or any securities convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire, any share capital of or other equity or voting interest in, ACT-Thailand. Neither ACT-Thailand nor any of its Subsidiaries has any authorized or outstanding bonds, debentures, notes or other Indebtedness the holders of which have the right to vote (or convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire securities having the right to vote) with the stockholders of ACT-Thailand on any matter. (b) ACT-UK has authorized share capital of 1,020,001 ordinary shares of L1 per share and paid up share capital of L1,020,001 consisting of 1,020,001 ordinary shares, par value of L1 per share. All such outstanding shares of capital stock have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and subscribed. Except as set forth on Schedule 6.10(b), there are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, rights, subscriptions, claims of any character, agreements, obligations, convertible or exchangeable securities, or other commitments contingent or otherwise, relating to the share capital of, or other equity or voting interest in, ACT-UK, pursuant to which ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries is or may become obligated to issue, deliver or sell or cause to be issued, delivered or sold, ordinary shares, any other share capital of or other equity or voting interest in, ACT-UK or any securities convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire, any share capital of or other equity or voting interest in, ACT-UK. Neither ACT-UK nor any of its Subsidiaries has any authorized or outstanding bonds, debentures, notes or other Indebtedness the holders of which have the right to vote (or convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire securities having the right to vote) with the stockholders of ACT-UK on any matter. Section 6.11 SUBSIDIARIES AND INVESTMENTS. (a) Set forth on Schedule 6.10(a) is a complete and accurate list of each Subsidiary of ACT-Thailand and the jurisdiction of organization of such Subsidiaries. (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, each Subsidiary of ACT-Thailand is wholly owned by ACT-Thailand except as set forth on Schedule 6.11(b). To the knowledge of the Sellers, all of the outstanding membership interests or other equity securities or voting interests, as the case may be, of each Subsidiary of ACT-Thailand have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and are not subject to, nor were they issued in violation of, any preemptive rights, and, except as set forth on Schedule 6.11(b) are owned, of record and beneficially, by ACT-Thailand or a Subsidiary of ACT Thailand, free and clear of all Liens. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, there are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, rights, subscriptions, claims of any character, agreements, obligations, convertible or exchangeable securities, or other commitments, contingent or otherwise relating to the capital stock of, or other equity or voting interest in, any Subsidiary of ACT-Thailand or any securities convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire any membership interests of, or other equity or voting interest in, such Subsidiary, other than such rights granted to ACT-Thailand or a Subsidiary of ACT-Thailand. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, neither ACT-Thailand nor any of its Subsidiaries has any authorized or outstanding bonds, debentures, notes or other Indebtedness, the holders of which have the right to vote (or convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire securities having the right to vote) with the members of any Subsidiary of ACT-Thailand on any matter. 19
(c) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, as of the date hereof, neither ACT-Thailand nor any of its Subsidiaries owns, directly or indirectly, any capital stock of, or other equity, ownership, proprietary or voting interest in, any Person except as set forth on Schedule 6.11(c). (d) Set forth on Schedule 6.11(d) is a complete and accurate list of each Subsidiary of ACT-UK and the jurisdiction of organization of such Subsidiaries. (e) Each Subsidiary of ACT-UK is wholly-owned by ACT-UK, except as set forth on Schedule 6.11(e). To the knowledge of the Sellers, all of the outstanding membership interests or other equity securities or voting interests, as the case may be, of each Subsidiary of ACT-UK have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable and are not subject to, nor were they issued in violation of, any preemptive rights, and, except as set forth on Schedule 6.11(e) are owned, of record and beneficially, by ACT-UK or a Subsidiary of ACT-UK, free and clear of all Liens. There are no outstanding or authorized options, warrants, rights, subscriptions, claims of any character, agreements, obligations, convertible or exchangeable securities, or other commitments, contingent or otherwise relating to the capital stock of, or other equity or voting interest in, any Subsidiary of ACT-UK or any securities convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire any membership interests of, or other equity or voting interest in, such Subsidiary, other than such rights granted to ACT-UK or a Subsidiary of ACT-UK. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, neither ACT-UK nor any of its Subsidiaries has any authorized or outstanding bonds, debentures, notes or other Indebtedness, the holders of which have the right to vote (or convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire securities having the right to vote) with the members of any Subsidiary of ACT-UK on any matter. (f) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, as of the date hereof, neither ACT-UK nor any its Subsidiaries owns, directly or indirectly, any capital stock of, or other equity, ownership, proprietary or voting interest in, any Person except as set forth on Schedule 6.10(f). Section 6.12 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS OF ACT-THAILAND. (a) ACT-Thailand has furnished the Purchaser with (x) the audited consolidated balance sheet of ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries as of November 24, 2001 (the "THAI BALANCE SHEET") and the related audited consolidated statement of income, statement of change in shareholders' equity, statement of retained earnings and statements of cash flows for the year then ended, all certified by Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Taiyos and (y) the consolidated unaudited balance sheet of ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries on or about May 25, 2002 (the "THAI MAY BALANCE SHEET") and the related consolidated statement of income for the period then ended as prepared by the management of ACT-Thailand. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the financial statements referred to above, including the footnotes thereto, except as described therein, have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles of Thailand ("THAI GAAP") (other than in the case of the financial statements referred to in clause (y), which do not contain footnotes required by Thai GAAP and are subject to normal year end adjustments). (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the Thai Balance Sheet and the Thai May Balance Sheet fairly present the financial condition of ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries at the date thereof and the related statements of income, statements of changes in shareholders' equity, statements of retained earnings and statements of cash flows fairly present the results of the 20
operations and cash flows of ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries and the changes in their financial conditions for the periods indicated. Section 6.13 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS OF ACT-UK. (a) ACT-UK has furnished Purchaser with (x) the unaudited consolidated balance sheets of ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2001 (the "UK BALANCE SHEET") and the related unaudited consolidated statement of income, statement of change in shareholders' equity, statement of retained earnings and statements of cash flows for the year then ended and (y) the consolidated unaudited balance sheet of ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries as of May 31, 2002 (the "UK MAY BALANCE SHEET") and the related consolidated statement of income for the fiscal quarter then ended as prepared by the management of ACT-UK. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the financial statements referred to above, including the footnotes thereto, except as described therein, have been prepared in accordance with good accounting principles and practices generally accepted at the date hereof in the United Kingdom (including the Accounting Standards (collectively, "UK GAAP")) for companies carrying on a similar business to that of ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries (other than in the case of the financial statements referred to in clause (y), which do not contain footnotes required by UK GAAP and are subject to normal year end adjustments). (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the UK Balance Sheet and the UK May Balance Sheet fairly present the financial condition of ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries at the date thereof and the related statements of income, statements of changes in shareholders' equity, statements of retained earnings and statements of cash flows fairly present the results of the operations and cash flows of ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries and the changes in their financial conditions for the periods indicated. Section 6.14 LIABILITIES. (a) Except as set forth on Schedule 6.13(a), to the Knowledge of the Sellers, ACT-Thailand and/or any of its Subsidiaries do not have any claims, obligations, liabilities or Indebtedness, whether absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise, except (i) as set forth or reserved in the Thai May Balance Sheet or specifically disclosed in the footnotes thereto, (ii) accounts payable and accrued liabilities incurred subsequent to the Thai May Balance Sheet Date in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and that, individually and in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole and (iii) claims, obligations, liabilities and Indebtedness not required to be set forth on a balance sheet which are incurred in the ordinary course of business that would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole. (b) Except as set forth on Schedule 6.14(b), to the Knowledge of the Sellers, ACT-UK and/or any of its Subsidiaries do not have any claims, obligations, liabilities or Indebtedness, whether absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise, except (i) as set forth in the UK May Balance Sheet or specifically disclosed in the footnotes thereto, (ii) accounts payable and accrued liabilities incurred subsequent to the UK May Balance Sheet Date in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and that, individually and in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole and (iii) claims, obligations, liabilities and Indebtedness not required to be set forth on a balance sheet which are incurred in the ordinary course of business that would not 21
reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole. Section 6.15 BOOKS AND RECORDS. (a) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the respective minute books of ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries, as previously made available to Purchaser and its representatives, contain accurate records of all meetings of, and corporate action taken by (including action taken by written consent) the respective members and Boards of Directors and the shareholders of ACT-Thailand and each such Subsidiary. (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the respective minute books of ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries, as previously made available to Purchaser and its representatives, contain accurate records of all meetings of, and corporate action taken by (including action taken by written consent) the respective members and Boards of Directors and the shareholders of ACT-UK and each such Subsidiary. Section 6.16 OWNED REAL PROPERTY. (a) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, Schedule 6.16(a) contains an accurate and complete list of all real property owned in whole or in part by ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries and includes the name of the record title holder thereof and a list of all Indebtedness secured by a Lien thereon. (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, Schedule 6.15(b) contains an accurate and complete list of all real property owned in whole or in part by ACT-UK or to the Knowledge of the Sellers, any of its Subsidiaries and includes the name of the record title holder thereof and a list of all Indebtedness secured by a Lien thereon. Section 6.17 LEASED REAL PROPERTY. (a) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, Schedule 6.16(a) contains an accurate and complete list of all material leases or subleases of real property to which ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries is a party (as lessee or lessor). (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, Schedule 6.16(b) contains an accurate and complete list of all material leases or subleases of real property to which ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries is a party (as lessee or lessor). Section 6.18 MATERIAL CONTRACTS. (a) To the Knowledge of the Sellers Schedule 6.18(a) sets forth an accurate and complete list as of the date hereof of the following Contracts to which ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or by which any of them are bound: (i) all Contracts which contain restrictions with respect to payment of dividends or any other distribution in respect of the capital stock or other equity interests of ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries; (ii) all Contracts requiring future capital expenditures by ACT-Thailand or other future purchases by ACT Thailand of material, supplies, equipment or other assets or properties (other than purchase orders for inventory or supplies in the ordinary course of business) in excess of $500,000 individually; (iii) all Contracts involving Indebtedness described in clauses (i), (iii) and (v) of such definition of ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries in excess of $500,000; 22
(iv) all Contracts (including so called take-or-pay agreements) under which any Person (other than ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries) has directly or indirectly guaranteed Indebtedness in excess of $500,000 of ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries; (v) all Contracts limiting the ability of ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries to engage in any line of business or to compete with any Person; (vi) all Contracts (other than this Agreement and any agreement or instrument entered into pursuant to this Agreement) with (A) any Affiliate of ACT-Thailand (other than one of its Subsidiaries) or (B) any current or former officer or director of ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries, excluding Contracts in the ordinary course of business on an arms' length basis and normal employment arrangements; (vii) all Contracts (including letters of intent) involving the future disposition or acquisition of a business through the purchase of a substantial portion of assets or properties, or any future merger, consolidation or similar business combination transaction; and (viii) all Contracts involving any resolution or settlement of any actual or threatened litigation, arbitration, claim or other dispute, where the resolution or settlement of any such litigation, arbitration claim or other dispute resulted in future payments in excess of $100,000. (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers Schedule 6.18(b), sets forth an accurate and complete list, as of the date hereof, of the following Contracts to which ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or by which any of them are bound: (i) all Contracts which contain restrictions with respect to payment of dividends or any other distribution in respect of the capital stock or other equity interests of ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries; (ii) all Contracts requiring future capital expenditures by ACT-UK or other future purchases by ACT-UK of material, supplies, equipment or other assets or properties (other than purchase orders for inventory or supplies in the ordinary course of business) in excess of $500,000 individually; (iii) all Contracts involving Indebtedness described in clauses (i), (iii) and (v) of such definition of ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries in excess of $500,000; (iv) all Contracts (including so called take-or-pay agreements) under which any Person (other than ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries) has directly or indirectly guaranteed Indebtedness in excess of $500,000 of ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries; (v) all Contracts limiting the ability of ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries to engage in any line of business or to compete with any Person; (vi) all material Contracts (other than this Agreement and any agreement or instrument entered into pursuant to this Agreement) with (A) any Affiliate of ACT-UK (other than one of its Subsidiaries) or (B) any current or former officer or director of ACT-UK or any of 23
its Subsidiaries, excluding Contracts in the ordinary course of business on an arms' length basis and normal employment arrangements; (vii) all Contracts (including letters of intent) involving the future disposition or acquisition of business through the purchase of a substantial portion of assets or properties, or any merger, consolidation or similar business combination transaction; and (viii) all Contracts involving any resolution or settlement of any actual or threatened litigation, arbitration, claim or other dispute, where the resolution or settlement of any such litigation, arbitration claim or other dispute resulted in future payments in excess of $100,000. Section 6.19 EMPLOYEE RELATIONS. (a) Except as disclosed in Schedule 6.19(a), to the Knowledge of the Sellers, there exist no written employment, consulting, severance, indemnification or other agreements between ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries (as the employers) and any individual employee, director, officer worker or self-employed contractor of ACT-Thailand and its Subsidiaries (as the employees) that would give any such Person the right to receive any payments in excess of $100,000 from ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries as a result of this Agreement (other than under any employee benefit or group plan). (b) Except as disclosed in Schedule 6.19(b), to the Knowledge of the Sellers, there exist no written employment, consulting, severance, indemnification or other agreements between ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries (as the employers) and any individual employee, director, officer worker or self-employed contractor of ACT-UK and its Subsidiaries (as the employees) that would give any such Person the right to receive any payments in excess of $100,000 from ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries as a result of this Agreement. (other than under any employee benefit or group plan). Section 6.20 BANK ACCOUNTS AND POWERS OF ATTORNEY. (a) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, set forth on Schedule 6.20(a) is an accurate and complete list showing (i) the name of each bank in which ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries has an account or safe deposit box, the number of any such account or any such box and the names of all Persons authorized to draw thereon or to have access thereto and (ii) the names of all Persons, if any, holding powers of attorney relating to bank accounts and safe deposit boxes of ACT-Thailand or any of its Subsidiaries and a summary statement of the terms thereof. (b) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, set forth on Schedule 6.20(b) is an accurate and complete list showing (i) the name of each bank in which ACT UK or any of its Subsidiaries has an account or safe deposit box, the number of any such account or any such box and the names of all Persons authorized to draw thereon or to have access thereto and (ii) the names of all Persons, if any, holding powers of attorney relating to bank accounts and safe deposit boxes of ACT-UK or any of its Subsidiaries and a summary statement of the terms thereof. Section 6.21 EXISTING OBLIGATIONS. (a) The Company or ACT-UK has paid any and all amounts due and owing under the UK Key Employee Retention Plan (if any exists) and NatWest Facility, and has paid or properly accrued any and all amounts due and owing under the Fisher Rosemount Acquisition Agreement. 24
(b) The Company or ACT-Thailand has paid any and all amounts due and owing under the Honeywell Settlement Agreement. (c) To the Knowledge of the Sellers, the Company has paid any and all amounts due and owing on or before June 30, 2002 under the Lemelson License with respect to ACT-Thailand. Section 6.22 INACTIVE COMPANIES. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, each of GSS Array Technology Limited, Array Technology International, Inc. and Array Technology Holdings, Inc. (i) have no material assets or liabilities (other than to other Purchased Entities), (ii) are not parties to any agreements, arrangements or understandings pursuant to which they have any material obligations to any Person, (ii) do not currently conduct any business nor have they conducted any business since July 1, 2000, and (iii) are inactive entities. Section 6.23 FISHER-ROSEMOUNT ACQUISITION. No actions, suits, proceedings in equity or at law, arbitration or administrative or other proceeding by or before any Person (including, without limitation, any Governmental Authority) have been brought by ACT-UK or any Subsidiary against Fisher-Rosemount Limited pursuant to the Fisher Rosemount Acquisition Agreement. THE PURCHASER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING ANYTHING TO THE CONTRARY CONTAINED HEREIN, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN THIS ARTICLE VI AND THE SCHEDULES HERETO, THE SELLERS MAKE NO OTHER REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES WHATSOEVER (INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE), EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, WITH RESPECT TO ANY MATTER CONCERNING THE ASSIGNED ASSETS, ASSUMED CONTRACTS OR THE PURCHASED SHARES. Section 6.24 CHANGES IN EMPLOYEE BENEFITS SINCE DECEMBER 21, 2001. To the Knowledge of the Sellers, Schedule 6.23 sets forth a list for the Purchased Entities of all changes since December 21, 2001 in employees, rates of compensation, benefits and any other plan, agreement, program, policy, practice or arrangement providing employee benefits (including, without limitation, any stock purchase, stock option, fringe benefit, bonus or incentive, deferred compensation, and retirement, pension, annuity, death, assurance, insurance and any employment, collective bargaining, severance or change of control agreements, plans, programs, policies or arrangements) under which any employee or former employee has any present or future right to benefits for which any Purchased Entity has any present or future liability, other than any of the foregoing arising in the ordinary course of business in amounts not material, individual or in the aggregate, to the Purchased Entities. It is understood and agreed that in the event that the Company elects to exercise the Acquired Assets Exclusion Right, each of the above representations and warranties are terminated to the extent that they relate to the Acquired Assets. ARTICLE VII REPRESENTATIONS OF THE PURCHASER Section 7.1 REPRESENTATIONS OF THE PURCHASER. The Purchaser represents and warrants to Sellers as follows: 25
Section 7.2 EXISTENCE AND GOOD STANDING; AUTHORIZATION AND VALIDITY OF AGREEMENT. (a) The Purchaser is a corporation duly incorporated, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation. The Purchaser is, or prior to the Closing will be, duly qualified as a foreign corporation and in good standing in each jurisdiction in which such qualification is required by law, except where the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on the Purchaser. (b) The Purchaser has full corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements, to perform its obligations hereunder and thereunder and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements by the Purchaser and the consummation by the Purchaser of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby, have been duly authorized and approved by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Purchaser. This Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements have been duly executed and delivered by the Purchaser and, assuming the due execution and delivery thereof by the Sellers are valid and binding obligations of the Purchaser, enforceable against them in accordance with their respective terms, except to the extent that its enforceability may be subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and to general equitable principles, whether invoked in a proceeding in equity or at law. Section 7.3 CONSENTS AND APPROVALS; NO VIOLATIONS. Assuming (i) that any filings required under the HSR Act are made and the waiting periods thereunder have been terminated or has expired, (ii) the receipt of the requisite approvals or clearances of applicable foreign antitrust authorities, if any, and (iii) the receipt of the necessary approvals of the Bankruptcy Court (including, without limitation, the Sale Procedures Order and the Approval Order), the execution and delivery of (x) this Agreement by the Purchaser and (y) the Ancillary Agreements by the Purchaser and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby will not result in a violation or breach of, conflict with, constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default (or give rise to any right of termination, cancellation, payment or acceleration) under, or result in the creation of any Lien on any of the properties or assets of the Purchaser under (a) the charter or By-laws or other constituent documents of the Purchaser, (b) any Law or Order by which the Purchaser is bound or by which any of its properties or assets are bound (c) any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any Contract to which Purchaser is a party, or by which it or any of its properties or assets is bound and (d) will not require any filing with, or permit, consent or approval of, or the giving of any notice to, any Governmental Authority on or prior to the Closing Date, the absence of which would not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on the Purchaser. Section 7.4 LITIGATION. There is no action, suit, proceeding in equity or at law, arbitration or administrative or other proceeding by or before (or, to the knowledge of the Purchaser, any investigation by) any Person (including, without limitation, any Governmental Authority) pending or, to the knowledge of the Purchaser, threatened against or affecting the Purchaser or its assets which, if adversely determined, would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have, a Material Adverse Effect on the Purchaser. 26
Section 7.5 AVAILABLE FUNDS. The Purchaser will have sufficient funds available to it to perform all of its obligations under this Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements, including, without limitation, to pay the Purchase Price in accordance with the terms of this Agreement or the Ancillary Agreements. Section 7.6 BROKER'S OR FINDER'S FEES. No agent, broker, Person or firm acting on behalf of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates is, or will be, entitled to any commission or broker's or finder's fees from any Party, or from any Affiliate of any Party, in connection with any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the Ancillary Agreements. Section 7.7 KNOWLEDGE OF PURCHASER. To the Knowledge of the Purchaser, as of the date hereof there is no fact, event or circumstance that constitutes, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a material breach of any of the representations and warranties of the Sellers contained in Article V1. ARTICLE VIII ADDITIONAL AGREEMENTS Section 8.1 OPERATION OF PURCHASED SUBSIDIARIES. (a) Except as expressly required by this Agreement or first approved in writing by the Purchaser, and to the extent not inconsistent with the Bankruptcy Code, or any orders entered by the Bankruptcy Court in the Chapter 11 Cases or otherwise required by applicable Law, prior to the Closing each Seller shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Purchased Subsidiaries and each of their respective Subsidiaries to (x) conduct their respective operations (including their working capital and cash management practices) in the ordinary course of business and (y) use their commercially reasonable efforts to preserve intact their respective business organizations and keep available the services of their officers and employees and (z) institute commercially reasonable measures to safeguard, protect and keep secure the Acquired Assets and store them in an adequate facility and shall use commercially reasonable efforts to maintain all property, casualty and other insurance policies or suitable renewals or replacements thereof, that currently cover such assets. The Sellers shall take commercially reasonable actions necessary to maintain such facilities, maintain existing insurance policies covering such facilities and assets and comply with the terms of all applicable leases and/or sub leases of the facilities that hold the Acquired Assets. (b) In addition to the rights set forth in Section 8.1 and 8.2, during the period from execution of this Agreement to the Closing Date: (i) Seller shall permit the Purchaser and any number of its representatives (including, without limitation, its accountants, lawyers and financial advisors) to be present at the premises operated by any of the Purchased Entities and to participate in the day-to-day operations and management of the Purchased Entities; and (ii) Seller shall first obtain the consent of the Purchaser's representatives to the entry by any of the Purchased Entities into any material Contract, agreement or commitment or any material amendment to any existing Contract. (c) Except as expressly required by this Agreement or first approved in writing by the Purchaser or by Purchaser's representatives present at the premises operated by any of the Purchased Entities, and to the extent not inconsistent with the Bankruptcy Code, or any orders entered by the Bankruptcy Court in the Chapter 11 Cases or otherwise required by applicable 27
Law, during the period from execution of this Agreement to the Closing Date, each Seller shall not authorize, instruct or cause either Purchased Subsidiary and/or any of their respective Subsidiaries (whether by voting as a director or shareholder of any such Person, enforcement of the terms of any Contract with any such Person, or otherwise) to: (i) except as set forth on Schedule 8.1(b)(i), sell, lease, license, encumber or dispose of any assets or properties of any Purchased Subsidiary or any of their respective Subsidiaries other than (x) sales of inventory in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and (y) sales of other assets in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or in amounts not material, individually or in the aggregate, to a Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole; (ii) enter into any material Contract, agreement or commitment, or engage in any other material transaction which is not in the ordinary course of business; (iii) amend or restate its charter or by-laws (or comparable organizational or governing documents) or undertake any corporate restructuring; (iv) authorize for issuance, issue, sell or deliver (x) any capital stock of, or other equity or voting interest in, either Purchased Subsidiary or any of its Subsidiaries or (y) any securities convertible into, exchangeable for, or evidencing the right to subscribe for or acquire any shares of capital stock of, or other equity or voting interest in, either Purchased Subsidiary or any of its Subsidiaries, except that the Sellers may cause the transfer or registration of record ownership of any ACT Thailand Shares or ACT UK Shares paid for in full by the Company prior to the date hereof into the name of the Company; (v) declare, pay or set aside any dividend or make any distribution with respect to, or split, combine, redeem, reclassify, purchase or otherwise acquire directly, or indirectly, any shares of capital stock of, or other equity or voting interest in, either Purchased Subsidiary or any of its Subsidiaries, or make any other change in the capital structure of either Purchased Subsidiary or any of its Subsidiaries; (vi) increase the compensation or benefits payable (including, but not limited to, wages, salaries, bonuses or any other remuneration) or to become payable by either Purchased Subsidiary or any of its Subsidiaries to any director, officer or employee or any director of either Purchased Subsidiary or any of its respective Subsidiaries; (vii) incur, assume or (in a manner materially adverse to either Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole) modify any Indebtedness, except Indebtedness (x) incurred pursuant to existing credit agreements or (y) in the ordinary course of business in amounts not material to the Purchased Entities taken as a whole, or prepay any Indebtedness in excess of $100,000 for borrowed money; (viii) subject any capital stock, or other equity or voting interests of either Purchased Subsidiary or its Subsidiaries to any additional Lien (other than Permitted Liens); 28
(ix) acquire any business or Person, by merger or consolidation, purchase of substantial assets or equity interests, or by any other manner, in a single transaction or a series of related transactions; (x) make any change in any method of accounting or auditing practice other than those required by US GAAP, UK GAAP or Thai GAAP, as the case may be; (xi) make any Tax election or settle and/or compromise any Tax liability; prepare any Tax returns in a manner which is inconsistent with the past practices of such Transaction Party, with respect to the treatment of items on such returns; incur any liability for Taxes other than in the ordinary course of business; or file an amended return or a claim for refund of Taxes with respect to the income, operations or property of either Purchased Subsidiary or its Subsidiaries (subject to the last sentence of Section 8.8); (xii) plan, announce, implement or effect any reduction in force, lay-off, early retirement program, severance program or other program or effort concerning the termination of employment of employees of any Purchased Subsidiary or any of their respective Subsidiaries (other than routine employee terminations); (xiii) make any loans, advances or capital contributions to, or investments in, any other Person other than in the ordinary course of business or in amounts not material, individually or in the aggregate, to either Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole; (xiv) enter into any Contract with any Seller or any Excluded Subsidiary except in the ordinary course of business on an arm's length basis and in a manner not materially adverse to the Purchased Subsidiaries; (xv) commence any winding up, dissolution, liquidation or voluntary bankruptcy case under applicable Law; and (xvi) enter into any Contract or letter of intent (whether or not binding) with respect to, or commit or agree to do, whether or not in writing, any of the foregoing. For purposes of clarity, future payments as used in the covenants set forth in this Section 8.1 means payments after the date of this Agreement. (d) During the period from the date of this Agreement to the Closing Date, the Company shall direct the management of the Purchased Subsidiaries and their respective Subsidiaries to report on a daily basis or as otherwise requested by Purchaser to one or more designated representatives of Purchaser on any material operational matters and to report the general status of ongoing operations. (e) The Company shall direct the management of the Purchased Entities to keep, all insurance policies currently maintained with respect to the Purchased Subsidiaries and their Subsidiaries and their respective assets and properties, or suitable replacements or renewals, in full force and effect through the close of business on the Closing Date. Any insurance proceeds received by any Purchased Entity or on behalf of any Purchased Entity between the period from 29
the execution of this Agreement to the Closing Date shall not be distributed to the Sellers or if received by the Seller, shall not be used for any purpose other than for the benefit of such relevant Purchased Entity. (f) Except as expressly required by this Agreement or first approved in writing by the Purchaser, and to the extent not inconsistent with the Bankruptcy Code, or any orders entered by the Bankruptcy Court in the Chapter 11 Cases or otherwise required by applicable Law, each Seller prior to the Closing, shall not sell, lease, license, encumber or dispose of any of the Purchased Shares or any securities of their respective Subsidiaries. No representation or warranty of Sellers is made, and no breach of any covenant of Sellers shall be deemed to have occurred, with respect to any matter resulting from actions taken, caused to be taken or omitted to be taken by the Purchaser. Section 8.2 REVIEW OF THE COMPANY AND THE PURCHASED SUBSIDIARIES; CONFIDENTIALITY. In addition to the foregoing, Purchaser may, at any time prior to the Closing Date, through its representatives, review the properties, books and records of the Transaction Parties to familiarize itself with their respective businesses, and the Purchased Subsidiaries, to the extent that the same is not prohibited by applicable Law. At any time prior to the Closing, the Sellers shall permit the Purchaser and its representatives (including, without limitation, its accountants, lawyers and financial advisors) to have full access to the premises and to the books and records of the Transaction Parties during normal working hours to conduct such review and the Company shall cause the officers, employees, counsel, accountants, consultants and other representatives of the Transaction Parties to furnish Purchaser with such financial, operating and other information with respect to the business and properties of the Transaction Parties as Purchaser shall from time to time reasonably request. Such review shall not, however, affect the representations and warranties made by each of the Sellers in this Agreement or any of the other agreements executed in connection herewith or the remedies of Purchaser for breaches of those representations and warranties or any condition to the obligations of Purchaser. The Parties acknowledge that the Purchaser (or an Affiliate of the Purchaser) and the Company have entered into a Confidentiality Agreement dated March 18, 2002 (the "CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT") and the Purchaser confirms that it and its Affiliates and its representatives will comply with their respective obligations thereunder and that information obtained during any such review or otherwise will be subject to the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement. Section 8.3 REASONABLE EFFORTS; COOPERATION; CONSENTS AND APPROVALS. Subject to the Sellers' obligations to comply with any order of the Bankruptcy Court and the Sellers' carrying out the activities contemplated by the Sale Procedures, each of the Parties agrees to use its commercially reasonable efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all action to do or cause to be done, and to assist and cooperate with each other Party in doing, all things necessary, proper or advisable to consummate and make effective, in the most expeditious manner practicable, the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (in each case, to the extent that the same is within the control of such Party), including, without limitation, (i) compliance with applicable antitrust Laws in all respects (including the filing of notification and report forms pursuant to the HSR Act) and any Bankruptcy Court approvals, consents and orders, (ii) the obtaining of all necessary waivers, consents and approvals from Governmental Authorities and the making of all necessary registrations and filings and the taking of all reasonable steps 30
as may be necessary to obtain any approval or waiver from, or to avoid any action or proceeding by, any Governmental Authority, (iii) the defending of any lawsuits or any other legal proceedings whether judicial or administrative, challenging this Agreement, the Ancillary Agreements or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby and (iv) causing the conditions set forth in Articles IX and X to be satisfied. Except as otherwise contemplated by the Sale Procedures, the Sellers will use their commercially reasonable efforts to obtain from the Bankruptcy Court all orders, consents and approvals necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including without limitation, the Approval Order. Section 8.4 SALE PROCEDURES. The Sellers (a) will conduct the auction process in accordance with the Sale Procedures and (b) will not amend, waive, modify or supplement in any material respect the Sale Procedures, without the prior written consent of Purchaser (which may be withheld in its sole discretion), except as required or ordered by the Bankruptcy Court. Section 8.5 PUBLIC DISCLOSURE. Except as otherwise required by Law, as contemplated by the Sale Procedures or as may be necessary or appropriate in connection with the pending Chapter 11 Cases in respect of the Sellers, each Party and its Affiliates shall consult with the other Party and obtain such Party's agreement before issuing any press release or otherwise making any public statements with respect to this Agreement or the matters contained herein and will not issue any such press release or make any such statement prior to such consultation and agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company may as contemplated by the Sale Procedures and otherwise in furtherance of the sale of its assets, make public statements with respect to this Agreement and the matters contained herein. Section 8.6 BOOKS AND RECORDS. Until the third anniversary of the Closing Date, the Company and its Affiliates will, to the extent necessary in connection with any Taxes, without charge to Purchaser, (i) retain and, as Purchaser may reasonably request, permit Purchaser and its agents to inspect and copy all original books, records and other documents and all electronically archived data not deliverable to Purchaser at Closing related to ACT-UK and ACT-Thailand, or any of their Subsidiaries and (ii) make reasonably available to Purchaser the officers, directors, employees and agents of Company and its Affiliates. The Company and its Affiliates shall from and after the Closing Date, preserve all such original books, records and other documents and all electronically archived data related to the ACT-UK and ACT-Thailand and each of their Subsidiaries for a period of three (3) years, and thereafter, not destroy or dispose of such original books, records or other documents or any electronically archived data without giving written notice to Purchaser of such pending disposal and offering Purchaser the right to copy such information. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Section 8.6, the Company shall be entitled during such three year period to dispose of the original books, records and other documents and all electronically archived data described in such notice if Purchaser shall fail to request copies of such books, records and files within ninety (90) days after receipt of the notice described in the preceding sentence. Section 8.7 ACCESS TO RECORDS AND CERTAIN PERSONNEL. Following the Closing, (a) Purchaser shall permit Sellers and any successors or assigns, their counsel, tax advisors and other Affiliates reasonable access to (i) the financial and other books and records relating to the operation of the Purchased Entities prior to the Closing (whether in documentary or data form) 31
and (ii) the continuing employees of the Purchased Entities for any purpose relating to the sale, operation, winding down, liquidation and final administration of the Seller's remaining business or the bankruptcy estate, which access shall include (i) the right of such professionals to copy and use such documents and records relating to periods prior to the Closing as they may request, and (ii) Purchaser's copying and delivering to Sellers or their professionals such documents or records as they may request relating to periods prior to the Closing (provided, that Sellers reimburse Purchaser for the reasonable out-of-pocket expenses thereof), and (b) Purchaser shall provide the Sellers and such professionals (at no costs to the Sellers) with reasonable access to management-level employees during regular business hours to assist the Sellers in connection with the foregoing. Section 8.8 TAX REFUNDS. Any Tax refund (including any interest in respect thereof) received by the Company (or any Affiliate thereof) and any amounts of overpayments of Tax credited against Tax that the Company (or any Affiliate thereof) otherwise would be or would have been required to pay that relate to any taxable period of ACT-UK and ACT-Thailand or any of their Subsidiaries shall be for the account of Purchaser, and the Company shall pay over to Purchaser any such refund or the amount of any such credit within fifteen (15) days after receipt or entitlement thereto. The Company shall pay Purchaser interest at the rate prescribed under Section 6621(a)(1) of the Code, compounded daily, on any amount not paid when due under this Section. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Section 8.8, the Sellers shall be entitled to keep for their own account (without any payment to Purchaser or the Purchased Entities) any and all U.S. Tax refunds, Tax prepayments, overpayments, credits and the like in each case to the extent that such U.S. Tax refunds, Tax prepayments, overpayments, credits and the like relate to the U.S. state and federal Tax returns of the Sellers and their consolidated group, including but not limited to, that certain refund for U.S. Taxes of approximately $4,800,000.00 with respect to the Company, and the Sellers may do all acts and things necessary or desirable to obtain such refund. It is understood and agreed that in the event the Company elects to exercise the Acquired Assets Exclusion Right, then each of the foregoing covenants of the Sellers need not be performed by the Sellers to the extent that they relate to the Acquired Assets. ARTICLE IX CONDITIONS TO THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE PURCHASER Section 9.1 CONDITIONS TO THE PURCHASER'S OBLIGATIONS. The obligations of the Purchaser to consummate the Closing are conditioned upon the satisfaction or waiver in writing, on or prior to the Closing Date, of each of the following conditions (it being understood that in the event the Sellers elect to exercise its Acquired Assets Exclusion Right, then each of the following conditions need not be satisfied as they relate to the Acquired Assets: Section 9.2 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. The representations and warranties (taken as a whole) of the Sellers contained in this Agreement or in any Schedule, Exhibit or certificate delivered pursuant to this Agreement (x) qualified by materiality shall be true and correct in all respects without further qualification as of the Closing Date, as if made on such date (except for representations and warranties that relate to a specific date, which shall be true and correct in all respects as of such date), and (y) that are not so qualified shall be true 32
and correct in all material respects without further qualification as of the Closing Date, as if made on such date (except for representations and warranties that relate to a specific date, which shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such date), and each of the Sellers shall have delivered to the Purchaser a certificate, dated the Closing Date, to such effect; provided, that for purposes of this Section 9.2 only, the representations and warranties set forth in Sections 6.11, 6.12 and 6.13 shall be read as if such representations and warranties were not qualified as to the Knowledge of the Seller; provided, further that no breach of any representation or warranty of the Sellers shall be deemed to have occurred with respect to any matter resulting from the acts or omissions of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates. Section 9.3 PERFORMANCE OF AGREEMENTS. Each and all of the agreements of the Sellers to be performed on or prior to the Closing pursuant to the terms hereof shall have been duly performed in all material respects and each Seller shall have delivered to the Purchaser a certificate, dated the Closing Date, to such effect; provided that no failure to perform any agreement of the Sellers shall be deemed to have occurred with respect to any matter resulting from the acts or omissions of the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates. Section 9.4 NO INJUNCTION. No court or other Governmental Authority shall have issued an Order or stay pending appeal which shall then be in effect restraining or prohibiting the completion of the transactions contemplated hereby. Section 9.5 STATUTES. No Law of any kind shall have been enacted, entered, promulgated or enforced by any Governmental Authority which prohibits, or has the effect of making illegal, the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby. Section 9.6 GOVERNMENTAL AND OTHER APPROVALS. All material governmental consents and approvals necessary to permit the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall have been obtained and delivered to Purchaser. All filings under the HSR Act shall have been made and any required waiting period under such laws (including any extensions thereof obtained by request or other action of any Governmental Authority) applicable to the transactions contemplated hereby shall have expired or been earlier terminated. Section 9.7 BANKRUPTCY MATTERS. The Bankruptcy Court shall have entered (i) the Sale Procedures Order and (ii) the Approval Order; and the Approval Order shall not have been stayed, reversed or modified in a manner materially adverse to the Purchaser. Section 9.8 FIRPTA CERTIFICATE. Each of the Sellers shall furnish to Purchaser, on or before the Closing Date, a copy of a statement, dated not more than thirty (30) days prior to the Closing Date, issued by such Seller pursuant to Treasury Regulations 1.1445-2(b), certifying as to such Seller's non-foreign status. Section 9.9 NO MATERIAL ADVERSE CHANGE. Since the date hereof, there shall have been no Material Adverse Change with respect to either Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and no events, facts or circumstances shall have occurred which could reasonably be expected to result, individually or in the aggregate, in a Material Adverse Change with respect to either Purchased Subsidiary and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, 33
and the Company shall have delivered to Purchaser a certificate, dated the Closing Date, to such effect. Section 9.10 RELEASE OF LIENS. All (i) Liens on the Purchased Shares and (ii) Liens arising under the Credit Agreement and the DIP Credit Agreement on the assets or shares of any of the Purchased Entities shall have been released and are of no further force and effect and the Purchaser shall have received copies of termination statements and other documents reasonably satisfactory to Purchaser that all such Liens have been released and are of no further force and effect effective on or before the Closing Date. Section 9.11 LEMELSON SUBLICENSE FOR ACT-THAILAND AND ACT UK. The Company shall grant, or shall cause any assignee of the Lemelson License to grant, a fully-paid, non-exclusive sublicense on an "as-is" basis to ACT-Thailand (or Purchaser solely as the acquirer of ACT-Thailand) of its rights pursuant to the Lemelson License on terms and conditions reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser solely to the extent permitted by the terms and conditions specified in the Lemelson License (including Purchaser's acknowledgement that the Company will assign the Lemelson License). Section 9.12 NATWEST FACILITY. The NatWest Facility shall have been terminated and all amounts due and owing pursuant to the NatWest Facility shall have been paid and the Purchaser shall have received copies of documents, in a form reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser, from NatWest Bank confirming that (i) any and all amounts due and owing pursuant to the NatWest Facility have been paid and the NatWest Facility has been terminated, and (ii) an acknowledgement that consent of NatWest to any sale of shares of ACT UK is not required. Section 9.13 ASSUMED CONTRACTS. The Purchaser shall have received the consent by Emerson to the assignment and assumption of the Assumed Contracts to the Purchaser. ARTICLE X CONDITIONS TO THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE SELLERS Section 10.1 CONDITIONS TO THE SELLERS' OBLIGATIONS. The obligations of the Sellers to consummate the Closing are conditioned upon the satisfaction or waiver in writing (subject to applicable Law), on or prior to the Closing Date, of each of the following conditions (it being understood that in the event the Sellers elect to exercise its Acquired Assets Exclusion Right, then each of the following conditions need not be satisfied as they relate to the Acquired Assets: Section 10.2 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. The representations and warranties (taken as a whole) of the Purchaser contained in this Agreement or in any Schedule, Exhibit or certificate delivered pursuant to this Agreement (x) qualified by materiality shall be true and correct in all respects without further qualification as of the Closing Date, as if made on such date (except for representations and warranties that relate to a specific date, which shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such date), and (y) that are not so qualified shall be true and correct in all material respects without further qualification as of the Closing Date, as if made on such date (except for representations and warranties that relate to a specific date, which shall be true and correct in all material respects as of such date), and the Purchaser shall have delivered to the Sellers a certificate, dated the Closing Date, to such effect. 34
Section 10.3 PERFORMANCE OF AGREEMENTS. Each and all of the agreements of the Purchaser to be performed on or prior to the Closing pursuant to the terms hereof shall have been duly performed in all material respects, and the Purchaser shall have delivered to the Sellers a certificate, dated the Closing Date, to such effect. Section 10.4 NO INJUNCTION. No court or other Government Authority shall have issued an Order or stay pending appeal which shall then be in effect restraining or prohibiting the completion of the transactions contemplated hereby. Section 10.5 STATUTES. No Law of any kind shall have been enacted, entered, promulgated or enforced by any Governmental Authority which prohibits, or has the effect of making illegal, the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby. Section 10.6 GOVERNMENTAL APPROVALS. All material governmental consents and approvals necessary to permit the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall have been obtained. All filings under the HSR Act shall have been made and any required waiting period under such laws (including any extensions thereof obtained by request or other action of any Governmental Authority) applicable to the transactions contemplated hereby shall have expired or been earlier terminated. Section 10.7 BANKRUPTCY MATTERS. The Bankruptcy Court shall have entered (i) the Sale Procedures Order and (ii) the Approval Order and the Approval Order shall not have been stayed, reversed or modified in a manner materially adverse to the Sellers, taken as a whole. ARTICLE XI NON-SURVIVAL OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES; TERMINATION Section 11.1 NO SURVIVAL OF REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES. Subject to Section 11.5, all covenants to be performed prior to the Closing, and all the representations and warranties of the Parties in this Agreement or in any certificate or instrument delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall terminate and shall not survive beyond the Closing Date and none of the Parties will have any liability therefor after the Closing; provided, that the covenants set forth in Sections 8.6 shall survive their stated term and the covenants set forth in Sections 2.4, 8.7, 8.8 and 12.2 shall survive until the expiration of the applicable statutory period of limitations. The Confidentiality Agreement shall survive any termination of this Agreement. Section 11.2 EVENTS OF TERMINATION. This Agreement may be terminated and the transactions contemplated hereby may be abandoned at any time on or after the date hereof and prior to the Closing: (a) by mutual written consent of the Parties; (b) by the Purchaser, if the Closing shall not have occurred by August 15, 2002 (or such later date as shall be agreed to in writing by the Purchaser) or by the Company, on behalf of the Sellers, if the Closing shall not have occurred by September 15, 2002 (or such later date as shall be agreed to in writing by the Company); PROVIDED that if the Closing shall not have occurred because any required waiting period under the HSR Act (including any extensions thereof obtained by request or other action of any Government Authority) applicable to the 35
transactions contemplated hereby shall have not expired or been terminated then the parties agree to extend the date by which Closing must have occurred to a date after such required waiting period shall have expired or been terminated; PROVIDED, that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 11.2(b) shall not be available to the Party seeking to terminate this Agreement if the failure to close under this Agreement on or before such date is a result of a willful breach of this Agreement by such Party; (c) by the Company, on behalf of the Sellers, if there has been a breach of any covenant or a breach of any representation or warranty of the Purchaser (other than the representations and warranties contained in Section 7.6), which breach would cause the failure of any condition set forth in Article X; PROVIDED, that any such breach has not been cured within ten (10) Business Days following receipt by the Purchaser of written notice of such breach; (d) by the Purchaser, if there has been a breach of any covenant or a breach of any representation or warranty of any Seller, which breach would cause the failure of any condition set forth in Article IX; PROVIDED, that any such breach has not been cured within ten (10) Business Days following receipt by such Seller of written notice of such breach; and PROVIDED, FURTHER, that the Purchaser shall not be entitled to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this Section 11.2(d) if (x) the Purchaser or any of its Affiliates causes the failure of any such condition or (y) in connection with an alleged breach of Section 6.11, 6.12 or 6.13, the Sellers can prove that there was an event, fact or circumstance that was Known to the Purchaser as of the date hereof that constituted, or would reasonably be expected to result in, a breach of any of the representations and warranties of the Sellers contained in Section 6.11, 6.12 or 6.13; (e) by the Purchaser or the Company, on behalf of the Sellers, if there shall be any Law of any Governmental Authority that makes consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby illegal or otherwise prohibited or if any judgment, injunction or decree of any competent authority prohibiting such transactions is entered and such judgment, injunction or decree shall have become final and non-appealable, PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that neither the Purchaser nor the Company may terminate this Agreement pursuant to this Section 11.2(e) unless the party seeking to so terminate this Agreement has used commercially reasonable efforts to oppose any such Governmental Authority judgment, injunction or decree or to have such Governmental judgment, injunction order or decree vacated or made inapplicable to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (f) by the Purchaser, if the Approval Order has not been entered in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Purchaser on or prior to July 9, 2002, or such other date agreed to by Purchaser in writing; or (g) by the Purchaser, if the Chapter 11 cases are converted to cases under Chapter 7 of the Bankruptcy Code. Section 11.3 EFFECT OF TERMINATION. Except as otherwise provided in this Section 11.3, in the event that this Agreement shall be terminated in accordance with Section 11.2, all obligations of the Parties under this Agreement shall terminate without further liability of any Party hereunder. Upon termination of this Agreement (other than a termination by the Company under Section 11.2(c) or termination by the Company under Section 11.2(b) in the event the 36
failure to close under this Agreement is a result of a willful breach of this Agreement by the Purchaser), the Deposit and all accrued interest and other earnings thereon shall be released to the Purchaser in accordance with the terms of the Escrow Agreement. Upon termination by the Company under Section 11.2(c) or termination by the Company under Section 11.2(b) in the event the failure to close under this Agreement is a result of a willful breach of this Agreement by the Purchaser, the Deposit and all accrued interest and other earnings thereon shall be delivered to the Company in accordance with the terms of the Escrow Agreement and any and all rights of the Purchaser in and to the Deposit and all accrued interest and other earnings thereon shall be extinguished. Section 11.4 EXCLUSIVE REMEDY. The provisions of Section 11.3 shall be the exclusive remedy of the non-breaching party in the event that this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 11.2. Section 11.5 NON-LIMITATIONS OF REMEDIES. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement to the contrary, nothing contained in this Article XI shall limit the remedies of the Parties after the Closing for breaches of representations and warranties resulting from fraud or intentional misrepresentation by any of the other Parties or the willful breach or willful failure of the other Parties to perform any covenant or agreement contained herein. ARTICLE XII MISCELLANEOUS Section 12.1 EXPENSES; FEES. Each of the Parties shall pay all of its own expenses relating to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including, without limitation, the fees and expenses of their respective counsel, financial advisors and accountants. The Purchaser shall be responsible for HSR Act filing fees and any other fees related to any other applicable antitrust Laws in respect of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Section 12.2 TRANSFER TAXES. In the event, notwithstanding the operation of Section 1146 of the Bankruptcy Code, that Transfer Taxes are assessed for any reason, then the Purchaser shall bear the cost of such Transfer Taxes along with any recording and filing fees. The Purchaser and the Sellers agree to cooperate to determine the amount of Transfer Taxes payable in connection with the transactions contemplated under this Agreement. The Purchaser shall bear the cost of any sales or use tax that may be imposed as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The Sellers agree to cooperate with Purchaser to the extent that Purchaser reasonably requests Sellers' participation in obtaining an exemption from any sales or use tax that would otherwise be imposed as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The Purchaser and the Sellers agree to cooperate in the preparation and filing of any and all required returns for or with respect to such Transfer Taxes and/or sales or use taxes with any and all appropriate taxing authorities. It is expressly agreed and understood that the Sellers intend to seek Bankruptcy Court approval to exempt the transactions contemplated by this Agreement under Bankruptcy Code Section 1146(c) such that the transaction will, to the extent possible, not be the subject of any transfer tax, stamp or similar tax. Section 12.3 APPLICABLE LAW. THIS AGREEMENT IS TO BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH U.S. FEDERAL BANKRUPTCY LAW, TO THE 37
EXTENT APPLICABLE, AND OTHERWISE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS SHALL GOVERN, WITHOUT REFERENCE TO CHOICE OF LAW PRINCIPLES, INCLUDING ALL MATTERS OF CONSTRUCTION, VALIDITY AND PERFORMANCE. Section 12.4 JURISDICTION; WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL. (a) THE BANKRUPTCY COURT WILL HAVE JURISDICTION OVER ANY AND ALL DISPUTES BETWEEN OR AMONG THE PARTIES, WHETHER IN LAW OR EQUITY, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY AGREEMENT CONTEMPLATED HEREBY; PROVIDED THAT IF THE BANKRUPTCY COURT IS UNWILLING OR UNABLE TO HEAR ANY SUCH DISPUTE, THE COURTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS AND THE FEDERAL COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN THE COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS WILL HAVE SOLE JURISDICTION OVER ANY AND ALL DISPUTES BETWEEN OR AMONG THE PARTIES, WHETHER IN LAW OR EQUITY, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY AGREEMENT CONTEMPLATED HEREBY. (b) EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY. Section 12.5 CAPTIONS; HEADINGS; TABLE OF CONTENTS. The Article and Section captions and the headings and table of contents set forth herein are for reference purposes only, and shall not in any way affect the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. Section 12.6 NOTICES. All notices, requests, demands, waivers and other communications required or permitted to be given under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given (i) five (5) Business Days following deposit in the mails within the continental United States if sent by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, (ii) when sent, if sent by facsimile transmission, if receipt thereof is confirmed by telephone, (iii) when delivered, if delivered personally to the intended recipient and (iv) two (2) Business Days following deposit within the continental United States with a nationally recognized overnight courier service, in each case addressed as follows: (a) if to the Sellers, to: ACT Manufacturing, Inc. 2 Cabot Road Hudson, Massachusetts 01749 Attention: John A. Pino Tel.: (978) 567-4000 Fax: (978) 567-4099 with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to: Testa, Hurwitz & Thibeault, LLP 125 High Street 38
Boston, Massachusetts 02110 Attention: John A. Meltaus, Esq. Tel.: (617) 248-7000 Fax: (617) 248-7100 with a further copy (which shall not constitute notice) to: Mintz Levin Cohen Ferris, Glovsky & Popeo PC One Financial Center Boston, Massachusetts 02111 Attention: Richard E. Mikels, Esq. Tel.: (617) 542-6000 Fax: (617) 542-2241 (b) if to the Purchaser or the Guarantor, to: Benchmark Electronics, Inc. 3000 Technology Drive Angleton, Texas 77515 Attention: Anh Tran, Corporate Counsel Tel.: (979) 848-5247 Fax: (979) 848-5225 with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to: Foley Hoag LLP 155 Seaport Boulevard Boston, Massachusetts 02210-2600 Attention: Edward N. Gadsby, Jr. Tel.: 617-832-1123 Fax: 617-832-7000 or to such other Person or address as any Party shall specify by notice in writing to each of the other Parties. All such notices, requests, demands, waivers and communications shall be deemed to have been received on the date set forth above except for a notice of a change of address, which shall be effective only upon receipt thereof. Section 12.7 ASSIGNMENT; PARTIES IN INTEREST. This Agreement may not be transferred, assigned, pledged or hypothecated by any Party, other than by operation of Law; provided, that the Purchaser may, without the prior consent of any of the other Parties, transfer or assign, in whole or from time to time in part, to one or more of its Affiliates, the right to purchase all or a portion of the Assumed Contracts and/or the Purchased Shares subject to such assignee(s) agreement in writing addressed to the Sellers to be bound by Purchaser's obligations hereunder, but no such transfer or assignment will relieve the Purchaser of its obligations hereunder. This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the Parties and their respective successors and permitted assigns. 39
Section 12.8 COUNTERPARTS. This Agreement may be executed in two (2) or more counterparts, in original form or by facsimile, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same document. Section 12.9 ENTIRE AGREEMENT. This Agreement, including the Exhibits, Schedules and other documents referred to herein which form a part hereof, and the Ancillary Agreements and the Confidentiality Agreement, contains the entire understanding of the Parties with respect to the subject matter contained herein and therein. This Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements supersede all prior agreements and understandings between the Parties with respect to such subject matter, other than the Confidentiality Agreement. Section 12.10 SEVERABILITY; ENFORCEMENT. The invalidity of any portion hereof shall not affect the validity, force or effect of the remaining portions hereof. If it is ever held that any restriction hereunder is too broad to permit enforcement of such restriction to its fullest extent, each Party agrees that a court of competent jurisdiction may enforce such restriction to the maximum extent permitted by law, and each Party hereby consents and agrees that such scope may be judicially modified accordingly in any proceeding brought to enforce such restriction. Section 12.11 AMENDMENTS, WAIVER. This Agreement may not be changed orally, but only by an agreement in writing signed by all Parties. Any provision of this Agreement can be waived, amended, supplemented or modified by written agreement of the Parties. The failure of any Party to enforce at any time any of the provisions of this Agreement shall in no way be construed to be a waiver of any such provision, nor in any way to affect the validity of this Agreement or any part hereof or the right of such Party thereafter to enforce each and every such provision. No waiver of any breach of or non-compliance with this Agreement shall be held to be a waiver of any other or subsequent breach or non-compliance. Section 12.12 NO STRICT CONSTRUCTION. The Parties hereto have participated jointly in the negotiation and drafting of this Agreement. In the event any ambiguity or question of intent or interpretation arises, this Agreement shall be construed as if drafted jointly by all of the Parties, and no presumption or burden of proof shall arise favoring or disfavoring any Party by virtue of the authorship of any provision of this Agreement. Section 12.13 THIRD PARTY BENEFICIARIES. Other than with respect to Section 2.4, each Party intends that this Agreement shall not benefit or create any right or cause of action in or on behalf of any Person other than the Parties. ********* 40
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the Parties has caused this Agreement to be executed by its officers thereunto duly authorized, all as of the day and year first above written. BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. By: /s/ CARY T. FU --------------------------------- Name: Cary T. Fu Title: President ACT MANUFACTURING, INC. By: /s/ JOHN A. PINO --------------------------------- Name: John A. Pino Title: Chief Executive Officer ACT MANUFACTURING SECURITIES CORP. By: /s/ JOHN A. PINO --------------------------------- Name: John A. Pino Title: Chief Executive Officer ACT MANUFACTURING U.S. HOLDINGS, LLC By: /s/ JOHN A. PINO --------------------------------- Name: John A. Pino Title: Chief Executive Officer CMC INDUSTRIES, INC. By: /s/ JOHN A. PINO --------------------------------- Name: John A. Pino Title: Chief Executive Officer 41
EXHIBIT A FORM OF BILL OF SALE Pursuant to the entry of the appropriate order by the Bankruptcy Court, ACT Manufacturing, Inc., a Massachusetts corporation, ACT Manufacturing Securities Corp., a Massachusetts corporation, ACT Manufacturing U.S. Holdings, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company and CMC Industries Inc., a Delaware corporation (collectively, the "Sellers"), and pursuant to the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement dated as of June 11, 2002 (the "Asset and Share Purchase Agreement") by and between the Sellers and Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the "Purchaser"), the Sellers, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, do hereby sell, transfer, convey, assign and deliver to the Purchaser on the Closing Date, all of the Sellers' right, title and interest in, to and under the Acquired Assets, free and clear of all Liens other than Permitted Liens. Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning given to them in the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement. Sellers, for themselves, their successors and assigns, irrevocably constitute and appoint the Purchaser, its successors and assigns, and each of them, the true and lawful attorney of Sellers, their successors and assigns, with full power of substitution and give and grant unto the Purchaser, its successors and assigns, and each of them, full power and authority in the name of Sellers, their successors and assigns, at any time and from time to time, to demand, sue for, recover and receive any and all rights, demands, claims and causes of action of every kind and description whatsoever incident or relating to the Acquired Assets, for the purpose of fully vesting in the Purchaser, its successors and assigns, all and singular, all the right, title and interest in and to the Acquired Assets. To the extent that the assignment to the Purchaser of any Assumed Contract pursuant to the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement is not permitted without the consent of another Person and such restriction cannot be effectively overridden or canceled by the Approval Order, or other related order of the Bankruptcy Court, then the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement and this Bill of Sale will not be deemed to constitute an assignment of or an undertaking or attempt to assign the same or any right or interest therein if such consent is not given; PROVIDED, that the Sellers and the Purchaser will use commercially reasonable efforts, both before and for a six (6) month period after the Closing, to obtain all such consents; PROVIDED FURTHER, that if any such consents are not obtained prior to the Closing, the Sellers will, at the Purchaser's request and at the Company's expense (other than required payments under the relevant Assumed Contract, which shall be paid by the Purchaser), reasonably cooperate with the Purchaser in any lawful and feasible arrangement designed to provide the Purchaser for a six (6) month period following the Closing with the benefits and obligations of any such contract, agreement, license, permit or authorization. This Bill of Sale shall be governed by and construed in accordance with 11 U.S.C. Sections 101, ET SEQ., to the extent applicable, and where state law is implicated, the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall govern, without reference to choice of law principles, including all matters of construction, validity and performance. 42
If there is any conflict as to the terms of this Bill of Sale and the terms of the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement, then the terms of the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement shall prevail. This Bill of Sale shall be binding upon the Sellers and their respective successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of the Purchaser and its successors and permitted assigns. The covenants of the Sellers contained herein shall survive the execution and delivery of this Bill of Sale in accordance with the terms of the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the undersigned has caused this Bill of Sale to be duly executed by its duly authorized officer, all as of the ___ day of [___________]. ACT MANUFACTURING, INC. By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: ACT MANUFACTURING SECURITIES CORP. By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: ACT MANUFACTURING U.S. HOLDINGS, LLC By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: CMC INDUSTRIES, INC. By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: 43
EXHIBIT B FORM OF ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT Pursuant to the entry of the appropriate order by the Bankruptcy Court, THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT dated as of [__________], 2002 (this "Assignment and Assumption Agreement") by and between Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the "Purchaser") and ACT Manufacturing, Inc., a Massachusetts corporation, ACT Manufacturing Securities Corp., a Massachusetts corporation, ACT Manufacturing U.S. Holdings, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company and CMC Industries Inc., a Delaware corporation (collectively, the "Sellers"), is entered into pursuant to the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement dated as of ________, 2002 by and between the Purchaser, and the Sellers (the "Asset and Share Purchase Agreement"). Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning given to them in the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement. For good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, and in accordance with the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement, the Sellers hereby convey, transfer, assign and deliver to the Purchaser the Assumed Contracts, and the Purchaser hereby assumes and agrees to pay, perform and discharge promptly and fully when due, the Assumed Liabilities. The Purchaser and the Sellers agree that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Assignment and Assumption Agreement or in the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement, that other than the Assumed Liabilities, the Purchaser is not assuming, and the Sellers are not assigning, any liabilities, commitments or obligations of any kind whatsoever of any Seller or any Excluded Subsidiary, including without limitation, any Indebtedness of such Person (the "Excluded Liabilities"), which Excluded Liabilities shall remain the exclusive responsibility of the Sellers. To the extent that the assignment to the Purchaser of any Assumed Contract pursuant to the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement is not permitted without the consent of another Person and such restriction cannot be effectively overridden or canceled by the Approval Order, or other related order of the Bankruptcy Court, then the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement and this Assignment and Assumption Agreement will not be deemed to constitute an assignment of or an undertaking or attempt to assign the same or any right or interest therein if such consent is not given; PROVIDED, that the Sellers and the Purchaser will use commercially reasonable efforts, both before and for a sixty (60) day period after the Closing, to obtain all such consents; PROVIDED FURTHER, that if any such consents are not obtained prior to the Closing, the Sellers will, at the Purchaser's request and the Company's expense (other than required payments under the relevant Assumed Contract, which shall be paid by the Purchaser), reasonably cooperate with the Purchaser for a sixty (60) day period following the Closing in any lawful and feasible arrangement designed to provide the Purchaser with the benefits and obligations of any such contract, agreement, license, permit or authorization. This Assignment and Assumption Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with 11 U.S.C. Sections 101, ET SEQ., to the extent applicable, and where state law is 44
implicated, the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall govern, without reference to choice of law principles, including all matters of construction, validity and performance. If there is any conflict as to the terms of this Assignment and Assumption Agreement and the terms of the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement, then the terms of the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement shall prevail. This Assignment and Assumption Agreement shall be binding upon the Purchaser and its successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of the Sellers and their respective successors and assigns. The covenants of the Purchaser contained herein shall survive the execution and delivery of this Assignment and Assumption Agreement in accordance with the terms of the Asset and Share Purchase Agreement. This Assignment and Assumption Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, in original form or by facsimile, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument. [REMAINDER OF PAGE INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK] 45
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each of the undersigned has caused this Assignment and Assumption Agreement to be duly executed by its duly authorized officer, all as of the day and year first written above. BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: ACT MANUFACTURING, INC. By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: ACT MANUFACTURING SECURITIES CORP. By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: ACT MANUFACTURING U.S. HOLDINGS, LLC By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: CMC INDUSTRIES, INC. By: --------------------------------- Name: Title: 46
EXHIBIT C SALES PROCEDURES ORDER 47
EXHIBIT D APPROVAL ORDER 48

Exhibit 99.1 PRESS RELEASE FOR MORE INFORMATION CALL: GAYLA J. DELLY CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER JULY 2, 2002 (979) 849-6550 FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS TO BUY THE THAILAND AND UK OPERATIONS OF ACT MANUFACTURING, INC. ANGLETON, TX, JULY 2, 2002 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) and ACT Manufacturing, Inc. (OTC Pink Sheets:ACTMQ) today announced that they have signed a Stock Purchase Agreement in which Benchmark will acquire the stock of ACT Manufacturing Thailand Public Company Limited (Thailand) and ACT Manufacturing UK Ltd. (UK). In previous press releases, ACT Manufacturing, Inc. announced that it had entered into a voluntary Chapter 11 bankruptcy process and had received court approval to conduct an auction process, at which Benchmark prevailed. The transaction has been approved today by the United States Bankruptcy Court for the District of Massachusetts. The transaction is currently expected to close in July 2002, subject to certain closing conditions. The purchase price of $45.2 million will be funded through Benchmark's currently available cash. The transaction includes the assumption of approximately $15 million of net debt under an interest-bearing debt facility. Based on recent financial information, Benchmark currently expects annual revenues from this acquisition to be between $180 and $200 million. On that basis, the transaction is currently expected to be slightly accretive to Benchmark's 2002 earnings, before any one-time transaction and related charges. Cary T. Fu, President and Chief Operating Officer of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., said "These acquisitions meet several of our long range strategic objectives. They will provide Benchmark with a strong high-technology manufacturing presence in Asia and several new customers in the medical, telecommunications and industrial control industries." Cary Fu added, "Both Benchmark and ACT have very customer-focused cultures. We welcome our new customers, employees and suppliers and are committed to
achieving a smooth transition." John Pino, Chief Executive Officer of ACT Manufacturing, Inc., said, "We are very pleased with the results of our court approved auction process and are extremely excited that Benchmark has emerged as the successful bidder to acquire our Thailand and UK business operations." He added, "Benchmark's financial strength and engineering expertise will provide excellent opportunities for ACT's customers, employees and suppliers." This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. ABOUT BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics an provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of telecommunication equipment, computers and related products for business enterprises, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products and medical devices. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in six countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE. ABOUT ACT MANUFACTURING, INC. ACT Manufacturing, Inc., with headquarters in Hudson, Massachusetts, provides electronics manufacturing services to equipment manufacturers in networking and telecommunications, computer and industrial and medical equipment markets. ACT provides OEMs with complex printed circuit board assembly primarily utilizing advanced surface mount technology, electro-mechanical subassembly, total system assembly and integration, mechanical and molded cable and harness assembly and other value-added services. # # # # #


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20020718112906.txt.gz
TIME:20020718112906
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 18, 2002 BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) TEXAS 1-10560 74-2211011 (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (I.R.S. Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 3000 TECHNOLOGY DRIVE, ANGLETON, TEXAS 77515 (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (979) 849-6550
Item 5. Other Events. On July 18, 2002, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing its revenues and earnings for the second quarter 2002 and a greenfield operation in Suzhou, China. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits. (c) Exhibits. The following material is furnished pursuant to item 5 as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K. S I G N A T U R E Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. Dated: July 18, 2002 By: /s/ DONALD E. NIGBOR --------------------------------------- Donald E. Nigbor Chief Executive Officer

Exhibit 99.1 PRESS RELEASE FOR MORE INFORMATION, CALL: GAYLA J. DELLY CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER JULY 18, 2002 (979) 849-6550 FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS SEQUENTIAL QUARTERLY INCREASES IN REVENUES AND EARNINGS FOR SECOND QUARTER 2002 ANGLETON, TX, JULY 18, 2002- Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced sales revenue of $404.4 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2002 compared to $329.2 million in the previous quarter and $317.4 million in the same quarter of the prior year. Second quarter net income was $8.3 million on a GAAP basis, compared to $5.3 million net income in the prior quarter and to net income, excluding amortization of goodwill and restructuring charges, net of tax, of $2.4 million for the same quarter in the previous year. Diluted earnings per share on a GAAP basis was $0.33 for the second quarter of 2002, compared to $0.26 per share for the previous quarter and $0.12 cash earnings per share (excluding amortization of goodwill and restructuring charges, net of tax) for the same quarter in the previous year. During the quarter ended June 30, 2002, GAAP earnings and cash earnings per share are equal as no restructuring charges were incurred or goodwill amortization was recorded during the period. "Over the past year we remained focused on one of our key business strategies, expansion in Asia. Our team is excited about our recently announced acquisition of the ACT Thailand and UK operations. We are also pleased to announce our greenfield operation in Suzhou, China which we expect to commence production in the fourth quarter this year," commented Donald E. Nigbor, Chief Executive Officer of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
PR July 18, 2002 Page 2 QUARTERLY FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS o Cash generated from operations was $47 million in the second quarter and $73 million for the six month period ended June 30th. o Second quarter revenue grew by 23% over first quarter 2002. o Accounts receivables increased by $5.8 million to $191.6 million in the second quarter from $185.8 million in the first quarter. Calculated days sales outstanding improved to 43 days from 51 days in the previous quarter. o Inventories decreased to $195.7 million in the quarter from $196.8 million for the first quarter 2002. Inventory turns improved to 7.6 for the quarter from 6.2 for the first quarter. THIRD QUARTER 2002 GUIDANCE We expect to close the acquisition of the ACT Thailand and UK operations in the middle of the third quarter. Based on current customer indications and including contributions for part of the quarter from the ACT Thailand and UK operations, the Company expects third quarter 2002 revenues to range from $420 million to $430 million, with corresponding earnings per share of $0.34 to $0.37, excluding any one-time transaction and related charges associated with the acquisition. This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of telecommunication equipment, computers and related products for business enterprises, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products and medical
PR July 18, 2002 Page 3 devices. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in six countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE. A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am CDT to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com. ###
PR July 18, 2002 Page 4 Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries Consolidated Statements of Income (Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data) (UNAUDITED)
PR July 18, 2002 Page 4 Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet June 30, 2002 (Amounts in Thousands) (UNAUDITED)
Assets - ------ Current assets: Cash $ 225,976 Accounts receivable, net 191,585 Inventories, net 195,682 Other current assets 29,849 --------- Total current assets 643,092 Property, plant and equipment, net 80,733 Other assets, net 15,031 Goodwill, net 119,506 --------- Total assets $ 858,362 ========= Liabilities and Shareholders' Equity - ------------------------------------ Current liabilities: Current installments of other long-term debt $ 23,415 Accounts payable 188,988 Other current liabilities 37,836 --------- Total current liabilities 250,239 Revolving line of credit - Convertible subordinated notes 80,200 Other long-term debt, excluding current installments 32,514 Other long-term liabilities 18,702 Shareholders' equity 476,707 --------- Total liabilities and shareholders' equity $ 858,362 =========


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20020813171555.txt.gz
TIME:20020813171555
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
(c)
Exhibits.
The following material is furnished pursuant to item 9 as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure
On August 13, 2002, Donald E. Nigbor and Gayla J. Delly, the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., each submitted sworn statements to the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) as required by the Order Requiring Filing of Sworn Statements Pursuant to Section 21(a)(1) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (Order No. 4-460) issued by the SEC on June 27, 2002. Conformed copies of the sworn statements are attached hereto as Exhibits (99.1 and 99.2). The information in this report and the exhibits attached hereto are being furnished pursuant to Regulation FD of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
QuickLinks
S I G N A T U R E

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Exhibit 99.1
STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS
I, Donald E. Nigbor, Chief Executive Officer of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., state and attest that:
(1)
To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report:
 - 
no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and
 - 
no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed).
(2)
I have reviewed the contents of this statement with the Company's audit committee.
(3)
In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report":
 - 
December 31, 2001 Annual Report on Form 10-K of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
 - 
all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and
 - 
any amendments to any of the foregoing.
QuickLinks
Exhibit 99.1
STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Exhibit 99.2
STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS
I, Gayla J. Delly, Chief Financial Officer of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., state and attest that:
(1)
To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report:
 - 
no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and
 - 
no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed).
(2)
I have reviewed the contents of this statement with the Company's audit committee.
(3)
In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report":
 - 
December 31, 2001 Annual Report on Form 10-K of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
 - 
all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and
 - 
any amendments to any of the foregoing.
QuickLinks
Exhibit 99.2
STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20021011162037.txt.gz
TIME:20021011162037
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K/A AMENDED CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 29, 2002 BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) TEXAS 1-10560 74-2211011 (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (I.R.S. Employer of incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 3000 TECHNOLOGY DRIVE, ANGLETON, TEXAS 77515 (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code: (979) 849-6550
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS On August 13, 2002, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the "Company" or "Benchmark") filed a current report on Form 8-K to report the acquisition of ACT Thailand Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited ("ACT Thailand") and ACT Manufacturing Holdings UK Limited ("ACT UK"). Pursuant to Item 7(a)(4) of Form 8-K, the Company indicated that it would file certain financial information under Item 7 of Form 8-K no later than October 11, 2002. This amendment is filed to provide the required financial information and to amend the language of Section (a) of Item 7. (a) Financial statements of business acquired. The required financial information of ACT Thailand has been included hereto in Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2 to the Amended Current Report on Form 8-K/A. (b) Pro forma financial information. The required pro forma financial information included in this Amended Current Report on Form 8-K/A, which gives effect to the acquisition of ACT Thailand, is as follows: PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION (c) Exhibits. The following exhibits are filed with this Amended Current Report on Form 8-K/A: 1
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS: This filing contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. 2
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES UNAUDITED PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED FINANCIAL INFORMATION The following unaudited pro forma combined condensed financial statements are not necessarily indicative of the combined results of operations for future periods or the results of operations that would have been realized had the Company and ACT Thailand been combined during the periods specified. The unaudited pro forma combined condensed financial statements and the related notes should be read in conjunction with the historical financial statements of Benchmark and ACT Thailand. On July 29, 2002, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. ("Benchmark") completed its previously announced acquisition (the "Acquisition") of all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of ACT Manufacturing Holdings UK Limited and 68,374,718 shares, constituting at least 99.77% of the issued and outstanding capital stock of ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited. As consideration for the Acquisition, the Company paid $45.2 million in cash and estimates that direct acquisition costs will be $1.5 million. Benchmark is accounting for the acquisition utilizing the accounting principles promulgated by SFAS 141 and 142. Therefore, the effects of the acquisition will be reflected on Benchmark's financial statements from and after the acquisition date. Because ACT UK is not individually significant to Benchmark, their financial statements have not been included herein. The unaudited pro forma combined condensed balance sheet gives effect to the Acquisition as if it had occurred on June 30, 2002, and combines Benchmark's unaudited historical consolidated balance sheet as of June 30, 2002 with ACT Thailand's unaudited historical U.S. GAAP consolidated balance sheet as June 28, 2002. The unaudited pro forma combined condensed statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2001, gives the effect to the Acquisition as if it had occurred on January 1, 2001, and combines Benchmark's historical consolidated statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2001, with ACT Thailand's historical U.S. GAAP consolidated statement of operations for the year ended November 24, 2001. The unaudited pro forma combined condensed statement of operations for the six months ended June 30, 2002, gives the effect to the Acquisition as if it had occurred on January 1, 2001, and combines Benchmark's unaudited historical consolidated statement of operations for the six months ended June 30, 2002, with ACT Thailand's historical U.S. GAAP consolidated statement of operations for the six months ended May 24, 2002. 3
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. UNAUDITED PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED BALANCE SHEET (IN THOUSANDS) 4
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. UNAUDITED PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS (IN THOUSANDS) 5
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. UNAUDITED PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS (IN THOUSANDS) 6
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. NOTES TO UNAUDITED PRO FORMA COMBINED CONDENSED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS The pro forma information related to the Acquisition has been prepared in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards (SFAS) No. 141, "Business Combinations," and SFAS 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," which were adopted by Benchmark effective January 1, 2002. The Acquisition will be accounted for as a purchase. Accordingly, the cash paid for the acquisition and the direct acquisition costs incurred are recorded as the purchase price. The purchase price will be allocated to individual assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on their respective fair values. The excess purchase price over the fair value of the net assets are allocated to goodwill. The following table summarizes the estimated fair value of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed at the date of acquisition. The Company is in the process of obtaining third-party valuations of certain assets; thus, the allocation of the purchase price is subject to refinement.
Calculation of purchase price: Cash $ 38,200 Acquisition costs 1,268 --------- Total purchase price $ 39,468 ========= Preliminary allocation of purchase price: Current assets $ 69,855 Property, plant and equipment 17,674 Other assets 28 Goodwill 8,645 --------- Total assets acquired $ 96,202 --------- Current liabilities 42,926 Long-term debt 13,808 --------- Total liabilities assumed 56,734 --------- Net assets acquired $ 39,468 =========
The following adjustments have been reflected in the Pro Forma Adjustments column of the audited pro forma combined condensed balance sheet and statement of operations: (a) Represents the cash consideration paid for ACT Thailand. (b) Represents adjustment to record inventory at "fair value." (c) Represents the allocation of the excess of total consideration over the net assets acquired to goodwill. (d) Represents the accrual of direct acquisition costs. (e) Represents the elimination of ACT Thailand's historical equity. (f) Represents the elimination of ACT Thailand's historical goodwill amortization expense. (g) Benchmark's estimated tax rate is 34%, after giving effect to the Acquisition. 7
S I G N A T U R E Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this amendment to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. Benchmark Electronics, Inc. Dated: October 11, 2002 By: /s/ Donald E. Nigbor ---------------------- Donald E. Nigbor Chief Executive Officer 8

Exhibit 23.1 Independent Auditors' Consent The Board of Directors ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited: We consent to the incorporation by reference in the registration statements (No. 333-90723, No. 333-90887 and No. 333-84488) on Form S-3 and registration statements (No. 33-61660, No. 333-26805, No. 333-28997, No. 333-54186, No. 333-66889 and No. 333-76207) on Form S-8 of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. of our report dated September 10, 2002, with respect to the consolidated balance sheet of ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited as of November 24, 2001, and the related consolidated statements of income, stockholders' equity and comprehensive income, and cash flows for the year then ended, which report appears in the Form 8-K/A of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. dated October 11, 2002. KPMG Audit (Thailand) Limited October 9, 2002

ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED AND SUBSIDIARIES Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 (With Independent Auditors' Report Thereon)
INDEPENDENT AUDITORS' REPORT The Board of Directors ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited: We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheet of ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited and subsidiaries as of November 24, 2001, and the related consolidated statements of income, stockholders' equity and comprehensive income, and cash flows for the year then ended. These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audit. We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States of America. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion. In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited and subsidiaries as of November 24, 2001, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for the year then ended in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. September 10, 2002 KPMG Audit (Thailand) Limited
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED AND SUBSIDIARIES Consolidated Balance Sheets November 24, 2001 (In thousands of US$, except share data) See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements. 3
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED AND SUBSIDIARIES Consolidated Statement of Income Year ended November 24, 2001 (In thousands of US$, except share data) See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements. 4
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements. 5
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED AND SUBSIDIARIES Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows Year ended November 24, 2001 (In thousands of US$) See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements. 6
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ (1) SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND PRACTICES (a) DESCRIPTION OF BUSINESS ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) PCL ("the Company") is a registered Thai company in the business of assembling electronic products for export. The Company was listed on the Stock Exchange of Thailand in 1989. On August 2, 2000, ACT Manufacturing Inc. ("ACT Inc."), a registered company in the United States, acquired 99.7% of the Company's issued shares and all of the outstanding options. The Company was delisted from the Stock Exchange of Thailand and changed its name to ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company. The Company has three wholly owned subsidiaries located in Singapore, California and Wales. The subsidiaries' activities range from purchasing in Singapore and sales and marketing in California. The subsidiary in Wales is dormant and currently does not conduct any business. Thailand and many Asia Pacific countries continue to experience economic difficulties since 1997. The accompanying consolidated financial statements reflect management's current assessment of the possible impact of the economic conditions on the financial position of the Company and subsidiaries. (b) BASIS OF PRESENTATION AND PRINCIPLES OF CONSOLIDATION The financial statements and associated notes are presented in US dollars, rounded to the nearest thousand. The consolidated financial statements include the financial statements of ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited and its three wholly owned subsidiaries. All significant intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation. (c) CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS Cash equivalents consist of cash in hand and deposits at banks and financial institutions with original maturities of three months or less. (d) ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE Accounts receivable are recorded at cost, less the related allowance for doubtful accounts. The allowance for doubtful accounts is based on management's evaluation of specific accounts. (e) INVENTORIES Inventories include material, labor and overhead and are stated at the lower of cost or market. Cost is determined using the first-in, first-out method. 7
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ (f) PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT Property, plant and equipment are stated at cost. Depreciation on plant and equipment is calculated on the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the assets. Leasehold improvements are amortized straight-line over the shorter of the lease term or estimated useful life of the asset. The useful lives of the classes of property, plant and equipment are as follows:
Buildings 20-25 years Machinery and equipment 4-5 years Leasehold improvements 5-10 years Vehicles 2-5 years
(g) GOODWILL Goodwill, which represents the excess of purchase price over fair value of net assets acquired, is amortized on a straight-line basis over the period of expected benefit of 10 years. Goodwill is stated at net of amortization. (See note 1(j)) (h) INCOME TAXES Income taxes are accounted for under the asset and liability method. Deferred income taxes are recognized for the future tax consequences attributable to differences between the financial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. (i) LONG-TERM SERVICE BENEFIT Under labor laws applicable to companies in Thailand, all employees with more than 120 days of service are entitled to severance pay on termination of service, including death, forced termination or retrenchment, or in the event of retirement at age 60. The termination benefits are unfunded. (j) IMPAIRMENT The Company accounts for long-lived assets in accordance with the provisions of SFAS No. 121, "Accounting for the Impairment of Long-Lived Assets and for Long-Lived Assets to Be Disposed Of." This Statement requires that long-lived assets and certain identifiable intangibles be reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable. Recoverability of assets to be held and used is measured by a comparison of the carrying amount of an asset to future net cash flows expected to be generated by the asset. If such assets are considered to be impaired, the impairment to be recognized is measured by the amount by which the carrying amount of the assets exceeds the fair value of the assets. Assets to be disposed of are reported at the lower of the carrying amount or fair value less costs to sell. (k) REVENUE RECOGNITION Revenue is recognized upon shipment of the product or otherwise, under certain contracts, when title to and risks and rewards of ownership pass to the customer. 8
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ (l) COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES Liabilities for loss contingencies, arising from claims, assessments, litigation, fines and penalties and other sources are recorded when it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount of the assessment can be reasonably estimated. (m) EARNINGS PER SHARE Basic and diluted earnings per share are computed using the weighted average number of shares outstanding. As at November 24, 2001, there were no instruments outstanding that would have a dilutive effect on the diluted earnings per share calculation. (n) FAIR VALUE OF FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS The Company's financial instruments consist of cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments, accounts receivable, accounts payable and loans from financial institutions. The Company believes that the carrying amount of these instruments approximate their fair value. (o) FOREIGN CURRENCY Transactions in foreign currencies are translated to US dollars at the foreign exchange rate ruling at the date of the transaction. Monetary assets and liabilities denominated in foreign currencies at the balance sheet date are translated to US dollars at the foreign exchange rate ruling at that date. Foreign exchange differences arising on translation are recognized in the statement of income. Total foreign exchange gains are included in other income and totaled approximately $1,760. The Company's functional currency is US dollars. The financial statements of the Company's foreign subsidiaries are measured in the local currency as the functional currency. Assets and liabilities are translated at exchange rates in effect at the balance sheet date. Revenue and expenses are translated at average exchange rates in effect during the year. The effects of these translation adjustments are reported as a separate component of stockholders' equity. (p) USE OF ESTIMATES Management of the Company has made a number of estimates and assumptions relating to the reporting of assets and liabilities and the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities to prepare these financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Actual results could differ from those estimates. (2) SHORT-TERM INVESTMENTS Short-term investments consist of fixed term deposits with maturities between three months and one year. At November 24, 2001 fixed term deposits amounted to $1,020. 9
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ (3) INVENTORIES Inventories consist of the following: At November 24, 2001 the amount of finished goods, included above, consigned to customers totals $2,800. (4) PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT Property, plant and equipment as at November 24, 2001 consist of the following: Depreciation expense amounted to $2,125 for the year ended November 24, 2001. (5) GOODWILL The changes in the carrying amount of goodwill for the year ended November 24, 2001 are as follows:
Balance at November 24, 2000 $ 95,744 Goodwill acquired during the year 162 Amortization during the year (9,905) --------------- Balance at November 24, 2001 $ 86,001 ===============
The accumulated amortization of goodwill at November 24, 2001 was approximately $13,200. 10
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ (6) BORROWING FACILITIES In March 2001, the Company entered into a credit facilities agreement with two local banks, which has five tranche facilities. The agreement is guaranteed by ACT Manufacturing Inc. and secured by the Company's land and buildings in Korat, Rangsit and Hi-Tech Industrial Estate and certain machinery and equipment with a total net book value at November 24, 2001 of $10,800. These loans carry restrictive covenants pertaining to the performance and the ratio of debt to equity which will be effective beginning January 2002. The five tranche facilities include the following: Tranche A and B are long-term facilities with maximum aggregate principals of $24,970. Both Tranches bear interest at LIBOR plus 2.5% and are payable in quarterly installments until 2006. As at November 24, 2001, interest rates ranged from 6.25% to 7.38%. The total from both Tranches outstanding at November 24, 2001 was $22,547. Tranche C is short-term revolving credit lines aggregating $28.5 million, of which $1,085 was outstanding as at November 24, 2001. The credit lines bear interest at a range of LIBOR plus 2.5% to 2.75%. At November 24, 2001, interest rates ranged from 6.41% to 6.87%. Tranche D is banking overdraft lines aggregating Baht 20 million, of which Baht 2.146 million ($49) was outstanding at November 24, 2001. The Company's banking overdraft lines carry interest at the rate of MOR, which was equal to 8% on average. Trance E is a guarantee credit line aggregating Baht 40 million, of which Baht 32 million ($730) was outstanding at November 24, 2001. The Company has another short-term revolving credit line facility aggregating $4,000, which was not used at November 24, 2001. The overdraft line carries interest at LIBOR plus 2.75%. One of the Company's subsidiaries has outstanding bank overdrafts amounting to $2,749 at November 24, 2001. The bank overdrafts bear interest at rates ranging from prime to prime plus 2% per annum. The aggregate amounts of maturities of long-term debt for each of the five years subsequent to November 24, 2001 are as follows: 2002, $4,994; 2003, $4,994; 2004, $4,994; 2005, $4,994; and 2006, $2,571. Interest cost incurred during the year amounted to approximately $2,699. 11
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ (7) LEASES The Company leased the property located at Korat plant to a third party under a 5-year cancelable agreement with a renewal option for an additional 3 years. Each party to the agreement has the right to terminate the lease by giving 6 months written notice to the other. At November 24, 2001 the gross amount of plant and equipment and related accumulated amortization relating to this operating lease amounted to approximately $4,900 and $1,300, respectively. The Company also has several noncancelable operating leases, primarily for vehicles and computer equipment that expire over the next three years. Rental expenses for operating leases during 2001 amounted to $509. Future minimum lease payments under noncancelable operating leases (with initial or remaining lease terms in excess of one year) at November 24, 2001 are 2002: $493; 2003: $289; and 2004: $127. (8) STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY The Company increased its registered capital from Baht 220.5 million to Baht 720.5 million by issuing 50 million new shares at par value of Baht 10. The shares were allocated only to ACT Inc. ACT Inc. paid up approximately $10,500 for 47 million of the shares allocated during the year ended November 24, 2001. Total issued and paid-up share capital at November 24, 2001 amounted to $15,679. (9) INCOME TAXES The Company has been granted certain rights and privileges as a promoted industry under the Thailand's Board of Investment ("BOI"). The primary privileges received from BOI include an exemption from income tax on profit from operations and an exemption from import duty on production machinery and equipment and raw materials used in products for export. These privileges are available for a period of seven years. The majority of these privileges will end in January 2004. Current income tax expense based on income before income taxes consisted of domestic and foreign taxes in the amount of $317 and $132, respectively. There was no deferred income tax expense. 12
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ Income tax expense (benefit) differed from the amounts computed by applying the Thailand income tax rate of 30% to pretax income from continuing operations as a result of the following: The Company does not have any deferred tax assets or liabilities at November 24, 2001. The excess of tax basis over book basis is projected to turn around during the period that the Company will be receiving BOI privileges. The effective tax rate during the BOI privilege period is zero. For the year ended November 24, 2001 the income tax benefit from BOI privileges amounted to $0.12 per share. The Company has not recognized differences between the carrying amounts over the tax basis for investments in foreign subsidiaries because assets representing those differences will be permanently reinvested. (10) LONG-TERM SERVICE BENEFITS At November 24, 2001, the present value of the unfunded obligations for long-term service benefits due to employees was approximately $490. Current service costs recognized in the statement of income amounted to $17. The assumptions used included a discount rate of 6.0% and a rate of compensation increase of 3.0%. During the year, no actual benefits were paid. (11) COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES The Company received a claim from a supplier relating to purchase commitments. This claim was recorded as a liability at November 24, 2001 and ultimately settled in May 2002 for an amount of $500. The Company is not involved in any other legal proceedings. 13
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED. AND SUBSIDIARIES Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements November 24, 2001 In Thousands of US$ (12) SUBSEQUENT EVENTS On December 21, 2001, ACT Inc. filed a petition for reorganization under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code. ACT Inc.'s bankruptcy filing does not include its foreign operations; however, ACT Inc. does serve as guarantor of the Company's credit facilities agreement dated March 29, 2001. The Company has since received written confirmation from its lenders that the bankruptcy petition of ACT Inc. does not presently constitute a breach of the Guarantee or cause a default of the Agreement by the Company. The Company and ACT Inc. have notified the banks of the bankruptcy filing as is stipulated in the agreement. On July 29, 2002, Benchmark Electronics, a registered corporation in the United States, purchased ACT Inc.'s 99.77% shareholding in the Company. The purchase was pursuant to the terms of an Asset and Share Purchase Agreement dated July 2, 2002 between Benchmark Electronics and ACT Inc. The purchase agreement was approved by the bankruptcy court. 14

ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET MAY 24, 2002 (IN THOUSANDS) See accompanying notes to condensed consolidated financial statements. 1
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF OPERATIONS SIX MONTHS ENDED MAY 24, 2002 AND MAY 25, 2001 (IN THOUSANDS) See accompanying notes to condensed consolidated financial statements. 2
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CASH FLOWS MAY 24, 2002 AND MAY 25, 2001 (IN THOUSANDS) See accompanying notes to condensed consolidated financial statements. 3
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED NOTES TO CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (IN THOUSANDS) (1) BASIS OF PRESENTATION ACT Manufacturing (Thailand) Public Company Limited (the "Company"), is a registered Thai company in the business of assembling electronic products for export. The condensed consolidated financial statements included herein have been prepared by the Company without audit pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission. The financial statements reflect all normal and recurring adjustments which in the opinion of management are necessary for a fair presentation of the financial position, results of operations and cash flows for the interim periods presented. The results of operations for the periods presented are not necessarily indicative of the results to be expected for the full year. The accompanying unaudited condensed consolidated financial statements should be read in conjunction with the audited annual financial statements and notes included elsewhere herein. (2) INVENTORIES Inventories consist of the following at May 24, 2002:
Finished goods $ 3,387 Work in Process 6,803 Raw materials 23,581 Less provision for obsolete inventory (6,614) ----------- $ 27,157 ===========
(3) PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT Property, plant and equipment consist of the following at May 24, 2002:
Land $ 3,266 Buildings 6,810 Machinery and equipment 8,171 Leasehold improvements 1,073 Vehicles 1,019 Construction in progress 480 ----------- Total 20,819 Less: accumulated depreciation (3,090) ----------- $ 17,729 ===========
4
ACT MANUFACTURING (THAILAND) PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED NOTES TO CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (IN THOUSANDS) (4) BORROWING FACILITIES The Company has a credit facility with two local banks, which has five tranche facilities. The five tranche facilities include the following at May 24, 2002: Tranche A and B are long-term facilities with maximum aggregate principal of $25.0 million. Both Tranches bear interest at LIBOR plus 2.5% and are payable in quarterly installments until 2006. At May 24, 2002, interest rates ranged from 4.62% to 5.18%. The total from both tranches outstanding at May 24, 2002 was $20.1 million. Tranche C are short-term revolving credit lines aggregating $28.5 million, of which $11.3 million was outstanding at May 24, 2002. The credit lines bear interest at a range of LIBOR plus 2.75% to 4.35%. At May 24, 2002, interest rates ranged from 4.35% to 6.87%. Tranche D is a banking overdraft credit line aggregating Baht 20 million. The credit line was unused at May 24, 2002. The Company's banking overdraft lines carry interest at the rate of MOR, which is equal to 8% on average. Tranche E is a guarantee credit line aggregating Baht 40 million, of which Baht 34.2 million ($0.9) was outstanding at May 24, 2002. The Company has another short-term credit facility aggregating $4.0 million, which was not used at May 24, 2002. 5


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20030422135023.txt.gz
TIME:20030422135023
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
(c)
                                 
Exhibits.
The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
This information, furnished under this "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure," is intended to be provided under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition," in accordance with U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission Release No. 33-8216.
 
On April 22, 2003, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing first quarter results for the period ended March 31, 2003. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 9 and Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
GAYLA J. DELLY
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS
EARNINGS FOR FIRST QUARTER 2003
 
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 22, 2003 Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $448 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, compared to $468 million in the previous quarter and $329 million in the same quarter of the prior year.  First quarter net income was $17.3 million, compared to $12.7 million in the previous quarter and $5.3 million in the same quarter of the prior year. Diluted earnings per share was $0.66 for the first quarter of 2003, compared to $0.50 per share for the previous quarter and $0.26 for the first quarter of 2002.
 
During the first quarter, we settled and released various claims arising out of customer manufacturing agreements. In connection with the settlement of these claims, we recorded a non-cash gain totaling $8.1 million. There were no production revenues in connection with these manufacturing agreements during recent quarters.
 
"The first quarter results reflect the continued commitment and focus of the Benchmark team. We are reaping the benefits of our higher levels of capacity utilization, having one of the highest levels of utilization in the industry.  Also, our continued cost and efficiency improvement programs over the past 18 months have significantly reduced our overhead costs.  We continue to earn the confidence of new and existing customers by our consistent and excellent execution in this competitive environment," commented Cary T. Fu, President of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
 
First Quarter 2003 Financial Highlights
 - 
                 
Cash balance at March 31, 2003 of $322 million.
 - 
                 
Cash generated from operations was $14 million in the first quarter of 2003.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivables increased by $16 million to $195 million at the end of the first quarter of 2003 from $179 million at the end of the fourth quarter of 2002. Calculated days sales outstanding increased to 39 days from 34 days in the previous quarter.
 - 
                 
Inventories increased to $197 million at the end of the first quarter of 2003 from $196 million at the end of the fourth quarter of 2002. Inventory turns decreased to 8.4 from 8.8 in the previous quarter.
 
 
Second Quarter 2003 Guidance
 - 
                 
Revenue in the second quarter of 2003 is expected to be between $430 million and $450 million.
 - 
                 
We expect gross margins to be relatively flat in the second quarter of 2003 compared with the first quarter of 2003.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the second quarter of 2003 are expected to be $0.42 to $0.46 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
The tax rate for the remainder of 2003 is expected to be approximately 32%.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00am CDT to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com.
(a) Includes add back of dilutive shares of 1,995 and dilutive interest expense on convertible subordinated notes, net of tax, of $818.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20030702161714.txt.gz
TIME:20030702161714
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
 
For More Information, Call:
 
 
 
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REAFFIRMS GUIDANCE FOR SECOND QUARTER 2003
 
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 2, 2003 Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it continues to expect second quarter 2003 revenues to meet or exceed analyst consensus revenues of $443 million and consensus earnings per share of $0.44.  The Company provided second quarter guidance of $430 million to $450 million, with corresponding earnings per share of $0.42 to $0.46 at the time of the first quarter earnings release on April 22, 2003.
 
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the second quarter ended June 30, 2003.  Results for that quarter will be announced on July 24, 2003.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am CDT on July 24, 2003 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties
materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20030724165404.txt.gz
TIME:20030724165404
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
        (c) Exhibits.
        The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure.
This information, furnished under this "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure," is intended to be provided under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition," in accordance with U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission Release No. 33-8216.
On July 24, 2003, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing second quarter results for the period ended June 30, 2003. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 9 and Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
QuickLinks
SIGNATURE

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Exhibit 99.1
Press Release For More Information, Call:
GAYLA J. DELLY CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER (979) 849-6550
JULY 24, 2003
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 24, 2003- Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $449 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2003, compared to $404 million in the same quarter of the prior year and $448 million in the previous quarter. Second quarter net income was $11.8 million, compared to $8.3 million in the same quarter of the prior year and $17.3 million in the previous quarter. Diluted earnings per share on a GAAP basis was $0.46 for the second quarter of 2003, compared to $0.33 for the second quarter of 2002 and $0.66 per share ($0.46 per share excluding a contract settlement gain)
1
for the previous quarter.
"In many ways, Benchmark's second quarter performance exceeded our expectations. We improved our operational metrics, continued to realign our resources and leveraged our capacities effectively. Our second quarter new program bookings, quite impressively, were one of our highest ever," commented Cary T. Fu, President of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Second Quarter 2003 Financial Highlights
 - 
Cash balance at June 30, 2003 of $336 million.
 - 
Cash generated from operations was $29 million in the second quarter of 2003.
 - 
Accounts receivables decreased by $3 million during the quarter to $192 million.
 - 
Calculated days sales outstanding remained consistent at 39 days for the quarter.
 - 
Inventories decreased by $11 million during the quarter to $186 million.
 - 
Inventory turns increased to 8.9 from 8.4 in the previous quarter.
Third Quarter 2003 Guidance
 - 
Revenue in the third quarter of 2003 is expected to be between $445 million and $460 million.
 - 
We expect gross margins to be relatively flat in the third quarter of 2003 compared with the second quarter of 2003.
 - 
Earnings per share for the third quarter of 2003 are expected to be $0.44 to $0.48 per diluted share.
 - 
The tax rate for the remainder of 2003 is expected to be approximately 33%.
1
As previously disclosed, during the first quarter of 2003 we settled and released various claims arising out of customer manufacturing agreements and recorded a non-cash gain totaling
$8.1 million ($5.5 million net of tax). Diluted earnings per share excluding the impact of the contract settlement gain was $0.46 for the quarter ending March 31, 2003 calculated as follows:
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00am CDT to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
QuickLinks
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS EARNINGS FOR SECOND QUARTER 2003
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statements of Income (Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data) (UNAUDITED)
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet June 30, 2003 (Amounts in Thousands) (UNAUDITED)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20030930153639.txt.gz
TIME:20030930153639
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits.
(c)
                                 
The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
Item 9.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
This information, furnished under this "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure," is intended to be provided under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition," in accordance with U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission Release No. 33-8216.
 
On September 30, 2003, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release reaffirming guidance for the quarter ended September 30, 2003. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 9 and Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
 
For More Information, Call:
 
 
 
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REAFFIRMS GUIDANCE FOR THIRD QUARTER 2003
ANGLETON, TX, SEPTEMBER 30, 2003  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it continues to expect third quarter revenue to be between $445 million and $460 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share of $0.44 to $0.48.  The Company reaffirmed the third quarter guidance previously provided at the time of the second quarter earnings release on July 24, 2003.
 
Results for the third quarter will be announced on October 23, 2003.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am CDT on October 23, 2003 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20031023160005.txt.gz
TIME:20031023160005
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits.
(c)
                                 
The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
 
Item 12.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On October 23, 2003, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing third quarter results for the period ended September 30, 2003. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS
EARNINGS FOR THIRD QUARTER 2003
 
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 23, 2003 Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $455 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2003, compared to $428 million for the same quarter in the prior year and $449 million for the second quarter of 2003.  Third quarter net income was $12.9 million, compared to $9.6 million for the same quarter in the prior year and $11.8 million for the second quarter of 2003.  Diluted earnings per share on a GAAP basis was $0.48 for the third quarter of 2003, compared to $0.38 for the third quarter of 2002 and $0.46 for the second quarter of 2003.
 
"Our operating results for the third quarter were once again solid.  We expect to see continued strong results in the fourth quarter driven by the ramp of new programs by several customers and the increased demand in some technology markets while we continue to diversify our customer base," commented Cary T. Fu, President of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
 
 
Third Quarter 2003 Financial Highlights
 
Cash balance at September 30, 2003 of $329 million.
 - 
                 
Convertible notes totaling $80.2 million converted into 1,994,987 shares of common stock.
 - 
                 
Total debt outstanding down to $26.5 million at September 30, 2003.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable increased by $11 million during the quarter to $203 million.
 - 
                 
Calculated days sales outstanding increased to 40 days for the quarter.
 - 
                 
Inventories increased by $23 million during the quarter to $209 million.
 - 
                 
Inventory turns decreased to 8.0 from 8.9 in the previous quarter.
 - 
                 
Fourth Quarter 2003 Guidance
 
Revenue in the fourth quarter of 2003 is expected to be between $460 million and $475 million.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the fourth quarter of 2003 are expected to be $0.47 to $0.51 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
During the fourth quarter of 2003, we will be closing our Scotland facility further aligning our operations with the current business environment.
 - 
                 
Costs related to closing this facility are estimated at $1.4 million.  In addition, certain tax benefits may be realized by Benchmark as a result of this closure.
 - 
                 
These closure related costs and benefits have not been included in the fourth quarter guidance above.
 - 
                 
 
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00am CDT to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20031121154138.txt.gz
TIME:20031121154138
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5. Other Events.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. has completed its previously announced 3-for-2 stock split in the form of a stock dividend of one-half share of common stock for every one share of common stock outstanding.  The new shares resulting from the 3-for-2 split were issued at the close of business on November 13, 2003 to holders of record as of November 6, 2003.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20040205182358.txt.gz
TIME:20040205182358
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits.
(c)
                                 
The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 5, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing fourth quarter results for the period ended December 31, 2003. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 5, 2004  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $487 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2003, compared to $468 million for the same quarter in the prior year and $455 million for the third quarter of 2003.  Fourth quarter net income was $13.4 million, compared to $12.7 million for the same quarter in the prior year and $12.9 million for the third quarter of 2003.  Diluted earnings per share was $0.32 for the fourth quarter of 2003, compared to $0.33 for the fourth quarter of 2002 and $0.32 for the third quarter of 2003.  Excluding a special item of $2.8 million ($1.9 million net of tax) in restructuring charges, the Company had net income before special items of $15.3 million, or $0.36 cents per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2003.
 
Sales revenue for the year ended December 31, 2003 was $1.8 billion, a 13% increase from $1.6 billion of revenue in the previous year.  Net income for the year ended December 31, 2003 was $55.4 million, compared to $35.9 million for the prior year.  Diluted earnings per share was $1.39 for the year ended December 31, 2003, compared to $1.01 per share in the prior year. Excluding two special items, an $8.1 million ($5.4 million net of tax) contract settlement gain and $2.8 million ($1.9 million net of tax) in restructuring charges, the Company had net income before special items of $51.9 million, or $1.31 per diluted share, for the year ended December 31, 2003.
 
"We are pleased to report another quarter and another year of strong results with growth in both revenues and profitability.  We look forward to the opportunities for further growth in 2004 with the expansion of our customer base and improving business conditions," commented Cary T. Fu, President of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Fourth Quarter 2003 Financial Highlights
 
Cash balance at December 31, 2003 of $356 million.
 - 
                 
Total debt outstanding down to $21.0 million at December 31, 2003.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable increased by $6 million during the quarter to $209 million.
 - 
                 
Calculated days sales outstanding decreased to 39 days for the quarter.
 - 
                 
Inventories increased by $30 million during the quarter to $239 million.
 - 
                 
Inventory turns decreased to 7.5 from 8.0 in the previous quarter.
 - 
                 
Completed 3-for-2 stock split on November 13, 2003.  All share and per share data appearing in this press release have been retroactively adjusted for the stock split.
 - 
                 
 
First Quarter 2004 Guidance
 
Revenue in the first quarter of 2004 is expected to be between $470 million and $485 million.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the first quarter of 2004 are expected to be $0.33 to $0.37 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.  Benchmark's guidance for the fourth quarter of 2003 did not include the impact of closing our Scotland facility during the fourth quarter of 2003.  Accordingly, we are providing information in this earnings release which adds back the costs associated with the closing of our Scotland facility to net income. This allows investors to more readily compare the fourth-quarter results with our previous guidance, and with the earnings in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) reported in previous quarters.
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, video/audio/entertainment products, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am CST to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20040401112827.txt.gz
TIME:20040401112827
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits.
(c)
                                 
The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
Item 9.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On March 31, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release reaffirming guidance for the quarter ended March 31, 2004. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 9 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
 
For More Information, Call:
 
 
 
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, MARCH 31, 2004  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it continues to expect first quarter revenue to be between $470 million and $485 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share of $0.33 to $0.37.  The Company reaffirmed the first quarter guidance previously provided at the time of the fourth quarter earnings release on February 5, 2004.
 
Results for the first quarter will be announced on April 22, 2004.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on April 22, 2004 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties
 
 
materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20040422164931.txt.gz
TIME:20040422164931
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits.
(c)
                                 
The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
 
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 22, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing first quarter results for the period ended March 31, 2004. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 22, 2004  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $481 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, compared to $448 million for the same quarter last year.  First quarter net income was $15.2 million, or $0.36 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $17.3 million, or $0.44 per diluted share, which included a contract settlement gain of $5.5 million, net of tax, or $0.13 per diluted share.  Without the effect of the contract settlement gain in the first quarter of 2003, the Company's net income was $11.8 million, or $0.31 per diluted share.
 
"Our new program activities have gained momentum and the overall technology marketplace has shown improvement.  Another excellent quarter resulted from our team's performance.  With a high number of variables impacting our quarter, our team remained focused and flexible and delivered strong results," commented Cary T. Fu, President of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
 
First Quarter 2004 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin of 4.5%.
 - 
                 
Return on invested capital of 14%.
 - 
                 
Working capital metrics were impacted by new program introduction delays, back end loading of shipments and production mix changes.
 - 
                 
Concentration of revenues reduced to 33% from top customer.
 - 
                 
Cash balance at March 31, 2004 of $302 million.
 - 
                 
No bank debt outstanding as of March 31, 2004.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable increased by $22 million during the quarter to $231 million.
 - 
                 
Calculated days sales outstanding increased to 43 days for the quarter.
 - 
                 
Inventories increased by $31 million during the quarter to $270 million.
 - 
                 
 
Second Quarter 2004 Guidance
 
Revenue in the second quarter of 2004 is expected to be between $465 million and $490 million.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the second quarter of 2004 are expected to be $0.35 to $0.39 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am CDT to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20040706155201.txt.gz
TIME:20040706155201
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
Item 7.
                        
 
Exhibits.
(c)
                     
 
The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
 
Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Item 12.
                  
 
On July 2, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing that it expects to meet or exceed analysts' consensus revenues and earnings per share estimates for the quarter ended June 30, 2004. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
 
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 2, 2004  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it expects to meet or exceed second quarter analysts' consensus revenues of $483.32 million and earnings per share of $0.37.  The Company provided second quarter revenue guidance of $465 million to $490 million, with corresponding earnings per share of $0.35 to $0.39 on April 22, 2004.
 
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the second quarter ended June 30, 2004.  Results for that quarter will be announced on July 22, 2004.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am CDT on July 22, 2004 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook.  This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunications equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries.  Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20040726082114.txt.gz
TIME:20040726082114
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Item 7. Financial Statements, Pro Forma Financial Information and Exhibits.
(c)
Exhibits.
        The following material is furnished as an exhibit to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 22, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing second quarter results for the period ended June 30, 2004. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 12 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
QuickLinks
SIGNATURE

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Exhibit 99.1
For More Information, Call:
July 22, 2004
GAYLA J. DELLY CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER (979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 22, 2004Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $491 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2004, compared to $449 million for the same quarter last year. Second quarter net income was $17.6 million, or $0.42 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $11.8 million, or $0.31 per diluted share.
"The Benchmark team has once again delivered solid performance and results. Our flexibility and execution have enabled us to continue to perform well and attract additional opportunities, amidst a technology marketplace that has recently shown mixed indicators," commented Cary T. Fu, President of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Second Quarter 2004 Financial Highlights
 - 
Operating margin of 4.7%.
 - 
Return on invested capital of 14%.
 - 
Revenues from top customer represented 32% of total revenues.
 - 
Cash balance at June 30, 2004 of $312 million.
 - 
No bank debt outstanding as of June 30, 2004.
 - 
Accounts receivable remained consistent during the quarter at $231 million.
 - 
Calculated days sales outstanding decreased to 42 days for the quarter.
 - 
Inventories increased by $7 million during the quarter to $277 million.
 - 
Inventory turns decreased to 6.5 times.
Third Quarter 2004 Guidance
 - 
Revenue in the third quarter of 2004 is expected to be between $485 million and $505 million.
 - 
Earnings per share for the third quarter of 2004 are expected to be $0.38 to $0.43 per diluted share.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable
assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am CDT to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
QuickLinks
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RECORD SALES AND RECORD EARNINGS FOR SECOND QUARTER 2004
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries Consolidated Statements of Income (Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data) (UNAUDITED)
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet June 30, 2004 (Amounts in Thousands) (UNAUDITED)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20040916093200.txt.gz
TIME:20040916093200
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) un der the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
Item 5-02.   Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
 
On September 16, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing changes in executive officers effective September 13, 2004. The Board of Directors of the Company has decided to separate the roles of Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer to further enhance the corporate governance standards of the Company. Donald E. Nigbor, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, will remain as Chairman of the Board. Cary T. Fu, 56, President and Chief Operating Officer of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., will remain President and assume the position of Chief Executive Officer. Gayla J. Delly will be promoted to Executive Vice President and continue to serve as Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer. The information related to Mr. Fu's employment history and employment agreement on pages 4 and 20, respectively, of the Proxy Statement filed by the Company on April 1, 2004 is incorporated herein by reference to this item 5-02.  The term of Mr. Fu's employment agreement has been extended through August 1, 2005.  Mr. Fu's annual base salary for the year ending August 1, 2005 has not yet been determined.  The Company will file an amendment to update this information when it becomes available.
(b), (c)
       
 
A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9-01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
          
 
Press release dated September 16, 2004
Exhibit 99.1
           
 
Information related to Mr. Fu's employment history and employment agreement (incorporated by reference from the Company's Proxy Statement filed on April 1, 2004, pages 4 and 20).
Exhibit 99.2
           
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
ANGLETON, TX, September 16, 2004  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) announced today the following executive management promotions:
 
Donald E. Nigbor, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, will remain as Chairman of the Board.
 
Cary T. Fu, President and Chief Operating Officer of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., will remain President and assume the position of Chief Executive Officer.
 
Gayla J. Delly will be promoted to Executive Vice President and continue to serve as Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer.
 
"The Board of Directors of Benchmark decided to separate the roles of Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer to further enhance the corporate governance standards of the Company," Mr. Nigbor said. "Benchmark has strong execution models, outstanding customers and suppliers and an excellent team. These changes help us to continue the strong momentum that we have built for our customers, employees and shareholders."
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunications equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20041005165709.txt.gz
TIME:20041005165709
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
        On October 5, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing that it expects to meet or exceed analysts' consensus revenues and earnings per share estimates for the quarter ended September 30, 2004. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c)
Exhibits
Exhibit 99.1    Press release dated October 5, 2004
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
QuickLinks
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURE
EXHIBITS INDEX

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 5, 2004Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it expects to meet or exceed third quarter 2004 analysts' consensus of $498 million revenues and earnings per share of $0.41. The Company provided third quarter revenue guidance of $485 million to $505 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share of $0.38 to $0.43 on July 22, 2004.
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the third quarter ended September 30, 2004. Results for the third quarter will be announced on October 21, 2004. A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on October 21, 2004 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
QuickLinks
Exhibit 99.1


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20041021182209.txt.gz
TIME:20041021182209
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
        On October 21, 2004, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing third quarter results for the period ended September 30, 2004. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9-01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c)
Exhibits
Exhibit 99.1    Press release dated October 21, 2004
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
QuickLinks
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
SIGNATURE
EXHIBITS INDEX

QuickLinks
-- Click here to rapidly navigate through this document
Exhibit 99.1
Press Release For More Information, Call:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 21, 2004Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $505 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2004, compared to $455 million for the same quarter last year. Third quarter net income was $18.0 million, or $0.43 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $12.9 million, or $0.32 per diluted share.
"This quarter was once again challenging and it was rewarding to see the performance of the Benchmark team. We have expanded existing relationships, added new customers and ramped programs at a strong pace this year and continued to deliver strong results," commented Cary T. Fu, President and CEO of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Third Quarter 2004 Financial Highlights
 - 
Operating margin improved slightly to 4.75%.
 - 
Return on invested capital of 14.0%.
 - 
Cash balance at September 30, 2004 of $312 million.
 - 
No bank debt outstanding as of September 30, 2004.
 - 
Accounts receivable were $260 million at September 30, 2004; calculated days sales outstanding were 46 days.
 - 
Inventories increased by $13 million to $290 million; inventory turns were 6.4 times.
Fourth Quarter 2004 Guidance
 - 
Revenue in the fourth quarter of 2004 is expected to be between $505 million and $530 million.
 - 
Earnings per share for the fourth quarter of 2004 are expected to be $0.41 to $0.45 per diluted share.
Forward-Looking Statements
        This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
        Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
        A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am CDT to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com
.
QuickLinks
Exhibit 99.1


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050107155042.txt.gz
TIME:20050107155042
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On January 6, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing that it continues to expect fourth quarter results to be in line with analysts' consensus for the quarter ended December 31, 2004.  A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9-01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
 
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REAFFIRMS
GUIDANCE FOR FOURTH QUARTER 2004
 
ANGLETON, TX, JANUARY 6, 2005  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it continues to expect fourth quarter revenue to be between $505 million to $530 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share of $0.41 to $0.45.  The Company expects the fourth quarter results to be in line with analysts' consensus of $521.6 million revenues and earnings per share of $0.44, in the upper end of the guidance previously provided at the time of the third quarter earnings release on October 21, 2004.
 
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2004.  Results for the fourth quarter will be announced on February 8, 2005.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on February 8, 2005 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties
materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050125153120.txt.gz
TIME:20050125153120
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
.
Item 1.01.   Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
Item 2.03.  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
 
On January 20, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the "Company") entered into a three-year, $100 million Credit Agreement (the "Credit Agreement") by and among the Company; the Banks party thereto; JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as administrative agent, collateral agent and issuing lender; and Fleet National Bank, Wells Fargo Bank and Comerica Bank as co-documentation agents. This new credit facility, which replaces the $158.9 million credit facility that expired on December 30, 2004, has a $100 million three-year revolving credit line for general corporate purposes which can be increased to a total of $200 million.
 
The foregoing is a summary of the terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement only, and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Credit Agreement attached to this Current Report as Exhibit 10.1, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
* Certain schedules and exhibits to this agreement have been omitted from the filing.  Any such exhibits or schedules shall be furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
$100,000,000
 
SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT
 
dated as of
 
January 20, 2005
 
among
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.,
 
The Borrowing Subsidiaries
 
The Lenders Party Hereto,
 
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A. as Administrative Agent, Collateral Agent and Issuing Lender
FLEET NATIONAL BANK, WELLS FARGO BANK, N.A. and COMERICA BANK as Co-Documentation Agent
 
 
J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC., as Lead Arranger
 
 
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
 
 
SCHEDULES:
 
Schedule 1.01  Unrestricted Subsidiaries
Schedule 2.01  Commitments
Schedule 3.01  Organization
Schedule 3.06  Disclosed Matters
Schedule 3.13  Insurance
Schedule 3.15  Subsidiaries of Company
Schedule 3.19  Liabilities
Schedule 6.01  Existing Indebtedness
Schedule 6.02  Existing Liens
Schedule 6.04  Existing Investments
Schedule 6.10  Restrictive Agreements
EXHIBITS:
 
Exhibit 1.01A  Form of Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit 1.01B  Form of Borrowing Request
Exhibit 1.01C  Form of Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement
Exhibit 1.01D  Form of Borrowing Subsidiary Termination
Exhibit 1.01E  Form of Commitment Increase Agreement
Exhibit 1.01G  Form of Guarantee Agreement
Exhibit 1.01H  Form of Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
Exhibit 1.01I   Form of New Lender Agreement
Exhibit 1.01K  Form of Pledge Agreement
Exhibit 1.01L  Form of Security Agreement
SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT (this "") dated as of January 20, 2005 (the ""), among Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party hereto, the Lenders party hereto, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, Collateral Agent and Issuing Lender, Fleet National Bank, Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., and Comerica Bank, as Co-Documentation Agent.
Agreement
Effective Date
Company
 
PRELIMINARY STATEMENT:
 
WHEREAS, on August 24, 1999, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent entered into the Credit Agreement (the "") whereby, upon the terms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to make term loans and revolving loans to the Company up to the aggregate amount of $225,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in of the Original Credit Agreement; and
Original Credit Agreement
Section 5.10
 
WHEREAS, on June 23, 2000, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Agent amended the Original Credit Agreement and entered into Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (as subsequently amended, hereinafter called the "") whereby, upon the terms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to increase the aggregate amount of the revolving loans to $175,000,000, increasing the aggregate amount of the credit facility to $268,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in of the Amended and Restated Agreement; and
Amended and Restated Agreement
Section 5.10
 
WHEREAS, the Company, the Lenders and the Agent mutually desire to amend and restate certain aspects of the Amended and Restated Agreement;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants set forth herein, the Borrower, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders agree to amend and restate the Amended and Restated Agreement in its entirety as follows:
 
 
.  As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Section 1.01
          
Defined Terms
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
 
"" means any acquisition permitted under .
Acquisition
Section 6.04(f)
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Act
Section 9.16
 
"" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of
Adjusted Leverage Ratio
the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries ended on such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, ended on the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company most recently ended prior to such date).
 
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
 
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
"" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Base CD Rate in effect on such day plus 1% and (c) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1%.  Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
 
"" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statement.
Amended and Restated Agreement
 
"" means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan, or with respect to the commitment fees payable hereunder, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "ABR Spread", "Eurodollar Spread" or "Commitment Fee Rate", as the case may be, based upon the Adjusted Leverage Ratio as of the end of the most recent fiscal determination date:
Applicable Margin
 
 
 
For purposes of the foregoing, (i) the Adjusted Leverage Ratio shall be determined as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Company's fiscal year based upon the Company's consolidated financial statements delivered pursuant to or and (ii) each change in the Applicable Margin resulting from a change in the Adjusted Leverage
Section 5.01(a)
(b)
Ratio shall be effective during the period commencing on and including the date of delivery to the Administrative Agent of such consolidated financial statements indicating such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change; provided that the Adjusted Leverage Ratio shall be deemed to be in Category 1 under each of the above tables at the option of the Administrative Agent or at the request of the Required Lenders if the Company fails to deliver the consolidated financial statements or the related compliance certificate required to be delivered by it pursuant to , or during the period from the expiration of the time for delivery thereof until such consolidated financial statements are delivered.
Sections 5.01(a)
(b)
(c)
 
"" means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lender's Commitment.  If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
 
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Approved Fund
Section 9.04
 
"" means any of the Republic of Ireland, Scotland, the Kingdom of Sweden or the Republic of Singapore.
Approved Jurisdiction
 
"" means, for any day, the annual assessment rate in effect on such day that is payable by a member of the Bank Insurance Fund classified as "well-capitalized" and within supervisory subgroup "B" (or a comparable successor risk classification) within the meaning of 12 C.F.R. Part 327 (or any successor provision) to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for insurance by such Corporation of time deposits made in dollars at the offices of such member in the United States; that if, as a result of any change in any law, rule or regulation, it is no longer possible to determine the Assessment Rate as aforesaid, then the Assessment Rate shall be such annual rate as shall be determined by the Administrative Agent to be representative of the cost of such insurance to the Lenders.
Assessment Rate
provided
 
"" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by ), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Section 9.04
Exhibit 1.01A
 
"" means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
 
"" means the sum of (a) the Three-Month Secondary CD Rate multiplied by the Statutory Reserve Rate plus (b) the Assessment Rate.
Base CD Rate
 
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
 
"" means the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof duly authorized to act on behalf of such Board.
Board of Directors
 
"" means the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary.
Borrower
"" means Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect.
Borrowing
 
"" means a request by the Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with , substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Request
Section 2.03
Exhibit 1.01B
 
"" means, at any time, each Restricted Subsidiary incorporated or organized in a State of the United States of America or an Approved Jurisdiction that has been designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary by the Company pursuant to and that has not ceased to be a Borrowing Subsidiary as provided in such Section.
Borrowing Subsidiary
Section 2.19
 
"" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement
Exhibit 1.01C
 
"" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Termination
Exhibit 1.01D
 
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; provided that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
Business Day
 
"" means, for any period, all expenditures (whether paid in cash or accrued as a liability, including the portion of Capital Lease Obligations originally incurred during such period that are capitalized on the consolidated balance sheet of the Company) by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries during such period, that, in conformity with GAAP, are included in "capital expenditures", "additions to property, plant or equipment" or comparable items in the consolidated financial statements of the Company, but excluding expenditures for the restoration, repair or replacement of any fixed or capital asset that was destroyed or damaged, in whole or in part, in an amount equal to any insurance proceeds received in connection with such destruction or damage.
Capital Expenditures
 
"" means, for any period, the sum of all cash payments of interest and prepayment charges, if any, including, without limitation, all net amounts payable (or receivable) under interest rate protection agreements and all imputed interest in respect of Capital Lease Obligations paid by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries on all consolidated basis during such period.
Cash Interest Expense
 
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP and any obligations of such Person under any synthetic lease financing whether or not such obligation is classified as a capital lease under GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
"" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission thereunder as in effect on the Effective Date), of Equity Interests representing more than 50% of either the aggregate ordinary voting power or the aggregate equity value represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in the Company; (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the Board of Directors by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the current Board of Directors nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; or (c) a Change of Control or similar event, however denominated, under any Subordinated Indebtedness or any other Material Indebtedness.
Change in Control
 
"" means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the Effective Date, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the Effective Date or (c) compliance by any Lender or the Issuing Lender (or, for purposes of , by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Effective Date.
Change in Law
Section 2.14
 
"" means Fleet National Bank, Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. and Comerica Bank, each in their capacity as Co-Documentation Agent.
Co-Documentation Agent
 
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
 
"" means any and all "Collateral", as defined in any applicable Security Document.
Collateral
 
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as collateral agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Collateral Agent
 
"" means, at any time, that the following requirements shall be satisfied (to the extent such requirements are stated to be applicable at the time under clause (a) or (b) below):
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement
 
at all times on and after the Effective Date:
(a)
          
 
the Guarantee Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time, shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect;
(i)
           
 
one or more Pledge Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time and directly owning any outstanding Equity Interests or any Indebtedness, and there shall have been duly and validly pledged to the Collateral Agent thereunder, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties (A) all the outstanding Equity Interests (other than Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary) owned
(ii)
          
directly by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary, (B) 65% of the outstanding voting Equity Interests, and 100% of the outstanding non-voting Equity Interests (or, in each case, such lesser percentages as shall be owned by the Company and the Domestic Subsidiaries) in each Foreign Subsidiary owned in whole or in part directly by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary and (C) all Indebtedness that is owed to the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary; and any certificates, promissory notes or other instruments representing the Equity Interests or Indebtedness pledged or subjected to a charge under the Pledge Agreements, accompanied by stock powers or other instruments of transfer endorsed in blank, shall be in the actual possession of the Collateral Agent and all other steps required under applicable law or requested by the Collateral Agent to ensure that the Pledge Agreements create valid, first priority, perfected Liens (subject to Permitted Encumbrances) on all the Collateral subject thereto shall have been taken;
 
one or more Security Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time and there shall have been subjected to security interests thereunder securing the Obligations all the assets of each such Person in which a security interest can be created under the UCC, and all documents and instruments, including UCC financing statements, required by law or reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to create the security interests intended to be created by the Security Agreements and perfect such Liens to the extent required by, and with the priority required by, the Security Agreements, shall have been filed, registered or recorded (or arrangements satisfactory to the Collateral Agent for such filing, registration or recording shall have been made);
(iii)
         
 
the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary party to the Guarantee Agreement, any Pledge Agreement or any Security Agreement, shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect; and
(iv)
         
 
each Loan Party shall have obtained all consents and approvals required to be obtained by it in connection with the execution and delivery of all Security Documents to which it is a party, the performance of its obligations thereunder and the granting by it of the Liens thereunder; and
(v)
          
 
at all times when there shall be one or more Foreign Subsidiaries that are Foreign Borrowers under this Agreement:
(b)
          
 
the Guarantee Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by each Foreign Subsidiary that is a direct or indirect
(i)
           
parent of any such Foreign Borrower (a "") (it being understood that each Foreign Parent will guarantee only the Obligations of Foreign Borrowers that are its subsidiaries), shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect;
Foreign Parent
 
one or more Pledge Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by each Foreign Borrower and each Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower existing at such time and directly owning any outstanding Equity Interests or any Indebtedness, and there shall have been duly and validly pledged to the Collateral Agent under the Pledge Agreement, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, (A) all the Equity Interests in such Foreign Borrower, each Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower and each Subsidiary directly owned in whole or in part by such Foreign Borrower or any such Foreign Parent, including any such Equity Interests owned by the Company and the Domestic Subsidiaries that are not pledged pursuant to clause (a)(ii) above and (B) all the Indebtedness that is owed to such Foreign Borrower or a Foreign Parent (it being understood that the Equity Interests and Indebtedness referred to in this clause (ii) will secure only the Obligations of such Foreign Borrower); and any certificates, promissory notes or other instruments representing such Equity Interests or Indebtedness, accompanied by stock powers or other instruments of transfer endorsed in blank, shall be in the actual possession of the Collateral Agent and all other steps required under applicable law or requested by the Collateral Agent to ensure that the Pledge Agreements create valid, first priority, perfected Liens (subject to Permitted Encumbrances) on all the Collateral subject thereto shall have been taken; and
(ii)
          
 
one or more Security Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by each Foreign Borrower or Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower existing at such time and there shall have been subjected to security interests thereunder securing the Obligations of such Foreign Borrower (but not any obligations of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary) all the personal property or fixtures (within the meaning of the UCC) of such Person in which a security interest can be created under the laws of each applicable jurisdiction, with such exceptions as the Collateral Agent may approve in its sole discretion, and without liability to any party hereto, taking into account the cost and difficulty involved in creating or perfecting any such security interest and the benefits to the Lenders that would result therefrom, and all documents and instruments required by law or reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to create the security interests intended to be created by the Security Agreements and perfect such Liens to the extent required by, and with the priority required by, the Security Agreements, shall have been filed, registered or recorded (or arrangements satisfactory to the Collateral Agent for such filing, registration or recording shall have been made).
(iii)
         
Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this definition, if the Company or any Subsidiary shall be using commercially reasonable efforts to create or perfect any pledge of Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of any Foreign Subsidiary, the failure to have created or perfected such pledge shall not, in and of itself, prevent the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement from being satisfied until (x) the later of (i) the 90th day after the Effective Date and (ii) the 90th day after the acquisition of such Collateral by the Company or a Domestic Subsidiary or (y) if, in the judgment of the Collateral Agent, the Company is endeavoring in good faith to satisfy the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement, the 180th day after the acquisition of such Collateral by the Company or a Domestic Subsidiary.
 
"" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lender's Revolving Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to or and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to .  The initial amount of each Lender's Commitment is set forth on , or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment, as applicable.  The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Commitments is $100,000,000.
Commitment
Section 2.07
Section 2.18
Section 9.04
Schedule 2.01
 
"" means a Commitment Increase Agreement substantially in the form of among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and a Lender.
Commitment Increase Agreement
Exhibit 1.01E
 
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.18.
Commitment Increase Notice
 
"" means Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation.
Company
 
"" means, for any period, the EBITDA of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis; that (i) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio and Adjusted Leverage Ratio, but not for any other purpose, Consolidated EBITDA for any period of four fiscal quarters during which an Acquisition shall have occurred shall be computed on a pro forma consolidated basis to include the EBITDA of such Acquisition and (ii) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio but not for any other purpose, all references to Restricted Subsidiaries in this definition and in the definitions referred to herein shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
Consolidated EBITDA
provided
 
"" means, for any Person for any period, the net income (or loss) of such person and its subsidiaries during such period, calculated and consolidated or combined in accordance with GAAP; that there shall be excluded from such net income (to the extent otherwise included therein) the following: (i) any non-cash, non-recurring charges, (ii) gains or losses attributable to Property sales not in the ordinary course of business, and (iii) the cumulative effect of a change in accounting principles and any gains or losses attributable to writeups or writedowns of assets.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
"" means the total assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries less, without duplication, (i) intangible assets including, without limitation, goodwill, research and development costs, trademarks, trade names, patents, franchises, copyrights, licenses and like general intangibles, experimental or organizational expense, unamortized debt discount and expense carried as an asset, all reserves and any write-up in the book of value of assets made after the Effective Date (other than write-ups of assets of a going concern business made within 12 months after the acquisition of such business), net of accumulated amortization and (ii) all reserves for depreciation and other asset valuation reserves (but excluding reserves for federal, state and other income taxes).
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets
 
"" means, at any time:
Consolidated Tangible Net Worth
 
the total assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries which would be shown as assets on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of such time prepared in accordance with GAAP, after eliminating all amounts properly attributable to minority interests, if any, in the stock and surplus of Restricted Subsidiaries,
(A)
         
minus
 
the total liabilities of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries which would be shown as liabilities on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of such time prepared in accordance with GAAP,
(B)
          
minus
 
the net book amount of all assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries (after deducting any reserves applicable thereto) that would be shown as intangible assets on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of such time prepared in accordance with GAAP.
(C)
          
 
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.  "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
"" means all assets of a Person which under GAAP would be classified as current assets.
Current Assets
 
"" means all liabilities of a Person which under GAAP would be classified as current liabilities, other than current maturities of Long-Term Indebtedness and the obligation to repay the Revolving Loans.
Current Liabilities
 
"" means, on any day, the ratio of (a) the Current Assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries to (b) the Current Liabilities of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, each on a consolidated basis.
Current Ratio
 
"" means, for any period, the sum of (a) Cash Interest Expense for such period and(b) scheduled principal payments on Total Indebtedness for such period.
Debt Service
"" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
"" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in .
Disclosed Matters
Schedule 3.06
 
"" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
"" means all Subsidiaries incorporated or organized under the laws of the United States of America, any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Domestic Subsidiaries
 
"" means, for any Person for any period, without duplication, the Consolidated Net Income of such Person for such period , to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, Cash Interest Expense, depreciation, amortization, other non-cash, non-recurring charges and income tax (including state franchise taxes based upon income) expense.
EBITDA
plus
 
"" has the meaning in the preamble of this Agreement.
Effective Date
 
"" means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
 
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Company or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
 
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest.
Equity Interests
 
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
 
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Company, is treated as a single employer under or of the Code or, solely for purposes of of ERISA and of the Code, is treated as a single employer under of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
Section 414(b)
(c)
Section 302
Section 412
Section 414
"" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in of the Code or of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to of the Code or of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Company or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Company or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
Section 4043
Section 412
Section 302
Section 412(d)
Section 303(d)
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
 
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in ARTICLE VII.
Event of Default
 
"" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Lender or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under ), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure to comply with , except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to .
Excluded Taxes
Section 2.17(b)
Section 2.15(e)
Section 2.15(a)
 
"" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
"" means the letter agreement dated December 15, 2004, between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
Fee Letter
 
"" means the fiscal quarter of the Company, ending on the last day of each March, June, September and December of each year.
Fiscal Quarter
 
"" means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Borrower.
Financial Officer
 
"" means, for any period, the ratio of (i) Consolidated EBITDA plus Lease Expense and less cash taxes of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period to (ii) the Debt Service plus Capital Expenditures plus Lease Expense of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
"" means any Borrowing Subsidiary that is a Foreign Subsidiary.
Foreign Borrower
 
"" means, with respect to any Borrower, any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which such Borrower is located.  For purposed of the definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
 
"" means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
"" means (ii) any authorization, consent, approval, license, waiver, ruling, permit, tariff, rate, certification, exemption, filing, variance, claim, order, judgment, decree, sanction or publication of, by or with; (iii)any notice to; (iv) any declaration of or with; or (v) any registration by or with, or any other action or deemed action by or on behalf of, any Governmental Authority.
Governmental Approval
 
"" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
 
"" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
provided
 
"" means the Guarantee Agreement substantially in the form of among the Company, the Guarantors from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Guarantee Agreement
Exhibit 1.01G
 
"" means all the Domestic Subsidiaries and the Foreign Parent of each Foreign Borrower who is required to execute a Guarantee Agreement pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of the definition of Collateral and Guarantee Requirement.
Guarantors
 
""  means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
 
"" means, as to any Lender or the Issuing Lender, the maximum nonusurious rate of interest that, under applicable law, may be contracted for, taken, reserved, charged or received by such Lender on the Loans or under the Loan Documents at any time or from time to time.  If the maximum rate of interest which, under applicable law, any of such Lenders are permitted to charge the Borrower on the Loans shall change after the date hereof, to the extent permitted by applicable law, the Highest Lawful Rate shall be automatically increased or decreased, as the case may be, as of the effective time of such change without notice to the Borrower or any other Person.
Highest Lawful Rate
 
"" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty and (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances.  The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such
Indebtedness
Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.
 
"" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
 
"" means the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement substantially in the form of among the Company, the Domestic Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
Exhibit 1.01H
 
"" means any indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary owed to and held by the Company or any Wholly Owned Subsidiary; that any subsequent issuance or transfer of any Equity Interest which results in any such Wholly Owned Subsidiary ceasing to be a Wholly Owned Subsidiary or any subsequent transfer of such indebtedness (other than to the Company or another Wholly Owned Subsidiary) shall be deemed, in each case, to constitute a new incurrence of Indebtedness other than Intercompany Indebtedness by the issuer thereof.
Intercompany Indebtedness
provided
 
"" means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with .
Interest Election Request
Section 2.06
 
"" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan, the last day of each March, June, September and December, and (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period.
Interest Payment Date
 
"" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect; provided, that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period.  For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
 
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as the issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in .  The Issuing Lender may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of the Issuing Lender, in which case the term "Issuing Lender" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Lender
Section 2.05
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company and Benchmark Electronics Delaware Corp., Benchmark Electronics Huntsville, Inc., Avex Constitution, Inc., Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., Avex Liberty, Inc., Avex Holdings, Inc., Benchmark Electronics California, Inc., Benchmark Electronics Company and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreement
 
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company, Benchmark Electronics Delaware Corp., Benchmark Electronics Huntsville, Inc., Avex Constitution, Inc., Avex Liberty, Inc., Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., Avex Holdings, Inc., Benchmark Electronics California, Inc., Benchmark Electronics Company and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
 
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company, Benchmark Electronics Delaware Corp., Benchmark Electronics Huntsville, Inc., Avex Constitution, Inc., Avex Liberty, Inc., Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., Avex Holdings, Inc., Benchmark Electronics California, Inc., Benchmark Electronics Company and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement
 
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company, Benchmark Electronics Delaware Corp., Benchmark Electronics Huntsville, Inc., Avex Constitution, Inc., Avex Liberty, Inc., Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., Avex Holdings, Inc., Benchmark Electronics California, Inc., Benchmark Electronics Company and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement
 
"" means all laws, statutes, treaties, ordinances, codes, acts, rules, regulations, Government Approvals and Orders of all Governmental Authorities, whether now or hereafter in effect.
Law
 
"" means a payment made by the Issuing Lender pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
 
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time.  The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
plus
 
"" for any period shall mean gross operating lease obligations of the Borrower and its Restricted Subsidiaries for any relevant period for which such calculation is being utilized.
Lease Expense
"" means the Persons listed on and any other Person that shall have become a Lender hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.
Lenders
Schedule 2.01
 
"" means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
 
"" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company ended on such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, ended on the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company most recently ended prior to such date); provided, that for purposes of determining the Leverage Ratio, all references in the definitions of Total Indebtedness and Consolidated EBITDA (and in the definitions used therein) to Restricted Subsidiaries shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
Leverage Ratio
 
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period.  In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "" with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
LIBO Rate
 
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.  For the purposes of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company shall be deemed to be the owner of any Property which it has acquired or holds subject to a conditional sale agreement, financing lease or other arrangement pursuant to which title to the Property has been retained by or vested in some other Person for security purposes.
Lien
 
"" means this Agreement, each Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement, each Borrowing Subsidiary Termination, the Guarantee Agreement, the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement, the Letters of Credit (and any applications therefor and reimbursement agreements relating thereto), the Security Documents, any promissory note issued pursuant to .
Loan Documents
Section 2.08
"" means each Borrower and each Subsidiary that is party to the Guarantee Agreement or any Security Document.
Loan Parties
 
"" means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement.
Loans
 
"" means any Indebtedness that, in accordance with GAAP, constitutes (or, when incurred, constituted) a long-term liability.
Long-Term Indebtedness
 
"" means any event, development or circumstance that has had or could reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, property or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the validity or enforceability of any of the Loan Documents or the rights or remedies of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders.
Material Adverse Effect
 
"" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $25,000,000.  For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
 
"" means January 20, 2008.
Maturity Date
 
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
 
"" means a multiemployer plan as defined in of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
Section 4001(a)(3)
 
"" means, with respect to any event, (a) the cash proceeds received in respect of such event net of all brokerage commissions, reasonable fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid by the Company to third parties (other than Affiliates) in connection with such event.
Net Cash Proceeds
 
"" means, at any time and from time to time, the net worth of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, determined in accordance with GAAP.
Net Worth
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
New Lender
Section 2.18(b)
 
"" means an agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and a New Lender in substantially in the form of or a form that is reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
New Lender Agreement
Exhibit 1.01I
 
"" means (a) the due and punctual payment by the Borrowers or the applicable Loan Parties of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the
Obligations
Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrowers under this Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements, interest thereon and obligations to provide cash collateral and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Secured Parties under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (b) the due and punctual payment and performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Loan Parties, monetary or otherwise, under or pursuant to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and (c) the due and punctual payment of all obligations of the Company under each Swap Agreement entered into (i) prior to the Effective Date with any counterparty that is a Lender (or an Affiliate thereof) on the date hereof or (ii) on or after the Effective Date with any counterparty that is a Lender (or an Affiliate thereof) at the time such Swap Agreement is entered into.
 
"" means an order, writ, judgment, award, injunction, decree, ruling or decision of any Governmental Authority or arbitrator.
Order
 
"" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statement.
Original Credit Agreement
 
"" means any and all present or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement.
Other Taxes
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Participant
Section 9.04
 
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
 
"" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
Liens imposed by law for taxes that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with ;
(a)
          
Section 5.05
 
carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, repairmen's and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 90 days or are being contested in compliance with ;
(b)
          
Section 5.05
 
pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
(c)
          
deposits to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(d)
          
 
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under of ;
(e)
          
clause (k)
Article VII
 
easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary;
(f)
           
 
any obligations or duties affecting any of the property of the Company or the Subsidiaries to any municipality or public authority with respect to any franchise, grant, license or permit which do not materially impair the use of such property for the purposes for which it is held;
(g)
          
 
Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statements regarding operating leases; and
(h)
          
 
Liens arising out of consignment or similar arrangements for the sale of goods entered into by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business.
(i)
           
 
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
 
"" means:
Permitted Investments
 
direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
(a)
          
 
investments in commercial paper maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moody's;
(b)
          
 
investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which (i) has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000 and (ii) has short-term credit ratings of at least A1 and P1 by S&P and Moody's, respectively;
(c)
          
 
fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above; the Company shall take possession of all securities purchased by the Company or any Subsidiary under repurchase
(d)
          
provided
that
and shall adhere to customary margin and mark-to-market procedures with respect to fluctuations in value; and
agreements
 
money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P and Aaa by Moody's or invest solely in the assets described in through above and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
(e)
          
clauses (a)
(d)
 
municipal investments with a rating of AAA by S&P and Aaa by Moody's and a maximum maturity of one year (for securities where the interest rate is adjusted periodically (e.g. floating rate securities), the interest rate reset date will be used to determine the maturity date); and
(f)
           
 
variable rate notes issued by, or guaranteed by, any state agency, municipality or domestic corporation rated A-1 (or the equivalent thereof) or better by S&P or P-1 (or the equivalent thereof) or better by Moody's and maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition (the interest rate reset date will be used to determine the maturity date).
(g)
          
 
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
""  means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or of the Code or of ERISA, and in respect of which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in of ERISA.
Plan
Section 412
Section 302
Section 4069
Section 3(5)
 
"" means (a) a Pledge Agreement substantially in the form of among the Company, the Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent and (b) in connection with pledges of shares of or other equity interests in Foreign Subsidiaries, other pledge agreements or similar agreements in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Pledge Agreements
Exhibit 1.01K
 
"" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
"" means a Domestic Subsidiary that does not own any assets other than, or engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of, Equity Interests of one or more Domestic or Foreign Subsidiaries and that does not have any Indebtedness or liabilities other than (a) liabilities incidental to its ownership of such Equity Interests and (b) liabilities as a Guarantor of the Obligations.
Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company
 
"" means the last day of each March, June, September and December in each year.
Quarterly Dates
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Re-Allocation Date
Section 2.18(e)
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Register
Section 9.04(b)
 
"" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
"" means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Exposures and unused Commitments representing at least 51% of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
 
"" means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in the Company or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in the Company.
Restricted Payment
 
"" means (a) any Domestic Subsidiary and (b) any Foreign Subsidiary that is not an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
Restricted Subsidiary
 
"" means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the (a) outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans and (b) such Lender's LC Exposure, in each case at such time.
Revolving Exposure
 
"" means a Loan made pursuant to .
Revolving Loan
Section 2.01
 
"" means any period of four consecutive Fiscal Quarters (or, if less, the number of full Fiscal Quarters subsequent to the Effective Date).
Rolling Period
 
"" means Standard & Poor's Rating Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. and any successor thereto.
S&P
 
"" means the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, each Lender, the Issuing Lender and each other person to which any of the Obligations is owed.
Secured Parties
 
"" means (a) a Security Agreement substantially in the form of among the Company, the Domestic Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties and (b) in connection with the creation of security interests in the assets of Foreign Subsidiaries, other security agreements or similar agreements in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Security Agreements
Exhibit 1.01L
 
"" means the Security Agreements, the Pledge Agreements, the Guarantee Agreements, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreements, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement, the Joinder to,
Security Documents
Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement and each other security document or pledge agreement delivered pursuant to or to secure any of the Obligations or in accordance with applicable local or foreign law to grant a valid, perfected security interest in any property, and all UCC or other financing statements or instruments of perfection required by this Agreement or any security agreement to be filed with respect to the security interests in property and fixtures created pursuant to the Security Agreement and any other document or instrument utilized to pledge as collateral for the Obligations any property of whatever kind or nature.
Section 5.11
Section 5.13
 
"" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject (a) with respect to the Base CD Rate, for new negotiable nonpersonal time deposits in dollars of over $100,000 with maturities approximately equal to three months and (b) with respect to the Adjusted LIBO Rate, for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board).  Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D.  Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation.  The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
 
"" means subordinated debt securities issued by the Company that (a) are subordinated to the Obligations pursuant to subordination provisions approved by Administrative Agent, (b) contain covenants, events of default and mandatory redemption, repayment, prepayment or repurchase requirements approved by Administrative Agent, (c) do not mature, and are not subject to any scheduled amortization, redemption, repayment, prepayment or repurchase requirement, prior to the date one year after the Maturity Date and (d) are not Guaranteed by any of the Subsidiaries.
Subordinated Indebtedness
 
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
 
"" means any subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Borrower or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
 
"" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
 
"" means, for any day, the secondary market rate for three-month certificates of deposit reported as being in effect on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next preceding Business Day) by the Board through the public information telephone line of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (which rate will, under the current practices of the Board, be published in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15(519) during the week following such day) or, if such rate is not so reported on such day or such next preceding Business Day, the average of the secondary market quotations for three-month certificates of deposit of major money center banks in New York City received at approximately 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, on the next preceding Business Day) by the Administrative Agent from three negotiable certificate of deposit dealers of recognized standing selected by it.
Three-Month Secondary CD Rate
 
(ii) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio but not for any other purpose, all references to Restricted Subsidiaries in this definition and in the definitions referred to herein shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
"" means, as of any date, the sum of (a) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date, in the amount that would be reflected on a balance sheet prepared as of such date on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, plus (b) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date that is not required to be reflected on a balance sheet in accordance with GAAP, determined on a consolidated basis; provided that, (i) for purposes of clause (b) above, the term "Indebtedness" shall not include contingent obligations of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty unless such letter of credit or letter of guaranty supports an obligation that constitutes Indebtedness and
Total Indebtedness
 
"" means the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the borrowing of Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effect in the State of Texas or, where applicable as to specific Collateral, any other relevant state.
UCC
 
"" means (i) any Foreign Subsidiary of the Company that at the time of determination shall have been designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary by the Company in the manner provided below (and shall not subsequently have been designated as a Restricted Subsidiary), (ii) any subsidiary of an Unrestricted Subsidiary and (iii) Avex International Corporation.  The Company may from time to time designate any Foreign Subsidiary (other than a Foreign Subsidiary that, immediately after such designation, shall hold any Indebtedness of or Equity Interest in the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary) as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, and may designate any Unrestricted Subsidiary as a Restricted Subsidiary so long as, immediately after giving effect to such designation, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.  Any designation by the Company pursuant to this definition shall be made in an officer's certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent and containing a certification that such designation is in compliance with the terms of this definition.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Borrowing Subsidiary shall at any time be an Unrestricted Subsidiary.  contains a list of the Foreign Subsidiaries that have been designated by the Company as Unrestricted Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date.
Unrestricted Subsidiary
Schedule 1.01
 
"" means any Subsidiary of the Company all the Equity Interests of which (other than directors' qualifying shares and Equity Interests held by other than the Persons to the extent such Equity Interests are required by applicable law to be held by a Person other than the Company or one of its Subsidiaries) is owned by the Company or one or more Wholly Owned Subsidiaries.
Wholly Owned Subsidiary
 
"" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
.  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation".  The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall".  Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Section 1.02
          
Terms Generally
.  Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Company notifies the Administrative Agent that the Company requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Company that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith.
Section 1.03
          
Accounting Terms; GAAP
provided
 
.  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to any Borrower from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (i) such Lender's Revolving Exposure exceeding such Lender's Commitment or (ii) in the case of any Foreign Borrower, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans of all Foreign Borrowers exceeding $20,000,000.  Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, any Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Section 2.01
          
Commitments
 
.  (a) Each Loan made pursuant to shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments.  The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Loans as required.
Section 2.02
          
Loans and Borrowings
Section 2.01
provided
 
Subject to , each Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith.  Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
(b)
          
Section 2.12
provided
 
At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $1,000,000.  At the time that each ABR Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000; provided that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Commitments.  Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of eight Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
(c)
          
provided
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, no Borrower shall be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
(d)
          
 
.  To request a Borrowing, the applicable Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing.  Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.  Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with :
Section 2.03
          
Requests for Borrowings
Section 2.02
 
the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
(i)
           
 
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
(ii)
          
 
whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
(iii)
         
 
in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "";
(iv)
         
Interest Period
 
the Borrower requesting such Borrowing; and
(v)
          
 
the location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of .
(vi)
         
Section 2.05(a)
 
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing.  If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.  Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
 
.  (a) .  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Company may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account or for the joint and several account of the Company and a Borrowing Subsidiary in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period.  Such Letters of Credit may be used for the benefit of any Subsidiary and may identify such Subsidiary in the text thereof so long as either the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary is the account party thereon.  In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Company to, or entered into by the Company with, the Issuing Lender relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Section 2.04
          
Letters of Credit
General
.  To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Company shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the Issuing Lender) to the Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit.  If requested by the Issuing Lender, the Company also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Lender's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit.  A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Company shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $20,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Exposures shall not exceed the total Commitments.
(b)
          
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions
 
.  Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; , , that any Letter of Credit with a one-year tenor may provide for the renewal thereof for additional one-year periods (which shall in no event extend beyond the date referred to in clause (ii) above).
(c)
          
Expiration Date
provided
however
 
.  By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Lender or the Lenders, the Issuing Lender hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Lender, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit.  In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Lender and not reimbursed by the Company on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Company for any reason.  Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
(d)
          
Participations
 
.  If the Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Company shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00
(e)
          
Reimbursement
noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Company shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Company prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Company receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Company receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt.  If the Company fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Company in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof.  Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Company, in the same manner as provided in with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders.  Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Company pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Lender or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Lender, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Lender as their interests may appear.  Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Lender for any LC Disbursement shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Company of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Section 2.05
Section 2.05
mutatis mutandis
 
.  The Company's obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Lender under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Company's obligations hereunder.  Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Lender, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Lender; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Lender from liability to the Company to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Company to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Company that are caused by the Issuing Lender's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of
(f)
           
Obligations Absolute
provided
with the terms thereof.  The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Lender (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Lender shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination.  In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Lender may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
Credit comply
 
.  The Issuing Lender shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Company by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any demand for payment under a Letter of Credit and whether the Issuing Lender has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Company of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Lender and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
(g)
          
Disbursement Procedures
provided
 
.  If the Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Company shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Company reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Company fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then shall apply.  Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Lender, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Lender shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
(h)
          
Interim Interest
provided
Section 2.11(c)
 
.  The Issuing Lender may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Company, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Lender and the successor Issuing Lender.  The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Issuing Lender.  At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Company shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Lender pursuant to .  From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of the Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Lender" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Lender, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Lenders, as the context shall require.  After the replacement of an Issuing Lender hereunder, the replaced Issuing Lender shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
(i)
           
Replacement of the Issuing Lender
Section 2.10(b)
 
.  If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Company receives notice from the Administrative
(j)
           
Cash Collateralization
Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Company shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in or of .  The Company also shall deposit cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph as and to the extent required by .  Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Company under this Agreement.  The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account.  Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Company's risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest.  Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account.  Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Lender for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Company for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Company under this Agreement.  If the Company is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Company within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.  If the Company is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to , such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Company as and to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, the Company would remain in compliance with and no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
provided
clause (h)
(i)
ARTICLE VII
Section 2.09(b)
Section 2.09(b)
Section 2.09(b)
 
.  (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders.  The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the applicable Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower maintained with the Administrative Agent in New York City and designated by such Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request.
Section 2.05
          
Funding of Borrowings
 
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the applicable Borrower a corresponding amount.  In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the
(b)
          
Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans.  If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
 
.  (a) Each Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request.  Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section.  The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.
Section 2.06
          
Interest Elections
 
To make an election pursuant to this Section, the applicable Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under if the Borrower were requesting a Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election.  Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.
(b)
          
Section 2.03
 
Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with :
(c)
          
Section 2.02
 
the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
(i)
           
 
the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
(ii)
          
 
whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
(iii)
         
 
if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
(iv)
         
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
(d)
          
 
If the applicable Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing.  Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
(e)
          
 
.
Section 2.07
          
Termination and Reduction of Commitments
 
Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
(a)
          
 
The Company may at any time terminate or from time to time reduce the Commitments; provided that (A) each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $5,000,000 and (B) the Company shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Loans in accordance with , the sum of the Revolving Exposures would exceed the total Commitments.
(b)
          
Section 2.09
 
The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof.  Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each notice delivered by the Company pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Company may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Company (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied.  Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent.  Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
(c)
          
provided
 
.  (a) Each Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan of such Lender on the Maturity Date.
Section 2.08
          
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
 
Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of each Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
(b)
          
The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrowers to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
(c)
          
 
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of any Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
(d)
          
prima
facie
provided
 
Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note.  In such event, the applicable Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and the Company.  Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to ) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
(e)
          
Section 9.04
 
.  (a) Each Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
Section 2.09
          
Prepayment of Loans
 
In the event and on each occasion that the sum of the Revolving Exposures exceeds the total Commitments, the Borrowers shall prepay Borrowings (or, if no such Borrowings are outstanding, deposit cash collateral in an account with the Administrative Agent pursuant to ) in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
(b)
          
Section 2.04(j)
 
The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment.  Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of optional prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by , then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with .  Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in .  Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing.  Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by .
(c)
          
provided
Section 2.07
Section 2.07
Section 2.02
Section 2.11
.  (a) The Company shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Margin on the daily amount of the unused Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which such Commitment terminates.  Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date.  All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Section 2.10
          
Fees
 
The Company shall pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Margin used to determine the interest rate applicable to Eurodollar Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates and the date on which it ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to the Issuing Lender a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 0.125% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as the Issuing Lender's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder.  Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; provided that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand.  Any other fees payable to the Issuing Lender pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand.  All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
(b)
          
 
The Company shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times set forth in the Fee Letter.
(c)
          
 
All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the Issuing Lender, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders.  Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
(d)
          
 
.  (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Margin.
Section 2.11
          
Interest
 
The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Margin.
(b)
          
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
(c)
          
 
Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and, in the case of Loans, upon termination of the Commitments; provided that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
(d)
          
 
All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
(e)
          
 
.  If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Section 2.12
          
Alternate Rate of Interest
 
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
(i)
           
 
the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
(ii)
          
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Company and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing; that if the circumstances giving rise to such notice affect only one Type of Borrowings, then the other Type of Borrowings shall be permitted.
provided
.  (a)  If any Change in Law shall:
Section 2.13
          
Increased Costs
 
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or the Issuing Lender; or
(i)
           
 
impose on any Lender or the Issuing Lender or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
(ii)
          
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or the Issuing Lender of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the Issuing Lender hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Company will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
If any Lender or the Issuing Lender determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Lender, to a level below that which such Lender or the Issuing Lender or such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Company will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender or such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
(b)
          
 
A certificate of a Lender or the Issuing Lender setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Company and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Company shall pay such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
(c)
          
 
Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the Issuing Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's right to demand such compensation; that the Company shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the Issuing Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, notifies the Company of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's intention to claim
(d)
          
provided
therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
compensation
provided
further
 
.  In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Revolving Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the applicable Borrower pursuant to , then, in any such event, the applicable Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event.  In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market.  A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The applicable Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Section 2.14
          
Break Funding Payments
Section 2.09(c)
Section 2.17
 
.  (a)Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Documents shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if such Loan Party shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Lender (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) such Loan Party shall make such deductions and (iii) such Loan Party shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Section 2.15
          
Taxes
             
provided
 
In addition, the Company shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
(b)
          
 
The Company shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Issuing Lender, within 10 Business Days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Documents (including
(c)
          
Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority.  A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Company by a Lender or the Issuing Lender, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the Issuing Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Company shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(d)
          
 
Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the law of the jurisdiction in which a Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate.
(e)
          
 
If the Administrative Agent, a Lender or the Issuing Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Company or with respect to which any Loan Party has paid additional amounts pursuant to this , it shall pay over such refund to the Company (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Company under this with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); provided, that the Company, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Company (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender in the event the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes that it deems confidential) to the Company or any other Person.
(f)
           
Section 2.15
Section 2.15
 
.  (a)  Each Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under , or , or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, Houston time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim.  Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon.  All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 712 Main
Section 2.16
          
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs
Section 2.13
2.14
2.15
Street, Houston, Texas, except payments to be made directly to the Issuing Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to , , and shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto.  The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof.  If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension.  All payments hereunder shall be made in dollars.
Section 2.13
2.14
2.15
9.03
 
If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
(b)
          
 
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans, or participations in LC Disbursements resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements, and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by a Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply).  Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
(c)
          
provided
 
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Lender hereunder that such Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount due.  In such event, if such
(d)
          
Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Lender with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to , or , , or , then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
(e)
          
Section 2.04(d)
(e)
2.05(b)
2.16(d)
9.03(c)
 
.  (a) If any Lender requests compensation under , or if a Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to or , as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender.  The Borrowers shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Section 2.17
          
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
Section 2.13
Section 2.15
Section 2.13
2.15
 
If any Lender requests compensation under , or if a Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , or if any Lender defaults in its obligation to fund Loans hereunder, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in ), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); provided that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and if a Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Lender), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.15, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments.  A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
(b)
          
Section 2.13
Section 2.15
Section 9.04
Section 2.13
.  (a)If no Default, Event of Default or Material Adverse Effect shall have occurred and be continuing, the Company may at any time and from time to time request an increase of the aggregate Commitments by notice to the Administrative Agent in writing of the amount of such proposed increase (such notice, a ""); provided, however, that (i) each such increase shall be at least $10,000,000, (ii) the cumulative increase in Commitments pursuant to this shall not exceed $100,000,000, (iii) the Commitment of any Lender may not be increased without such Lender's consent, and (iv) the aggregate amount of the Lenders' Commitments shall not exceed $200,000,000.  Any such Commitment Increase Notice must offer each Lender the opportunity to subscribe for its pro rata share of the increased Commitments.  If any portion of the increased Commitments is not subscribed for by such Lenders, the Company may, in its sole discretion, but with the consent of the Administrative Agent as to any Person that is not at such time a Lender (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), offer to any existing Lender or to one or more additional banks or financial institutions the opportunity to participate in all or a portion of such unsubscribed portion of the increased Commitments pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) below, as applicable.
Section 2.18
          
Increase of Commitments
           
Commitment Increase Notice
Section 2.18
 
Any additional bank or financial institution that the Company selects to offer participation in the increased Commitments shall become a party to this Agreement by executing and delivering to the Administrative Agent a New Lender Agreement setting forth its Commitment, whereupon such bank or financial institution (a "") shall become a Lender for all purposes and to the same extent as if originally a party hereto and shall be bound by and entitled to the benefits of this Agreement, and the signature pages hereof shall be deemed to be amended to add the name of such New Lender and the definition of Commitment in hereof shall be deemed amended to increase the aggregate Commitments of the Lenders by the Commitment of such New Lender, that the Commitment of any New Lender shall be an amount not less than $5,000,000 (or any remaining portion of the increased Commitments not subscribed to by the Lenders).
(b)
          
New Lender
Section 1.01
provided
 
Any Lender that accepts an offer to it by the Borrower to increase its Commitment pursuant to this shall, in each case, execute a Commitment Increase Agreement with the Company and the Administrative Agent, whereupon such Lender shall be bound by and entitled to the benefits of this Agreement with respect to the full amount of its Commitment as so increased, and the definition of Commitment in hereof shall be deemed to be amended to reflect such increase.
(c)
          
Section 2.18
Section 1.01
 
The effectiveness of any New Lender Agreement or Commitment Increase Agreement shall be contingent upon receipt by the Administrative Agent of such corporate resolutions of the Company and legal opinions of counsel to the Company as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request with respect thereto, in each case in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
(d)
          
 
If any bank or financial institution becomes a New Lender pursuant to or any Lender's Commitment is increased pursuant to , additional Loans made on or after the effectiveness thereof (the "") shall be made pro rata based on their respective Commitments in effect on or after such Re-Allocation Date (except to the extent that any such pro rata borrowings would result in any Lender making an aggregate
(e)
          
Section 2.18(b)
Section 2.18(c)
Re-Allocation Date
principal amount of Loans in excess of its Commitment, in which case such excess amount will be allocated to, and made by, such New Lender and/or Lenders with such increased Commitments to the extent of, and pro rata based on, their respective Commitments), and continuations of Loans outstanding on such Re-Allocation Date shall be effected by repayment of such Loans on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto and the making of new Loans pro rata based on the respective Commitments in effect on and after such Re-Allocation Date.
 
If on any Re-Allocation Date there is an unpaid principal amount of Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans, such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans shall remain outstanding with the respective holders thereof until the expiration of their respective Interest Periods (unless the Company elects to prepay any thereof in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Agreement), and interest on and repayments of such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans will be paid thereon to the respective Lenders holding such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans pro rata based on the respective principal amounts thereof outstanding.
(f)
           
 
.  On or after the Effective Date, the Company may designate any Restricted Subsidiary of the Company as a Borrowing Subsidiary by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement executed by such Restricted Subsidiary and the Company, and upon such delivery such Restricted Subsidiary shall for all purposes of this Agreement be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement until the Company shall have executed and delivered to the Administrative Agent a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination with respect to such Restricted Subsidiary, whereupon such Restricted Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement.  Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, no Borrowing Subsidiary Termination will become effective as to any Borrowing Subsidiary at a time when any principal of or interest on any Revolving Loan to such Borrowing Subsidiary or any Letter of Credit issued for the account of such Borrowing Subsidiary shall be outstanding hereunder; that such Borrowing Subsidiary Termination shall be effective to terminate such Borrowing Subsidiary's right to make further Borrowings or to request Letters of Credit under this Agreement.  As soon as practicable upon receipt of a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement, the Administrative Agent shall send a copy thereof to each Lender.
Section 2.19
          
Borrowing Subsidiaries
provided
 
Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders that:
 
.  As of the Effective Date, each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, except Avex International Corporation (i) is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, (ii) has the requisite power and authority to conduct its business as it is presently being conducted, and (iii) is duly qualified or licensed to conduct business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction listed in .  Each Borrower and its Subsidiaries are qualified and licensed in all jurisdictions where they are required to be so qualified or licensed to operate their business and where the failure to so qualify or be in good standing, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be
Section 3.01
          
Organization
Schedule 3.01
 
expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.  No proceeding to dissolve any Loan Party is pending or, to the Borrower's knowledge, threatened.
 
           .  The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Party's corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action.  This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrowers and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Borrowers or such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Section 3.02
Authorization; Enforceability
 
           .  The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect, (ii) filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents and (iii) those the failure to obtain or make which, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement or other material instrument binding upon the Company  or any of its Subsidiaries or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, except Liens created under the Loan Documents.
Section 3.03
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
 
           .  (a)             The Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2003, reported on by KPMG LLP, independent certified public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the current fiscal year ended September 30, 2004, certified by its chief financial officer. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
Section 3.04
Financial Statements; No Material Adverse Change
 
(b)           Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of the Company or its Subsidiaries has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities, unusual long-term commitments or unrealized losses.
 
(c)           Since December 31, 2003, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, property, condition (financial or otherwise), of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
 
           .  (a)      Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that (i) do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and (ii) individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 3.05
Properties
 
(b)           Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, trade names, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by the Company and its Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
           . (a)       There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Section 3.06
Litigation and Environmental Matters
 
(b)           Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
 
(c)           Since the Effective Date, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
           . Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all Laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, material agreements and other material instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Section 3.07
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
 
           .  The Company and each of its Subsidiary owns, or is licensed to use, all patents, trademarks, trade names, service marks, copyrights, technology, know-how and processes (together with all applications therefor and licenses granting rights therein, "") reasonably necessary for the conduct of its business as currently conducted, except for those the failure to own or be licensed to use which could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  To the knowledge of the Company, (i) the use of Intellectual Property by the Company and its Subsidiaries does not infringe on the rights of any person, (ii) no Intellectual Property of the Company or any of its
Section 3.08
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property
Subsidiaries is being infringed upon by any person, and (iii) no claim is pending or threatened in writing challenging the use or the validity of any Intellectual Property of the Company or any Subsidiary, except for infringements and claims referred to in the foregoing clauses (a), (b) and (c) that, in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
           .  Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is (a) an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or (b) a "holding company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, as amended.
Section 3.09
Investment and Holding Company Status
 
           .  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) any Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Company or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 3.10
Taxes
 
           .  No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $10,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
Section 3.11
ERISA
 
           .  As of the Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened.  The hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries have not been in violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other Law dealing with such matters in any manner that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.  All payments due from the Company or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against any of them, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries.  The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is bound.
Section 3.12
Labor Matters
 
           .   lists all policies or binders of fire, liability, worker's compensation, vehicular or other insurance held by or for the benefit of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (specifying the insurer, the policy number or covering note number with respect to binders) as of the Effective Date.  As of the Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.  All insurance is in full force and effect, is with
Section 3.13
Insurance
Schedule 3.13
financially sound and reputable insurers and is in amounts and provides coverage that are reasonable and customary for Persons engaged in businesses similar to those conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries.
 
           .  Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date, and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Effective Date and after giving effect to the application of the proceeds of such Loans, (a) the fair market value of the assets of each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinate, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities; (c) each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinate, contingent or otherwise as they become absolute and mature; and (d) each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct its business as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
Section 3.14
Solvency
 
           .  sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Company in, each Subsidiary of the Company and identifies each Subsidiary that is a Loan Party and each that is a Foreign Borrower, in each case as of the Effective Date.  As of Effective Date, there are no Borrowing Subsidiaries and no Person has executed a Borrower Supplement or a Foreign Borrower Supplement (as defined in the Amended and Restated Agreement) or obtained a Loan under of the Original Credit Agreement or the Amended and Restated Agreement.
Section 3.15
Subsidiaries
Schedule 3.15
Section 2.01
 
           .  The Company has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to it, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Company to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any Loan Document or delivered hereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contain any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, taken as a whole in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, the Borrowers represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Section 3.16
Disclosure
provided
 
           .  Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is engaged principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of buying or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board).  The proceeds of the Loans and the Letters of Credit will not be used, directly or indirectly, immediately, incidentally or ultimately, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any margin stock or for the purpose of reducing or retiring any Indebtedness which was originally incurred to purchase or carry margin stock or for any other purpose which might cause any of the
Section 3.17
Margin Stock
Loans or the Letters of Credit under this Agreement to be "purpose credit" within the meaning of Regulation U or Regulation X of the Board.
 
           .  The proceeds of the Loans shall be used only for working capital and other general corporate purposes, including without limitation, Acquisitions.  Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent that all Loans will be for business, commercial, investment or other similar purpose and not primarily for personal, family, household or agricultural use, as such terms are used in the Texas Finance Code.
Section 3.18
Use of Proceeds
 
           .  Except as set forth in , the Company and its Subsidiaries have no liabilities or obligations of any nature (whether known or unknown, and whether absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise) except for (i) liabilities or obligations reflected or reserved against in the Financial Statements or in the financial statements most recently delivered by the Borrower pursuant to , (ii) current liabilities incurred in the ordinary course of business since the date of such financial statements, (iii) liabilities or obligations that are not required to be included in financial statements prepared in accordance with GAAP, and (iv) liabilities or obligations arising under Governmental Approvals or contracts to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or otherwise subject.
Section 3.19
No Undisclosed Liabilities
Schedule 3.19
Section 5.01
 
 
           .  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with ):
Section 4.01
Effective Date
Section 9.02
 
(a)           The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
 
(b)           The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P., counsel for the Company, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and Required Lenders, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions as the Required Lenders shall reasonably request.  The Company hereby requests such counsel to deliver such opinion.
 
(c)           The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of each Loan Party, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, this Agreement or the
Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
(d)           The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Effective Date and signed by the President, a Vice President or a Financial Officer of the Company, confirming compliance with the conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (d) of .
Section 4.02
 
(e)           The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable legal fees) required to be reimbursed or paid by any Loan Party hereunder or under any Loan Documents.
 
(f)            All material governmental and third party approvals necessary or, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, advisable in connection with the financing contemplated hereby and the continuing operations of the Borrowers and its Subsidiaries shall have been obtained and be in full force and effect.
 
(g)           The Lenders shall have received (i) audited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the two most recent fiscal years ended prior to the Effective Date as to which such financial statements are available and (ii) satisfactory unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for each fiscal quarterly period ended subsequent to the date of the latest financial statements delivered pursuant to clause (i) of this paragraph as to which such financial statements are available which financial statements shall not be materially inconsistent with the financial statements or forecasts previously provided.
 
(h)           The Administrative Agent shall have received each of the Security Documents and they shall constitute satisfactory security documentation to create first priority security interests in the Collateral (free and clear of all Liens, other than Liens permitted by ).
Section 6.02
 
(i)            The Collateral and Guarantee Requirement shall have been satisfied.
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to ) at or prior to 3:00 p.m., Houston time, on January 20, 2005 (and, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied or waived, the Commitments shall terminate at such time).
Section 9.02
 
           .  The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of the Issuing Lender to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Section 4.02
Each Credit Event
 
(a)           The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be deemed to have been made as a part of said request for a Borrowing and shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date
of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
 
(b)           No Material Adverse Effect shall have occurred since the date of the most recent Borrowing by the Company.
 
(c)           The Administrative Agent shall have received a request for a Borrowing as required by or the Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent shall have received a request for the issuance of a Letter of Credit as required by ;
Section 2.03
Section 2.04(b)
 
(d)           At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this Section.
 
           .  The obligation of the Lenders to make Loans to any Borrowing Subsidiary and the obligations of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit for the account of any Borrowing Subsidiary are subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Section 4.03
Initial Credit Event for each Borrowing Subsidiary
 
(a)           The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement duly executed by such Borrowing Subsidiary and the other parties thereto.
 
(b)           The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion of counsel for such Borrowing Subsidiary, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Administrative Agent and Required Lenders, and covering such other matters relating to such Borrowing Subsidiary and its Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request.
 
(c)           The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of such Borrowing Subsidiary, the authorization of the Transactions insofar as they relate to such Borrowing Subsidiary, the satisfaction of the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement insofar as it relates to the assets of such Borrowing Subsidiary and any other legal matters relating to such Borrowing Subsidiary, its Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement or such Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
 
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters
of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
           .  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Section 5.01
Financial Statements and Other Information
 
(a)           within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, the audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries as of such year, all reported on by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
 
(b)           within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries and Company and the Restricted Subsidiaries as of such year, all certified by one of the Company's Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries or the Company on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)           concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with , , , and , (iii) setting forth in a reasonably detailed schedule, a comparison of the consolidated results under clause (a) or (b) above with the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Restricted Subsidiaries, and (iv) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
Section 6.15
6.16
6.17
6.18
Section 3.04
 
(d)           concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, any management letter delivered to the management of the Company by the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements;
 
(e)           promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Company or any Subsidiary
with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
 
(f)            promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of this Agreement, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request;
 
(g)           within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year, a summary description of the insurance policies of the Company and its Subsidiaries; and
 
(h)           promptly following any request thereof, all information and/or documentation necessary to comply with the Act or for Administrative Agent to confirm compliance with the Act.
 
           .  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt and, in any event, within five Business Days, written notice of the following:
Section 5.02
Notices of Material Events
 
(a)           the occurrence of any Default;
 
(b)           the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Company or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect or that in any manner questions the validity of the Loan Documents;
 
(c)           the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties);
 
(d)           the occurrence of any event or any other development by which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) fails to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) becomes subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) receives notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) becomes aware of any basis for any Environmental Liability and in each of the preceding clauses, which individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; and
 
(e)           any other development (including the termination of any material contract) that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
           .  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change (i) in any Loan Party's corporate name or in any trade name used to identify it in the conduct of its business or in the ownership of its properties, (ii) in any Loan Party's identity or corporate structure or (iii) in any Loan Party's Federal Taxpayer Identification Number and, at the time of the delivery of the financial statements required under , the Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent written notice of (i) any change in the location of any office in which any Loan Party maintains books or records relating to Collateral owned by it and (ii) any new office or facility at which Collateral owned by a Loan Party is located.  The Company agrees not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the UCC or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral.  The Company also agrees promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
Section 5.03
Information Regarding Collateral
Section 5.01(a)
 
           .  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under .
Section 5.04
Existence; Conduct of Business
provided
Section 6.03
 
           .  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other obligations, including Tax liabilities, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (b) the Company or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.05
Payment of Obligations
 
           .  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.06
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
 
           .  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies (a) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (b) all insurance required to be maintained pursuant to the Security Documents.  The Company will furnish to the Lenders, upon request of the Administrative Agent, information in reasonable detail as to the insurance so maintained.
Section 5.07
Insurance
           .  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all material dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities.  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested.
Section 5.08
Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights
 
           .  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all Laws (including Environmental Laws) and Orders applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.09
Compliance with Laws
 
           .  The proceeds of the Loans will be used only for working capital and other general corporate purposes, including, without limitation, Acquisitions.  No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
Section 5.10
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
 
           .  If any additional Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Effective Date, the Company will, no more than thirty days after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired, notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof and cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied (to the extent applicable) with respect to such Subsidiary and with respect to any Equity Interest in or Indebtedness of such Subsidiary owned or to be owned by or on behalf of the Company or any other Subsidiary.
Section 5.11
Additional Subsidiaries
 
           .  (a)          The Company will, and will cause each of the Subsidiaries to, ensure that all Equity Interests in Domestic Subsidiaries are owned directly or indirectly at all times only by the Company or one or more other Domestic Subsidiaries and that all the Equity Interests of such latter Domestic Subsidiaries are pledged to secure the Obligations.
Section 5.12
Ownership of Subsidiaries
 
(b)           As promptly as practicable, and in any event within 30 days after the Effective Date, the Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, ensure that any Foreign Subsidiary (including each Foreign Subsidiary acquired in connection with an Acquisition), is owned directly or indirectly at all times by a Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company and that all the Equity Interests of such Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company are pledged to secure the Obligations.
 
           .  The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, at its own cost and expense, execute, acknowledge and deliver any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments and take all such further actions,  (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust, and other documents) which may be required under any applicable Law, or which may from time to time be reasonably necessary or as the Required Lenders may from time to time reasonably request in order to carry out the intent and purpose of the Loan Documents and the
Section 5.13
Further Assurances
Transactions, including all such actions to establish, preserve, protect and perfect the estate, right, title and interest of the Lenders, or the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, to the Collateral (including Collateral acquired after the date hereof) and preserve, protect and perfect first priority Liens (subject to Liens permitted by ) in favor of the Lenders, or the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, on any and all assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries, now owned or hereafter acquired, that are not Collateral on the date hereof.
Section 6.02
 
 
 
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees  payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Section 6.01
Indebtedness
 
(a)           the Obligations;
 
(b)           Subordinated Indebtedness;
 
(c)           Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or shorten the maturity or the weighted average life thereof;
Schedule 6.01
 
(d)           Intercompany Indebtedness (to the extent permitted by );
Section 6.04
 
(e)           Guarantees by the Company or any Subsidiary of Indebtedness of any Restricted Subsidiary which Indebtedness is permitted under this Section 6.01, provided, in no event shall the Company or any Subsidiary guarantee the Indebtedness of any Unrestricted Subsidiary or any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party hereunder.
 
(f)            Indebtedness of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary or any Foreign Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations, and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 90 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (f) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(g)           Indebtedness of any Person that becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower after the Effective Date; that (i) such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower, as the case may be, and is
provided
not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (g) shall not exceed $25,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(h)           Indebtedness of Unrestricted Subsidiaries for which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary shall be liable as obligor, under any Guarantee or otherwise;
 
(i)            other unsecured Indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $50,000,000 at any time outstanding; and
 
(j)            other secured Indebtedness incurred by Foreign Subsidiaries that are Restricted Subsidiaries for working capital purposes in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $25,000,000 at any time outstanding.
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Section 6.02
Liens
 
(a)           Liens created under the Loan Documents;
 
(b)           Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(c)           any Lien on any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary existing on the Effective Date and set forth in ; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the Effective Date, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
Schedule 6.02
provided
 
(d)           any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Company or any Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that is merged or consolidated with or into the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person is so merged or consolidated or becomes a Subsidiary; provided that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
 
(e)           Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Company or any Subsidiary, including Liens deemed to exist in respect of assets subject to Capital Lease Obligations; that (i) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by clause (f) of , (ii) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 90 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (iii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (iv) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary;
provided
Section 6.01
(f)            Liens securing Intercompany Indebtedness permitted under ;
Section 6.01(d)
 
(g)           Extensions, renewals or replacements of any Lien referred to in clauses (c), (d) and (e); that the principal amount of the Indebtedness or obligations secured thereby is not increased and that any such extension, renewal or replacement is limited to the assets originally encumbered thereby;
provided
 
(h)           Liens on the assets of Unrestricted Subsidiaries securing Indebtedness permitted under ;
Section 6.01(h)
 
(i)            Liens securing Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01(j); and
 
(j)            additional Liens incurred by the Company and its Subsidiaries so long as the value of the property subject to such Liens, and the Indebtedness and other obligations secured thereby do not exceed $3,000,000 at any time.
 
           .  (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or substantially all of its assets, or all or substantially all of the Equity Interests of any of its Subsidiaries (in each case, whether now owned or hereafter acquired), or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing
Section 6.03
Fundamental Changes
 
(i)            any Person may merge into the Company in a transaction in which the Company is the surviving corporation,
 
(ii)           any Person may merge with or into any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary; that (A) if any party to such merger is a Loan Party the surviving Person must also be a Loan Party and must succeed to all the obligations of such Loan Party under the Loan Documents and (B) if any party to such merger is a Restricted Subsidiary the surviving Person shall also be a Restricted Subsidiary unless designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary pursuant to the definition of such term; and
provided
 
(iii)          any Subsidiary (other than a Loan Party) may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders;
 
that any such merger involving a Person that is not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by .
provided
Section 6.04
 
(b)           The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries on the Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto.
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests in or evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person (all of the foregoing being collectively called ""), or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person (other than inventory acquired in the ordinary course of business) constituting a business unit or are substantial in relation to the consolidated assets of the Company, except:
Section 6.04
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions
Investments
 
(a)           Permitted Investments;
 
(b)           Investments existing on the Effective Date and set forth on ;
Schedule 6.04
 
(c)           Investments existing on the Effective Date in Subsidiaries;
 
(d)           additional Investments in Persons that, immediately prior to such investments, are Restricted Subsidiaries;
 
(e)           Investments by Unrestricted Subsidiaries in Persons that, immediately prior to such investments, are Unrestricted Subsidiaries;
 
(f)            Investments consisting of all the issued and outstanding capital stock, or all or substantially all the assets, of Persons engaged in lines of business permitted under ; that (A) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing at the time any such Investment is made or would occur as a result thereof and (B) the cash consideration payable for all such Investments made under this clause (g) after the Effective Date in the capital stock or assets of other Persons shall not exceed $100,000,000 in the aggregate;
Section 6.03(b)
provided
 
(g)           Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by ; that a Subsidiary shall not Guarantee any Subordinated Indebtedness;
Section 6.01
provided
 
(h)           investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(i)            accounts receivable arising in the ordinary course of business;
 
(j)            investments and loans held by any Subsidiary at the time it becomes a Subsidiary in a transaction permitted by this Section;
 
(k)           reasonable advances to officers and employees of the Company and any Subsidiary for travel arising in the ordinary course of business;
 
(l)            loans to officers and employees of the Company or any Subsidiary, not to exceed $100,000 in the aggregate at any one time outstanding;
(m)          promissory notes and other noncash consideration received by the Company and its Subsidiaries in connection with any asset sale permitted hereunder;
 
(n)           advances in the form of prepayments of expenses, so long as such expenses were incurred in the ordinary course of business and are paid in accordance with customary trade terms of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
 
(o)           Guarantees by the Company of obligations of Restricted Subsidiaries incurred in the ordinary course of business and not constituting Indebtedness; and
 
(p)           other investments, loans or advances made by the Company, any Domestic Subsidiary or any Foreign Borrower at times when no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a result thereof and that, taken together with all other investments made after the Effective Date under this clause (p) would not exceed $10,000,000.
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interest, except:
Section 6.05
Asset Sales, etc
 
(a)           sales of inventory, used or surplus equipment and Permitted Investments in the ordinary course of business or as expressly permitted elsewhere in this Agreement;
 
(b)           sales, transfers and dispositions to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary; and
 
(c)           sales, transfers and other dispositions of other assets (other than Equity Interests in Subsidiaries); provided that (x) the aggregate proceeds from such sales, transfers and other dispositions during any fiscal year shall not exceed the greater of (A) 10% of Consolidated Net Tangible Assets as of the beginning of such fiscal year and (B) 10% of Consolidated Net Income of the Company (excluding Unrestricted Subsidiaries) for such fiscal year and (y) not more than $2,000,000 of noncash proceeds shall be received from such sales, transfers and other dispositions during any fiscal year.
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred.
Section 6.06
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Company or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of the Company or any Subsidiary.
Section 6.07
Swap Agreements
           .  (a)      The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except that (i) Restricted Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their capital stock and (ii) if no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or would occur as a result thereof, the Company may make any Restricted Payment that, taken together with all other Restricted Payments made after the Effective Date, would not exceed the sum of $100,000,000 and 50% of Consolidated Net Income of the Company for the period (treated as one accounting period) commencing January 1, 2005, and ending at the most recent fiscal quarter end for which financial statements shall have been delivered under or .
Section 6.08
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments in Respect of Indebtedness
Section 5.01(a)
(b)
 
(b)           The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, make or agree to make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of the principal of or interest on any Subordinated Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, defeasance, cancellation or termination of any Subordinated Indebtedness, except scheduled and other mandatory payments of interest and principal in respect of Subordinated Indebtedness; provided that no payment shall be made in respect of Subordinated Indebtedness that is prohibited by the subordination provisions applicable to such Subordinated Indebtedness.
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries not involving any other Affiliate, (c) transactions among or between Unrestricted Subsidiaries and (d) any Restricted Payment permitted by .
Section 6.09
Transactions with Affiliates
Section 6.08
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Restricted Subsidiary (i) to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any shares of its capital stock, (ii) to make or repay loans or advances to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary, (iii) to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Company or any other Subsidiary, or (iv) sell, lease or transfer any of its Property to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by this Agreement, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Restricted Subsidiary pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the
Section 6.10
Restrictive Agreements
provided
Schedule 6.10
Restricted Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness and (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases and other contracts restricting the assignment thereof.
 
           .  The Company will not change the end if its fiscal year to a date other than December 31.
Section 6.11
Change in Fiscal Year
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, amend it charter or by-laws or other constitutive documents in any manner which could adversely and materially affect the rights of the Lenders under this Agreement or their ability to enforce the same, except as otherwise permitted pursuant to or .
Section 6.12
Constitutive Documents
Sections 6.03
6.04
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, sell or assign, with or without recourse, for discount or otherwise, any income or revenues, including notes and accounts receivable.
Section 6.13
Sales and Assignments of Income, Revenues and Receivables
 
           .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive in any respect materially adverse to the Company or to the rights or interests of the Lenders any of its rights under any document evidencing or governing Subordinated Indebtedness.
Section 6.14
Amendment of Material Documents
 
           .  (a)  The Company will not permit the Adjusted Leverage Ratio as of any date to exceed the ratio of 2.50 to 1.00.
Section 6.15
Adjusted Leverage Ratio; Leverage Ratio
 
(b)           The Company will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of any date to exceed the ratio of 2.50 to 1.00.
 
           .  The Company will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for any Rolling Period ending after the Effective Date to be less than the ratio of 1.20 to 1.00.
Section 6.16
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
           .  The Company will not permit the Current Ratio at any time to be less than 1.50 to 1.00.
Section 6.17
Current Ratio
 
           .  The Company will not permit Consolidated Tangible Net Worth (excluding Unrestricted Subsidiaries) as of any date to be less than the sum of (a) $400,000,000 plus (b) 50% of Consolidated Net Income of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries (but only to the extent such amount is positive) for fiscal quarters ended after September 30, 2004 plus (z) 75% of the aggregate Net Cash Proceeds (cash or non-cash) from the issuance by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary of Equity Interests subsequent to the Effective Date.
Section 6.18
Minimum Tangible Net Worth
 
           .  If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Section 7.01
Events of Default
Events of Default
 
(a)           any Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)           any Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this ) payable under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five days;
Section 7.01
 
(c)           any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver hereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement, Loan Document or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver hereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
(d)           the Company or any Subsidiary shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in , (with respect to the existence of any Borrower) or or in ;
Section 5.02
5.04
5.10
Article VI
 
(e)           any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article) or in any other Loan Document, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the earlier of (i) the Company's obtaining knowledge thereof or (ii) written notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Company (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
 
(f)            the Company or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable after giving effect to any applicable grace period;
 
(g)           any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
(h)           an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Company or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any  Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i)            the Company or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
 
(j)            the Company or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
(k)           one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $25,000,000 shall be rendered against the Company, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
 
(l)            an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Company and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $10,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) in any year or (ii) $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) for all periods;
 
(m)          any Loan Document or any material provision thereof shall at any time cease to be in full force and effect, or a proceeding shall be commenced by any Loan Party or any other Person seeking to establish the invalidity or unenforceability thereof (exclusive of questions of interpretation thereof), or any Loan Party shall repudiate or deny that it has any liability or obligation for the payment of principal or interest or other obligations purported to be created under any Loan Document;
 
(n)           any Lien created by any of the Security Documents shall at any time fail to constitute a valid and (to the extent required by the Security Documents) perfected Lien on any material portion of the Collateral purported to be subject thereto, securing the obligations
purported to be secured thereby, with the priority required by the Loan Documents, or any Loan Party shall so assert in writing; or
 
(o)           a Change in Control shall occur;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Company, take any or all of the following actions, at the same or different times:  (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall become  due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers; and in case of any event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers, and (iii) exercise any or all of the remedies available to it under the Security Documents, at law or in equity.
 
           .  Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default, the Company shall, if requested by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, pay to the Administrative Agent an amount in immediately available funds (which funds shall be held as collateral pursuant to arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon under all Letters of Credit then outstanding at such time; provided that, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default specified in or , the Company shall pay such amount forthwith without any notice or demand or any other act by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders.
Section 7.02
Cash Collateral
Section 7.01(h)
(i)
 
 
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.  The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct.  The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Company or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection herewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Section 9.02
Article IV
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person.  The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon.  The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Company), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent.  The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties.  The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Lender and the Company.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Company, to appoint a successor.  If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  The fees payable by the Company to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Company and such successor.  After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Section 9.03
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
It is expressly understood that the Co-Documentation Agent shall not have any duties or responsibilities under this Agreement.
 
 
           .  (a)  Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
Section 9.01
Notices
(i)            if to the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary, to it, or to it in care of the Company:
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas
Attention:  Gayla J. Delly
Telecopy No.: [                       ]
Telephone No.: 979-849-6550 (ext. 1304)
 
(ii)           if to the Administrative Agent, to
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
712 Main Street
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention:  Robert Mendoza
Telecopy No.: 713-216-6004
Telephone No.: 713-216-5831
 
with a copy to:
 
JPMorgan Chase, N.A.
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, Texas  77002
Attention:  Angelynn Johnson
Telecopy No.: 713-750-2892
Telephone No.: 713-750-2351
 
with a copy to:
 
Andrews Kurth LLP
600 Travis, Suite 4200
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention:  Thomas J. Perich
Telecopy No.:  713-220-4285
Telephone No.: 713-220-4268
 
(iii)          if to the Issuing Lender, to
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
Loan and Agency Services Group
712 Main Street
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention:  Robert Mendoza
Telecopy No.: 713-216-6004
Telephone No.: 713-216-5831
 
a copy to:
with
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, Texas  77002
Attention:  Angelynn Johnson
Telecopy No.: 713-750-2892
Telephone No.: 713-750-2351
 
(iv)          if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
(b)           Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; provided that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender.  The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; provided that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
Article II
 
(c)           Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.  All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
 
           .  (a)               No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders hereunder are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by the Loan Parties therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Section 9.02
Waivers; Amendments
 
(b)           Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Company and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan Documents, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders; provided that no such agreement shall (i) increase  the Commitment of any Lender without the
written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change or in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, (vi) release all or substantially all the Guarantors from their Guarantees under the Guarantee Agreement except as expressly provided in the Guarantee Agreement or , or limit the liability of the Guarantors in respect of their Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender or (vii) release all or substantially all of the Collateral without the written consent of each Lender, provided, that nothing herein shall prohibit the Administrative Agent from releasing any Collateral, or require the consent of the other Lenders for such release, in respect of items sold to the extent such sale is permitted or not prohibited hereunder; provided further that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, any provision of this Agreement may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by the Company, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent (and, if their rights or obligations are affected thereby the Issuing Lender) if (i) by the terms of such agreement the Commitment of each Lender not consenting to the amendment provided for therein shall terminate upon the effectiveness of such amendment and (ii) at the time such amendment becomes effective, each Lender not consenting thereto receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by it and all other amounts owing to it or accrued for its account under this Agreement.
Section 2.16(b)
(c)
Section 9.14
 
           .  (a)     The Company shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel and consultants for the Administrative Agent and such Affiliates, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, due diligence undertaken by the Administrative Agent with respect to the financing contemplated by this Agreement, the preparation and administration of this Agreement or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Issuing Lender in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or, after the occurrence and during the continuance of any Default, any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel and consultant for the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with this Agreement, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses
Section 9.03
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
incurred
 
(b)           The Company shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "Indemnitee") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, the Commitment Letter dated December 15, 2004, among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and JP Morgan Securities, Inc., or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the Issuing Lender to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property currently or formerly owned or operated by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto ; provided that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
and whether or not caused by the ordinary, sole or contributory negligence of any Indemnitee
 
(c)           To the extent that the Company fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such Lender's share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; provided that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender in its capacity as such.  For purposes hereof, a Lender's " share" shall be determined based upon its share of the sum of the total Revolving Exposure and unused Commitments at the time.
pro rata
pro rata
 
(d)           To the extent permitted by applicable Law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
(e)           All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
 
           .  (a)            The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) a Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by a Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section.  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement, other than rights, remedies or claims in favor of the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders.
Section 9.04
Successors and Assigns
 
(b)           (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
 
(A)          the Borrower, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee; and
provided
Article VII
 
(B)           the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender, that no such consent shall be required for an assignment of any Commitment to an assignee that is a Lender with a Commitment immediately prior to giving effect to such assignment;
provided
 
(ii)           Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
(A)          except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Company and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Company shall be required if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of has occurred and is continuing;
provided
Article VII
(B)           each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement;
 
(C)           the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500;
 
(D)          the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire; and
 
(E)           in the case of an assignment to  CLO (as defined below), the assignment Lender shall retain the sole right to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provisions of this Agreement, provided that the Assignment and Assumption between such Lender and such CLO may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of such CLO, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to that affects such CLO.
Section 9.02(b)
 
For the purposes of this , the terms "" "" have the following meanings:
Section 9.04(b)
Approved Fund
CLO
 
"" means (a) a CLO and (b) with respect to any Lender that is a fund which invests in bank loans and similar extensions of credit, any other fund that invests in bank loans and similar extensions of credit and is managed by the same investment advisor as such lender or by an Affiliate of such investment advisor.
Approved Fund
 
"" means any entity (whether a corporation, partnership, trust or otherwise) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
CLO
 
(iii)          Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of , , and ).  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this shall be
Section 2.13
2.14
2.15
10.03
Section 9.04
for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
treated
 
(iv)          The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the "").  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by any Borrower, the Issuing Lender and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(v)           Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register.  No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
 
(c)           (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Company, the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement.  Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to that affects such Participant.  Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of , and to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section.  To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to as though it were a Lender.
Participant
provided
provided
Section 9.02(b)
Section 2.13
2.14
2.15
Section 9.08
Section 2.16(c)
(ii)           A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under or than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Company's prior written consent.  A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of unless the Company is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Company, to comply with as though it were a Lender.
Section 2.13
2.15
Section 2.15
Section 2.15(e)
 
(d)           Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
 
           .  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties herein and in the certificates or other instruments  delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated.  The provisions of , , and and shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Section 9.05
Survival
Section 2.13
2.14
2.15
9.03
Article VIII
 
           .  This Agreement may be executed in counterparts and may be delivered in original or facsimile form (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and the Fee Letter constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.  Except as provided in , this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Section 9.06
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
Section 4.01
           .  Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 9.07
Severability
 
           .  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the obligations of any Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Section 9.08
Right of Setoff
 
           .  (a)      This Agreement and the Loan Documents shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of Texas.
Section 9.09
Governing Law; Consent to Service of Process
 
(b)           The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the court of the State of Texas sitting in Harris County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of Texas, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such Texas State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement against any Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)           Each Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
Without limitation of the foregoing, nothing in this Agreement, or in the Notes or in any other Loan Document shall be deemed to constitute a waiver of any rights which any Lender, or the holder of any Note may have under applicable federal legislation relating to the amount of interest which such Lender or holder may contract for, take, receive or charge in respect of the Loan and the Loan Documents, including any right to take, receive, reserve and
interest at the rate allowed by the law of the state where any Lender is located.  The Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Borrower further agree that insofar as the provisions of Chapter 303 of the Texas Finance Code, as amended, are applicable to the determination of the Highest Lawful Rate with respect to the Notes and the Obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, the indicated rate ceiling of such Article shall be applicable; provided, however, that to the extent permitted by such Article, the Administrative Agent may from time to time by notice to the Borrower revise the election of such interest rate ceiling as such ceiling affects the then current or future balances of the Loans.  The provisions of Chapter 346 of the Texas Finance Code, as amended, do not apply to this Agreement, any Note issued hereunder or the other Loan Documents.
charge
 
           .  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY).  EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
Section 9.10
WAIVER
OF JURY TRIAL
 
           .  Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Section 9.11
Headings
 
           .  Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the enforcement of rights hereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii)  any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to any Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Company or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than the Borrower.  For the purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from the Company relating to the Company or its business, other than any such information that is
Section 9.12
Confidentiality
Information
to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by the Company; that, in the case of information received from the Company after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.  Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
available
provided
 
           .  Each provision in this Agreement and each other Loan Document is expressly limited so that in no event whatsoever shall the amount paid, or otherwise agreed to be paid, to the Administrative Agent or any Lender or charged, contracted for, reserved, taken or received by the Administrative Agent or any such Lender, for the use, forbearance or detention of the money to be loaned under this Agreement or any Loan Document or otherwise (including any sums paid as required by any covenant or obligation contained herein or in any other Loan Document which is for the use, forbearance or detention of such money), exceed that amount of money which would cause the effective rate of interest to exceed the Highest Lawful Rate, and all amounts owed under this Agreement and each other Loan Document shall be held to be subject to reduction to the effect that such amounts so paid or agreed to be paid, charged, contracted for, reserved, taken or received which are for the use, forbearance or detention of money under this Agreement or such Loan Document shall in no event exceed that amount of money which would cause the effective rate of interest to exceed the Highest Lawful Rate.  Anything in any Note or any other Loan Document to the contrary notwithstanding, the Borrowers shall not be required to pay unearned interest on any Note and the Borrowers shall not be required to pay interest on the Obligations at a rate in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate, and if the effective rate of interest which would otherwise be payable under such Note and such Loan Documents would exceed the Highest Lawful Rate, or if the holder of such Note shall receive any unearned interest or shall receive monies that are deemed to constitute interest which would increase the effective rate of interest payable by the Borrowers under such Note and the other Loan Documents to a rate in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate, then (a) the amount of interest which would otherwise be payable by the Borrowers shall be reduced to the amount allowed under applicable law and (b) any unearned interest paid by the Borrowers or any interest paid by the Borrowers in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate shall in the first instance be credited on the principal of the obligations of the Borrowers (or if all such obligations shall have been paid in full, refunded to the Borrowers).  It is further agreed that, without the limitation of the foregoing, all calculations of the rate of interest contracted for, reserved, taken, charged or received by any Lender under the Notes and the Obligations and under the other Loan Documents are made for the purpose of determining whether such rate exceeds the Highest Lawful Rate, and shall be made, to the extent permitted by usury laws applicable to such Lender, by amortizing, prorating and spreading in equal parts during the period of the full stated term of the Notes and this Agreement and all interest at any time contracted for, charged or received by such Lender in connection therewith.
Section 9.13
Interest
 
           .  In the event that the Company or any Subsidiary sells, transfers or otherwise disposes of all or any portion of any of the Equity Interests, assets or property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary in a transaction not prohibited by this Agreement, the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent shall promptly (and the Lenders hereby authorize and instruct the Administrative Agent and the Collateral
Section 9.14
Release of Liens and Guarantees
Agent to) take such action and execute any such documents as may be reasonably requested by the Company and at the Borrower's expense to release any Liens created by any Loan Document in respect of such Equity Interests, assets or property, including the release and satisfaction of record of any mortgage or deed of trust granted in connection herewith, and, in the case of a disposition of all or substantially all the Equity Interests or assets of any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party, terminate such Subsidiary's obligations under the Guarantee Agreement and each other Loan Document. In addition, the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent agree to take such actions as are reasonably requested by the Company and at the Borrower's expense to terminate the Liens and security interests created by the Loan Documents when all the Obligations have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit and Commitments terminated.
 
           .  The execution, delivery and effectiveness of this Agreement shall not extinguish the obligations for the payment of money outstanding under the Amended and Restated Agreement or discharge or release the Lien or priority of any Security Document or any other security therefor. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the obligations outstanding under the Amended and Restated Agreement or any agreements securing the same, which shall remain in full force and effect, except as modified hereby or by agreements executed concurrently herewith. Nothing expressed or implied in this Agreement or any other document contemplated hereby shall be construed as a release or other discharge of Company under the Amended and Restated Agreement or any Guarantor under any Loan Document from any of its obligations and liabilities thereunder. Each of the Amended and Restated Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall remain in full force and effect until and except as expressly modified hereby.
Section 9.15
No Novation
 
           .  Each Lender hereby notifies the Borrowers that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001) (the ""), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers, which information includes the name and address of any Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify any Borrower in accordance with the Act.
Section 9.16
USA Patriot Act
Act
 
           .  Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the Lenders hereby acknowledge and agree that, so long as no Default or Event of Default exists hereunder, upon delivery to the Administrative Agent of (a) a written request by the Company that Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("") be released as a Guarantor and (b) written evidence satisfactory to Administrative Agent that Benchmark BV has no assets and that proceedings have been commenced to dissolve Benchmark BV, Benchmark BV shall be released as a Guarantor and upon the request of Company, the Administrative Agent shall provide evidence of such release to the Company.
Section 9.17
Release of Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc
Benchmark BV
 
           .  THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING THE SCHEDULES AND EXHIBITS HERETO), THE NOTES AND OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS CONSTITUTE A "LOAN AGREEMENT" AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26.02(a) OF THE TEXAS BUSINESS AND COMMERCIAL CODE, AND REPRESENT THE FINAL AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES RELATING TO THE SUBJECT MATTER HEREOF AND THEREOF AND MAY NOT BE CONTRADICTED BY EVIDENCE OF
Section 9.18
FINAL AGREEMENT OF THE PARTIES
  THERE ARE NO UNWRITTEN ORAL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
PRIOR, CONTEMPORANEOUS OR SUBSEQUENT ORAL AGREEMENTS OF THE PARTIES.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050208172039.txt.gz
TIME:20050208172039
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 8, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing fourth quarter results for the period ended December 31, 2004. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9-01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
 
Exhibit 99.1               Press release dated February 8, 2005
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RECORD SALES AND RECORD EARNINGS FOR FOURTH QUARTER 2004
 
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 8, 2005  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $524 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2004, compared to $487 million for the same quarter last year.  Fourth quarter net income was $20.2 million, or $0.47 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $13.4 million, or $0.32 per diluted share. In the fourth quarter of 2003, excluding a special item of $2.8 million ($1.9 million net of tax) in restructuring charges, the Company had net income before special items of $15.3 million, or $0.36 cents per diluted share.
 
Sales revenue for the year ended December 31, 2004 was $2.0 billion, an 8.8% increase from $1.8 billion of revenue in the previous year.  Net income for the year ended December 31, 2004 was $71.0 million, compared to $55.4 million for the prior year.  Diluted earnings per share was $1.67 for the year ended December 31, 2004, compared to $1.39 per share in the prior year. For the year ended December 31, 2003, excluding two special items, an $8.1 million ($5.4 million net of tax) contract settlement gain and $2.8 million ($1.9 million net of tax) in restructuring charges, the Company had net income before special items of $51.9 million, or $1.31 per diluted share.
 
"2004 was another good year for Benchmark," commented Cary T. Fu, President and CEO of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.  "We again exceeded every major goal that we set last February.  We enhanced our customer base, reduced customer concentration, expanded our low cost manufacturing capacities, realigned our resources, increased our technical capabilities and delivered solid financial performance.  Additionally, our 2004 new program bookings provide good momentum for a strong 2005."
Fourth Quarter 2004 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the fourth quarter was 4.6%.
 - 
                 
Return on invested capital of 14.0%.
 - 
                 
Cash balance at December 31, 2004 of $367 million.
 - 
                 
No debt outstanding as of December 31, 2004.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable were $251 million at December 31, 2004; calculated days sales outstanding were 43 days.
 - 
                 
Inventories decreased by $33 million to $257 million; inventory turns were 7.5 times.
 - 
                 
During the fourth quarter our tax rate was reduced by approximately 2% on a full year basis.  This favorable result was primarily related to the dissolution of an inactive foreign owned subsidiary.
 - 
                 
 
First Quarter and Full Year 2005 Guidance
 
Revenue in the first quarter of 2005 is expected to be between $510 million and $530 million.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the first quarter of 2005 are expected to be $0.40 to $0.44 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
For the 2005 fiscal year the Company anticipates revenue and earnings growth in the range of 10  15%.
 - 
                 
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share for 2003 that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends.  Benchmark's results for the fourth quarter of 2003 include the impact of closing our Scotland facility during the fourth quarter of 2003. 
In addition, our results for the year ended December 31, 2003 also include the impact of a non-cash gain related to the settlement and release of various claims arising out of customer manufacturing agreements.
We are providing information in this earnings release which adds back the one-time costs associated with the closing of our Scotland facility to net income
and subtracts the one-time non-cash gain from net income
. This allows investors to more readily compare the 2003 fourth-quarter and year-end results with the earnings in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) reported in 2004.
 
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this
information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
financial
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am CST to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050408130915.txt.gz
TIME:20050408130915
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 8, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing that it expects first quarter results to be in the lower end of the guidance previously provided at the time of the fourth quarter earnings release on February 8, 2005, due to the high level of scheduling and mix changes experienced during the quarter. The Company currently expects second quarter 2005 revenue to be between $525 million to $550 million. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9-01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)        Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REAFFIRMS
GUIDANCE FOR FIRST QUARTER 2005
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 8, 2005  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it continues to expect first quarter revenue to be between $510 million to $530 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share of $0.40 to $0.44.  The Company expects first quarter results to be in the lower end of the guidance previously provided at the time of the fourth quarter earnings release on February 8, 2005, due to the high level of scheduling and mix changes experienced during the quarter.
 
The Company currently expects second quarter revenue to be between $525 million to $550 million. The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the first quarter ended March 31, 2005.  Results for the first quarter will be announced on April 21, 2005.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on April 21, 2005 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties
 
materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050420092435.txt.gz
TIME:20050420092435
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Solicitin g material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 7.01.   Other Events.
 
On April 19, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. responded to a letter from MMI Investments, L.P. dated March 30, 2005. A copy of the Company's letter is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 7.01 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9-01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
Exhibit 99.1    Letter dated April 19, 2005.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
April 19, 2005
 
Mr. Clay Lifflander
MMI Investments, L.P.
1370 Avenue of the Americas, 25 Floor
th
New York, NY 10019
 
 
Dear Mr. Lifflander:
 
We received your letter dated March 30, 2005.  Thank you for your continued support of and interest in Benchmark.  We agree with your observation that Benchmark's operating performance is superior relative to other companies in the EMS industry, nonetheless in our competitive industry we continuously focus on improving our financial and operational performance.  As a result, we review on an ongoing basis both our operational and capital structure to ensure such continued performance.   We also point out that our share price has consistently outperformed our peer group average because of this continued focus.
 
We note the proposal in your letter for a special dividend.  Benchmark's board of directors and management routinely monitor Benchmark's financial condition and the optimal use of its balance sheet for maximizing shareholder value.  At its regularly scheduled meeting earlier this year the board discussed, as we do from time to time, at length with management and outside financial advisors a number of alternatives with respect to Benchmark's current cash position.  The board reviewed the strategic, operating and financial factors currently facing Benchmark as well as a detailed presentation from its financial advisors.  At that meeting, the Benchmark board unanimously agreed not to implement a special dividend at this time.  Of course, if the circumstances change we will not hesitate to revisit the idea of a special dividend or other similar actions.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050421203839.txt.gz
TIME:20050421203839
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 21, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing first quarter results for the period ended March 31, 2005. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9-01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
Exhibit 99.1            Press release dated April 21, 2005
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS SALES
AND EARNINGS FOR FIRST QUARTER 2005
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 21, 2005  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $510 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2005, compared to $481 million for the same quarter last year.  First quarter net income was $16.9 million, or $0.40 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $15.2 million, or $0.36 per diluted share.
 
"Our first quarter results reflect revenue growth of 6% and net income growth of 11% year over year," commented Cary T. Fu, President and CEO of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.  "The first quarter results were excellent in light of the soft economic conditions seen recently in the technology marketplace.  Our focus for the remainder of 2005 is on efficiently ramping our new programs in this challenging environment."
 
First Quarter 2005 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the first quarter was 4.4%.
 - 
                 
Return on invested capital of 13.8%.
 - 
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at March 31, 2005 of $344 million.
 - 
                 
No debt outstanding as of March 31, 2005.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable were $267 million at March 31, 2005; calculated days sales outstanding were 47 days.
 - 
                 
Inventories increased by $39 million to $295 million; inventory turns were 6.4 times.
 - 
                 
 
Second Quarter 2005 Guidance
 
Revenue in the second quarter of 2005 is expected to be between $525 million and $550 million.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the second quarter of 2005 are expected to be $0.41 to $0.45 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050429080608.txt.gz
TIME:20050429080608
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) unde r the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 5.03.   Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
 
Effective December 1, 2004, the Board of Directors of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. approved and authorized an amendment to Article 4, Sections 10, 13, and 14 of the Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company dated March 15, 2002 (the "Bylaws"). The Bylaws were amended to grant the Chief Financial Officer of the Company the authority to agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations of the Company.
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                       
 
Amended and Restated Bylaws of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. dated December 1, 2004
Exhibit 99.1
                         
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
AMENDED AND RESTATED BYLAWS
OF
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
A Texas Corporation
Date of Adoption
October 21, 1981
As Amended
May 11, 1990
December 21, 1990
March 15, 2002
December 1, 2004
AMENDED AND RESTATED BYLAWS
 
 
 
 
The Corporation may have such offices, either within or without the State of Texas, as the Board of Directors may designate or as the business of the Corporation may require from time to time.
 
The registered office of the Corporation required by the Texas Business Corporation Act to be maintained in the State of Texas may be, but need not be, the same as the principal office in the State of Texas, as designated by the Board of Directors.  The address of the registered office or the identity of the registered agent may be changed from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
The address of the registered office of the Corporation is 811 Dallas Avenue, Houston, Texas 77002, and the name of the registered agent of the Corporation at such address is  C T Corporation System.
 
 
 
Section 1.  .  The annual meeting of the shareholders shall be held on such date in each year and at such time and place as may be determined by the Board of Directors, for the purpose of electing directors and for the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting.  If the day fixed for the annual meeting is a legal holiday in the State of Texas, such meeting shall be held on the next succeeding business day.  If the election of directors is not held on the day designated for the annual meeting of the shareholders or at any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors shall cause the election to be held at a special meeting of the shareholders as soon thereafter as may be convenient.
Annual Meeting
 
Section 2.  .  Special meetings of the shareholders may be called by (a) the ChiefExecutive Officer or the President, (b) the Board of Directors, (c) the Chief Executive Officer, the President or the Secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the Board of Directors, or (d) the ChiefExecutive Officer, the President or the Secretary at the request in writing of the holders of at least ten percent of all the shares entitled to vote at the proposed special meeting.  Any such request to call a special meeting of the shareholders shall state the purpose or purposes of such meeting.
Special Meetings
 
Section 3.  .  The Board of Directors may designate any place within or without the State of Texas as the place of meeting for any annual or special meeting of shareholders called by or at the request of the Board of Directors.  If no designation is made, or if a special meeting is called otherwise than by or at the request of the Board of Directors, the place of meeting shall be the principal office of the Corporation in the State of Texas.
Place of Meeting
 
Section 4.  .  Written or printed notice stating the place, day and hour of the meeting and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail, by or at the direction of the President, the Secretary, or the officer or persons calling the meeting, to each shareholder entitled to vote at such meeting.  If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered
Notice of Meeting
when deposited in the United States mail addressed to the shareholder at his address as it appears on the share transfer records of the Corporation, with postage thereon prepaid.  Attendance by a shareholder, whether in person or by proxy, at a shareholder's meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting of which he has had no notice.
 
The notice of any meeting of shareholders may be accompanied by a form of proxy and other proxy solicitation materials approved by the Board of Directors.
 
Section 5.  .  For the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of shareholders or any adjournment thereof, or entitled to receive a distribution by the Corporation (other than a distribution involving a purchase or redemption by the Corporation of any of its own shares) or a share dividend, or in order to make a determination of shareholders for any other proper purpose (other than determining shareholders entitled to consent to action by shareholders proposed to be taken without a meeting of shareholders), the Board of Directors of the Corporation may provide that the share transfer records shall be closed for a stated period not to exceed, in any case, sixty days.  If the share transfer records shall be closed for the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders, such records shall be closed for at least ten days immediately preceding such meeting.  In lieu of closing the share transfer records, the Board of Directors may fix in advance a date as the record date for any such determination of shareholders, such date in any case to be not more than sixty days and, in the case of a meeting of shareholders, not less than ten days, prior to the date on which the particular action requiring such determination of shareholders is to be taken.  If the share transfer records are not closed and no record date is fixed for the determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders, or shareholders entitled to receive a distribution (other than a distribution involving a purchase or redemption by the Corporation of any of its own shares) or a share dividend, the date on which notice of the meeting is mailed or the date on which the resolution of the Board of Directors declaring such distribution or share dividend is adopted, as the case may be, shall be the record date for such determination of shareholders.  When a determination of shareholders entitled to vote at any meeting of shareholders has been made as provided in this Section 5, such determination shall apply to any adjournment thereof except where the determination has been made through the closing of the share transfer records and the stated period of closing has expired.
Fixing Record Dates for Matters Other than Consents to Action
 
Section 6.  .  Unless a record date shall have previously been fixed or determined pursuant to Section 5 of this Article 2, whenever action by shareholders is proposed to be taken by consent in writing without a meeting of shareholders, the Board of Directors may fix a record date for the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to consent to that action, which record date shall not precede, and shall not be more than ten days after, the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors.  If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and the prior action of the Board of Directors is not required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to consent to action in writing without a meeting shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the books in which proceedings of meetings of shareholders are recorded.  Delivery shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested.  Delivery to the Corporation's principal place of business shall be addressed to the President or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation.  If no record date shall have been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action of the Board of Directors is required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to consent to action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the date on which the Board of Directors adopts a resolution taking such prior action.
Fixing Record Dates for Consents to Action
 
Section 7.  .  The officer or agent having charge of the share transfer records of the Corporation shall make, at least ten days before each meeting of shareholders, a complete list of the shareholders entitled to vote at such meeting or any adjournment thereof, arranged in alphabetical order, with the address of and the number of shares held by each, which list, for a period of ten days prior to such meeting, shall be kept on file at the registered office or principal place of business of the Corporation and
Voting List
shall be subject to inspection by any shareholder at any time during usual business hours.  Such list also shall be produced and kept open at the time and place of the meeting and shall be subject to the inspection of any shareholder during the whole time of the meeting.  The original share transfer records shall be prima-facie evidence as to who are the shareholders entitled to examine such list or transfer records or to vote at any meeting of shareholders.  The failure to comply with the requirements of this Section 7 shall not affect the validity of any action taken at the meeting.
 
Section 8.  .  A quorum shall be present at a meeting of shareholders if the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote are represented at the meeting in person or by proxy.  Once a quorum is present at a meeting of shareholders, the shareholders represented in person or by proxy at the meeting may conduct such business as may be properly brought before the meeting until it is adjourned, and the subsequent withdrawal from the meeting of any shareholder or the refusal of any shareholder represented in person or by proxy to vote shall not affect the presence of a quorum at the meeting.  The shareholders represented in person or by proxy at a meeting of shareholders at which a quorum is not present may adjourn the meeting until such time and to such place as may be determined by a vote of the holders of a majority of the shares represented in person or by proxy at that meeting.
Quorum of Shareholders
 
Section 9.  .  Any shareholder may vote either in person or by proxy executed in writing by the shareholder.  A telegram, telex, cablegram or similar transmission by the shareholder, or a photographic, photostatic, facsimile or similar reproduction of a writing executed by the shareholder, shall be treated as an execution in writing for purposes of this Section 9.  No proxy shall be valid after eleven months from the date of its execution unless otherwise provided in the proxy.  A proxy shall be revocable unless the proxy form conspicuously states that the proxy is irrevocable and the proxy is coupled with an interest.
Proxies
 
Section 10.  .  Except as otherwise expressly provided in any resolution or resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors establishing any series of Preferred Stock, the exclusive voting power of the Corporation shall be vested in the Common Stock.  Except as otherwise expressly provided in any such resolution or resolutions, or as otherwise provided by the Texas Business Corporation Act, each outstanding share of Common Stock shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders.
Voting Rights
 
Section 11.  .  With respect to any matter, other than the election of directors or a matter for which the affirmative vote of the holders of a specified portion of the shares entitled to vote is required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the act of the shareholders shall be the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote on that matter and represented in person or by proxy at a meeting of shareholders at which a quorum is present.
Voting Requirement
 
With respect to the election of directors, a director shall be elected only if the director receives the vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors and represented in person or by proxy at a meeting of shareholders at which a quorum is present.
 
With respect to any matter for which the affirmative vote of the holders of a specified portion of the shares entitled to vote is required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the act of the shareholders on that matter shall be the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote on that matter, rather than the affirmative vote otherwise required by the Texas Business Corporation Act.
 
Section 12.  .  To be properly brought before any meeting of shareholders for consideration, the business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting given pursuant to Section 4 of this Article 2, (b) properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a shareholder.
Business at Meeting
 
If a shareholder desires to bring business before a meeting for consideration, the shareholder must submit a written notice of the proposed business to the Secretary as provided herein.  In the case of the annual meeting of shareholders, the shareholder's notice must be received at the principal office of the Corporation not less than sixty days in advance of the date of the Corporation's notice of annual meeting
given in connection with the previous year's annual meeting of shareholders.  If no such annual meeting was held in the previous year or the date of the current year's annual meeting has been changed by more than thirty days from the date contemplated in the previous year's notice of annual meeting, the shareholder's notice must be received by the Corporation a reasonable period of time before the date of the Corporation's notice of annual meeting for the current year and any accompanying solicitation of proxies are made.  In the case of a special meeting of shareholders, the shareholder's notice must be received at the principal office of the Corporation a reasonable period of time prior to the date of the meeting to allow sufficient time for the dissemination of information to the shareholders entitled to vote at such meeting; provided, however, that if at least thirty days' notice of the meeting has been given to the shareholders, the shareholder's notice must be received by the Corporation no later than ten days prior to the date of the meeting.
 
A shareholder's notice of proposed business shall set forth as to each matter that the shareholder proposes to bring before the meeting of shareholders the following information:  (a) a brief description of the business proposed to be brought before the meeting and the reason or reasons for conducting such business at the meeting; (b) the name and address of the shareholder proposing such business; (c) the class, series (if applicable), and number of shares of the Corporation that such shareholder owns beneficially; (d) any material interest of the shareholder in the proposed business; and (e) if the business that the shareholder proposes to bring before the meeting of shareholders is the election to the Board of Directors of a person or persons to be nominated by or on behalf of the shareholder, the information set forth in Section 8 of Article 3.
 
After receipt of the shareholder's notice of proposed business but before the commencement of the meeting of shareholders, the Board of Directors, to the extent allowed by law, may consider the subject matter of the proposed business and the reason or reasons for conducting such business at the meeting to determine whether such business should be considered.  Proposed business, notice of which is submitted by a shareholder in accordance with the foregoing procedures, shall be considered at the meeting of shareholders unless the Board of Directors determines that the proposed business should not be conducted at the meeting.  If the business is not to be considered at the meeting, the Board of Directors shall notify the presiding officer of the meeting of such determination, and such presiding officer shall declare to the meeting that such proposed business is not properly before the meeting and will not be considered.  In addition, with respect to any business proposed to be considered, the presiding officer of the meeting may determine that such business has not been brought properly before the meeting in accordance with the foregoing procedures and, if such determination is made, such proposed business will not be considered at the meeting.
 
Section 13.  .  Any action required by the Texas Business Corporation Act to be taken at any annual or special meeting of shareholders, or any action which may be taken at any annual or special meeting of shareholders, may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the holder or holders of all the shares entitled to vote with respect to the action that is the subject of the consent.
Actions Without Meeting
 
Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each shareholder who signs the consent.  No written consent shall be effective to take the action that is the subject of the consent unless, within sixty days after the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 13, a consent or consents signed by the holder or holders of shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to take the action that is the subject of the consent are delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the books in which proceedings of meetings of shareholders are recorded.  Delivery shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested.  Delivery to the Corporation's principal place of business shall be addressed to the President or principal executive officer of the Corporation.
A telegram, telex, cablegram or similar transmission by a shareholder, or a photographic, photostatic, facsimile or similar reproduction of a writing signed by a shareholder, shall be regarded as signed by the shareholder for purposes of this Section 13.
 
Prompt notice of the taking of any action by shareholders without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those shareholders who did not consent in writing to the action.
 
Section 14.  .  Subject to the provisions required or permitted by the Texas Business Corporation Act for notice of meetings, shareholders may participate in and hold a meeting of such shareholders by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment whereby all persons participating in the meeting can hear and speak to each other.
Telephone Meetings
 
 
 
Section 1.  .  The powers of the Corporation shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed under the direction of, the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Power
 
Section 2.  .  The Board of Directors shall consist of not lessthan five nor more than nine members.  The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to these Amended and Restated Bylaws, but no decrease shall have the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent director.  Unless removed in accordance with the provisions of these Amended and Restated Bylaws, each director shall hold office until the next annual meeting of shareholders, and until his successor shall have been elected and qualified.  A director need not be a resident of the State of Texas or a shareholder of the Corporation.
Number, Tenure and Qualifications
 
Section 3.  .  A regular meeting of the Board of Directors shall be held without notice other than this Section 3 immediately after, and at the same place as, the annual meeting of shareholders.  The Board of Directors may provide, by resolution, the time and place, either within or without the State of Texas, for the holding of additional regular meetings without notice other than such resolution.
Regular Meetings
 
Section 4.  .  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer, the President or any two directors.  The person or persons authorized to call special meetings of the Board of Directors may fix any place, either within or without the State of Texas, as the place for holding any special meeting called by such person or persons.
Special Meetings
 
Section 5.  .  Notice of any special meeting of the Board of Directors shall be given at least one day prior thereto by written notice delivered personally or mailed to each director at his business address, or by telegram, telex, telecopy or similar means of visual data transmission.  If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered three days after deposited in the United States mail so addressed, with postage thereon prepaid.  If notice is given by telegram, telex, telecopy or similar means of visual data transmission, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when transmitted for delivery to the recipient.  Any director may waive notice of any meeting.  The attendance of a director at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except where a director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business on the grounds that such meeting is not lawfully called or convened.  Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting.
Notice
 
Section 6.  .  A majority of the number of directors fixed in Section 2 of this Article 3 shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of the Board of Directors.  If less
Quorum
than a majority of such number of directors is present at a meeting, a majority of the directors present may adjourn such meeting from time to time without further notice.
 
Section 7.  .
Manner of Acting
 
(a)           .  Except as provided in Paragraph (b) of this Section 7, the act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.
Actions at Meeting
 
(b)           .  Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed by all the members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be.  Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote at a meeting.  A telegram, telex, cablegram or similar transmission by a director, or a photographic, photostatic, facsimile or similar reproduction of a writing signed by a director, shall be regarded as signed by the director for purposes of this Paragraph (b).
Actions Without Meeting
 
(c)           .  Subject to the provisions required or permitted by the Texas Business Corporation Act for notice of meetings, members of the Board of Directors or any committee designated by the Board of Directors may participate in and hold a meeting of the Board of Directors or such committee by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and speak to each other.
Telephone Meetings
 
Section 8.  .  Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors at the annual meeting of shareholders or any special meeting of shareholders called for the specific purpose of electing directors may be made at any such meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, any nominating committee thereof, or any person appointed by the Board of Directors or such committee to make such nominations, or (b) by any shareholder entitled to vote for the election of directors who complies with the procedures set forth in this Section 8 as well as Section 12 of Article 2.
Nominations for Election
 
The shareholder's notice with respect to the nomination of persons for election to the Board of Directors shall set forth, as to each person whom the shareholder proposes to nominate, (a) the nominee's name, age, business and residence address; (b) the principal occupation or employment of the nominee; (c) the class, series (if applicable), and number of shares of the Corporation that the nominee owns beneficially; and (d) any other information relating to the nominee that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for the election of directors pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including, without limitation, the nominee's consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected.  The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as a director of the Corporation.
 
No person shall be eligible for nomination as a director of the Corporation at any meeting of shareholders unless such person is nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth herein.  The presiding officer of the meeting may determine that a proposed nomination was not made in accordance with such procedures and, if such determination is made, such proposed nomination will not be considered at the meeting.
 
Section 9.  .  At any meeting of shareholders called expressly for the purpose of removal, any director or the entire Board of Directors may be removed, with or without cause, by a vote of the holders of a majority of the shares then entitled to vote at an election of directors.  In the event that any director is so removed, a new director may be elected at the same meeting for the unexpired term of the director so removed.  The failure to elect a director to fill the unexpired term of any director so removed shall be deemed to create a vacancy in the Board of Directors.
Removal
Section 10.  .  A vacancy in the Board of Directors shall be deemed to exist by reason of the death or resignation of a director or upon the failure of shareholders to elect a director to fill the unexpired term of any director removed in accordance with the provisions of Section 9 of this Article 3.
Vacancies
 
Any vacancy occurring in the Board of Directors may be filled (a) by election at an annual or special meeting of shareholders called for that purpose, or (b) by a majority of the remaining directors though less than a quorum of the Board of Directors, provided that the remaining directors may not fill more than two such directorships during the period between any two successive annual meetings of shareholders.  A director elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the unexpired term of his predecessor in office.
 
Section 11.  .  The Board of Directors, by resolution adopted by a majority of the full Board of Directors, may designate from among its members one or more committees, each of which shall be comprised of one or more of its members, and may designate one or more of its members as alternative members of any committee, who may, subject to any limitations imposed by the Board of Directors, replace absent or disqualified members at any meeting of that committee.  Any such committee, to the extent provided in such resolution, shall have and may exercise all of the authority of the Board of Directors, subject to the limitations set forth in the Texas Business Corporation Act.  The designation of a committee of the Board of Directors and the delegation thereto of authority shall not operate to relieve the Board of Directors, or any member thereof, of any responsibility imposed by law.
Committees of Board of Directors
 
Section 12.  .  By resolution of the Board of Directors, the directors may be paid their expenses, if any, of attendance at each meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee, and may be paid a fixed sum for attendance at each meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee or a stated salary as directors or committee members.  No such payment shall preclude any director from serving the Corporation in any other capacity and receiving compensation therefor.
Compensation
 
Section 13.  .   A director of the Corporation who is present at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee at which action on any corporate matter is taken shall be presumed to have assented to the action taken unless his dissent shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting or unless he shall file his written dissent to such action with the person acting as the secretary of the meeting before the adjournment thereof or shall forward such dissent by registered mail to the Secretary of the Corporation immediately after the adjournment of the meeting.  Such right to dissent shall not apply to a director who voted in favor of such action.
Presumption of Assent
 
 
 
Section 1.    The officers of the Corporation shall consist of a Chairman of the Board of Directors, a Chief Executive Officer, a President, one or more Vice Presidents (the number and specific titles thereof to be determined by the Board of Directors), a Secretary, a Chief Financial Officer and a Treasurer, each of whom shall be elected by the Board of Directors.  Such other officers, including assistant officers, and agents as may be deemed necessary may be elected or appointed by the Board of Directors.  Any two or more offices may be held by the same person.
Officers.
 
Section 2.  .  The officers of the Corporation shall be elected annually by the Board of Directors at the regular meeting of the Board of Directors held after each annual meeting of the shareholders.  If the election of officers is not held at such meeting, such election shall be held as soon thereafter as may be convenient.  Each officer shall hold office until his successor shall have been duly elected and qualified, or until his earlier death, resignation or removal in accordance with the provisions of Section 3 of this Article 4.
Election and Term of Office
 
Section 3.  .  Any officer or agent may be removed by the Board of Directors whenever in its judgment the best interests of the Corporation will be served thereby, but such removal shall be without prejudice to the contract rights, if any, of the person so removed.
Removal
Section 4.  .  A vacancy in any office occurring for any reason may be filled by the Board of Directors.  An officer elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the unexpired term of his predecessor in office.
Vacancies
 
Section 5.  .  The Chairman of the Board, if any, shall preside at all meetings of shareholders and of the Board of Directors, and shall have such other authority and perform such other duties as are prescribed by law, the Articles of Incorporation, these Bylaws or by the Board of Directors.
Powers and Duties of the Chairman of the Board
 
Section 6. The Chief Executive Officer shall be the chief executive officer of the Corporation.  Subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Executive Committee (if any), the Chief Executive Officer shall have general executive charge, management and control of the properties, business and operations of the Corporation with all such powers as may be reasonably incident to such responsibilities; may agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation; may sign all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation;  and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the Chief Executive Officer by the Board of Directors.  In the absence of the Chairman of the Board (or if there be no Chairman of the Board), the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at all meetings of the shareholders and, if the Chief Executive Officer shall also be a director, at all meetings of the Board of Directors.
Powers and Duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
 
Section 7.   The President  shall report to the Chief Executive Officer and shall serve as the chief operating officer of the Corporation.  Subject to the control of the Board of Directors, the Executive Committee (if any) and the Chief Executive Officer, the President shall have general executive charge, management and control of the properties, business and operations of the Corporation with all such powers as may be reasonably incident to such responsibilities; may agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation; may sign all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation;  and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the President by the Chief Executive Officer or by the Board of Directors.  In the absence of the Chairman of the Board and the Chief Executive Officer, the President shall preside at all meetings of the shareholders.
Powers and Duties of the President.
 
Section 8.  .  In the absence of the Chief Executive Officer and President, or in the event of their deaths or inability or refusal to act, the Vice President (or if there is more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated at the time of their election, or in the absence of any such designation, in the order of their election) shall perform the duties of the Chief Executive Officer, and when so acting, shall have all the powers of and be subject to all the restrictions upon the Chief ExecutiveOfficer.  Each Vice President shall perform such other duties as the Chief Executive Officer, President or the Board of Directors may assign to him from time to time.
Vice Presidents
 
Section 9.  .  The Secretary shall (a) keep the minutes of the meetings of the shareholders and of the Board of Directors in one or more books provided for that purpose; (b) see that all notices are duly given in accordance with the provisions of these Amended and Restated Bylaws or as required by law; (c) have custody of, and be responsible for, the corporate records and the seal of the Corporation, and see that the seal of the Corporation is affixed to all documents as may be necessary or appropriate; (d) keep a register of the post office address of each shareholder furnished to the Secretary by such shareholder; (e) have general charge of the share transfer records of the Corporation; and (f) in general, perform all duties incident to the office of the Secretary and such other duties the President or the Board of Directors may assign to him from time to time.
Secretary
 
Section 10.    The Chief Financial Officer shall report to the President.  The Chief Financial Officer shall keep and maintain, or cause to be kept and maintained, adequate and correct books and records of account in written form or any other form capable of being converted into written form.  The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit, or cause to be deposited, all monies and other
Chief Financial Officer.
valuables in the name and to the credit of the Corporation with such depositories as may be designated by the Board of Directors.  The Chief Financial Officer shall disburse all funds of the Corporation as may be ordered by the Board of Directors, shall render to the Chief Executive Officer, the President and the members of the Board of Directors, whenever they request it, an account of the financial condition of the Corporation, shall perform other duties commonly incident to such office and shall have such other powers and perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the President. Unless the Board of Directors determines otherwise, the Chief Financial Officer shall have such authority to agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned by the President, Chief Executive Officer and/or by the Board of Directors.  The Chief Executive Officer or President may direct the Treasurer to assume and perform the duties of the Chief Financial Officer in the absence or disability of the Chief Financial Officer, and the Treasurer shall perform other duties commonly incident to such office and shall also perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer, the President or the Chief Financial Officer shall designate from time to time
.
 
Section 11.  .  The Treasurer shall report to the Chief Financial Officer.  Subject to control of the Chief Financial Officer, the Treasurer shall (a) have charge and custody of, and be responsible for, all funds and securities of the Corporation from any source whatsoever, and deposit all such funds in the name of the Corporation in such banks, trust companies or other depositories as shall be selected by the Board of Directors; and (b) in general, perform all duties incident to the office of the Treasurer and such other duties as the Chief Executive Officer, the President or the Board of Directors may assign to him from time to time.  If required by the Board of Directors, the Treasurer shall give a bond for the faithful discharge of his duties in such sum, and with such surety or sureties, as the Board of Directors shall determine.
Treasurer
 
Section 12.  .  The Assistant Secretaries, when authorized by the Board of Directors, may sign with the President or a Vice President certificates for shares of the Corporation, the issuance of which shall have been authorized by the Board of Directors.  The Assistant Treasurers, if required by the Board of Directors, shall give bonds for the faithful discharge of their duties in such sums, and with such sureties, as the Board of Directors shall determine.  The Assistant Secretaries and the Assistant Treasurers, in general, shall perform such duties as the Secretary or the Treasurer, respectively, the President or the Board of Directors may assign to them from time to time.
Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers
 
Section 13.  .  The Chief Executive Officer, President, and/or the Chief Financial Officer may delegate some or all of the powers or duties of such officer in accordance with these Bylaws to any other officer or to any director, employee, shareholder or agent for whatever period of time seems desirable.
Delegation of Authority
 
Section 14..  The salaries, if any, of the officers shall be fixed by the Board of Directors from time to time, and no officer shall be prevented from receiving such salary by reason of the fact that he also is a director of the Corporation.
  
Salaries
 
 
Section 1.  .  Certificates representing shares of the Corporation shall be in such form as shall be determined by the Board of Directors.  The certificates shall be signed by the Chief Executive Officer, or the President or a Vice President and by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the signatures of such officers on such certificates may be facsimiles.  The certificates may be sealed with the seal of the Corporation or a facsimile thereof.  In case any officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon any certificate shall have ceased to be such officer before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer at the date of its issuance.  All certificates for shares shall be consecutively numbered or otherwise identified.  The name and address of the person to whom the shares represented thereby are issued, together with the number of shares and date of issue, shall be entered in the share transfer records of the Corporation.  All certificates surrendered to the Corporation for transfer shall be cancelled, and no new certificate shall be issued until the former certificate for a like number of shares shall have been surrendered and cancelled, except that in case of a lost, stolen or destroyed certificate, a new certificate may be issued therefor as provided in Section 3 of this Article 5.
Certificates Representing Shares
,
 
Section 2.  .  A transfer of shares of the Corporation shall be made only in the share transfer records of the Corporation by the holder of record thereof, or by his legal representative who shall furnish proper evidence of authority to transfer, or by his attorney thereunto authorized by power of attorney, duly executed and filed with the Secretary of the Corporation, and on surrender for cancellation of the certificate for such shares.  The Corporation shall regard the person in whose name any shares issued by the Corporation are registered in the share transfer records of the Corporation at any particular time (including, without limitation, as of a record date fixed pursuant to Section 5 or 6 of Article 2) as the owner of those shares at that time for the purposes specified by the Texas Business Corporation Act.
Transfer of Shares
 
Section 3.  .  The Corporation shall issue a new certificate in place of any certificate representing shares previously issued if the registered owner of the certificate (a) makes proof in affidavit form that it has been lost, destroyed or wrongfully taken; (b) requests the issuance of a new certificate before the Corporation has notice that the certificate has been acquired by a purchaser for value in good faith and without notice of an adverse claim; (c) gives a bond in such form, and with such surety or sureties, with fixed or open penalty, as the Corporation may direct, or indemnifies the Corporation (and its transfer agent and registrar, if any) against any claim that may be made on account of the alleged loss, destruction or theft of the certificate; and (d) satisfies any other reasonable requirements imposed by the Corporation.  If a certificate has been lost, apparently destroyed or wrongfully taken, and the registered holder of the shares represented thereby fails to notify the Corporation within a reasonable time after he has notice of it, and the Corporation registers a transfer of such shares before receiving such notification, the registered holder shall be precluded from making any claim against the Corporation for the transfer or for a new certificate.
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
 
 
 
The Board of Directors, by resolution, shall fix the fiscal year of the Corporation.
 
 
 
The Board of Directors may authorize, and the Corporation may make, distributions subject to any restrictions in its Articles of Incorporation and to the limitations set forth in the Texas Business Corporation Act.
 
 
.  As permitted by Section G of Article 2.02-1 of the Texas Business Corporation Act (the "Indemnification Article"), the Corporation (a) makes mandatory the indemnification permitted under Section B of the Indemnification Article as contemplated by Section G thereof, and (b) agrees to advance the reasonable expenses of a director upon such director's compliance with the requirements of Sections K and L of the Indemnification Article.
Section 1. 
Indemnification
 
The provisions of Section 1 of this Article 8 shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which any director of the Corporation may be entitled under any agreement, pursuant to a vote of the Board of Directors, any committee thereof or the shareholders, as a matter of law or otherwise, either as to action in his official capacity or as to action in another capacity while holding such office, shall continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such person.
Section 2.  . 
Non-Exclusivity
 
Section 3.  .  No person shall be entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Article 8 in relation to any matter as to which indemnification shall not be permitted by law.
Limitation
 
Section 4.  .  Terms used herein that are defined in the Indemnification Article shall have the respective meanings set forth therein.
Defined Terms
 
 
The Board of Directors shall provide for a corporate seal, which shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the state of incorporation, and the five-pointed Texas star.
 
 
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any shareholder or director of the Corporation under the provisions of the Articles of Incorporation, these Amended and Restated Bylaws or the Texas Business Corporation Act, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice.
 
 
 
Meetings of the shareholders and of the Board of Directors shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures established by the presiding officer of the meeting.
 
 
Unless otherwise provided by contract, directors and officers of the Corporation may hold positions as directors and officers of other corporations in related businesses, and their efforts to advance the interests of those corporations will not create a breach of fiduciary duty to this Corporation in the absence of bad faith.
 
 
These Amended and Restated Bylaws may be amended or repealed, as to all or some portion thereof, and new bylaws may be adopted, by (a) the Board of Directors or (b) the shareholders.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050516170630.txt.gz
TIME:20050516170630
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Item 1.01.
      
 
In December 2004, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 123 (revised 2004), "Share-Based Payment"(SFAS 123R). SFAS 123R will require that compensation cost related to share-based payment transactions, including stock options, be recognized in the financial statements. Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) is required to adopt the revised standard in the first quarter of 2006. Currently, the Company accounts for its share-based payment transactions under the provisions of APB 25, which does not necessarily require the recognition of compensation cost in the consolidated statement of income in the financial statements.
 
On May 11, 2005, in response to the accounting standard referenced above, the Company's Board of Directors approved accelerating the vesting of out-of-the-money, unvested stock options held by current employees, including executive officers, and the Chairman of the Board of Directors. No options held by non-employee directors were subject to acceleration. An option was considered out-of-the-money if the stated option exercise price was greater than the closing price, $28.30, of the Company's common stock on the day the Board of Directors approved the acceleration. The accelerated vesting was effective as of May 11, 2005. The following table summarizes the options subject to acceleration:
 
 
The decision to accelerate vesting of these options was made to avoid recognizing compensation cost in the statement of income in future financial statements upon the effectiveness of SFAS 123R. It is estimated that the maximum future compensation expense that will be avoided, based on the Company's implementation date for SFAS 123R of January 1, 2006, is approximately $6.8 million, of which approximately $2.5 million is related to options held by executive officers and the Chairman of the Board of the Company. The Company will report the avoided future compensation expense in the 2005 financial statements as pro forma footnote disclosures, as permitted under the transition guidance provided by the Financial Accounting Standards Board.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20050722151814.txt.gz
TIME:20050722151814
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On July 21, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing second quarter results for the period ended June 30, 2005. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9-01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
 
Exhibit 99.1            Press release dated July 21, 2005
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS SALES
AND EARNINGS FOR SECOND QUARTER 2005
 
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 21, 2005  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales revenue of $561 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2005, compared to $491 million for the same quarter last year.  Second quarter net income was $18.7 million, or $0.44 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $17.6 million, or $0.42 per diluted share.
 
"Our second quarter results reflect revenue growth of 14% driven by the significant level of new program production," commented Cary T. Fu, President and CEO of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. "We are proud of the excellent results our teams delivered, driven by our intense focus on customer satisfaction.  We expect strong growth and opportunities in the second half of 2005. "
 
Second Quarter 2005 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the second quarter was 4.1%, impacted by a combination of product pricing and mix as well as realignment costs of approximately $0.6 million.  When these realignment costs are excluded, on a non-GAAP basis the operating margin was 4.3%.
 - 
                 
Return on invested capital of 13.1%.
 - 
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at June 30, 2005 of $287 million.
 - 
                 
No debt outstanding as of June 30, 2005.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable increased by $43 million during the quarter to $310 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 50 days.
 - 
                 
Inventories increased by $17 million during the quarter to $313 million; inventory turns were 6.7 times.
 - 
                 
Working capital increased associated with our organic growth and the high level of demand from our customers in the last month of the quarter.
 - 
                 
 
Third Quarter 2005 Guidance
 
Revenue in the third quarter of 2005 is expected to be between $555 million and $580 million.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the third quarter of 2005 are expected to be $0.44 to $0.48 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20051021161730.txt.gz
TIME:20051021161730
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On October 20, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing third quarter results for the period ended September 30, 2005. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
 
Exhibit 99.1      Press release dated October 20, 2005
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS SALES
AND EARNINGS FOR THIRD QUARTER 2005
 
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 20, 2005  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $561 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2005, compared to $505 million for the same quarter last year.  Third quarter net income was $20.3 million, or $0.47 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $18.0 million, or $0.43 per diluted share.
 
"Our third quarter results
are a clear indication that our strategy is working as we delivered double digit growth in sales and net income," stated Benchmark's President and CEO Cary T. Fu.  "Our continued focus and execution on meeting our customers' needs around the world have provided for strong growth, profitability and increased shareholder value."
 
"I would like to thank our teams for their performance during the disruption caused by the Hurricane Rita evacuation that occurred during the last ten days of the third quarter.  Our team's flexibility and dedication during this historical event in the Angleton/Houston area was nothing short of remarkable."
 
Third Quarter 2005 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the third quarter was 4.4%.
 - 
                 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the third quarter was $45 million.
 - 
                 
Return on invested capital of 12.7%.
 - 
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at September 30, 2005 of $321 million.
 - 
                 
No debt outstanding.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable decreased by $8 million during the quarter to $302 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 48 days.
 - 
                 
Inventories increased by $5 million during the quarter to $318 million; inventory turns were 6.6 times.
 - 
                 
Fourth Quarter 2005 Guidance
 
Revenue in the fourth quarter of 2005 is expected to be between $585 million and $615 million.
 - 
                 
Earnings per share for the fourth quarter of 2005 are expected to be $0.49 to $0.54 per diluted share.
 - 
                 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.  The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements.  Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.  Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20051114213231.txt.gz
TIME:20051114213231
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act  (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 1.01.   Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Employment Agreement with Gayla J. Delly
 
On November 11, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) entered into a three-year employment agreement with Gayla J. Delly effective December 1, 2005 (the Agreement) which Agreement superseded the Company's prior severance agreement with Ms. Delly dated as of January 24, 2002.
 
Under the terms of the Agreement, Ms. Delly has agreed to serve as the Company's Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, for an initial term of three (3) years, commencing December 1, 2005. The Agreement automatically renews thereafter for successive one (1) year terms (each such renewal term, a "Renewal Term"), unless either party gives written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of any such Renewal Term. The Initial Term, as the same may be extended by any Renewal Term, is referred to as the "Employment Term". In connection with such service, Ms. Delly receives an annual base salary of $410,000, subject to annual increases at the discretion of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company, and an annual bonus with a target opportunity of 60% of her base salary for each calendar year in the Employment Term if the Company attains certain performance objectives for such year, and an over achievement bonus opportunity of up to 60% of her base salary if the Company exceeds the foregoing performance objectives by predetermined amounts. The Company may terminate Ms. Delly's employment at any time and Ms. Delly may terminate her employment upon 30 days' prior written notice. In the event her employment is terminated by the Company without cause or she terminates her employment for good reason, she is entitled to receive the following cash severance benefits:
 
Accrued but unpaid base salary and target bonus, pro rated through the date of termination;
 - 
                 
Any employee benefits to which she is entitled under the Company's benefit plans;
 - 
                 
Severance Pay equal to 100% of her base salary for the Severance Period (as defined). The "Severance Period" means (i) if termination is at or prior to the end of the Initial Term, a period equal to the greater of (a) two (2) full years beginning on the date of termination and (b) the then remaining portion of the Initial Term and (ii) if termination is after the end of the initial term and prior to the end of the then-current Renewal Term, a period equal to one (1) full year beginning on the date of termination;
 - 
                 
Continued coverage under the Company's medical, dental, health and other welfare benefit plans during the Severance Period at the same cost to her as was provided to her immediately prior to the date of termination.
 - 
                 
 
Ms. Delly has agreed not to disclose any confidential information pertaining to the Company's business and has agreed not to compete with the Company during her employment and for two years following termination of her employment.
 
The foregoing is a summary of the terms and conditions of the Agreement only, and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Agreement attached to this Current Report as Exhibit 10.1, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
 
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
Employment Agreement, dated as of December 1, 2005, (the "Agreement"), by and between Gayla J. Delly (the "Employee") and Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the "Company").
 
 
In consideration of the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
Section 1.  .  The Company hereby agrees to employ the Employee, and the Employee hereby accepts employment by the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth.  During the term of her employment, the Employee shall have the title of Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
Employment
 
Section 2.  .  In her capacity as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, the Employee shall perform such reasonable executive duties as a Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer would normally perform or as otherwise specified in the By-laws of the Company, and such other reasonable executive duties as the Board of Directors of the Company may from time to time reasonably prescribe with the concurrence of the Employee.  Except as otherwise provided herein, except as may otherwise be approved by the Board of Directors of the Company, and except during vacation periods and reasonable periods due to sickness, personal injury or other disability, the Employee agrees to devote substantially all of her available time to the performance of her duties to the Company hereunder, provided that nothing contained herein shall preclude the Employee from (i) serving on the board of directors of any business or corporation on which she is serving on the date hereof or, with the consent of the Board of Directors, serving on the board of directors of any other business or corporation, (ii) serving on the board of, or working for, any charitable or community organization, and (iii) pursuing her personal financial and legal affairs so long as such activities do not materially interfere with the performance of the Employee's duties hereunder.
Duties
 
Section 3.  .  Except as otherwise provided herein, the term of this Agreement shall be for three (3) years (the "Initial Term"), commencing on the date of this Agreement.  This Agreement shall be automatically renewed thereafter for successive one 1) year terms (each such renewal term, a "Renewal Term"), unless either party gives to the other written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of any such Renewal Term, which notice shall expressly refer to this Section 3
Term
of the Agreement and state that such party does not wish to extend this Agreement (any such notice, a "Non-Renewal Notice").  Any such Non-Renewal Notice given by the Company shall constitute a termination of the Employee's employment without Cause for purposes of this Agreement.  The Initial Term, as the same may be extended by any Renewal Term, is referred to herein as the "Employment Term".  The provisions of this Agreement shall survive any termination hereof.
 
Section 4.  .  In consideration for the services of the Employee hereunder, the Company shall compensate the Employee and perform its other obligations as provided in this Section 4.
Compensation and Benefits
 
(a) .  Commencing on the date hereof, the Employee shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay the Employee in equal bi-weekly installments, a base salary at a rate per annum of Four Hundred Ten Thousand United States Dollars ($410,000.00), as increased from time to time by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Compensation Committee").  Commencing in 2006 and from time to time at least annually thereafter, the Compensation Committee shall review and evaluate the annual base salary of the Employee in accordance with its standard policies and practices for key executive employee compensation and, in its discretion, may increase the Employee's annual base salary commencing on August 1, 2006, and on anniversaries of such date thereafter.  The amount of such base salary for each respective annual one (1) year period, including any increases hereafter approved, is referred to as the Base Salary for such respective one year period.  The Employee's Base Salary may not and shall not be decreased or reduced more than ten percent (10%) in any year, including but not limited to after giving effect to any such increase.
Base Salary
 
(b) .  During the Employment Term, the Employee shall be eligible to participate in any annual fiscal year bonus program that may be provided by the Company for its key executive employees, subject to its terms and conditions.  On February 14, 2005, the Compensation Committee adopted a formal bonus plan (the "Executive Bonus Plan") for eligible senior executive officers, including the Employee.  The Executive Bonus Plan provides the Employee with a target bonus opportunity of Sixty percent (60%) of Base Salary for each calendar year in the Employment Term if the Company attains specified performance objectives for such year, and an over achievement bonus opportunity of up to Sixty percent (60%) of Base Salary if the Company exceeds the foregoing performance objectives by predetermined amounts.  Such objectives and targets shall be determined on an annual basis each year during the Employment Term, and shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Company and the Employee.  All bonuses payable to the Employee under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other annual bonus plan shall be determined and paid on or prior to March 31 of the year following the year for which such bonus is payable.
Bonus
(c) .  The Employee shall be entitled to participate in all long-term incentive compensation programs for key executives (if any) at a level commensurate with her position.
Other Long Term Incentive Compensation
 
(d) .  During the term of this Agreement, the Employee shall be entitled to participate in and receive benefits under any and all pension, profit-sharing, life and other insurance, medical, dental, health and other welfare and fringe benefit plans and programs, and be provided any and all other perquisites, that are from time to time made available to executive employees or other employees of the Company.  The Employee shall also be entitled to an amount of paid vacation per calendar year, and sick leave and illness and disability benefits, in accordance with such reasonable Company policy as may be applicable from time to time to key executive employees.
Other Benefits
 
Section 5.  .  It is acknowledged by the parties that the Employee, in connection with the services to be performed by him pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, will be required to make payments for travel, entertainment and similar expenses.  The Company shall reimburse the Employee for all reasonable expenses incurred by the Employee in connection with the performance of her duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company.
Expenses and Other Employment-Related Matters
 
Section 6.  .  The Employee's employment may terminate prior to the end of the Employment Term as provided in this Section 6.
Termination
 
(a) .  The Employee's employment will terminate (x) immediately upon the death of the Employee during the term of her employment hereunder or (y) at the option of the Company, upon thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the Employee, in the event of the Employee's disability.  The Employee shall not be deemed disabled unless, as a result of the Employee's incapacity due to physical or mental illness (as determined by a physician selected by the Employer or its insurers and reasonably acceptable to the Employee or her representative), the Employee shall have been absent from and unable to perform her duties with the Company on a full-time bases for one hundred twenty (120) consecutive business days.   In the event of termination of the Employee's employment pursuant to this Section 6(a):
Death or Disability
 
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee any portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will make a lump sum cash payment equal to the Employee's Base Salary and a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Sixty
percent (60%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employee's annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Sixty percent (60%) of Base Salary, the Employee or her estate shall be entitled to receive, at the time such bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(b) .  The Company may terminate the employee's employment for Cause (as defined below) upon written notice by the Company to the Employee, such termination to take effect on the date determined in accordance with the last paragraph of this Section 6(b) below to be the termination date for such purpose.  In the event of termination of the Employee's employment for Cause pursuant to this Section 6(b):
For Cause
 
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and (ii) all payments and reimbursement under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "Cause" shall mean the Employee's (i) gross negligence in the performance of her duties with the Company, which gross negligence results in a material adverse effect on the Company, provided that no such gross negligence will constitute "Cause" if it relates to an action taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company; (ii) habitual neglect or disregard of her duties with the Company that is materially and demonstrably injurious to the Company, after written notice from the Company stating the duties the Employee has failed to perform; (iii) engaging in conduct or misconduct that materially harms the reputation or
financial position of the Company; (iv) obstruction, impedance, or failure to materially cooperate with an investigation authorized by the Board, a self-regulatory organization empowered with self-regulatory responsibilities under federal or state laws, or a governmental department or agency; or (v) conviction of a felony, provided that no such conviction will constitute "Cause" if it relates to an action taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interest of the Company.  The Employee's employment may not and shall not be terminated for Cause unless the (1) Board of Directors provides the Employee with written notice stating the conduct alleged to give rise to such Cause, (2) the Employee has been given an opportunity to be heard by the Board, (3) in the case of clause (i) or (ii) of the definition of Cause, the Employee has been given a reasonable time to cure, and the Employee has not cured such negligence or failure to the reasonable satisfaction of the Board, and (4) the Board has approved such termination by majority vote of the members of the Board of Directors, excluding the Employee.
 
(c) .  The Company may terminate the Employee's employment at any time for any reason without Cause.  In the event of any termination of the Employee's employment by the Company without Cause:
By Company Without Cause
 
(1) The Company shall pay the Employee severance pay for the Severance Period (as defined below) at the per annum rate which shall equal one hundred percent (100%) of her Base Salary at the date of such termination.  The Company shall pay such severance pay in lump sum six (6) months after the date of such termination.  The Company's obligation to make such payments shall be absolute and unconditional.  Without limiting the foregoing, such payments shall not be subject to any right of offset or similar right, and the Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect thereto.
 
(2) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee the portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will pay and a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Sixty percent (60%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employee's annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Sixty percent (60%) of Base Salary, the Employee (or her estate) shall
be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay, at the time the bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
(3) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(4) Following such termination, the Employee shall be entitled to continue participation in all medical, dental, health and other welfare benefits (or receive comparable coverage if such participation is not permitted under the terms of such plans or if the Board, at its option, determines that it is in the best interest of the Company to provide such comparable coverage rather than continued participation in the Company's plans) until the end of the Severance Period upon the same terms and conditions that would have applied if the Employee continued to be employed by the Company, provided that the benefits referred to in this clause (4) will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment.
 
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "Severance Period" means (i) if the Employee's employment is terminated at or prior to the end of the Initial Term (including but not limited to by the giving of a Non-Renewal Notice or other notice as provided in Section 3 hereof), a period equal to the greater of (x) two (2) full years beginning on the date of such termination and (y) the then remaining portion of the Initial Term and (ii) if the Employee's employment is terminated after the end of the Initial Term and prior to the end of the then-current Renewal Term (including but not limited to by the giving of any Non-Renewal Notice as provided in Section 3 hereof), a period equal to one (1) full year beginning on the date of such termination.
 
(d) .  The Employee may terminate her employment at any time for Good Reason (as defined below).  In the event of any termination of the Employee's employment by the Employee for Good Reason:
By Employee for Good Reason
 
(1) The Company shall pay the Employee severance pay for the Severance Period (as defined above) at the per annum rate which shall equal one hundred percent (100%) of her Base Salary at the date of such termination.  The Company shall pay such severance pay in lump sum six (6) months after the date of such termination.  The Company's obligation to make such payments shall be absolute and unconditional.  Without limiting the foregoing, such payments shall not be
subject to any right of offset or similar right, and the Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect thereto.
 
(2) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee the portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will pay a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Sixty percent (60%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employee's annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Sixty percent (60%) of Base Salary, the Employee (or her estate) shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay, at the time the bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
(3) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(4) Following such termination, the Employee shall be entitled to continue participation in all medical, dental, health and other welfare benefits (or receive comparable coverage if such participation is not permitted under the terms of such plans or if the Board, at its option, determines that it is in the best interest of the Company to provide such comparable coverage rather than continued participation in the Company's plans) until the end of the Severance Period upon the same terms and conditions that would have applied if the Employee continued to be employed by the Company, provided that the benefits referred to in this clause (4) will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment.
 
For purposes of this Agreement, "Good Reason" means (A) a material diminution of the Employee's duties or responsibilities, (B) a reduction in the Employee's Base Salary greater than ten percent (10%), or annual bonus or long-term incentive compensation opportunity, (C) a Change of Control (as defined in Section 7 hereof), but
only if the Employee terminates her employment pursuant to this subsection within ninety (90) days after the date of such Change of Control, or (D) a material breach by the Company of any other provision of this Agreement that is not cured promptly after written notice to the Company by the Employee.
 
(e) .  The Employee may terminate her employment at any time without Good Reason upon thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the Company.  In the event of any such termination of the Employee's employment by the Employee with Good Reason:
By Employee Without Good Reason
 
(1)  The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and (ii) all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(f) .  If a Change of Control or other transaction triggers or results in the imposition upon the Employee of any excise or similar tax under Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (or any similar or successor provision) pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any employee stock option agreement or plan in which the Employee is a participant, the Company shall pay (or cause any acquirer in such transaction to pay) any such excise or similar tax and make "gross-up" payments to the Employee to the extent necessary so that the Employee will receive the same net after-tax amount she would have received if no excise tax had been imposed on him.
Excise Tax Gross-Up Payment
 
(g) .  Any termination by the Employee of her employment with the Company in accordance with the terms hereof shall be without penalty, forfeiture, or liability arising out of such termination of any kind or nature.  Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, any termination of the Employee's employment on or after the occurrence of a Change of Control shall be deemed to be a termination by the Company without Cause if by the Company.
No Penalty, Forfeiture or Liability
 
Section 7. .  For purposes of this Agreement, (1) the term "Person" means any corporation, partnership, trust, company, business, firm, association, organization, individual, governmental instrumentality or entity, or other person or entity, (2) the term "Voting Stock" shall mean, as to any Person, the then-outstanding securities of or other interests in such corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, trustees or similar managers of such Person, and (3) the term "Change in Control" shall mean:
Change in Control
(a) The Company is merged, consolidated or reorganized into or with another corporation or other Person, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a merger, consolidation or reorganization, and as a result of such merger, consolidation or reorganization, the holders of the Voting Stock of the Company immediately prior to such transaction hold or would hold in the aggregate less than seventy percent (70%) of the combined voting power of the then-outstanding Voting Stock of the surviving corporation or Person immediately after such transaction; or
 
(b) The Company sells or otherwise transfers all or substantially all of its assets to another corporation or other Person, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a sale or transfer, and either (x) as a result of such sale or transfer, the holders of the Voting Stock of the Company immediately prior to such sale or transfer hold or would hold in the aggregate less than seventy percent (70%) of the combined voting power of the then-outstanding Voting Stock of such corporation or Person immediately after such sale or transfer, or (y) such corporation or Person does not assume all of the Company's obligations to the Employee pursuant to an instrument in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Employee; or
 
(c) The Company is liquidated or dissolved, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a liquidation or dissolution; or
 
(d) Any Person or "group" [as the term "group" is used in Section 13(d)(3) or Section 14(d)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")] becomes, or a report is filed on Schedule 13D or Schedule 14D-1 (or any successor schedule, form or report), each as promulgated pursuant to the Exchange Act, disclosing that any Person or "group" (as the term "group" is used in Section 13(d)(3) or Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) has become, the beneficial owner (as the term "beneficial owner" is defined under Rule 13d-3 or any successor rules or regulations promulgated under the Exchange Act) of securities representing thirty percent (30%) or more of the combined voting power of the then outstanding Voting Stock of the Company or fifty percent (50%) or more of the then outstanding shares of Voting Stock of the Company; or
 
(e) The Company files a report or proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Exchange Act disclosing in response to Form 8-K or Schedule 14A (or any successor schedule, form, report or item therein) that a change in control of the Company has occurred or will occur in the future pursuant to any then-existing contract or transaction; or
 
(f) If, during any period of two consecutive years, individuals who at the beginning of any such period constitute the Directors of the Company cease for any reason to
constitute at least a majority thereof; provided, however, that for purposes of this clause (f), each Director who is first elected, or first nominated for election by the Company's  stockholders, by a vote of at least two-thirds of the Directors of the Company then still in office who were Directors of the Company at the beginning of any such period (other than an election or nomination of any individual whose initial assumption of office is in connection with an actual or threatened election contest relating to the election of the Directors of the Company, as such terms are used in Rule 14a-11 or any successor rule or regulation promulgated under the Exchange Act) will be deemed to have been a Director of the Company at the beginning of such period.
 
Section 8.  .  The Employee recognizes and acknowledges that certain proprietary, non-public information owned by the Company and its affiliates, including without limitation proprietary, non-public information regarding customers, pricing policies, methods of operation, proprietary computer programs, sales products, profits, costs, markets, key personnel, technical processes, and trade secrets (hereinafter called "Confidential Information"), are valuable, special and unique assets of the Company and its affiliates.  The Employee will not, during or after her term of employment, without the prior written consent of a member of the Board believed by the Employee to have been authorized by the Board for such purpose, knowingly and intentionally disclose any of the Confidential Information obtained by him while in the employ of the Company to any person, firm, corporation, association or other entity for any reason or purpose whatsoever, directly or indirectly (other than to an employee of the Company of its affiliates, a director of the Company or its affiliates, or a person to whom disclosure is necessary or appropriate in the Employee's good faith judgment in connection with the performance of her duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company), unless and until such Confidential Information becomes publicly available (other than as a consequence of the breach by the Employee of her confidentiality obligations under this Section 8), and except as may be required (or as the Employee may be advised by counsel is required) in connection with any judicial, administrative or other governmental proceeding or inquiry.  In the event of the termination of her employment, whether voluntary or involuntary and whether by the Company or the Employee, the Employee will deliver to the Company and will not take with him any documents, or any other reproductions (in whole or in part) of any items, comprising Confidential Information (except that the Employee may retain her personal address, telephone and other contact lists and information and any other documents or reproductions retained upon the advice of counsel).  Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the term "Confidential Information" does not include any information that (a) is or becomes publicly available other than as the result of the breach by the Employee of her confidentiality obligations under this Section 8, (b) became, is or becomes available to the Employee on a non-confidential basis from a source, other than the Company, that to the Employee's knowledge is not prohibited from disclosing such information to the Employee by a
Confidential Information
confidentiality obligation owed to the Company or (c) was known to the Employee prior to becoming an officer of the Company.  The provisions of this Section 8 shall expire and be of no further force and effect on the third anniversary of the date of termination of the Employee's employment with the Company.
 
Section 9.  .  The Company promises that during the term of this Agreement and before the Company can exercise any right to terminate the Employee's employment without cause, the Company shall provide the Employee with Confidential Information that the Employee did not possess and had not received prior to the execution of this Agreement.  In exchange for and ancillary to the Company's enforceable promise to provide him with that Confidential Information, the Employee agrees that she will not disclose or make improper use of any of the Confidential Information.  In order to enforce that promise by the Employee, she agrees to the provisions of this Section 9.  Accordingly, during her employment with the Company pursuant to this Agreement and for a period of two (2) years thereafter, the Employee will not knowingly and intentionally (i) engage, directly or indirectly, alone or as a partner, officer, director, employee, or consultant of any other business organization, in any business activities that are substantially and directly competitive with the business activities then conducted by the Company anywhere in the world (the "Designated Industry"), (ii) divert to any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry any customer of the Company or (iii) solicit or encourage any officer, employee, or consultant of the Company to leave its employ for employment by or with any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry.  The parties hereto acknowledge that the Employee's non-competition obligations hereunder will not preclude the Employee from (i) owning less than 5% of the common stock of any publicly traded corporation or other Persons conducting business activities in the Designated Industry or (ii) serving as a director of a corporation or other Person engaged in the manufacturing or electronics industry whose business operations are not substantially and directly competitive with those of the Company.
Non-Competition
 
Section 10.  .
Arbitration
 
(a) . The Company and the Employee agree that all (i) disputes and claims of any nature that the employee may have against the Company and any subsidiaries or affiliates and their officers and employees, including all federal or state statutory, contractual, and common law claims (including all employment discrimination claims) arising from, concerning, or relating in any way to our employment relationship, (ii) all disputes and claims of any nature that the Company may have against the Employee, or (iii) any dispute among us about the arbitrability of any claims or controversy will be resolved out of court.  Any such claims will be submitted
Subject Claims; Initiation of Binding Arbitration
exclusively first to mandatory mediation and, if mediation is unsuccessful, to mandatory arbitration.
 
(b) .  Unless otherwise agreed in writing by the Company and the Employee, any arbitration proceeding will be held in Houston, Texas.  The arbitration will be conducted under the National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes of the American Arbitration Association ("AAA" Rules).  The claim will be submitted to a single experienced, neutral employment arbitrator selected in accordance with the AAA Rules.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to award or grant all remedies provided by law.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to permit adequate discovery.  At the conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator shall issue a written, reasoned award.  The award of the arbitration shall be final and binding.  A judgment upon the award may be entered and enforced by any court having jurisdiction.  Each party shall pay the fees of their respective attorneys, the expenses of their witnesses, and any other expenses incurred by such party in connection with the arbitration, provided, however, that the Company shall pay for the fees of the arbitrator and the administrative and filing fees charged by the AAA.
Arbitration Procedure
 
(c) . All information regarding the dispute or claim or mediation or arbitration proceedings, including the mediation settlement or arbitration award, will not be disclosed by the Employee or by the Company or any mediator or arbitrator to any third party without the written consent of the Employee and the Company.  In no event may an arbitrator allow any party to join claims of any other employee in a single arbitration proceeding without consent of the Employee and the Company.  In the event that the dispute or claim involves a written agreement between the Employee and the Company (including this Agreement) or a compensation plan, the arbitrator will have no authority to add to, detract from, or otherwise modify the agreement or plan provisions other than as expressly set forth in that agreement or plan.  Should this arbitration agreement conflict with the arbitration provisions of any other agreement that the Employee has with the Company, the terms of this agreement will govern.
Confidentiality; Nonjoinder
 
(d) .  In the event that irreparable injury could occur during the pendency of a mediation or arbitration proceeding, to restore or maintain the status quo until the dispute has been resolved by mediation or arbitration a party may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to obtain a temporary or preliminary injunction in aid of mediation and arbitration.
Equitable Relief
 
(e) .  Notwithstanding any policy of the Company permitting it to alter its policies, procedures, and the terms and conditions of employment, this agreement to arbitrate is binding and cannot be modified or superseded except by a written
Binding Agreement
agreement signed by an authorized representative of the Company and the Employee.
Section 11.  .
General
 
(a) .  All notices and other communications hereunder will be in writing, and will be deemed to have been duly given if delivered personally, or three (3) business days after being mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, or upon receipt if sent by written telecommunications, to the relevant address set forth below, or to such other address as the recipient of such notice or communication will have specified to the other party hereto in accordance with this Section 11(a):
Notices
 
If to Company, to:
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas 77515
Attn: Corporate Secretary
Fax No.: 979/848-5269
 
If to Employee, to:
 
Gayla J. Delly
1203 Woodbank Drive
Seabrook, Texas 77586
 
(b) .  All payments required to be made by the Company under this Agreement to the Employee will be subject to the withholding of such amounts, if any, relating to federal, state and local taxes as may be required by law.  No payment under this Agreement will be subject to offset or reduction attributable to any amount of obligation the Employee may owe or be liable for to the Company or any other Person.
Withholding; No Offset
 
(c) .  Each of the parties hereto acknowledges and agrees that upon any breach by the Employee of her obligations under any of Sections 8 and 9 hereof, the Company will have no adequate remedy at law, and accordingly will be entitled to specific performance and other appropriate injunctive and equitable relief.
Equitable Remedies
 
(d) .  If any provision of this Agreement is held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, such provision will be fully severable and this Agreement will be construed and enforced as if such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision never comprised a part hereof; and the remaining provisions hereof will remain in full force and effect and will not be affected by the illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision or by its severance herefrom.  Furthermore, in lieu of such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision, there
Severability
will be added automatically as part of this Agreement a provision as similar in its terms to such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision as may be possible and be legal, valid, and enforceable.
 
  (e) .  No delay or omission by either party hereto in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder will impair such right, power or privilege, nor will any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or privilege preclude any further exercise of any other right, power or privilege.
Waivers
 
(f) .  This Agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, and all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument
Counterparts
 
(g) .  The captions in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and will not limit or otherwise affect any of the terms or provisions hereof.
Captions
 
(h) .  Use of the words "herein", "hereof", and "hereto" and the like in this Agreement refer to this Agreement only as a whole and not to any particular Section, subsection or provision of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.  Any reference to a "Section" or "subsection" shall refer to a Section or subsection of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.
Reference to Agreement
 
(i) .  The Company shall require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company, by agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Employee, expressly to assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent the Company would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any successor to the Company, including without limitation any Persons acquiring directly or indirectly all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company whether by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization, or otherwise ( and such successor shall thereafter be deemed the "Company" for the purposes of this Agreement), but shall not otherwise be assignable, transferable, or delegable by the Company.  Without limiting the foregoing, the surviving or transferee corporation or other person in any such transaction (whether by merger, consolidation, reorganization, transfer of business or assets, or otherwise) shall be subject to the provisions of Section 7 hereof and shall be deemed to be the Company for purposes of such provisions, regardless of whether such transaction itself constituted a Change of Control of the Company.
Successors and Binding Agreement
(j) .  This Agreement contains the entire understanding of the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between them, relating to the subject matter hereof including that certain Key Contributor Severance Agreement between the parties dated January 24, 2002.  This Agreement may not be amended or modified except by a written instrument hereafter signed by each of the parties hereto, and may not be waived except by a written instrument hereafter signed by the party granting such waiver.  The Company has not made any promise or entered into any agreement that is not expressed in this Agreement, and the Employee is not relying upon any statement or representation of any agent of the Company.  In executing this Agreement, the Employee is relying solely on her judgment and has been represented by the legal counsel of her choice in connection with this Agreement who has read and explained to the Employee the entire contents of this Agreement, as well as explained the legal consequences.  No agreements or representation, oral or otherwise, express or implied, with respect to the subject matter hereof have been made by either party which are not set forth expressly in this Agreement.
Entire Agreement; Amendments and Waivers
 
(k) .  This Agreement and the performance hereof shall be governed and construed in all respects, including but not limited to as to validity, interpretation and effect, by the laws of the State of Texas, without regard to the principles or rules of conflict of laws thereof.
Governing Law
Executed as of the date and year first above written.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20051130171305.txt.gz
TIME:20051130171305
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 1.02.   Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On November 30, 2005, the Board of Directors of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) approved the termination of the Company's Employee Stock Purchase Plan, as amended, at the end of the current offering period.  The current offering period ends December 31, 2005.  Subsequent to this date, shares will no longer be offered under the Company's Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20051202172651.txt.gz
TIME:20051202172651
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 1.01.   Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Employment Agreement with Steven A. Barton
 
On December 1, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) entered into a three-year employment agreement with Steven A. Barton effective December 1, 2005 (the Agreement) which Agreement superseded the Company's prior employment agreement with Mr. Barton dated as of August 1, 2001.
 
Under the terms of the Agreement, Mr. Barton has agreed to serve as the Company's Executive Vice President, for an initial term of three (3) years, commencing December 1, 2005. The Agreement automatically renews thereafter for successive one (1) year terms (each such renewal term, a "Renewal Term"), unless either party gives written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of any such Renewal Term. The Initial Term, as the same may be extended by any Renewal Term, is referred to as the "Employment Term". In connection with such service, Mr. Barton receives an annual base salary of $250,000, subject to annual increases at the discretion of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company, and an annual bonus with a target opportunity of 50% of his base salary for each calendar year in the Employment Term if the Company attains certain performance objectives for such year, and an over achievement bonus opportunity of up to 50% of his base salary if the Company exceeds the foregoing performance objectives by predetermined amounts. The Company may terminate Mr. Barton's employment at any time and Mr. Barton may terminate his employment upon 30 days' prior written notice. In the event his employment is terminated by the Company without cause or he terminates his employment for good reason, he is entitled to receive the following cash severance benefits:
 
Accrued but unpaid base salary and target bonus, pro rated through the date of termination;
 - 
                 
Any employee benefits to which he is entitled under the Company's benefit plans;
 - 
                 
Severance Pay equal to 100% of his base salary for the Severance Period (as defined). The "Severance Period" means (i) if termination is at or prior to the end of the Initial Term, a period equal to the greater of (a) two (2) full years beginning on the date of termination and (b) the then remaining portion of the Initial Term and (ii) if termination is after the end of the initial term and prior to the end of the then-current Renewal Term, a period equal to one (1) full year beginning on the date of termination;
 - 
                 
Continued coverage under the Company's medical, dental, health and other welfare benefit plans during the Severance Period at the same cost to him as was provided to him immediately prior to the date of termination.
 - 
                 
 
Mr. Barton has agreed not to disclose any confidential information pertaining to the Company's business and has agreed not to compete with the Company during his employment and for two years following termination of his employment.
The foregoing is a summary of the terms and conditions of the Agreement only, and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Agreement attached to this Current Report as Exhibit 10.1, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(c)
                                 
 
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
Employment Agreement, dated as of December 1, 2005, (the "Agreement"), by and between Steven A. Barton (the "Employee") and Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the "Company").
 
 
In consideration of the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
Section 1.  .  The Company hereby agrees to employ the Employee, and the Employee hereby accepts employment by the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth.  During the term of his employment, the Employee shall have the title of Executive Vice President.
Employment
 
Section 2.  .  In his capacity as Executive Vice President of the Company, the Employee shall perform such reasonable executive duties as an Executive Vice President would normally perform or as otherwise specified in the By-laws of the Company, and such other reasonable executive duties as the Board of Directors of the Company may from time to time reasonably prescribe with the concurrence of the Employee.  Except as otherwise provided herein, except as may otherwise be approved by the Board of Directors of the Company, and except during vacation periods and reasonable periods due to sickness, personal injury or other disability, the Employee agrees to devote approximately twenty (20) hours per week to the performance of his duties to the Company hereunder, provided that nothing contained herein shall preclude the Employee from (i) serving on the board of directors of any business or corporation on which he is serving on the date hereof or, with the consent of the Board of Directors, serving on the board of directors of any other business or corporation, (ii) serving on the board of, or working for, any charitable or community organization, and (iii) pursuing his personal financial and legal affairs so long as such activities do not materially interfere with the performance of the Employee's duties hereunder.
Duties
 
Section 3.  .  Except as otherwise provided herein, the term of this Agreement shall be for three (3) years (the "Initial Term"), commencing on the date of this Agreement.  This Agreement shall be automatically renewed thereafter for successive one (1) year terms (each such renewal term, a "Renewal Term"), unless either party gives to the other written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of any such Renewal Term, which notice shall expressly refer to this Section 3 of the Agreement and state that such party does not wish to
Term
 
extend this Agreement (any such notice, a "Non-Renewal Notice").  Any such Non-Renewal Notice given by the Company shall constitute a termination of the Employee's employment without Cause for purposes of this Agreement.  The Initial Term, as the same may be extended by any Renewal Term, is referred to herein as the "Employment Term."  The provisions of this Agreement shall survive any termination hereof.
 
Section 4.  .  In consideration for the services of the Employee hereunder, the Company shall compensate the Employee and perform its other obligations as provided in this Section 4.
Compensation and Benefits
 
(a) .  Commencing on the date hereof, the Employee shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay the Employee in equal bi-weekly installments, a base salary at a rate per annum of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand United States Dollars ($250,000), as increased from time to time by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Compensation Committee").  Commencing in 2006 and from time to time at least annually thereafter, the Compensation Committee shall review and evaluate the annual base salary of the Employee in accordance with its standard policies and practices for key executive employee compensation and, in its discretion, may increase the Employee's annual base salary commencing on August 1, 2006, and on anniversaries of such date thereafter.  The amount of such base salary for each respective annual one (1) year period, including any increases hereafter approved, is referred to as the "Base Salary" for such respective one year period.  The Employee's Base Salary may not and shall not be decreased or reduced more than ten percent (10%) in any year, including but not limited to after giving effect to any such increase.
Base Salary
 
(b) .  During the Employment Term, the Employee shall be eligible to participate in any annual fiscal year bonus program that may be provided by the Company for its key executive employees, subject to its terms and conditions.  On February 14, 2005, the Compensation Committee adopted a formal bonus plan (the "Executive Bonus Plan") for eligible senior executive officers, including the Employee.  The Executive Bonus Plan provides the Employee with a target bonus opportunity of Fifty percent (50%) of Base Salary for each calendar year in the Employment Term if the Company attains specified performance objectives for such year, and an over achievement bonus opportunity of up to Fifty percent (50%) of Base Salary if the Company exceeds the foregoing performance objectives by predetermined amounts.  Such objectives and targets shall be determined on an annual basis each year during the Employment Term, and shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Company and the Employee.  All bonuses payable to the Employee under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other annual bonus plan shall be
Bonus
determined and paid on or prior to March 31 of the year following the year for which such bonus is payable.
 
(c) .  The Employee shall be entitled to participate in all long-term incentive compensation programs for key executives (if any) at a level commensurate with his position.
Other Long Term Incentive Compensation
 
(d) .  During the term of this Agreement, the Employee shall be entitled to participate in and receive benefits under any and all pension, profit-sharing, life and other insurance, medical, dental, health and other welfare and fringe benefit plans and programs, and be provided any and all other perquisites, that are from time to time made available to executive employees or other employees of the Company.  The Employee shall also be entitled to an amount of paid vacation per calendar year, and sick leave and illness and disability benefits, in accordance with such reasonable Company policy as may be applicable from time to time to key executive employees.
Other Benefits
 
Section 5.  .  It is acknowledged by the parties that the Employee, in connection with the services to be performed by him pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, will be required to make payments for travel, entertainment and similar expenses.  The Company shall reimburse the Employee for all reasonable expenses incurred by the Employee in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company.
Expenses and Other Employment-Related Matters
 
Section 6.  .  The Employee's employment may terminate prior to the end of the Employment Term as provided in this Section 6.
Termination
 
(a) .  The Employee's employment will terminate (x) immediately upon the death of the Employee during the term of his employment hereunder or (y) at the option of the Company, upon thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the Employee, in the event of the Employee's disability.  The Employee shall not be deemed disabled unless, as a result of the Employee's incapacity due to physical or mental illness (as determined by a physician selected by the Employer or its insurers and reasonably acceptable to the Employee or his representative), the Employee shall have been absent from and unable to perform his duties with the Company on a full-time bases for one hundred twenty (120) consecutive business days.   In the event of termination of the Employee's employment pursuant to this Section 6(a):
Death or Disability
 
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee any portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such
termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will make a lump sum cash payment equal to the Employee's Base Salary and a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Fifty percent (50%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employee's annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Fifty percent (50%) of Base Salary, the Employee or his estate shall be entitled to receive, at the time such bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(b) .  The Company may terminate the employee's employment for Cause (as defined below) upon written notice by the Company to the Employee, such termination to take effect on the date determined in accordance with the last paragraph of this Section 6(b) below to be the termination date for such purpose.  In the event of termination of the Employee's employment for Cause pursuant to this Section 6(b):
For Cause
 
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and (ii) all payments and reimbursement under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "Cause" shall mean the Employee's (i) gross negligence in the performance of his duties with the Company, which gross negligence results in a material adverse effect on the Company, provided that no such gross negligence will constitute "Cause" if it relates to an
action taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company; (ii) habitual neglect or disregard of his duties with the Company that is materially and demonstrably injurious to the Company, after written notice from the Company stating the duties the Employee has failed to perform; (iii) engaging in conduct or misconduct that materially harms the reputation or financial position of the Company; (iv) obstruction, impedance, or failure to materially cooperate with an investigation authorized by the Board, a self-regulatory organization empowered with self-regulatory responsibilities under federal or state laws, or a governmental department or agency; or (v) conviction of a felony, provided that no such conviction will constitute "Cause" if it relates to an action taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interest of the Company.  The Employee's employment may not and shall not be terminated for Cause unless the (1) Board of Directors provides the Employee with written notice stating the conduct alleged to give rise to such Cause, (2) the Employee has been given an opportunity to be heard by the Board, (3) in the case of clause (i) or (ii) of the definition of Cause, the Employee has been given a reasonable time to cure, and the Employee has not cured such negligence or failure to the reasonable satisfaction of the Board, and (4) the Board has approved such termination by majority vote of the members of the Board of Directors, excluding the Employee.
 
(c) .  The Company may terminate the Employee's employment at any time for any reason without Cause.  In the event of any termination of the Employee's employment by the Company without Cause:
By Company Without Cause
 
(1) The Company shall pay the Employee severance pay for the Severance Period (as defined below) at the per annum rate which shall equal one hundred percent (100%) of his Base Salary at the date of such termination.  The Company shall pay such severance pay in lump sum six (6) months after the date of such termination.  The Company's obligation to make such payments shall be absolute and unconditional.  Without limiting the foregoing, such payments shall not be subject to any right of offset or similar right, and the Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect thereto.
 
(2) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee the portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will pay and a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Fifty percent (50%) of the amount calculated by
dividing the Employee's annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Fifty percent (50%) of Base Salary, the Employee (or his estate) shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay, at the time the bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
(3) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(4) Following such termination, the Employee shall be entitled to continue participation in all medical, dental, health and other welfare benefits (or receive comparable coverage if such participation is not permitted under the terms of such plans or if the Board, at its option, determines that it is in the best interest of the Company to provide such comparable coverage rather than continued participation in the Company's plans) until the end of the Severance Period upon the same terms and conditions that would have applied if the Employee continued to be employed by the Company, provided that the benefits referred to in this clause (4) will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment.
 
For purposes of this Agreement, the term "Severance Period" means (i) if the Employee's employment is terminated at or prior to the end of the Initial Term (including but not limited to by the giving of a Non-Renewal Notice or other notice as provided in Section 3 hereof), a period equal to the greater of (x) two (2) full years beginning on the date of such termination and (y) the then remaining portion of the Initial Term and (ii) if the Employee's employment is terminated after the end of the Initial Term and prior to the end of the then-current Renewal Term (including but not limited to by the giving of any Non-Renewal Notice as provided in Section 3 hereof), a period equal to one (1) full year beginning on the date of such termination.
 
(d) .  The Employee may terminate his employment at any time for Good Reason (as defined below).  In the event of any
By Employee for Good Reason
termination of the Employee's employment by the Employee for Good Reason:
 
(1) The Company shall pay the Employee severance pay for the Severance Period (as defined above) at the per annum rate which shall equal one hundred percent (100%) of his Base Salary at the date of such termination.  The Company shall pay such severance pay in lump sum six (6) months after the date of such termination.  The Company's obligation to make such payments shall be absolute and unconditional.  Without limiting the foregoing, such payments shall not be subject to any right of offset or similar right, and the Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect thereto.
 
(2) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee the portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will pay a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Fifty percent (50%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employee's annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Fifty percent (50%) of Base Salary, the Employee (or his estate) shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay, at the time the bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
(3) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(4) Following such termination, the Employee shall be entitled to continue participation in all medical, dental, health and other welfare benefits (or receive comparable coverage if such participation is not permitted under the terms of such plans or if the Board, at its option, determines that it is in the best interest of the Company to provide such comparable coverage rather than continued participation in the Company's plans) until the end of
the Severance Period upon the same terms and conditions that would have applied if the Employee continued to be employed by the Company, provided that the benefits referred to in this clause (4) will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment.
 
For purposes of this Agreement, "Good Reason" means (A) a material diminution of the Employee's duties or responsibilities, (B) a reduction in the Employee's Base Salary greater than ten percent (10%), or annual bonus or long-term incentive compensation opportunity, (C) a Change of Control (as defined in Section 7 hereof), but only if the Employee terminates his employment pursuant to this subsection within ninety (90) days after the date of such Change of Control, or (D) a material breach by the Company of any other provision of this Agreement that is not cured promptly after written notice to the Company by the Employee.
 
(e) .  The Employee may terminate his employment at any time without Good Reason upon thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the Company.  In the event of any such termination of the Employee's employment by the Employee with Good Reason:
By Employee Without Good Reason
 
(1)  The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employee's Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and (ii) all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Company's otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(f) .  If a Change of Control or other transaction triggers or results in the imposition upon the Employee of any excise or similar tax under Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (or any similar or successor provision) pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any employee stock option agreement or plan in which the Employee is a participant, the Company shall pay (or cause any acquirer in such transaction to pay) any such excise or similar tax and make "gross-up" payments to the Employee to the extent necessary so that the Employee will receive the same net after-tax amount he would have received if no excise tax had been imposed on him.
Excise Tax Gross-Up Payment
 
(g) .  Any termination by the Employee of his employment with the Company in accordance with the terms hereof shall be without penalty, forfeiture, or liability arising out of such termination of any kind or nature.  Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, any termination of the Employee's
No Penalty, Forfeiture or Liability
employment on or after the occurrence of a Change of Control shall be deemed to be a termination by the Company without Cause if by the Company.
 
Section 7. .  For purposes of this Agreement, (1) the term "Person" means any corporation, partnership, trust, company, business, firm, association, organization, individual, governmental instrumentality or entity, or other person or entity, (2) the term "Voting Stock" shall mean, as to any Person, the then-outstanding securities of or other interests in such corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, trustees or similar managers of such Person, and (3) the term "Change in Control" shall mean:
Change in Control
 
(a) The Company is merged, consolidated or reorganized into or with another corporation or other Person, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a merger, consolidation or reorganization, and as a result of such merger, consolidation or reorganization, the holders of the Voting Stock of the Company immediately prior to such transaction hold or would hold in the aggregate less than seventy percent (70%) of the combined voting power of the then-outstanding Voting Stock of the surviving corporation or Person immediately after such transaction; or
 
(b) The Company sells or otherwise transfers all or substantially all of its assets to another corporation or other Person, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a sale or transfer, and either (x) as a result of such sale or transfer, the holders of the Voting Stock of the Company immediately prior to such sale or transfer hold or would hold in the aggregate less than seventy percent (70%) of the combined voting power of the then-outstanding Voting Stock of such corporation or Person immediately after such sale or transfer, or (y) such corporation or Person does not assume all of the Company's obligations to the Employee pursuant to an instrument in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Employee; or
 
(c) The Company is liquidated or dissolved, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a liquidation or dissolution; or
 
(d) Any Person or "group" [as the term "group" is used in Section 13(d)(3) or Section 14(d)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")] becomes, or a report is filed on Schedule 13D or Schedule 14D-1 (or any successor schedule, form or report), each as promulgated pursuant to the Exchange Act, disclosing that any Person or "group" (as the term "group" is used in Section 13(d)(3) or Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) has become, the beneficial owner (as the term "beneficial owner" is defined under Rule 13d-3 or any successor rules or regulations promulgated under the Exchange Act) of securities representing thirty percent (30%) or more of the combined voting power of the then outstanding Voting Stock of the Company or fifty percent (50%) or more of the then
outstanding shares of Voting Stock of the Company; or
 
(e) The Company files a report or proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Exchange Act disclosing in response to Form 8-K or Schedule 14A (or any successor schedule, form, report or item therein) that a change in control of the Company has occurred or will occur in the future pursuant to any then-existing contract or transaction; or
 
(f) If, during any period of two consecutive years, individuals who at the beginning of any such period constitute the Directors of the Company cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority thereof; provided, however, that for purposes of this clause (f), each Director who is first elected, or first nominated for election by the Company's  stockholders, by a vote of at least two-thirds of the Directors of the Company then still in office who were Directors of the Company at the beginning of any such period (other than an election or nomination of any individual whose initial assumption of office is in connection with an actual or threatened election contest relating to the election of the Directors of the Company, as such terms are used in Rule 14a-11 or any successor rule or regulation promulgated under the Exchange Act) will be deemed to have been a Director of the Company at the beginning of such period.
 
Section 8.  .  The Employee recognizes and acknowledges that certain proprietary, non-public information owned by the Company and its affiliates, including without limitation proprietary, non-public information regarding customers, pricing policies, methods of operation, proprietary computer programs, sales products, profits, costs, markets, key personnel, technical processes, and trade secrets (hereinafter called "Confidential Information"), are valuable, special and unique assets of the Company and its affiliates.  The Employee will not, during or after his term of employment, without the prior written consent of a member of the Board believed by the Employee to have been authorized by the Board for such purpose, knowingly and intentionally disclose any of the Confidential Information obtained by him while in the employ of the Company to any person, firm, corporation, association or other entity for any reason or purpose whatsoever, directly or indirectly (other than to an employee of the Company of its affiliates, a director of the Company or its affiliates, or a person to whom disclosure is necessary or appropriate in the Employee's good faith judgment in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company), unless and until such Confidential Information becomes publicly available (other than as a consequence of the breach by the Employee of his confidentiality obligations under this Section 8), and except as may be required (or as the Employee may be advised by counsel is required) in connection with any judicial, administrative or other governmental proceeding or inquiry.  In the event of
Confidential Information
the termination of his employment, whether voluntary or involuntary and whether by the Company or the Employee, the Employee will deliver to the Company and will not take with him any documents, or any other reproductions (in whole or in part) of any items, comprising Confidential Information (except that the Employee may retain his personal address, telephone and other contact lists and information and any other documents or reproductions retained upon the advice of counsel).  Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the term "Confidential Information" does not include any information that (a) is or becomes publicly available other than as the result of the breach by the Employee of his confidentiality obligations under this Section 8, (b) became, is or becomes available to the Employee on a non-confidential basis from a source, other than the Company, that to the Employee's knowledge is not prohibited from disclosing such information to the Employee by a confidentiality obligation owed to the Company or (c) was known to the Employee prior to becoming an officer of the Company.  The provisions of this Section 8 shall expire and be of no further force and effect on the third anniversary of the date of termination of the Employee's employment with the Company.
 
Section 9.  .  The Company promises that during the term of this Agreement and before the Company can exercise any right to terminate the Employee's employment without cause, the Company shall provide the Employee with Confidential Information that the Employee did not possess and had not received prior to the execution of this Agreement.  In exchange for and ancillary to the Company's enforceable promise to provide him with that Confidential Information, the Employee agrees that he will not disclose or make improper use of any of the Confidential Information.  In order to enforce that promise by the Employee, he agrees to the provisions of this Section 9.  Accordingly, during his employment with the Company pursuant to this Agreement and for a period of two (2) years thereafter, the Employee will not knowingly and intentionally (i) engage, directly or indirectly, alone or as a partner, officer, director, employee, or consultant of any other business organization, in any business activities that are substantially and directly competitive with the business activities then conducted by the Company anywhere in the world (the "Designated Industry"), (ii) divert to any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry any customer of the Company or (iii) solicit or encourage any officer, employee, or consultant of the Company to leave its employ for employment by or with any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry.  The parties hereto acknowledge that the Employee's non-competition obligations hereunder will not preclude the Employee from (i) owning less than 5% of the common stock of any publicly traded corporation or other Persons conducting business activities in the Designated Industry or (ii) serving as a director of a corporation or other Person engaged in the manufacturing or electronics industry whose business operations are not substantially and directly competitive with those of the Company.
Non-Competition
 
Section 10.  .
Arbitration
 
(a) . The Company and the Employee agree that all (i) disputes and claims of any nature that the employee may have against the Company and any subsidiaries or affiliates and their officers and employees, including all federal or state statutory, contractual, and common law claims (including all employment discrimination claims) arising from, concerning, or relating in any way to our employment relationship, (ii) all disputes and claims of any nature that the Company may have against the Employee, or (iii) any dispute among us about the arbitrability of any claims or controversy will be resolved out of court.  Any such claims will be submitted exclusively first to mandatory mediation and, if mediation is unsuccessful, to mandatory arbitration.
Subject Claims; Initiation of Binding Arbitration
 
(b) .  Unless otherwise agreed in writing by the Company and the Employee, any arbitration proceeding will be held in Houston, Texas.  The arbitration will be conducted under the National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes of the American Arbitration Association ("AAA Rules").  The claim will be submitted to a single experienced, neutral employment arbitrator selected in accordance with the AAA Rules.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to award or grant all remedies provided by law.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to permit adequate discovery.  At the conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator shall issue a written, reasoned award.  The award of the arbitration shall be final and binding.  A judgment upon the award may be entered and enforced by any court having jurisdiction.  Each party shall pay the fees of their respective attorneys, the expenses of their witnesses, and any other expenses incurred by such party in connection with the arbitration, provided, however, that the Company shall pay for the fees of the arbitrator and the administrative and filing fees charged by the AAA.
Arbitration Procedure
 
(c) . All information regarding the dispute or claim or mediation or arbitration proceedings, including the mediation settlement or arbitration award, will not be disclosed by the Employee or by the Company or any mediator or arbitrator to any third party without the written consent of the Employee and the Company.  In no event may an arbitrator allow any party to join claims of any other employee in a single arbitration proceeding without consent of the Employee and the Company.  In the event that the dispute or claim involves a written agreement between the Employee and the Company (including this Agreement) or a compensation plan, the arbitrator will have no authority to add to, detract from, or otherwise modify the agreement or plan provisions other than as expressly set forth in that agreement or plan.  Should this arbitration agreement conflict with the arbitration provisions of any other agreement that the Employee has with the Company, the terms of this agreement will govern.
Confidentiality; Nonjoinder
(d) .  In the event that irreparable injury could occur during the pendency of a mediation or arbitration proceeding, to restore or maintain the status quo until the dispute has been resolved by mediation or arbitration a party may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to obtain a temporary or preliminary injunction in aid of mediation and arbitration.
Equitable Relief
 
(e) .  Notwithstanding any policy of the Company permitting it to alter its policies, procedures, and the terms and conditions of employment, this agreement to arbitrate is binding and cannot be modified or superseded except by a written agreement signed by an authorized representative of the Company and the Employee.
Binding Agreement
 
Section 11.  .
General
 
(a) .  All notices and other communications hereunder will be in writing, and will be deemed to have been duly given if delivered personally, or three (3) business days after being mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, or upon receipt if sent by written telecommunications, to the relevant address set forth below, or to such other address as the recipient of such notice or communication will have specified to the other party hereto in accordance with this Section 11(a):
Notices
 
If to Company, to:
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas 77515
Attn: Corporate Secretary
Fax No.: 979/848-5269
 
If to Employee, to:
 
Steven A. Barton
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas 77515
 
(b) .  All payments required to be made by the Company under this Agreement to the Employee will be subject to the withholding of such amounts, if any, relating to federal, state and local taxes as may be required by law.  No payment under this Agreement will be subject to offset or reduction attributable to any amount of obligation the Employee may owe or be liable for to the Company or any other Person.
Withholding; No Offset
(c) .  Each of the parties hereto acknowledges and agrees that upon any breach by the Employee of his obligations under any of Sections 8 and 9 hereof, the Company will have no adequate remedy at law, and accordingly will be entitled to specific performance and other appropriate injunctive and equitable relief.
Equitable Remedies
 
(d) .  If any provision of this Agreement is held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, such provision will be fully severable and this Agreement will be construed and enforced as if such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision never comprised a part hereof; and the remaining provisions hereof will remain in full force and effect and will not be affected by the illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision or by its severance herefrom.  Furthermore, in lieu of such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision, there will be added automatically as part of this Agreement a provision as similar in its terms to such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision as may be possible and be legal, valid, and enforceable.
Severability
 
(e) .  No delay or omission by either party hereto in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder will impair such right, power or privilege, nor will any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or privilege preclude any further exercise of any other right, power or privilege.
Waivers
 
(f) .  This Agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, and all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument
Counterparts
 
(g) .  The captions in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and will not limit or otherwise affect any of the terms or provisions hereof.
Captions
 
(h) .  Use of the words "herein," "hereof", and "hereto" and the like in this Agreement refer to this Agreement only as a whole and not to any particular Section, subsection or provision of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.  Any reference to a "Section" or "subsection" shall refer to a Section or subsection of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.
Reference to Agreement
 
(i) .  The Company shall require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company, by agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Employee, expressly to assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent the Company would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of
Successors and Binding Agreement
the Company and any successor to the Company, including without limitation any Persons acquiring directly or indirectly all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company whether by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization, or otherwise ( and such successor shall thereafter be deemed the "Company" for the purposes of this Agreement), but shall not otherwise be assignable, transferable, or delegable by the Company.  Without limiting the foregoing, the surviving or transferee corporation or other person in any such transaction (whether by merger, consolidation, reorganization, transfer of business or assets, or otherwise) shall be subject to the provisions of Section 7 hereof and shall be deemed to be the Company for purposes of such provisions, regardless of whether such transaction itself constituted a Change of Control of the Company.
 
(j) .  This Agreement contains the entire understanding of the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between them, relating to the subject matter hereof including that certain Employment Agreement between the parties dated August 1, 2001.  This Agreement may not be amended or modified except by a written instrument hereafter signed by each of the parties hereto, and may not be waived except by a written instrument hereafter signed by the party granting such waiver.  The Company has not made any promise or entered into any agreement that is not expressed in this Agreement, and the Employee is not relying upon any statement or representation of any agent of the Company.  In executing this Agreement, the Employee is relying solely on his judgement and has been represented by the legal counsel of his choice in connection with this Agreement who has read and explained to the Employee the entire contents of this Agreement, as well as explained the legal consequences.  No agreements or representation, oral or otherwise, express or implied, with respect to the subject matter hereof have been made by either party which are not set forth expressly in this Agreement.
Entire Agreement; Amendments and Waivers
 
(k) .  This Agreement and the performance hereof shall be governed and construed in all respects, including but not limited to as to validity, interpretation and effect, by the laws of the State of Texas, without regard to the principles or rules of conflict of laws thereof.
Governing Law
 
Executed as of the date and year first above written.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20051219134714.txt.gz
TIME:20051219134714
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 8.01.   Other Events.
 
On December 19, 2005, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. placed on its website (www.bench.com) a letter to all of its shareholders written in response to a letter from MMI Investments, L.P. dated November 16, 2005. A copy of the Company's letter is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 8.01 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(d)
                                
 
Exhibit 99.1            Letter dated December 19, 2005.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
December 19, 2005
 
To all Benchmark Electronics Shareholders:
 
As you may be aware, in recent public statements a Benchmark shareholder, MMI Investments LP, has stated its position with respect to the ongoing performance and strategy of our company.  Benchmark's directors and officers value our shareholders and their input.  Indeed, our chief executive and financial officers meet with our investors frequently to hear their suggestions and ideas about the marketplace and the future of Benchmark.
 
With respect to our performance, we are pleased to note that we have industry leading metrics, albeit in an industry that has faced its share of challenges in the marketplace since the technology market downturn.  We, as have many others during this period, have significantly expanded our low cost footprint.  In fact, we have grown our low cost footprint by 34% since 2003 and are continuing to seek opportunities to further increase that figure.  Benchmark's stock has provided the highest annualized return for the US EMS industry, 12% over the past 5 years.  During this period, our stock has outperformed both the S&P 500 and an index consisting of the other six largest US EMS players, which have had returns of -1% and -20%, respectively, and has outperformed every individual one of these competitors as well.  In fact, whether one looks at a 1, 2, 3, 4, or 5-year horizon we have outperformed the index of our EMS peers.  Our operating performance for the most recent quarter measured in terms of gross margin, operating profit margin and return on invested capital of 7.2%, 4.4% and 12.7%, respectively, is among the highest in the industry and is superior to the average of our EMS peers of 6.6%, 1.9% and 6.9%, respectively.  We are proud that we continue to maintain the highest operating margin in our industry.
 
MMI has also restated its view, first enunciated publicly in a March 30, 2005 letter to the Board and again on several occasions in conversations with our executive officers, that the Board should declare an $8 per share special dividend as a "sound means to improve stockholder value."  As we noted in our publicly available April 19 response to MMI, the Board unanimously concluded at a regularly scheduled meeting earlier in the year not to implement a special dividend at that time.  That conclusion was reached after a full review and discussion of Benchmark's financial condition, including a number of alternatives with respect to our then current cash position.  That review was conducted in conjunction with detailed presentations made by outside financial advisors.
 
As we further said in our response, the Board would continue to evaluate, with assistance from our independent financial advisors, its options for the use of cash in light of ever-changing circumstances.  As many of you who follow our industry closely may be aware, the electronics manufacturing sector has been experiencing significant consolidation.  In light of this as well as other factors, the Board and management continue to believe that continued capital investments or the consummation of an accretive, strategic acquisition provides the optimal opportunity for the enhancement of long term value for all of Benchmark's shareholders.  With that in mind, the Board has unanimously agreed to support management's ongoing efforts to identify investment opportunities that would enable us to deliver maximum value to our shareholders.
 
The Board recognizes the need to reevaluate the use of its cash periodically and will do so to create both short term and long term value for our shareholders.  Such alternatives may include a
stock buyback program, although the Board has not reached a conclusion with respect to this alternative.
 
The Board continues to be grateful for the strong indications of support it has received from many of Benchmark's major shareholders, and it continues to welcome suggestions from all shareholders of Benchmark.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060113080001.txt.gz
TIME:20060113080001
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) un der the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On January 12, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing that it expects to meet or exceed fourth quarter 2005 analysts' consensus of $604 million revenues and earnings per share of $0.52.  A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(d)
                                
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, JANUARY 12, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it expects to meet or exceed fourth quarter 2005 analysts' consensus of $604 million revenues and earnings per share of $0.52.
 
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2005. Results for the fourth quarter will be announced on February 7, 2006. A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on February 7, 2006 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060207133939.txt.gz
TIME:20060207133939
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 7, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing fourth quarter results for the quarter ended December 31, 2005. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 7, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $625 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2005, compared to $524 million for the same quarter last year. Fourth quarter net income was $24.7 million, or $0.57 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $20.2 million, or $0.47 per diluted share.
 
Sales revenue for the year ended December 31, 2005 was $2.3 billion, a 12.8% increase from $2.0 billion in the previous year. Net income for the year ended December 31, 2005 was $80.6 million, compared to $71.0 million for the prior year. Diluted earnings per share was $1.88 for the year ended December 31, 2005, compared to $1.67 per share in the prior year.
 
"We continued to execute well throughout the fourth quarter and full year of 2005 resulting in a year of record revenues and earnings. We fully expect our momentum and level of execution to continue into 2006 and beyond," stated Benchmark's President and CEO Cary T. Fu.
 
Fourth Quarter 2005 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the fourth quarter was 4.65%.
 - 
                 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the fourth quarter was $15 million.
 - 
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at December 31, 2005 of $327 million.
 - 
                 
No debt outstanding.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable balance at December 31, 2005 of $366 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 53 days.
 - 
                 
Inventory of $362 million at December 31, 2005; inventory turns were 6.4 times.
 - 
                 
 
First Quarter and Full Year 2006 Guidance
 
Revenues for the first quarter of 2006 are expected to be between $590 million and $615 million.
Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter are expected to be between $0.50 and $0.54, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses.
 
 
Revenues for the full year 2006 are expected to be between $2.47 billion and $2.54 billion.
Diluted earnings per share for 2006 are expected to between $2.11 and $2.17, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses.
 
During 2006, the Company will continue to expand our low-cost capacity while realigning and further strengthening our global footprint to support continued business opportunities. Restructuring charges associated with these re-alignment efforts, primarily related to the closure of our UK facility, are estimated to be in the range of $3.5 million to $4.5 million pre-tax during 2006. The actual timing of such charges has yet to be determined, although it is expected that the majority of these charges will be recorded in the first half of 2006.
 
Benchmark currently expects fiscal year 2006 GAAP earnings per share to be $2.00 to $2.05 per diluted share which includes an estimated $0.06 - $0.07 per diluted share associated with restructuring charges to be incurred and $0.05 per share for stock-based compensation to be expensed in fiscal year 2006 under new accounting guidelines, SFAS 123R.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060209180941.txt.gz
TIME:20060209180941
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
< font face="Times New Roman"> Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 8.01.   Other Events.
 
On February 9, 2006, Donald E. Nigbor, Chairman of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. ("Benchmark") adopted a pre-arranged stock trading plan to sell shares of Benchmark stock. This plan was established as part of his individual long-term strategy for asset diversification and liquidity. Mr. Nigbor's plan was adopted in accordance with guidelines specified under Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
Under the plan Mr. Nigbor may sell up to 414,800 shares of Benchmark stock beginning February 10, 2006. This plan is scheduled to terminate at the latest on November 10, 2006. The transactions under the plan will be disclosed publicly through Form 144 and Form 4 or Form 5, as appropriate, with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
Rule 10b5-1 permits individuals who are not in possession of material, non-public information at the time the plan is adopted to establish pre-arranged plans to buy or sell company stock. Using these plans, individuals can prudently and gradually diversify their investment portfolios over an extended period of time.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060315172928.txt.gz
TIME:20060315172928
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule& nbsp;14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
 
On March 15, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing a 3-for-2 stock split in the form of a stock dividend. Shareholders of record at the close of business March 27, 2006 will receive one additional share for every two shares owned. The additional shares will be distributed on or about April 3, 2006. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(d)
                                
Press release dated March 15, 2006
Exhibit 99.1
                                   
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
 
For More Information, Call:
 
GAYLA J. DELLY
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, MARCH 15, 2006 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) announced today that its Board of Directors has declared a 3-for-2 stock split in the form of a stock dividend. Shareholders of record at the close of business March 27, 2006 will receive one additional share for every two shares owned. The additional shares will be distributed on or about April 3, 2006. On March 14, 2006, the Company had 42,585,479 shares of common stock outstanding. After the stock split, the Company will have approximately 63,878,218 shares of common stock outstanding.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in eight countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060421080223.txt.gz
TIME:20060421080223
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 20, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing first quarter results for the quarter ended March 31, 2006. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(d)
                                
 
Exhibit 99.1
                                   
Press release dated April 20, 2006
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS SALES
AND EARNINGS FOR FIRST QUARTER 2006
AND RAISES FULL YEAR 2006 GUIDANCE
 
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 20, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $651 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, compared to $510 million for the same quarter last year. First quarter net income was $26.5 million, or $0.41 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $16.9 million, or $0.26 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, the impact of stock-based compensation costs and a tax benefit resulting from the closure of our UK facility, the Company had net income before special items of $24.7 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2006. All share and per share data appearing in this press release has been retroactively adjusted for the 3-for-2 stock split completed on April 3, 2006 to holders of record as of March 27, 2006.
 
"These results reflect the overall strength of our business model. With overall improvements in the marketplace, our primary challenge is to properly manage our growth and maintain our execution levels," stated Benchmark's President and CEO Cary T. Fu.
 
First Quarter 2006 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the first quarter was 4.0% on a GAAP basis and was 4.5%, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses.
 - 
                 
Cash flows used by operating activities for the first quarter was $42.7 million.
 - 
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at March 31, 2006 of $288 million.
 - 
                 
No debt outstanding.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable balance at March 31, 2006 of $447 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 62 days.
 - 
                 
Inventory of $403 million at March 31, 2006; inventory turns were 6.0 times.
 - 
                 
 
Second Quarter 2006 Guidance
 
Revenues for the second quarter of 2006 are expected to be between $630 million and $660 million. Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses, are expected to be between $0.36 and $0.39 ($0.33 and $0.36 on a GAAP basis).
 
 
Full Year 2006 Guidance
 
We are raising our full year guidance. Revenues for 2006 are now expected to be between $2.55 billion and $2.60 billion. The corresponding diluted earnings per share for 2006, excluding restructuring charges, the impact of stock-based compensation expenses and the first quarter tax benefit, are expected to be between $1.48 and $1.53 ($1.46 and $1.51 on a GAAP basis).
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060519165838.txt.gz
TIME:20060519165838
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
 
On May 18, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the appointment of Douglas G. Duncan to the Board of Directors of the Company effective May 18, 2006 to serve as an independent director. Mr. Duncan is President and Chief Executive Officer of FedEx Freight Corp., a provider of regional and interregional less-than-truckload freight services. He was founding CEO of this stand-alone corporation for FedEx and has served in that capacity since 2001. Mr. Duncan serves on the executive committee of the American Trucking Associations and the Transportation Research Board. He is also chairman of the American Transportation Research Institute. Mr. Duncan graduated from Christopher Newport University, where he serves on the Board of Visitors.
 
The press release announcing the appointment of Mr. Duncan is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
 
Effective May 18, 2006, the Board of Directors of the Company approved and authorized an amendment to Article 3, Sections 2 and 10 of the Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company dated December 1, 2004 (the "Bylaws"). The Bylaws were amended to grant the Board of Directors of the Company the authority to increase the size of the board of directors and to appoint a director of the Company to serve until the next annual meeting of shareholders.
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
 
On May 18, 2006, the Board of Directors of the Company approved and authorized an amendment to the Company's 2002 Stock Option Plan for Non-Employee Directors to allow for the grant of options to a new director upon appointment to the Board.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, MAY 18, 2006 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) announced today the appointment of Douglas G. Duncan to the Board of Directors of the Company effective May 18, 2006 to serve as an independent director. Mr. Duncan is President and Chief Executive Officer of FedEx Freight Corp., a provider of regional and interregional less-than-truckload freight services. He was founding CEO of this stand-alone corporation for FedEx and has served in that capacity since 2001. Mr. Duncan serves on the executive committee of the American Trucking Associations and the Transportation Research Board. He is also chairman of the American Transportation Research Institute. Mr. Duncan graduated from Christopher Newport University, where he serves on the Board of Visitors.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED BYLAWS
 
OF
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
 
 
A Texas Corporation
 
 
 
 
Date of Adoption
October 21, 1981
 
As Amended
May 11, 1990
December 21, 1990
March 15, 2002
December 1, 2004
May 18, 2006
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED BYLAWS
The Corporation may have such offices, either within or without the State of Texas, as the Board of Directors may designate or as the business of the Corporation may require from time to time.
 
The registered office of the Corporation required by the Texas Business Corporation Act to be maintained in the State of Texas may be, but need not be, the same as the principal office in the State of Texas, as designated by the Board of Directors. The address of the registered office or the identity of the registered agent may be changed from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
The address of the registered office of the Corporation is 811 Dallas Avenue, Houston, Texas 77002, and the name of the registered agent of the Corporation at such address is  C T Corporation System.
 
Section 1. . The annual meeting of the shareholders shall be held on such date in each year and at such time and place as may be determined by the Board of Directors, for the purpose of electing directors and for the transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting. If the day fixed for the annual meeting is a legal holiday in the State of Texas, such meeting shall be held on the next succeeding business day. If the election of directors is not held on the day designated for the annual meeting of the shareholders or at any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors shall cause the election to be held at a special meeting of the shareholders as soon thereafter as may be convenient.
Annual Meeting
 
Section 2. . Special meetings of the shareholders may be called by (a) the ChiefExecutive Officer or the President, (b) the Board of Directors, (c) the Chief Executive Officer, the President or the Secretary at the request in writing of a majority of the Board of Directors, or (d) the ChiefExecutive Officer, the President or the Secretary at the request in writing of the holders of at least ten percent of all the shares entitled to vote at the proposed special meeting. Any such request to call a special meeting of the shareholders shall state the purpose or purposes of such meeting.
Special Meetings
 
Section 3. . The Board of Directors may designate any place within or without the State of Texas as the place of meeting for any annual or special meeting of shareholders called by or at the request of the Board of Directors. If no designation is made, or if a special meeting is called otherwise than by or at the request of the Board of Directors, the place of meeting shall be the principal office of the Corporation in the State of Texas.
Place of Meeting
 
Section 4. . Written or printed notice stating the place, day and hour of the meeting and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail, by or at the direction of the President, the Secretary, or the officer or persons calling the meeting, to each shareholder entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered
Notice of Meeting
 
when deposited in the United States mail addressed to the shareholder at his address as it appears on the share transfer records of the Corporation, with postage thereon prepaid. Attendance by a shareholder, whether in person or by proxy, at a shareholder's meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting of which he has had no notice.
 
The notice of any meeting of shareholders may be accompanied by a form of proxy and other proxy solicitation materials approved by the Board of Directors.
 
Section 5. . For the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of shareholders or any adjournment thereof, or entitled to receive a distribution by the Corporation (other than a distribution involving a purchase or redemption by the Corporation of any of its own shares) or a share dividend, or in order to make a determination of shareholders for any other proper purpose (other than determining shareholders entitled to consent to action by shareholders proposed to be taken without a meeting of shareholders), the Board of Directors of the Corporation may provide that the share transfer records shall be closed for a stated period not to exceed, in any case, sixty days. If the share transfer records shall be closed for the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders, such records shall be closed for at least ten days immediately preceding such meeting. In lieu of closing the share transfer records, the Board of Directors may fix in advance a date as the record date for any such determination of shareholders, such date in any case to be not more than sixty days and, in the case of a meeting of shareholders, not less than ten days, prior to the date on which the particular action requiring such determination of shareholders is to be taken. If the share transfer records are not closed and no record date is fixed for the determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders, or shareholders entitled to receive a distribution (other than a distribution involving a purchase or redemption by the Corporation of any of its own shares) or a share dividend, the date on which notice of the meeting is mailed or the date on which the resolution of the Board of Directors declaring such distribution or share dividend is adopted, as the case may be, shall be the record date for such determination of shareholders. When a determination of shareholders entitled to vote at any meeting of shareholders has been made as provided in this Section 5, such determination shall apply to any adjournment thereof except where the determination has been made through the closing of the share transfer records and the stated period of closing has expired.
Fixing Record Dates for Matters Other than Consents to Action
 
Section 6. . Unless a record date shall have previously been fixed or determined pursuant to Section 5 of this Article 2, whenever action by shareholders is proposed to be taken by consent in writing without a meeting of shareholders, the Board of Directors may fix a record date for the purpose of determining shareholders entitled to consent to that action, which record date shall not precede, and shall not be more than ten days after, the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date has been fixed by the Board of Directors and the prior action of the Board of Directors is not required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to consent to action in writing without a meeting shall be the first date on which a signed written consent setting forth the action taken or proposed to be taken is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the books in which proceedings of meetings of shareholders are recorded. Delivery shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. Delivery to the Corporation's principal place of business shall be addressed to the President or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. If no record date shall have been fixed by the Board of Directors and prior action of the Board of Directors is required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to consent to action in writing without a meeting shall be at the close of business on the date on which the Board of Directors adopts a resolution taking such prior action.
Fixing Record Dates for Consents to Action
 
Section 7. . The officer or agent having charge of the share transfer records of the Corporation shall make, at least ten days before each meeting of shareholders, a complete list of the shareholders entitled to vote at such meeting or any adjournment thereof, arranged in alphabetical order, with the address of and the number of shares held by each, which list, for a period of ten days prior to such meeting, shall be kept on file at the registered office or principal place of business of the Corporation and
Voting List
 
shall be subject to inspection by any shareholder at any time during usual business hours. Such list also shall be produced and kept open at the time and place of the meeting and shall be subject to the inspection of any shareholder during the whole time of the meeting. The original share transfer records shall be prima-facie evidence as to who are the shareholders entitled to examine such list or transfer records or to vote at any meeting of shareholders. The failure to comply with the requirements of this Section 7 shall not affect the validity of any action taken at the meeting.
 
Section 8. . A quorum shall be present at a meeting of shareholders if the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote are represented at the meeting in person or by proxy. Once a quorum is present at a meeting of shareholders, the shareholders represented in person or by proxy at the meeting may conduct such business as may be properly brought before the meeting until it is adjourned, and the subsequent withdrawal from the meeting of any shareholder or the refusal of any shareholder represented in person or by proxy to vote shall not affect the presence of a quorum at the meeting. The shareholders represented in person or by proxy at a meeting of shareholders at which a quorum is not present may adjourn the meeting until such time and to such place as may be determined by a vote of the holders of a majority of the shares represented in person or by proxy at that meeting.
Quorum of Shareholders
 
Section 9. . Any shareholder may vote either in person or by proxy executed in writing by the shareholder. A telegram, telex, cablegram or similar transmission by the shareholder, or a photographic, photostatic, facsimile or similar reproduction of a writing executed by the shareholder, shall be treated as an execution in writing for purposes of this Section 9. No proxy shall be valid after eleven months from the date of its execution unless otherwise provided in the proxy. A proxy shall be revocable unless the proxy form conspicuously states that the proxy is irrevocable and the proxy is coupled with an interest.
Proxies
 
Section 10. . Except as otherwise expressly provided in any resolution or resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors establishing any series of Preferred Stock, the exclusive voting power of the Corporation shall be vested in the Common Stock. Except as otherwise expressly provided in any such resolution or resolutions, or as otherwise provided by the Texas Business Corporation Act, each outstanding share of Common Stock shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders.
Voting Rights
 
Section 11. . With respect to any matter, other than the election of directors or a matter for which the affirmative vote of the holders of a specified portion of the shares entitled to vote is required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the act of the shareholders shall be the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote on that matter and represented in person or by proxy at a meeting of shareholders at which a quorum is present.
Voting Requirement
 
With respect to the election of directors, a director shall be elected only if the director receives the vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors and represented in person or by proxy at a meeting of shareholders at which a quorum is present.
 
With respect to any matter for which the affirmative vote of the holders of a specified portion of the shares entitled to vote is required by the Texas Business Corporation Act, the act of the shareholders on that matter shall be the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote on that matter, rather than the affirmative vote otherwise required by the Texas Business Corporation Act.
 
Section 12. . To be properly brought before any meeting of shareholders for consideration, the business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting given pursuant to Section 4 of this Article 2, (b) properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a shareholder.
Business at Meeting
 
If a shareholder desires to bring business before a meeting for consideration, the shareholder must submit a written notice of the proposed business to the Secretary as provided herein. In the case of the annual meeting of shareholders, the shareholder's notice must be received at the principal office of the Corporation not less than sixty days in advance of the date of the Corporation's notice of annual meeting
 
given in connection with the previous year's annual meeting of shareholders. If no such annual meeting was held in the previous year or the date of the current year's annual meeting has been changed by more than thirty days from the date contemplated in the previous year's notice of annual meeting, the shareholder's notice must be received by the Corporation a reasonable period of time before the date of the Corporation's notice of annual meeting for the current year and any accompanying solicitation of proxies are made. In the case of a special meeting of shareholders, the shareholder's notice must be received at the principal office of the Corporation a reasonable period of time prior to the date of the meeting to allow sufficient time for the dissemination of information to the shareholders entitled to vote at such meeting; provided, however, that if at least thirty days' notice of the meeting has been given to the shareholders, the shareholder's notice must be received by the Corporation no later than ten days prior to the date of the meeting.
 
A shareholder's notice of proposed business shall set forth as to each matter that the shareholder proposes to bring before the meeting of shareholders the following information:  (a) a brief description of the business proposed to be brought before the meeting and the reason or reasons for conducting such business at the meeting; (b) the name and address of the shareholder proposing such business; (c) the class, series (if applicable), and number of shares of the Corporation that such shareholder owns beneficially; (d) any material interest of the shareholder in the proposed business; and (e) if the business that the shareholder proposes to bring before the meeting of shareholders is the election to the Board of Directors of a person or persons to be nominated by or on behalf of the shareholder, the information set forth in Section 8 of Article 3.
 
After receipt of the shareholder's notice of proposed business but before the commencement of the meeting of shareholders, the Board of Directors, to the extent allowed by law, may consider the subject matter of the proposed business and the reason or reasons for conducting such business at the meeting to determine whether such business should be considered. Proposed business, notice of which is submitted by a shareholder in accordance with the foregoing procedures, shall be considered at the meeting of shareholders unless the Board of Directors determines that the proposed business should not be conducted at the meeting. If the business is not to be considered at the meeting, the Board of Directors shall notify the presiding officer of the meeting of such determination, and such presiding officer shall declare to the meeting that such proposed business is not properly before the meeting and will not be considered. In addition, with respect to any business proposed to be considered, the presiding officer of the meeting may determine that such business has not been brought properly before the meeting in accordance with the foregoing procedures and, if such determination is made, such proposed business will not be considered at the meeting.
 
Section 13. . Any action required by the Texas Business Corporation Act to be taken at any annual or special meeting of shareholders, or any action which may be taken at any annual or special meeting of shareholders, may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and without a vote, if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the holder or holders of all the shares entitled to vote with respect to the action that is the subject of the consent.
Actions Without Meeting
 
Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each shareholder who signs the consent. No written consent shall be effective to take the action that is the subject of the consent unless, within sixty days after the date of the earliest dated consent delivered to the Corporation in the manner required by this Section 13, a consent or consents signed by the holder or holders of shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to take the action that is the subject of the consent are delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office, its principal place of business, or an officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the books in which proceedings of meetings of shareholders are recorded. Delivery shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. Delivery to the Corporation's principal place of business shall be addressed to the President or principal executive officer of the Corporation.
A telegram, telex, cablegram or similar transmission by a shareholder, or a photographic, photostatic, facsimile or similar reproduction of a writing signed by a shareholder, shall be regarded as signed by the shareholder for purposes of this Section 13.
 
Prompt notice of the taking of any action by shareholders without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those shareholders who did not consent in writing to the action.
 
Section 14. . Subject to the provisions required or permitted by the Texas Business Corporation Act for notice of meetings, shareholders may participate in and hold a meeting of such shareholders by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment whereby all persons participating in the meeting can hear and speak to each other.
Telephone Meetings
 
Section 1. . The powers of the Corporation shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed under the direction of, the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Power
 
Section 2. . The Board of Directors shall consist of not lessthan five nor more than nine members. The number of directors may be increased above nine or decreased below five from time to time by amendment to these Amended and Restated Bylaws, but no decrease shall have the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent director. Subject to the foregoing and to any limitations specified by law or in the Articles of Incorporation, the number of directors may be increased or decreased by resolution adopted by a majority of the Board of Directors. Any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors shall be filled by a majority vote of the Board of Directors at a meeting called for that purpose, though less than a quorum, for a term of office continuing only until the next election of one or more directors by the shareholders; provided that the remaining directors may not fill more than two such directorships during the period between any two such successive annual meetings of shareholders. No decrease in number shall act to reduce the term of office of a duly elected director unless such director resigns or is removed from office in accordance with these Amended and Restated Bylaws. Unless removed in accordance with the provisions of these Amended and Restated Bylaws, each director shall hold office until the next annual meeting of shareholders, and until his successor shall have been elected and qualified. A director need not be a resident of the State of Texas or a shareholder of the Corporation.
Number, Tenure and Qualifications
 
Section 3. . A regular meeting of the Board of Directors shall be held without notice other than this Section 3 immediately after, and at the same place as, the annual meeting of shareholders. The Board of Directors may provide, by resolution, the time and place, either within or without the State of Texas, for the holding of additional regular meetings without notice other than such resolution.
Regular Meetings
 
Section 4. . Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by or at the request of the Chairman of the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer, the President or any two directors. The person or persons authorized to call special meetings of the Board of Directors may fix any place, either within or without the State of Texas, as the place for holding any special meeting called by such person or persons.
Special Meetings
 
Section 5. . Notice of any special meeting of the Board of Directors shall be given at least one day prior thereto by written notice delivered personally or mailed to each director at his business address, or by telegram, telex, telecopy or similar means of visual data transmission. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered three days after deposited in the United States mail so addressed, with postage thereon prepaid. If notice is given by telegram, telex, telecopy or similar means of visual data transmission, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when transmitted for delivery to the recipient.
Notice
 
Any director may waive notice of any meeting. The attendance of a director at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except where a director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business on the grounds that such meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the Board of Directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting.
 
Section 6. . A majority of the number of directors fixed in Section 2 of this Article 3 shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting of the Board of Directors. If less than a majority of such number of directors is present at a meeting, a majority of the directors present may adjourn such meeting from time to time without further notice.
Quorum
 
Section 7. .
Manner of Acting
 
. Except as provided in Paragraph (b) of this Section 7, the act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.
(a)
                                 
Actions at Meeting
 
. Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed by all the members of the Board of Directors or committee, as the case may be. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote at a meeting. A telegram, telex, cablegram or similar transmission by a director, or a photographic, photostatic, facsimile or similar reproduction of a writing signed by a director, shall be regarded as signed by the director for purposes of this Paragraph (b).
(b)
                                
Actions Without Meeting
 
. Subject to the provisions required or permitted by the Texas Business Corporation Act for notice of meetings, members of the Board of Directors or any committee designated by the Board of Directors may participate in and hold a meeting of the Board of Directors or such committee by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and speak to each other.
(c)
                                 
Telephone Meetings
 
Section 8. . Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors at the annual meeting of shareholders or any special meeting of shareholders called for the specific purpose of electing directors may be made at any such meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, any nominating committee thereof, or any person appointed by the Board of Directors or such committee to make such nominations, or (b) by any shareholder entitled to vote for the election of directors who complies with the procedures set forth in this Section 8 as well as Section 12 of Article 2.
Nominations for Election
 
The shareholder's notice with respect to the nomination of persons for election to the Board of Directors shall set forth, as to each person whom the shareholder proposes to nominate, (a) the nominee's name, age, business and residence address; (b) the principal occupation or employment of the nominee; (c) the class, series (if applicable), and number of shares of the Corporation that the nominee owns beneficially; and (d) any other information relating to the nominee that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for the election of directors pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including, without limitation, the nominee's consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as a director of the Corporation.
 
No person shall be eligible for nomination as a director of the Corporation at any meeting of shareholders unless such person is nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth herein. The presiding officer of the meeting may determine that a proposed nomination was not made in accordance with such procedures and, if such determination is made, such proposed nomination will not be considered at the meeting.
 
Section 9. . At any meeting of shareholders called expressly for the purpose of removal, any director or the entire Board of Directors may be removed, with or without cause, by a vote of the holders of a majority of the shares then entitled to vote at an election of directors. In the event that any director is so removed, a new director may be elected at the same meeting for the unexpired term of the director so removed. The failure to elect a director to fill the unexpired term of any director so removed shall be deemed to create a vacancy in the Board of Directors.
Removal
 
Section 10. . A vacancy in the Board of Directors shall be deemed to exist by reason of the death or resignation of a director, upon the failure of shareholders to elect a director to fill the unexpired term of any director removed in accordance with the provisions of Section 9 of this Article 3, or upon the existence of an unfilled directorship position pursuant to resolution of the Board of Directors in accordance with Section 2 of this Article 3. Any vacancy occurring in the Board of Directors may be filled (a) by election at an annual or special meeting of shareholders called for that purpose, or (b) by a majority of the remaining directors though less than a quorum of the Board of Directors. A director elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the unexpired term of his predecessor in office.
Vacancies
 
Section 11. . The Board of Directors, by resolution adopted by a majority of the full Board of Directors, may designate from among its members one or more committees, each of which shall be comprised of one or more of its members, and may designate one or more of its members as alternative members of any committee, who may, subject to any limitations imposed by the Board of Directors, replace absent or disqualified members at any meeting of that committee. Any such committee, to the extent provided in such resolution, shall have and may exercise all of the authority of the Board of Directors, subject to the limitations set forth in the Texas Business Corporation Act. The designation of a committee of the Board of Directors and the delegation thereto of authority shall not operate to relieve the Board of Directors, or any member thereof, of any responsibility imposed by law.
Committees of Board of Directors
 
Section 12. . By resolution of the Board of Directors, the directors may be paid their expenses, if any, of attendance at each meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee, and may be paid a fixed sum for attendance at each meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee or a stated salary as directors or committee members. No such payment shall preclude any director from serving the Corporation in any other capacity and receiving compensation therefor.
Compensation
 
Section 13. . A director of the Corporation who is present at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee at which action on any corporate matter is taken shall be presumed to have assented to the action taken unless his dissent shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting or unless he shall file his written dissent to such action with the person acting as the secretary of the meeting before the adjournment thereof or shall forward such dissent by registered mail to the Secretary of the Corporation immediately after the adjournment of the meeting. Such right to dissent shall not apply to a director who voted in favor of such action.
Presumption of Assent
 
Section 1. The officers of the Corporation shall consist of a Chairman of the Board of Directors, a Chief Executive Officer, a President, one or more Vice Presidents (the number and specific titles thereof to be determined by the Board of Directors), a Secretary, a Chief Financial Officer and a Treasurer, each of whom shall be elected by the Board of Directors. Such other officers, including assistant officers, and agents as may be deemed necessary may be elected or appointed by the Board of Directors. Any two or more offices may be held by the same person.
Officers.
 
Section 2. . The officers of the Corporation shall be elected annually by the Board of Directors at the regular meeting of the Board of Directors held after each annual meeting of the shareholders. If the election of officers is not held at such meeting, such election shall be held as soon thereafter as may be convenient. Each officer shall hold office until his successor shall have been duly
Election and Term of Office
 
elected and qualified, or until his earlier death, resignation or removal in accordance with the provisions of Section 3 of this Article 4.
 
Section 3. . Any officer or agent may be removed by the Board of Directors whenever in its judgment the best interests of the Corporation will be served thereby, but such removal shall be without prejudice to the contract rights, if any, of the person so removed.
Removal
 
Section 4. . A vacancy in any office occurring for any reason may be filled by the Board of Directors. An officer elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the unexpired term of his predecessor in office.
Vacancies
 
Section 5. . The Chairman of the Board, if any, shall preside at all meetings of shareholders and of the Board of Directors, and shall have such other authority and perform such other duties as are prescribed by law, the Articles of Incorporation, these Bylaws or by the Board of Directors.
Powers and Duties of the Chairman of the Board
 
Section 6. The Chief Executive Officer shall be the chief executive officer of the Corporation. Subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Executive Committee (if any), the Chief Executive Officer shall have general executive charge, management and control of the properties, business and operations of the Corporation with all such powers as may be reasonably incident to such responsibilities; may agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation; may sign all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation;  and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the Chief Executive Officer by the Board of Directors. In the absence of the Chairman of the Board (or if there be no Chairman of the Board), the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at all meetings of the shareholders and, if the Chief Executive Officer shall also be a director, at all meetings of the Board of Directors.
Powers and Duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
 
Section 7. The President  shall report to the Chief Executive Officer and shall serve as the chief operating officer of the Corporation. Subject to the control of the Board of Directors, the Executive Committee (if any) and the Chief Executive Officer, the President shall have general executive charge, management and control of the properties, business and operations of the Corporation with all such powers as may be reasonably incident to such responsibilities; may agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation; may sign all certificates for shares of capital stock of the Corporation;  and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned to the President by the Chief Executive Officer or by the Board of Directors. In the absence of the Chairman of the Board and the Chief Executive Officer, the President shall preside at all meetings of the shareholders.
Powers and Duties of the President.
 
Section 8. . In the absence of the Chief Executive Officer and President, or in the event of their deaths or inability or refusal to act, the Vice President (or if there is more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated at the time of their election, or in the absence of any such designation, in the order of their election) shall perform the duties of the Chief Executive Officer, and when so acting, shall have all the powers of and be subject to all the restrictions upon the Chief ExecutiveOfficer. Each Vice President shall perform such other duties as the Chief Executive Officer, President or the Board of Directors may assign to him from time to time.
Vice Presidents
 
Section 9. . The Secretary shall (a) keep the minutes of the meetings of the shareholders and of the Board of Directors in one or more books provided for that purpose; (b) see that all notices are duly given in accordance with the provisions of these Amended and Restated Bylaws or as required by law; (c) have custody of, and be responsible for, the corporate records and the seal of the Corporation, and see that the seal of the Corporation is affixed to all documents as may be necessary or appropriate; (d) keep a register of the post office address of each shareholder furnished to the Secretary by such shareholder; (e) have general charge of the share transfer records of the Corporation; and (f) in general, perform all duties
Secretary
 
incident to the office of the Secretary and such other duties the President or the Board of Directors may assign to him from time to time.
 
Section 10. The Chief Financial Officer shall report to the President. The Chief Financial Officer shall keep and maintain, or cause to be kept and maintained, adequate and correct books and records of account in written form or any other form capable of being converted into written form. The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit, or cause to be deposited, all monies and other valuables in the name and to the credit of the Corporation with such depositories as may be designated by the Board of Directors. The Chief Financial Officer shall disburse all funds of the Corporation as may be ordered by the Board of Directors, shall render to the Chief Executive Officer, the President and the members of the Board of Directors, whenever they request it, an account of the financial condition of the Corporation, shall perform other duties commonly incident to such office and shall have such other powers and perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer or the President. Unless the Board of Directors determines otherwise, the Chief Financial Officer shall have such authority to agree upon and execute all leases, contracts, evidences of indebtedness and other obligations in the name of the Corporation and shall have such other powers and duties as designated in accordance with these Bylaws and as from time to time may be assigned by the President, Chief Executive Officer and/or by the Board of Directors. The Chief Executive Officer or President may direct the Treasurer to assume and perform the duties of the Chief Financial Officer in the absence or disability of the Chief Financial Officer, and the Treasurer shall perform other duties commonly incident to such office and shall also perform such other duties and have such other powers as the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer, the President or the Chief Financial Officer shall designate from time to time
Chief Financial Officer.
.
 
Section 11. . The Treasurer shall report to the Chief Financial Officer. Subject to control of the Chief Financial Officer, the Treasurer shall (a) have charge and custody of, and be responsible for, all funds and securities of the Corporation from any source whatsoever, and deposit all such funds in the name of the Corporation in such banks, trust companies or other depositories as shall be selected by the Board of Directors; and (b) in general, perform all duties incident to the office of the Treasurer and such other duties as the Chief Executive Officer, the President or the Board of Directors may assign to him from time to time. If required by the Board of Directors, the Treasurer shall give a bond for the faithful discharge of his duties in such sum, and with such surety or sureties, as the Board of Directors shall determine.
Treasurer
 
Section 12. . The Assistant Secretaries, when authorized by the Board of Directors, may sign with the President or a Vice President certificates for shares of the Corporation, the issuance of which shall have been authorized by the Board of Directors. The Assistant Treasurers, if required by the Board of Directors, shall give bonds for the faithful discharge of their duties in such sums, and with such sureties, as the Board of Directors shall determine. The Assistant Secretaries and the Assistant Treasurers, in general, shall perform such duties as the Secretary or the Treasurer, respectively, the President or the Board of Directors may assign to them from time to time.
Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers
 
Section 13. . The Chief Executive Officer, President, and/or the Chief Financial Officer may delegate some or all of the powers or duties of such officer in accordance with these Bylaws to any other officer or to any director, employee, shareholder or agent for whatever period of time seems desirable.
Delegation of Authority
 
Section 14. . The salaries, if any, of the officers shall be fixed by the Board of Directors from time to time, and no officer shall be prevented from receiving such salary by reason of the fact that he also is a director of the Corporation.
Salaries
 
Section 1. . Certificates representing shares of the Corporation shall be in such form as shall be determined by the Board of Directors. The certificates shall be signed by the Chief Executive Officer, or the President or a Vice President and by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the signatures of such officers on such certificates may be facsimiles. The certificates may be sealed with the seal of the Corporation or a facsimile thereof. In case any officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon any certificate shall have ceased to be such officer before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer at the date of its issuance. All certificates for shares shall be consecutively numbered or otherwise identified. The name and address of the person to whom the shares represented thereby are issued, together with the number of shares and date of issue, shall be entered in the share transfer records of the Corporation. All certificates surrendered to the Corporation for transfer shall be cancelled, and no new certificate shall be issued until the former certificate for a like number of shares shall have been surrendered and cancelled, except that in case of a lost, stolen or destroyed certificate, a new certificate may be issued therefor as provided in Section 3 of this Article 5.
Certificates Representing Shares
,
 
Section 2. . A transfer of shares of the Corporation shall be made only in the share transfer records of the Corporation by the holder of record thereof, or by his legal representative who shall furnish proper evidence of authority to transfer, or by his attorney thereunto authorized by power of attorney, duly executed and filed with the Secretary of the Corporation, and on surrender for cancellation of the certificate for such shares. The Corporation shall regard the person in whose name any shares issued by the Corporation are registered in the share transfer records of the Corporation at any particular time (including, without limitation, as of a record date fixed pursuant to Section 5 or 6 of Article 2) as the owner of those shares at that time for the purposes specified by the Texas Business Corporation Act.
Transfer of Shares
 
Section 3. . The Corporation shall issue a new certificate in place of any certificate representing shares previously issued if the registered owner of the certificate (a) makes proof in affidavit form that it has been lost, destroyed or wrongfully taken; (b) requests the issuance of a new certificate before the Corporation has notice that the certificate has been acquired by a purchaser for value in good faith and without notice of an adverse claim; (c) gives a bond in such form, and with such surety or sureties, with fixed or open penalty, as the Corporation may direct, or indemnifies the Corporation (and its transfer agent and registrar, if any) against any claim that may be made on account of the alleged loss, destruction or theft of the certificate; and (d) satisfies any other reasonable requirements imposed by the Corporation. If a certificate has been lost, apparently destroyed or wrongfully taken, and the registered holder of the shares represented thereby fails to notify the Corporation within a reasonable time after he has notice of it, and the Corporation registers a transfer of such shares before receiving such notification, the registered holder shall be precluded from making any claim against the Corporation for the transfer or for a new certificate.
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
 
The Board of Directors, by resolution, shall fix the fiscal year of the Corporation.
 
The Board of Directors may authorize, and the Corporation may make, distributions subject to any restrictions in its Articles of Incorporation and to the limitations set forth in the Texas Business Corporation Act.
 
. As permitted by Section G of Article 2.02-1 of the Texas Business Corporation Act (the "Indemnification Article"), the Corporation (a) makes mandatory the indemnification permitted under Section B of the Indemnification Article as contemplated by Section G thereof, and (b) agrees to advance the reasonable expenses of a director upon such director's compliance with the requirements of Sections K and L of the Indemnification Article.
Section 1.
Indemnification
 
The provisions of Section 1 of this Article 8 shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which any director of the Corporation may be entitled under any agreement, pursuant to a vote of the Board of Directors, any committee thereof or the shareholders, as a matter of law or otherwise, either as to action in his official capacity or as to action in another capacity while holding such office, shall continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such person.
Section 2. .
Non-Exclusivity
 
Section 3. . No person shall be entitled to indemnification pursuant to this Article 8 in relation to any matter as to which indemnification shall not be permitted by law.
Limitation
 
Section 4. . Terms used herein that are defined in the Indemnification Article shall have the respective meanings set forth therein.
Defined Terms
 
The Board of Directors shall provide for a corporate seal, which shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the state of incorporation, and the five-pointed Texas star.
 
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any shareholder or director of the Corporation under the provisions of the Articles of Incorporation, these Amended and Restated Bylaws or the Texas Business Corporation Act, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice.
 
Meetings of the shareholders and of the Board of Directors shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures established by the presiding officer of the meeting.
 
Unless otherwise provided by contract, directors and officers of the Corporation may hold positions as directors and officers of other corporations in related businesses, and their efforts to advance the interests of those corporations will not create a breach of fiduciary duty to this Corporation in the absence of bad faith.
 
These Amended and Restated Bylaws may be amended or repealed, as to all or some portion thereof, and new bylaws may be adopted, by (a) the Board of Directors or (b) the shareholders.
 

Exhibit 99.3
The first sentence of Section 5 of the Benchmark Electronics, Inc. 2002 Stock Option Plan for Non-Employee Directors is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
 
"Commencing with the Annual Meeting of the Shareholders approving this Plan, each non-employee director of the Company shall receive a grant of an option to purchase 7,000 shares (and any additional shares required to give effect to any stock dividend paid since the adoption of this Plan on April 4, 2002) of Common Stock, or any lesser amount of shares as the Board shall determine in its sole discretion, upon the occurrence of the non-employee director's election or re-election to the Board by the shareholders or appointment to the Board by the Board as contemplated by the bylaws of the Company."
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060601121017.txt.gz
TIME:20060601121017
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
Item 5.02.
     
 
On June 1, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing that John W. Cox resigned from its Board of Directors effective May 26, 2006, as required, to allow him to serve as Chief Financial Officer of the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development. Mr. Cox's resignation was not because of any disagreement with the Company or any matter related to the Company's operations, policies or practices.
 
The press release announcing the resignation of Mr. Cox is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Item 9.01.
     
 
Exhibits
(d)
    
Exhibit 99.1
             
Press release dated June 1, 2006
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 GAYLA J. DELLY
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
ANGLETON, TX, JUNE 1, 2006 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) announced today that John W. Cox resigned from its Board of Directors effective May 26, 2006, as required, to allow him to serve as Chief Financial Officer of the U.S. Department  of Housing and Urban Development.
 
"On behalf of Benchmark, I wish to thank John for his support and service to our Company. We wish him success at his new position at HUD," stated Benchmark's President and CEO Cary T. Fu.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060712111742.txt.gz
TIME:20060712111742
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
     Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
     Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
     Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Item 2.02.
                
 
second quarter revenue guidance of $630 million to $660 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses, of $0.36 to $0.39 on April 20, 2006. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
On July 12, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing it expects revenues and earnings per share to exceed the high end of guidance for the second quarter 2006. The Company provided
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Item 9.01.
                
 
Exhibits
(d)
                        
Press release dated July 12, 2006
Exhibit 99.1
                   
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
2
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS EXPECTS TO EXCEED
SECOND QUARTER 2006 GUIDANCE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 12, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE) announced today that it expects revenues and earnings per share to exceed the high end of guidance for the second quarter 2006. The Company provided second quarter revenue guidance of $630 million to $660 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses, of $0.36 to $0.39 on April 20, 2006.
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the second quarter ended June 30, 2006. Results for the second quarter will be announced on July 20, 2006. A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on July 20, 2006 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com
.
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although the Company believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products,
and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060728155036.txt.gz
TIME:20060728155036
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02.    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On July 20, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing second quarter results for the quarter ended June 30, 2006. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(d)
                                
 
Exhibit 99.1               Press release dated July 20, 2006
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS SECOND QUARTER RESULTS
RAISES FULL YEAR 2006 GUIDANCE
 
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 20, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $749 million for the quarter ended
June 30, 2006, compared to $561 million for the same quarter last year. Second quarter net income was $27.5 million, or $0.42 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $18.7 million, or $0.29 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company had net income before special items of $29.4 million, or $0.45 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2006. All share and per share data appearing in this press release has been retroactively adjusted for the 3-for-2 stock split completed on April 3, 2006 to holders of record as of March 27, 2006.
 
"We experienced a strong second quarter with solid year-to-date growth in each of the industry sectors that we serve.  Our commitment and focus on improving our operational effectiveness will drive Benchmark's continued success," stated Benchmark's President and CEO Cary T. Fu.
 
Second Quarter 2006 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the second quarter was 4.4% on a GAAP basis and was 4.7%, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses.
 - 
                 
 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the second quarter was $1.9 million.
 - 
                 
 
Cash and short-term investments balance at June 30, 2006 of $282 million.
 - 
                 
 
No debt outstanding.
 - 
                 
 
Accounts receivable balance at June 30, 2006 of $443 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 53 days.
 - 
                 
 
Inventory of $481 million at June 30, 2006; inventory turns were 5.8 times.
 - 
                 
 
Third Quarter 2006 Guidance
 
Revenues for the third quarter of 2006 are expected to be between $710 million and $750 million.
Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expenses, are expected to be between $0.40 and $0.45.
 
 
Full Year 2006 Guidance
 
We are raising our full year guidance. Revenues for 2006 are now expected to be between $2.76 billion and $2.85 billion. The corresponding diluted earnings per share for 2006, excluding restructuring charges, the impact of stock-based compensation expenses and the first quarter tax benefit, are expected to be between $1.61 and $1.69.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20060908161110.txt.gz
TIME:20060908161110
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):   September 6, 2006
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
              
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
              
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
              
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
              
 
Item 5.02.
            
Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers.
On September 8, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the appointment of Michael R. Dawson to the Board of Directors of the Company effective September 6, 2006 to serve as an independent director. Mr. Dawson is Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of GlobalSantaFe Corporation, an offshore oil and gas drilling contractor. Previously, he served as Vice President and Controller and as Vice President and Treasurer for GlobalSantaFe. Prior to November 2001, Mr. Dawson served as Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications for Global Marine, Inc. A Certified Public Accountant, Mr. Dawson joined Global Marine in 1999 after 16 years with Union Texas Petroleum Holdings, where he served as Director of Acquisitions and Portfolio Management, Director of Investor Relations and in numerous financial management positions in the Controller's organization. Mr. Dawson began his career at Shell Oil Company in 1975. Mr. Dawson holds a B.B.A. degree from the University of Iowa.
The press release announcing the appointment of Mr. Dawson is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01.
            
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, SEPTEMBER 8, 2006 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) announced today the appointment of Michael R. Dawson to the Board of Directors of the Company effective September 6, 2006 to serve as an independent director. Mr. Dawson is Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of GlobalSantaFe Corporation, an offshore oil and gas drilling contractor. Previously, he served as Vice President and Controller and as Vice President and Treasurer for GlobalSantaFe. Prior to November 2001, Mr. Dawson served as Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications for Global Marine, Inc. A Certified Public Accountant, Mr. Dawson joined Global Marine in 1999 after 16 years with Union Texas Petroleum Holdings, where he served as Director of Acquisitions and Portfolio Management, Director of Investor Relations and in numerous financial management positions in the Controller's organization. Mr. Dawson began his career at Shell Oil Company in 1975. Mr. Dawson holds a B.B.A. degree from the University of Iowa.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20061016171557.txt.gz
TIME:20061016171557
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    October 16, 2006
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
              
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
              
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
              
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
              
 
 
Item 5.03.   Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On October 16, 2006, the Company filed with the Texas Secretary of State an amendment to Article 4 of the Company's Articles of Incorporation. The amendment, approved by shareholders on May 10, 2006, increases the authorized Common Shares of the Company from 85,000,000 to 145,000,000.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits
(d)
              
Articles of Amendment to the Articles of Incorporation of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. filed October 16, 2006
Exhibit 99.1
                                               
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
ARTICLES OF AMENDMENT TO
THE ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION
OF
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
 
 
A Texas Corporation
 
 
 
 
 
Date of Adoption
May 10, 2006
As Amended
August 13, 2002
May 20, 1997
May 4, 1990
 
Pursuant to the provisions of Article 4.04 of the Texas Business Corporation Act, the undersigned corporation adopts the following Articles of Amendment to its Articles of Incorporation:
The name of the Corporation is Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
The following amendment to the Articles of Incorporation was adopted by the shareholders of the Corporation on May 10, 2006.  The amendment increases the authorized shares of Common Stock of the Corporation from 85,000,000 to 145,000,000 shares.  The amendment changes Article Four of the Corporation's Articles of Incorporation, and the full text of Article Four as amended is as follows:
"Section 4.1.               The aggregate number of shares that the Corporation shall have authority to issue is 150,000,000, which shall consist of 145,000,000 shares of Common Stock, par value $0.10 per share, and 5,000,000 shares of Preferred Stock, par value $0.10 per share.
Authorized Shares.
Section  4.2.                .  The shares of Preferred Stock may be divided into and issued in series.  The Board of Directors shall have the authority to establish series of unissued shares of Preferred Stock by fixing the relative rights and preferences of the shares of any series so established, and to increase or decrease the number of shares of any series so established, and to increase or decrease the number of shares within each such series; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may not decrease the number of shares within a series of Preferred Stock to less than the number of shares within such series that are then issues.  The Preferred Stock of each such series shall have such designations, preferences, limitations, or relative rights, as shall be set forth in the resolution or resolutions establishing such series adopted by the Board of Directors.
Preferred Stock
Section 4.3. .  Except as otherwise expressly provided in any resolution or resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors establishing any series of Preferred Stock, the exclusive voting power of the Corporation shall be vested in the Common Stock.  Except as expressly provided in such resolution or resolutions, or as otherwise provided by the Texas Business Corporation Act,
Voting Rights
2
each outstanding share of Common Stock shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of the shareholders.
Section 4.4. .  No Shareholder shall have any preemptive right whatsoever.  Cumulative voting shall not be permitted."
Denial of Preemptive Rights and Cumulative Voting
The number of shares of the Corporation outstanding at the time of such adoption was 42,741,029 all of which were entitled to vote on the foregoing amendment.
The number of shares voted for such amendment was 34,915,747; the number of shares voted against such amendment was 4,196,822; and the number of shares abstaining from the vote was 65,763.
EXECUTED this 13th day of October, 2006.
 
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20061017170434.txt.gz
TIME:20061017170434
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):  October 17, 2006
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
x
                                 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Item 8.01.   Other Events.
pursuant to which Pemstar Inc. will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference is a copy of the registrant's press release dated October 17, 2006, announcing that Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Pemstar Inc. have entered into a definitive merger agreement
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits
(d)
              
Press Release Dated October 17, 2006
Exhibit 99.1
                                                           
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information Call:
GAYLA J. DELLY
CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC                                                                                              OCTOBER 17, 2006
(979) 849-6550
GREG S. LEA
CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER
PEMSTAR INC.
(507) 292-6941
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 17, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) and Pemstar Inc. (NASDAQ:PMTR) today announced that they have signed a definitive merger agreement pursuant to which each outstanding share of Pemstar common stock will be converted into the right to receive 0.160 of a common share of Benchmark at transaction close.
Based on Benchmark's closing price of $28.93 on October 16, 2006, the transaction values Pemstar at $4.63 per common share, or approximately $300 million including the assumption of Pemstar net debt. The merger is expected to be a tax-free exchange of common shares.
The merger agreement has been unanimously approved by the boards of directors of both Benchmark and Pemstar. The transaction, which is subject to the approval of Pemstar's shareholders, antitrust approvals and other closing conditions, is expected to close in the first calendar quarter of 2007, subject to the timing of completion of regulatory reviews.
"The combination of the Benchmark/Pemstar organizations brings together two well respected teams with broad and complementary customer bases and serving diversified end markets. Pemstar's customer-focused culture and operating flexibility is highly
compatible with that of Benchmark," said Cary Fu, Benchmark's chief executive officer. "This acquisition also supports Benchmark's strategy to continue to expand and deepen its suite of integrated services and solutions. Pemstar's strengths in design engineering and systems integration as well as its global footprint complement our existing growing business. I am confident that the combined organization will create additional value for our combined base of customers."
"Benchmark's proven track record, strong balance sheet, and reputation as a global leader in electronics manufacturing services make the deal an attractive one for Pemstar's customers, shareholders and employees. This transaction will provide Pemstar customers with an enhanced portfolio of capabilities, expanded supply chain and operating leverage and the advantages of an increased global footprint," said Al Berning, Pemstar's chairman and chief executive officer. "Our customers will benefit greatly from Benchmark's capabilities in design engineering, complex manufacturing and test and repair, as well as expanded low-cost operations in Asia. There is a strong cultural fit between the two organizations, which will facilitate a smooth transition and ensure consistency of ongoing service delivery. The management team and I strongly support the transaction and the opportunity it provides."
of global engineering, product design, automation and test, manufacturing and fulfillment services to customers on a global basis through facilities strategically located in North America, Asia and Europe.
Pemstar was founded in 1994 and is an established leader in the EMS industry, with Fiscal Year 2006 (March) revenues of $871 million, including the additional revenue resulting from the full turnkey operation with a wireless handset customer. Pemstar has a global footprint of 11 design, manufacturing and fulfillment locations worldwide and employs approximately 3,500 people. Pemstar provides a comprehensive range
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's common shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark and Pemstar management will be held on October 17, 2006 at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss this announcement. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to Benchmark's website at www.bench.com or Pemstar's website at www.pemstar.com.
Credit Suisse acted as financial advisor to Benchmark and Needham & Company, LLC acted as financial advisor to Pemstar. Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP acted as legal advisor to Benchmark and Dorsey & Whitney LLP acted as legal advisor to Pemstar.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark and Pemstar believe that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, Pemstar's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended March 31, 2006, and Benchmark's and Pemstar's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
Additional Information
This communication is not a solicitation of a proxy from any security holder of Pemstar Inc. Benchmark Electronics, Inc. intends to file a registration statement on Form S-4 with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction. The registration statement will include a proxy statement of Pemstar Inc. that also constitutes a prospectus of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., which will be sent to the shareholders of Pemstar Inc. Shareholders are urged to read the proxy statement/prospectus and any other relevant document when they become available, because they will contain important information about Benchmark Electronics, Inc., Pemstar Inc. and the proposed transaction. A definitive proxy statement will be sent to shareholders of Pemstar Inc. seeking approval of the proposed transaction. The proxy statement/prospectus and other documents relating to the proposed transaction (when they are available) can be obtained free of
charge from the SEC's website at www.sec.gov. These documents (when they are available) can also be obtained free of charge from Benchmark Electronics, Inc. upon written request to Benchmark Electronics, Inc., 3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas 77515, or by calling (979) 849-6550, or from Pemstar Inc., upon written request to Pemstar Inc., 3535 Technology Drive, N.W., Rochester, Minnesota 55901, or by calling (507) 280-2385.
Participants in the Proposed Transaction
Benchmark Electronics, Inc., Pemstar Inc. and certain of their respective directors and executive officers may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from shareholders in connection with the proposed transaction under the rules of the SEC. Information about the directors and executive officers of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. may be found in its 2005 Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on March 13, 2006 and definitive proxy statement relating to its 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the SEC on April 12, 2006. Information about the directors and executive officers of Pemstar Inc. may be found in its 2006 Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on June 23, 2006 and definitive proxy statement relating to its 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the SEC on June 30, 2006. These documents can be obtained free of charge from the sources indicated above. Additional information regarding the interests of these participants will also be included in the proxy statement/prospectus regarding the proposed transaction when it becomes available.
Non-Solicitation
This communication shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction. No offer of securities shall be made except by means of a prospectus meeting the requirements of Section 10 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20061018172044.txt.gz
TIME:20061018172044
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
x
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Item 1.01.
               
On October 16, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement") with Pemstar Inc., a Minnesota corporation ("Pemstar"), and the Company's wholly owned subsidiary, Autobahn Acquisition Corp., a Minnesota corporation ("Sub"), whereby Sub will merge with and into Pemstar (the "Merger"), with Pemstar surviving the Merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company.
Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, at the effective time of the Merger, each issued and outstanding share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of Pemstar not owned by the Company, Pemstar or Sub will be converted into the right to receive 0.16 of a share of common stock, par value $0.10 per share, of the Company.  The Merger Agreement contains customary anti-dilution provisions in the event of a stock split, stock dividend, special cash dividend or similar event.
It is intended that the Merger will qualify as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.  Consummation of the Merger is subject to closing conditions that include, among others, (i) approval of the Merger by Pemstar's shareholders and (ii) expiration or termination of any waiting period (and any extension thereof) under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended.
The Merger Agreement contains certain termination rights for each of Pemstar and the Company and further provides that, upon termination of the Merger Agreement under circumstances described in more detail in the Merger Agreement, Pemstar will pay the Company a termination fee of $12 million.
The foregoing description of the Merger Agreement is a summary only and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Merger Agreement, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 2.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Additional Information
This communication is not a solicitation of a proxy from any security holder of Pemstar Inc. Benchmark Electronics, Inc. intends to file a registration statement on Form S-4 with the SEC in connection with the proposed transaction. The registration statement will include a proxy statement of Pemstar Inc. that also constitutes a prospectus of Benchmark Electronics, Inc., which will be sent to the shareholders of Pemstar Inc. Shareholders are urged to read the proxy statement/prospectus and any other relevant document when they become available, because they will contain important information about Benchmark Electronics, Inc., Pemstar Inc. and the proposed transaction. A definitive proxy statement will be sent to shareholders of Pemstar Inc. seeking approval of the proposed transaction. The proxy statement/prospectus and other documents relating to the proposed transaction (when they are available) can be obtained free of charge from the SEC's website at www.sec.gov. These documents (when they are available) can also be obtained free of charge from Benchmark Electronics, Inc. upon written request to Benchmark Electronics, Inc., 3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas 77515, or by calling (979) 849-6550, or from Pemstar Inc., upon written request to Pemstar Inc., 3535 Technology Drive, N.W., Rochester, Minnesota 55901, or by calling (507) 280-2385.
Participants in the Proposed Transaction
Benchmark Electronics, Inc., Pemstar Inc. and certain of their respective directors and executive officers may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies from shareholders in connection with the proposed transaction under the rules of the SEC. Information about the directors and executive officers of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. may be found in its 2005 Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on March 13, 2006 and definitive proxy statement relating to its 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the SEC on April 12, 2006. Information about the directors and executive officers of Pemstar Inc. may be found in its 2006 Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the SEC on June 23, 2006 and definitive proxy statement relating to its 2006 Annual Meeting of Shareholders filed with the SEC on June 30, 2006. These documents can be obtained free of charge from the sources indicated above. Additional information regarding the interests of these participants will also be included in the proxy statement/prospectus regarding the proposed transaction when it becomes available.
Non-Solicitation
This communication shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction. No offer of securities shall be made except by means of a prospectus meeting the requirements of Section 10 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Item 9.01.
               
Exhibits
(d)
              
Exhibit 2.1      Agreement and Plan of Merger among Benchmark Electronics, Inc., Autobahn Acquisition Corp. and Pemstar Inc. dated October 16, 2006.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
2

Exhibit 2.1
 
 
 
 
ii
 
 
 
iii
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER (this "") dated as of October 16, 2006, among BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC., a Texas corporation (""), AUTOBAHN ACQUISITION CORP., a Minnesota corporation and a wholly owned Subsidiary of Parent (""), and PEMSTAR INC., a Minnesota corporation (the "").
Agreement
Parent
Sub
Company
WHEREAS the Board of Directors of each of the Company, Parent and Sub has approved, and a special committee of the Company's Board of Directors (the "") formed in accordance with Section 302A.673 of the Minnesota Business Corporation Act (the "") has approved, this Agreement and the merger of Sub with and into the Company (the ""), upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, whereby each issued and outstanding share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company (""), other than any shares of Company Common Stock directly owned by Parent, Sub or the Company, will be converted into the right to receive common stock, par value $0.10 per share, of Parent ("");
Special Committee
MBCA
Merger
Company Common Stock
Parent Common Stock
WHEREAS the Board of Directors of the Company and the Special Committee have determined that the Merger is fair to and in the best interests of the shareholders of the Company;
WHEREAS for U.S. Federal income tax purposes, it is intended that (a) the Merger will qualify as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (the ""), (b) this Agreement will constitute a "plan of reorganization" for purposes of Sections 354 and 361 of the Code and (c) Parent, Sub and the Company will each be a party to such reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(b) of the Code; and
Code
WHEREAS Parent, Sub and the Company desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements in connection with the Merger and also to prescribe various conditions to the Merger.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements contained in this Agreement, and subject to the conditions set forth herein, the parties hereto agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01.   Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, and in accordance with the MBCA, Sub shall be merged with and into the Company at the Effective Time (as defined in Section 1.03 below).  Following the Effective Time, the separate corporate existence of Sub shall
The Merger.
cease and the Company shall continue as the surviving corporation in the Merger (the "") and shall succeed to and assume all the rights and obligations of Sub in accordance with the MBCA.
Surviving Corporation
SECTION 1.02.   The closing of the Merger (the "") will take place at 10:00 a.m. on a date to be specified by the parties, which shall be no later than the second business day after satisfaction or (to the extent permitted by law) waiver of the conditions set forth in Article VI (other than those conditions that by their terms are to be satisfied at the Closing, but subject to the satisfaction or (to the extent permitted by law) waiver of those conditions), at the offices of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, Worldwide Plaza, 825 Eighth Avenue, New York, New York 10019, unless another time, date or place is agreed to in writing by Parent and the Company; , , that if all the conditions set forth in Article VI shall not have been satisfied or (to the extent permitted by law) waived on such second business day, then the Closing shall take place on the first business day on which all such conditions shall have been satisfied or (to the extent permitted by law) waived.  The date on which the Closing occurs is referred to in this Agreement as the "".
Closing.
Closing
provided
however
Closing Date
SECTION 1.03.   Subject to the provisions of this Agreement, as soon as practicable on the Closing Date, the parties shall file with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota articles of merger (the "") executed and acknowledged by the parties in accordance with the relevant provisions of the MBCA and, as soon as practicable on or after the Closing Date, shall make all other filings or recordings required under the MBCA.  The Merger shall become effective upon the filing of the Articles of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota, or at such later time as Parent and the Company shall agree and shall specify in the Articles of Merger (the time the Merger becomes effective being the "").
Effective Time.
Articles of Merger
Effective Time
SECTION 1.04.   The Merger shall have the effects set forth in Section 302A.641 of the MBCA.
Effects of the Merger.
SECTION 1.05.   (a) The Amended Articles of Incorporation of the Company (the "") shall be amended at the Effective Time to be in the form of Exhibit A and, as so amended, such Company Articles shall be the Amended Articles of Incorporation of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter changed or amended as provided therein or by applicable law.
Articles of Incorporation and By-laws.
Company Articles
(b) The By-laws of Sub, as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Time, shall be the By-laws of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter changed or amended as provided therein or by applicable law.
SECTION 1.06.   The directors of Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the directors of the Surviving Corporation until the earlier of their resignation or removal or until their respective successors are duly elected and qualified, as the case may be.
Directors.
2
SECTION 1.07.   The officers of Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be the officers of the Surviving Corporation until the earlier of their resignation or removal or until their respective successors are duly elected and qualified, as the case may be.
Officers.
SECTION 2.01.   At the Effective Time, by virtue of the Merger and without any action on the part of the holder of any shares of Company Common Stock or any shares of capital stock of Parent or Sub:
Effect on Capital Stock.
(a)   Each issued and outstanding share of capital stock of Sub shall be converted into and become one validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Surviving Corporation.
Capital Stock of Sub.
(b)   Each share of Company Common Stock that is directly owned by the Company, Parent or Sub immediately prior to the Effective Time shall automatically be canceled and shall cease to exist, and no consideration shall be delivered in exchange therefor.
Cancellation of Treasury Stock and Parent-Owned Stock.
(c)   Subject to Section 2.02(e), each share of Company Common Stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than any shares to be canceled in accordance with Section 2.01(b)) shall be converted into the right to receive 0.16 (the "") validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable shares of Parent Common Stock (the "").   At the Effective Time, all such shares of Company Common Stock shall no longer be outstanding and shall automatically be canceled and shall cease to exist, and each holder of a certificate which immediately prior to the Effective Time represented any such shares of Company Common Stock (each, a "") shall cease to have any rights with respect thereto, except the right to receive the Merger Consideration, any dividends or other distributions to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(c) and cash in lieu of fractional shares of Parent Common Stock to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(e), in each case to be issued or paid in consideration therefor upon surrender of such Certificate in accordance with Section 2.02(b), without interest.  As provided in Section 2.02(j), the right of any holder of a Certificate to receive the Merger Consideration shall be subject to and reduced by the amount of any withholding that is required under applicable tax law.
Conversion of Company Common Stock.
Exchange Ratio
Merger Consideration
Certificate
(d)   In the event Parent changes (or establishes a record date for changing) the number of shares of Parent Common Stock issued and outstanding prior to the Effective Time as a result of a stock split (including a reverse split), stock dividend or distribution, recapitalization, subdivision, reclassification, combination, exchange of shares or similar transaction, or issues a special cash dividend,
Anti-Dilution Provisions.
3
with respect to the outstanding shares of Parent Common Stock and the record date therefor shall be prior to the Effective Time, shares of Parent Common Stock payable as part of the Merger Consideration shall be appropriately adjusted to reflect such stock split (including a reverse split), stock dividend or distribution, recapitalization, subdivision, reclassification, combination, exchange of shares or similar transaction or special cash dividend.
SECTION 2.02.   (a)   As of the Effective Time, Parent shall deposit in trust with Computershare Trust Company, N.A. or such other bank or trust company as may be designated by Parent (the ""), for the benefit of the holders of shares of Company Common Stock, for exchange in accordance with this Article II, through the Exchange Agent, certificates representing the shares of Parent Common Stock issuable pursuant to Section 2.01 in exchange for outstanding shares of Company Common Stock, any dividends or other distributions with respect thereto with a record date after the Effective Time and any cash payments in lieu of any fractional shares of Parent Common Stock (such shares of Parent Common Stock, dividends or other distributions and cash being hereinafter referred to as the "").
Exchange of Certificates.
Exchange Agent.
Exchange Agent
Exchange Fund
(b)   As soon as reasonably practicable after the Effective Time, Parent shall cause the Exchange Agent to mail to each holder of record of a Certificate whose shares of Company Common Stock were converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration, any dividends or other distributions to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(c) and cash in lieu of fractional shares of Parent Common Stock to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(e), (i) a form of letter of transmittal (which shall specify that delivery shall be effected, and risk of loss and title to the Certificates held by such person shall pass, only upon proper delivery of the Certificates to the Exchange Agent and which shall be in customary form and have such other provisions as Parent may reasonably specify) and (ii) instructions for use in surrendering the Certificates in exchange for the Merger Consideration, any dividends or other distributions to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(c) and cash in lieu of fractional shares of Parent Common Stock to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(e).  Each holder of record of a Certificate shall, upon surrender to the Exchange Agent of such Certificate, together with such letter of transmittal, duly completed and validly executed, and such other documents as may reasonably be required by the Exchange Agent, be entitled to receive in exchange therefor (x) uncertificated shares of Parent Common Stock registered on the stock transfer books of Parent in the name of such holder (the "") or, at the election of such holder, certificates, in each case representing that number of whole shares of Parent Common Stock which such holder has the right to receive pursuant to the provisions of this Article II after taking into account all the shares of Company Common Stock then held by such holder under all such Certificates so surrendered and (y) any dividends or other distributions to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(c) and cash in lieu of fractional shares of Parent Common Stock to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(e), and the Certificate so surrendered shall forthwith be canceled.  In the event of a transfer of ownership of shares of Company Common Stock that is not registered in the transfer records of the Company, the proper
Exchange Procedures.
Registered Parent Shares
4
amount of cash, if any, and Registered Parent Shares or certificates representing the proper number of shares of Parent Common Stock, as the case may be, may be paid and issued to a person other than the person in whose name the Certificate so surrendered is registered if, upon presentation to the Exchange Agent, such Certificate shall be properly endorsed or otherwise be in proper form for transfer and the person requesting such issuance shall pay any transfer or other taxes required by reason of the payment of any cash and the issuance of shares of Parent Common Stock to a person other than the registered holder of such Certificate or establish to the reasonable satisfaction of Parent that such taxes have been paid or are not applicable.  Until surrendered as contemplated by this Section 2.02(b), each Certificate shall be deemed at any time after the Effective Time to represent only the right to receive upon such surrender the Merger Consideration in accordance with this Article II and any dividends or other distributions to which the holder of such Certificate is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(c) and cash in lieu of fractional shares of Parent Common Stock to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(e).  No interest will be paid or will accrue on any cash payable to holders of Certificates pursuant to the provisions of this Article II.
(c)   No dividends or other distributions with respect to Parent Common Stock with a record date after the Effective Time shall be paid to the holder of any unsurrendered Certificate with respect to the shares of Parent Common Stock that the holder thereof has the right to receive upon the surrender thereof, and no cash payment in lieu of fractional shares of Parent Common Stock shall be paid to any such holder pursuant to Section 2.02(e), in each case until the holder of such Certificate shall surrender such Certificate in accordance with this Article II.  Following surrender of any Certificate, there shall be issued or paid to the record holder of such Certificate, Registered Parent Shares or certificates representing whole shares of Parent Common Stock issued in exchange therefor, as the case may be, and, without interest, (i) at the time of such surrender, the amount of any cash payable in lieu of a fractional share of Parent Common Stock to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(e) and the amount of dividends or other distributions with a record date after the Effective Time theretofore paid with respect to such Registered Parent Shares or whole shares of Parent Common Stock and (ii) at the appropriate payment date, the amount of dividends or other distributions with a record date after the Effective Time but prior to such surrender and a payment date subsequent to such surrender payable with respect to such Registered Parent Shares or whole shares of Parent Common Stock.
Distributions with Respect to Unexchanged Shares.
(d)   All shares of Parent Common Stock issued upon the surrender of Certificates in accordance with the terms of this Article II (together with any dividends or other distributions paid pursuant to Section 2.02(c) and cash paid in lieu of fractional shares pursuant to Section 2.02(e)) shall be deemed to have been issued (and paid) in full satisfaction of all rights pertaining to the shares of Company Common Stock previously represented by such Certificates.  At the close of business on the day on which the Effective Time occurs, the stock transfer books of the Company shall be closed, and there shall be no further registration of transfers on the stock transfer books of the Surviving Corporation of the shares of Company Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time.
No Further Ownership Rights in Company Common Stock.
5
If after the Effective Time, Certificates are presented to the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent for any reason, they shall be canceled and exchanged as provided in this Article II.
(e)   (i) No Registered Parent Shares or certificates or scrips, in each case representing fractional shares of Parent Common Stock, shall be issued upon the surrender for exchange of Certificates, no dividends or other distributions of Parent shall relate to such fractional share interests and such fractional share interests will not entitle the owner thereof to vote or to any rights of a shareholder of Parent.
No Fractional Shares.
(ii) In lieu of such fractional share interests, Parent shall pay to each holder of a Certificate an amount in cash equal to the product obtained by multiplying (A) the fractional share interest to which such holder (after taking into account all shares of Company Common Stock held at the Effective Time by such holder) would otherwise be entitled by (B) the per share closing price of Parent Common Stock on the Closing Date, as such price is reported on the New York Stock Exchange, Inc. (the "") Composite Transactions Tape (as reported by Bloomberg Financial Markets or such other source as the parties shall agree in writing).
NYSE
(f)   Any portion of the Exchange Fund which remains undistributed to the holders of the Certificates for nine months after the Effective Time shall be delivered to Parent, upon demand, and any holders of the Certificates who have not theretofore complied with this Article II shall thereafter look only to Parent for, and Parent shall remain liable for, payment of their claim for the Merger Consideration and any dividends or other distributions with respect to shares of Parent Common Stock and cash in lieu of any fractional shares of Parent Common Stock in accordance with this Article II.
Termination of the Exchange Fund.
(g)   None of Parent, Sub, the Company, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent shall be liable to any person in respect of any shares of Parent Common Stock or any dividends or other distributions with respect thereto or cash in lieu of any fractional shares of Parent Common Stock or cash from the Exchange Fund, in each case delivered to a public official pursuant to any applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar law.  If any Certificate shall not have been surrendered prior to two years after the Effective Time (or immediately prior to such earlier date on which any Merger Consideration (and all dividends or other distributions with respect to shares of Parent Common Stock and cash in lieu of any fractional shares of Parent Common Stock pursuant to this Article II) would otherwise escheat to or become the property of any Federal, state, local or foreign government, any court, administrative, regulatory or other governmental agency, commission or authority or any non-governmental self-regulatory agency, commission or authority (each, a "")), any such Merger Consideration (and such dividends, distributions and cash) shall, to the extent permitted by applicable law, become the property of Parent, free and clear of all claims or interest of any person previously entitled thereto.
No Liability.
Governmental Entity
6
(h)   The Exchange Agent shall invest any cash included in the Exchange Fund, as directed by Parent.  Any interest and other income resulting from such investments shall be paid to Parent.
Investment of Exchange Fund.
(i)   If any Certificate shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming such Certificate to be lost, stolen or destroyed and, if required by Parent, the posting by such person of a bond in such reasonable amount as Parent may direct as indemnity against any claim that may be made against it with respect to such Certificate, the Exchange Agent will issue in exchange for such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate the Merger Consideration, any dividends or other distributions to which the holder of such Certificate would be entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(c) and cash in lieu of any fractional shares of Parent Common Stock to which such holder would be entitled pursuant to Section 2.02(e).
Lost Certificates.
(j)   Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the consideration otherwise payable pursuant to this Agreement to any holder of shares of Company Common Stock such amounts as Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent is required to deduct and withhold with respect to the making of such payment under the Code, or any provision of state, local or foreign tax law.  To the extent that amounts are so withheld and paid over to the appropriate taxing authority by Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent, such withheld amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the holder of the shares of Company Common Stock in respect of which such deduction and withholding was made by Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent.
Withholding Rights.
SECTION 3.01.   Except as set forth in the disclosure schedule (with specific reference to the particular Section or subsection of this Agreement to which the information set forth in such disclosure schedule relates; , , that any information set forth in one section of such disclosure schedule shall be deemed to apply to each other Section or subsection thereof or hereof to which its relevance is readily apparent on its face) delivered by the Company to Parent prior to the execution of this Agreement (the ""), the Company represents and warrants to Parent and Sub as follows:
Representations and Warranties of the Company.
provided
however
Company Disclosure Schedule
(a)   Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has been duly organized, and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its incorporation or formation, as the case may be, and has all requisite power and authority and possesses all governmental licenses, permits, authorizations and approvals necessary to enable it to use its corporate or other name and to own, lease or otherwise hold and operate its properties and other assets and to carry on its business as presently conducted and as currently proposed by its
Organization, Standing and Corporate Power.
7
management to be conducted, except where the failure to have such government licenses, permits, authorizations or approvals individually or in the aggregate has not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is duly qualified or licensed to do business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the nature of its business or the ownership, leasing or operation of its properties makes such qualification or licensing necessary, other than in such jurisdictions where the failure to be so qualified or licensed individually or in the aggregate has not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  The Company has made available to Parent, prior to the execution of this Agreement, complete and accurate copies of the Company Articles and its Amended and Restated By-laws (the ""), and the comparable organizational documents of each of its Subsidiaries, in each case as amended to the date hereof.  The Company has made available to Parent complete and accurate copies of the minutes (or, in the case of minutes that have not yet been finalized, drafts thereof) of all meetings of the shareholders of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries, the Boards of Directors of the Company and each of its Subsidiaries and the committees of each of such Boards of Directors, in each case held since January 1, 2003 and prior to the date hereof.
Company By-laws
(b)   Section 3.01(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule lists each of the Subsidiaries of the Company and, for each such Subsidiary, the jurisdiction of incorporation or formation and, as of the date hereof, each jurisdiction in which such Subsidiary is qualified or licensed to do business.  All the issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of, or other equity interests in, each such Subsidiary have been validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable and are owned directly or indirectly by the Company free and clear of all pledges, liens, charges, encumbrances or security interests of any kind or nature whatsoever (collectively, ""), and free of any restriction on the right to vote, sell or otherwise dispose of such capital stock or other equity interests.  Except for the capital stock of, or voting securities or equity interests in, its Subsidiaries, the Company does not own, directly or indirectly, any capital stock of, or other voting securities or equity interests in, any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association or other entity.
Subsidiaries.
Liens
(c)   The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of 150,000,000 shares of Company Common Stock and 5,000,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $0.01 per share ("").  At the close of business on October 13, 2006, (i) 45,449,433 shares of Company Common Stock were issued and outstanding, (ii) approximately 4,300,000 shares of Company Common Stock were reserved for issuance pursuant to the Company 1994 Stock Option Plan, the Company 1995 Stock Option Plan, the Company 1997 Stock Option Plan, the Company Amended and Restated 1999 Stock Option Plan, the Company 2000 Stock Option Plan and the Company 2002 Stock Option Plan (collectively, the ""), of which 2,925,854 shares of Company Common Stock were subject to outstanding options to purchase shares of Company Common Stock (collectively, and including any options to purchase shares of Company Common Stock granted after October 13, 2006, pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, ""), (iii) no shares of Company Preferred Stock were issued or outstanding or were held by the Company as treasury
Capital Structure.
Company Preferred Stock
Company Stock Plans
Company Stock Options
8
shares and (iv) 5,000,000 shares of Company Preferred Stock designated as Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock were reserved for issuance in connection with the rights (the "") to be issued pursuant to the Rights Agreement, dated as of August 11, 2000, between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. (as amended, the "").  Except as set forth above in this Section 3.01(c), at the close of business on October 13, 2006, no shares of capital stock or other voting securities or equity interests of the Company were issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding.  There are no outstanding shares of Company Common Stock or Company Preferred Stock subject to vesting or restrictions on transfer or rights of repurchase by the Company, stock appreciation rights, "phantom" stock rights, performance units, rights to receive shares of Company Common Stock on a deferred basis or other rights (other than Company Stock Options) that are linked to the value of Company Common Stock.  Section 3.01(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list, as of October 13, 2006, of all outstanding Company Stock Options under the Company Stock Plans, the number of unpurchased shares of Company Common Stock subject thereto, the grant dates, expiration dates, exercise prices and vesting schedules thereof and the names of the holders thereof.  Section 3.01(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule also sets forth the aggregate number of unpurchased shares of Company Common Stock subject to outstanding Company Stock Options with exercise prices on a per share basis lower than $5.00 and the weighted average exercise price of such Company Stock Options.  All Company Stock Options are evidenced by stock option agreements in the forms set forth in Section 3.01(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, and no stock option agreement contains terms that are inconsistent with such forms.  With respect to the Company Stock Options, (A) each grant of a Company Stock Option was duly authorized no later than the date on which the grant of such Company Stock Option was by its terms to be effective (the "") by all necessary corporate action, including, as applicable, approval by the Board of Directors of the Company (or a duly constituted and authorized committee thereof) and any required shareholder approval by the necessary number of votes or written consents, and the award agreement governing such grant (if any) was duly executed and delivered by each party thereto, (B) each such grant was made in accordance with the terms of the applicable Company Stock Plan, the Exchange Act and all other applicable statutes, laws, ordinances, rules, regulations, orders, writs, injunctions, decrees, judgments or stipulations (""), including the rules and regulations of The NASDAQ Global Market and its predecessor markets ("") or any other exchange on which Company securities are traded, (C) the per share exercise price of each Company Stock Option was equal to the fair market value of a share of Company Common Stock on the applicable Grant Date and (D) each such grant was properly accounted for in accordance with GAAP in the audited financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents and disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents in accordance with the Exchange Act and all other applicable Legal Provisions.  The Company has terminated the Company 2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the ""), and no employee of the Company has any rights to purchase shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to the Company ESPP.  All outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are, and all shares which may be issued pursuant to the Company Stock Options will be, when issued in accordance with the terms thereof, duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and not
Rights
Rights Agreement
Grant Date
Legal Provisions
Nasdaq
Company ESPP
9
subject to preemptive rights.  There are no bonds, debentures, notes or other indebtedness of the Company having the right to vote (or convertible into, or exchangeable for, securities having the right to vote) on any matters on which shareholders of the Company may vote.  Except as set forth above in this Section 3.01(c), (x) there are not issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding (A) any shares of capital stock or other voting securities or equity interests of the Company, (B) any securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for shares of capital stock or other voting securities or equity interests of the Company or (C) any warrants, calls, options or other rights to acquire from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, and no obligation of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to issue, any capital stock, voting securities, equity interests or securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for capital stock or voting securities of the Company and (y) there are not any outstanding obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any such securities or to issue, deliver or sell, or cause to be issued, delivered or sold, any such securities.  Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to any voting agreement with respect to the voting of any such securities.  Except as set forth above in this Section 3.01(c), there are no outstanding (1) securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for shares of capital stock or voting securities or equity interests of any Subsidiary of the Company, (2) warrants, calls, options or other rights to acquire from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, and no obligation of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to issue, any capital stock, voting securities, equity interests or securities convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for capital stock or voting securities of any Subsidiary of the Company or (3) obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any such outstanding securities of any Subsidiary of the Company or to issue, deliver or sell, or cause to be issued, delivered or sold, any such securities of any Subsidiary of the Company.
(d)   The Company has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and, subject to receipt of the affirmative vote of holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock at the meeting of the Company's shareholders (the "") or any adjournment or postponement thereof to adopt this Agreement (the ""), to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.  The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company and no other corporate proceedings on the part of the Company are necessary to authorize this Agreement or to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby, subject, in the case of the consummation of the Merger, to the obtaining of the Shareholder Approval.  This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery by each of the other parties hereto, constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to (i) bankruptcy, insolvency, moratorium, reorganization or similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally and the availability of equitable remedies and (ii) the remedy of specific performance and injunctive relief may be subject to equitable defenses and to the discretion of the court
Authority; Noncontravention.
Shareholders' Meeting
Shareholder Approval
10
before which any proceeding therefor may be brought.  Each of the Board of Directors of the Company, at a meeting duly called and held at which all directors of the Company were present, and the Special Committee, at a meeting duly called and held at which all members thereof were present, duly and unanimously adopted resolutions (i) approving this Agreement, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement and (ii) recommending that the shareholders of the Company adopt this Agreement, which resolutions, as of the date of this Agreement, have not been subsequently rescinded, modified or withdrawn in any way.  Each of the Company, the Company's Board of Directors and the Special Committee has taken all actions necessary to ensure that no "control share acquisitions", "business combinations", "fair price" (including Sections 302A.671, .673 and .675 of the MBCA) or other state takeover laws or other state takeover statute or similar statute or regulation applies to this Agreement, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.  The execution and delivery of this Agreement do not, and the consummation of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement and compliance with the provisions of this Agreement will not, conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of, or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of, or result in, termination, cancellation or acceleration of any obligation or to the loss of a benefit under, or result in the creation of any Lien in or upon any of the properties or other assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries under, (x) the Company Articles or the Company By-laws or the comparable organizational documents of any of its Subsidiaries, (y) any loan or credit agreement, bond, debenture, note, mortgage, indenture, lease, supply agreement, license agreement, development agreement, distribution agreement or other contract, agreement, obligation, commitment, arrangement, understanding, instrument, permit, franchise or license, whether oral or written (each, including all amendments thereto, a ""), to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or any of their respective properties or other assets is subject or (z) subject to (i) the Shareholder Approval and (ii) the governmental filings and the other matters referred to in the following sentence, any applicable Legal Provisions, other than, in the case of clauses (y) and (z), any such conflicts, violations, breaches, defaults, rights, losses or Liens that individually or in the aggregate have not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  No consent, approval, order or authorization of, action by or in respect of, or registration, declaration or filing with, any Governmental Entity is required by or with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company or the consummation of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, except for (1) the filing of a premerger notification and report form by the Company with the U.S. Federal Trade Commission and the Antitrust Division of the Department of Justice (the "") under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended (including the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the ""), and the receipt, termination or expiration, as applicable, of approvals or waiting periods required under the HSR Act or any other applicable competition, merger control, antitrust or similar law or regulation, (2) the filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") of (A) a proxy statement relating to the Shareholder Approval (as amended or supplemented from time to time, the "") and (B) such reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended
Contract
HSR Filing
HSR Act
SEC
Proxy Statement
11
(including the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the ""), as may be required in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (3) the filing of the Articles of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota and appropriate documents with the relevant authorities of other states in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is qualified to do business, (4) any filings required under the rules and regulations of Nasdaq and (5) such other consents, approvals, orders, authorizations, actions, registrations, declarations and filings the failure of which to be obtained or made individually or in the aggregate has not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
Exchange Act
(e)   (i) The Company has filed all reports, schedules, forms, statements and other documents (including exhibits and other information incorporated therein) with the SEC required to be filed by the Company since April 1, 2004 (such documents, together with any documents filed during such period by the Company with the SEC on a voluntary basis on Current Reports on Form 8-K, the "").  As of their respective filing dates, the Company SEC Documents complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (including the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the ""), the Exchange Act, and the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (including the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, "") to the extent applicable to such Company SEC Documents, and none of the Company SEC Documents contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.  Except to the extent that information contained in any Company SEC Document has been revised, amended, supplemented or superseded by a later-filed Company SEC Document, none of the Company SEC Documents contains any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.  None of the Subsidiaries of the Company are, or have at any time, been subject to the reporting requirements of Sections 13(a) and 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
Company SEC Documents.
Company SEC Documents
Securities Act
SOX
(ii) Each of the financial statements (including the related notes) of the Company included in the Company SEC Documents complied at the time it was filed as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements and the published rules and regulations of the SEC with respect thereto in effect at the time of filing, has been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States ("") (except, in the case of unaudited statements, as permitted by the rules and regulations of the SEC) applied on a consistent basis during the periods involved (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto) and fairly presented in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the dates thereof and the consolidated results of their operations and cash flows for the periods then ended (subject, in the case of unaudited statements, to normal year-end audit adjustments).
GAAP
12
(iii) Except as disclosed in the Company SEC Documents filed by the Company and publicly available prior to the date of this Agreement (excluding (i) the cautionary, predictive and forward looking disclosures set forth in the risk factor and forward looking statements sections included therein and (ii) disclosures in any other sections included therein, solely to the extent that those sections include disclosures that are cautionary, predictive and forward looking in nature, the ""), neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any material liabilities or obligations of any nature (whether accrued, absolute, contingent or otherwise).
Filed Company SEC Documents
(iv) Subject to the applicable reserve for bad debts (which were determined in accordance with GAAP consistent with past practice) on the most recent audited balance sheet included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, all accounts receivable of the Company reflected on such balance sheet were valid receivables as of such date subject to no setoffs or counterclaims.  All accounts receivable of the Company have arisen from bona fide transactions in the ordinary course of business. Since the date of the most recent audited balance sheet included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, there have not been any write-offs as uncollectible of any customer accounts receivable of the Company and the Subsidiaries, except for write-offs in the ordinary course of the business of the Company and the Subsidiaries and consistent with past practice.
(v) All items in the inventories of the Company (the "") reflected on the most recent audited balance sheet included in the Filed Company SEC Documents or existing at the date hereof are of a quality and quantity saleable or usable in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices of the Company, subject to the reserves or provisions reflected in the Inventory valuation in such balance sheet.  Such Inventory reflects reserves or provisions which were determined in accordance with GAAP consistent with the Company's past practices and procedures for items which are below standard quality, represent excess quantities or have become obsolete or unsaleable or unusable (except at prices less than cost) in the ordinary course of business.  No material reserves or provisions for Inventory since the date of the most recent audited balance sheet included in the Filed Company SEC Documents have been, or are required to be, recorded.  Except for Inventory items in transit at any time or held by distributors, all Inventory items are located on any real property or interest in real property owned in fee by the Company or its Subsidiaries (individually, an "") or any real property or interest in real property leased, subleased or occupied by the Company or its Subsidiaries (individually, a "").  An Owned Property or Leased Property is sometimes referred to herein, individually, as a "" and collectively, as "".  Since the date of the most recent audited balance sheet included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, no Inventory items have been sold, leased or disposed of, except through sales and leases in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices.
Inventory
Owned Property
Leased Property
Company Property
Company Properties
13
(vi) Each of the principal executive officer of the Company and the principal financial officer of the Company (or each former principal executive officer of the Company and each former principal financial officer of the Company, as applicable) has made all applicable certifications required by Rule 13a-14 or 15d-14 under the Exchange Act and Sections 302 and 906 of SOX with respect to the Company SEC Documents, and the statements contained in such certifications are complete and accurate.  For purposes of this Agreement, "principal executive officer" and "principal financial officer" shall have the meanings given to such terms in SOX.  None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has outstanding, or has arranged any outstanding, "extensions of credit" to directors or executive officers within the meaning of Section 402 of SOX.
(vii) The Company maintains a system of "internal control over financial reporting" (as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) of the Exchange Act) sufficient to provide reasonable assurance (A) that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP, consistently applied, (B) that transactions are executed only in accordance with the authorization of management and (C) regarding prevention or timely detection of the unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company's assets.
(viii) The "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of the Exchange Act) utilized by the Company are reasonably designed to ensure that all information (both financial and non-financial) required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of the SEC, and that all such information required to be disclosed is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure and to enable the chief executive officer and chief financial officer of the Company to make the certifications required under the Exchange Act with respect to such reports.
(ix) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to, or has any commitment to become a party to, any joint venture, off balance sheet partnership or any similar Contract (including any Contract or arrangement relating to any transaction or relationship between or among the Company and any of its Subsidiaries, on the one hand, and any unconsolidated Affiliate, including any structured finance, special purpose or limited purpose entity or person, on the other hand, or any "off balance sheet arrangements" (as defined in Item 303(a) of Regulation S-K under the Exchange Act)), where the result, purpose or intended effect of such Contract is to avoid disclosure of any material transaction involving, or material liabilities of, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in the Company's or such Subsidiary's published financial statements or other Company SEC Documents.
14
(x) Since April 1, 2004, the Company has not received any oral or written notification of any (A) "significant deficiency" or (B) "material weakness" in the Company's internal controls over financial reporting.  There is no outstanding "significant deficiency" or "material weakness" that has not been appropriately and adequately remedied by the Company.  For purposes of this Agreement, the terms "significant deficiency" and "material weakness" shall have the meanings assigned to them in Release 2004-001 of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board, as in effect on the date hereof.
(f)   None of the information supplied or to be supplied by the Company, or on behalf of the Company by financial, legal or accounting advisors to the Company, either orally during any in person or telephonic meetings in which representatives of the Company are present or in writing, specifically for inclusion or incorporation by reference in (i) the registration statement on Form S-4 to be filed with the SEC by Parent in connection with the issuance of shares of Parent Common Stock in the Merger (as amended or supplemented from time to time, the "") will, at the time the Form S-4 is filed with the SEC, at any time it is amended or supplemented and at the time it becomes effective under the Securities Act, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading or (ii) the Proxy Statement will, at the date the Proxy Statement is first mailed to the shareholders of the Company and at the time of the Shareholders' Meeting, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, except that no representation, warranty or covenant is made by the Company with respect to statements made or incorporated by reference therein based on information supplied by Parent or Sub, or on behalf of Parent or Sub by financial, legal or accounting advisors to Parent or Sub, either orally during any in person or telephonic meetings in which representatives of Parent are present or in writing, specifically for inclusion or incorporation by reference in the Form S-4 or the Proxy Statement.  The Proxy Statement will comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act.
Information Supplied.
Form S-4
(g)   Except for liabilities incurred in connection with this Agreement and except as disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents or as expressly permitted pursuant to Section 4.01(a)(i) through (xv), since the date of the most recent audited financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, the Company and its Subsidiaries have conducted their respective businesses only in the ordinary course consistent with past practice, and there has not been any Company Material Adverse Change, and from such date until the date hereof there has not been (i) any declaration, setting aside or payment of any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, stock or property) with respect to any capital stock of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (ii) any purchase, redemption or other acquisition by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of any shares of capital stock or any other securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any options, warrants, calls or rights to acquire such shares or other securities, (iii) any split, combination or reclassification of any capital stock of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any
Absence of Certain Changes or Events.
15
issuance or the authorization of any issuance of any other securities in respect of, in lieu of or in substitution for shares of their respective capital stock, (iv) (A) any granting by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of any increase in compensation, bonus or fringe or other benefits or any granting of any type of compensation or benefits to any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant not previously receiving or entitled to receive such type of compensation or benefit, except as was required under any Company Benefit Agreement or Company Benefit Plan in effect as of the date of the most recent audited financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, (B) any granting by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of any right to receive any increase in change of control, severance or termination compensation or benefits, or (C) any entry by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries into or any amendments of (1) any employment, deferred compensation, consulting, severance, change of control, termination or indemnification agreement or any other agreement, plan or policy with or involving any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or (2) any agreement with any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, the benefits of which are contingent, or the terms of which are materially altered, upon the occurrence of a transaction involving the Company of a nature contemplated by this Agreement (all such agreements under this clause (C), collectively, ""), (D) any adoption of, any amendment to or any termination of any collective bargaining agreement or any Company Benefit Plan, (E) any payment of any benefit or grant of any award under Company Benefit Agreement or Company Benefit Plan (including in respect of stock options, "phantom" stock, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock, "phantom" stock rights, restricted stock units, deferred stock units, performance stock units or other stock-based or stock-related awards or the removal or modification of any restrictions in any Company Benefit Agreement or Company Benefit Plan or awards made thereunder) except as required to comply with applicable Legal Provisions or any Company Benefit Agreement or Company Benefit Plan in effect as of the date of the most recent audited financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, (F) any action to accelerate the vesting or time of payment of any compensation or benefit under any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement or (G) any action to fund or in any other way secure the payment of compensation or benefits under any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement, (v) any damage, destruction or loss to any asset of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, whether or not covered by insurance, that individually or in the aggregate has had or could reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, (vi) any change in accounting methods, principles or practices by the Company materially affecting its assets, liabilities or businesses, except insofar as may have been required by a change in GAAP or (vii) any material tax election or any settlement or compromise of any material income tax liability.
Company Benefit Agreements
(h)   Except as disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents, there is no suit, action or proceeding pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective assets that individually or in the aggregate has had or could reasonably
Litigation.
16
be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect, nor is there any judgment, decree, injunction, rule or order of any Governmental Entity or arbitrator outstanding against, or, to the Knowledge of the Company, investigation by any Governmental Entity involving, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective assets that individually or in the aggregate has had or could reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(i)   Except as disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents and except with respect to licenses and other agreements relating to intellectual property, which are the subject of Section 3.01(p), as of the date hereof, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to, and none of their respective properties or other assets is subject to, any Contract that is material to the business, condition (financial or otherwise), properties, assets or results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or of a nature required to be filed as an exhibit to a report or filing under the Securities Act or the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.  None of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or, to the Knowledge of the Company, any other party thereto is in violation of or in default under (nor does there exist any condition which upon the passage of time or the giving of notice or both would cause such a violation of or default under) any Contract, to which it is a party or by which it or any of its properties or other assets is bound, except for violations or defaults that individually or in the aggregate have not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has entered into any Contract with any Affiliate of the Company that is currently in effect other than agreements that are disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents.  None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party to or otherwise bound by any agreement or covenant (A) restricting the Company's or any of its Affiliates' ability to compete or by any agreement or covenant restricting in any respect the research, development, distribution, sale, supply, license, marketing or manufacturing of products or services of the Company or any of its Affiliates, (B) containing a right of first refusal, right of first negotiation or right of first offer or (C) containing any material indemnity obligations to third parties.
Contracts.
(j)   (i) Except with respect to Environmental Laws (as defined in clause (iii) below), the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (""), and taxes, which are the subjects of Sections 3.01(j)(ii), 3.01(l) and 3.01(n), respectively, and except as set forth in the Filed Company SEC Documents, each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all applicable Legal Provisions, except for failures to be in compliance that individually or in the aggregate have not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has in effect all approvals, authorizations, certificates, filings, franchises, licenses, notices and permits of or with all Governmental Entities (collectively, "") necessary for it to own, lease or operate its properties and other assets and to carry on its business and operations as presently conducted and as currently proposed by its management to be conducted, except where the failure to have such Permits individually or in the aggregate has not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  There has occurred no default under, or violation
Compliance with Laws; Environmental Matters.
ERISA
Permits
17
of, any such Permit, except for any such default or violation that individually or in the aggregate has not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  The consummation of the Merger, in and of itself, would not cause the revocation or cancellation of any such Permit that individually or in the aggregate could reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  No material action, demand, requirement or investigation by any Governmental Entity and no material suit, action or proceeding by any other person, in each case with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective properties or other assets under any Legal Provision, is pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened.
(ii) Except for those matters disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents: (A) each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is, and has been, in compliance in all material respects with all Environmental Laws, and, except for matters on which the Company or its Subsidiaries have obtained full and final resolution, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received any (y) written communication that alleges that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is in material violation of, or has any material liability under, any Environmental Law or (z) written request for information pursuant to any Environmental Law; (B)(y) each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has obtained and is in compliance in all material respects with all permits, licenses and governmental authorizations pursuant to Environmental Law (collectively "") necessary for its operations as currently conducted and (z) all such Environmental Permits are valid and in good standing; (C) there are no material Environmental Claims (as defined below) pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened, against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is subject to any material outstanding judgment, order or decree pursuant to or under Environmental Laws; (D) there have been no Releases (as defined in clause (iii) below) of any Hazardous Material (as defined in clause (iii) below) that could reasonably be expected to form the basis of any material Environmental Claim against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or against any Person whose liabilities for such Environmental Claims the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has, or may have, retained or assumed, either contractually or by operation of law; (E) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has retained or assumed, either contractually or by operation of law, any liabilities or obligations that could reasonably be expected to form the basis of any material Environmental Claim against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries; (F) none of the operations of the Company, its Subsidiaries, or any of their respective products requires, or is reasonably expected to require, a material expenditure in order to comply with the requirements of the Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive (2002/96/EC), the Restriction of Hazardous Substances Directive (2002/95/ED) or of any similar Environmental Law restricting the manufacture, sale, distribution, use, handling, disposal or recycling of electrical and electronic equipment or products containing hazardous substances, and none of such requirements could reasonably be expected to result in a material restriction on the operations of the Company or its Subsidiaries, as currently conducted; (G) there are no facts, circumstances or conditions that could reasonably be expected
Environmental Permits
18
to form the basis for any material Environmental Claim against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries; and (H) the Company has provided Parent with complete and accurate copies of all environmental reports, studies and audits of the Company Properties and operations in the Company's possession.
(iii)   For purposes of this Agreement:
Definitions.
(1) "" means any and all administrative, regulatory or judicial actions, suits, orders, demands, directives, claims, liens, investigations, proceedings or written or oral notices of noncompliance or violation by or from any person alleging liability of whatever kind of nature (including liability or responsibility for the costs of enforcement proceedings, investigations, cleanup, governmental response, removal or remediation, natural resources damages, property damages, personal injuries, medical monitoring, penalties, contribution, indemnification and injunctive relief) arising out of, based on or resulting from (y) the presence or Release of, or exposure to, any Hazardous Materials at any location; or (z) the failure to comply with any Environmental Law.
Environmental Claim
(2) "" means all applicable Federal, state, local and foreign laws (including common law), rules, regulations, directives, orders, decrees, judgments, legally binding agreements or Environmental Permits issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Entity, relating to pollution, natural resources or protection of endangered or threatened species, human health, the environment (including ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or the generation, use, storage, treatment, disposal, transport or recycling of Hazardous Materials.
Environmental Laws
(3) "" means (y) any petroleum or petroleum products, radioactive materials or wastes, asbestos in any form, urea formaldehyde foam insulation and polychlorinated biphenyls; and (z) any other chemical, material, substance or waste that is prohibited, limited or regulated under any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
(4) "" means any actual or threatened release, spill, emission, leaking, dumping, injection, pouring, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration into or through the environment (including ambient air, surface water, groundwater, land surface or subsurface strata) or within any building, structure, facility or fixture.
Release
19
(k)   Except as disclosed in the Filed Company SEC Documents or as expressly permitted pursuant to Section 4.01(a)(xiii), since the date of the most recent audited financial statements included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, there has not been any adoption, amendment or termination by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of any collective bargaining agreement or any employment, bonus, pension, profit sharing, deferred compensation, incentive compensation, stock ownership, stock purchase, equity or equity-based compensation, performance, retirement, thrift, savings, paid time off, perquisite, fringe benefit, vacation, change of control, severance, disability, death benefit, hospitalization, medical, welfare benefit or other plan, program, policy, arrangement, agreement or understanding (whether or not legally binding) sponsored, maintained, contributed to or required to be maintained or contributed to by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any other person or entity that, together with the Company, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b), (c), (m) or (o) of the Code (each, a ""), in each case providing benefits to any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (collectively, the ""), or any material change in any actuarial or other assumption used to calculate funding obligations with respect to any Company Pension Plan, or any change in the manner in which contributions to any Company Pension Plan are made or the basis on which such contributions are determined, other than amendments or other changes as required to ensure that such Company Benefit Plan is not then out of compliance with applicable Legal Provisions, or reasonably determined by the Company to be necessary or appropriate to preserve the qualified status of a Company Pension Plan under Section 401(a) of the Code.  Any shares of capital stock, options, rights, warrants or other securities issued, granted or purchased under any Company Benefit Plan have been issued, granted or purchased in compliance with applicable Legal Provisions.  There are no collective bargaining or other labor union agreements to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is bound.  As of the date hereof, none of the employees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries are represented by any union with respect to their employment by the Company or such Subsidiary.  As of the date hereof, since April 1, 2004, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has experienced any labor disputes, union organization attempts or work stoppages, slowdowns or lockouts due to labor disagreements, and there are no unfair labor practice complaints pending against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries before the National Labor Relations Board or any other Governmental Entity.
Absence of Changes in Company Benefit Plans; Labor Relations.
Commonly Controlled Entity
Company Benefit Plans
(l)   (i) Section 3.01(l)(i) of the Company Disclosure Schedule contains a complete and accurate list of each Company Benefit Plan that is an "employee pension benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA) (sometimes referred to herein as a ""), each Company Benefit Plan that is an "employee welfare benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA) and all other Company Benefit Plans and each Company Benefit Agreement.  The Company has provided to, or has made available to, Parent complete and accurate copies of (A) each Company Benefit Plan (or, in the case of any unwritten Company Benefit Plans, descriptions thereof) and each Company Benefit Agreement, (B) the two most recent annual reports on Form 5500 required to be filed with the
ERISA Compliance; Company Benefit Agreements.
Company Pension Plan
 
20
Internal Revenue Service (the "") with respect to each Company Benefit Plan (if any such report was required), (C) the most recent summary plan description for each Company Benefit Plan for which such summary plan description is required, (D) each trust agreement and insurance or group annuity contract relating to any Company Benefit Plan and (E) the most recent actuarial report or financial statements for each Company Pension Plan.  Each Company Benefit Plan has been administered in all material respects in accordance with its terms.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries and each of the Company Benefit Plans is in compliance in all material respects with the applicable provisions of ERISA, the Code and all other applicable Legal Provisions, including Legal Provisions of foreign jurisdictions, and the terms of all collective bargaining agreements.
IRS
(ii) Each Company Pension Plan intended to be tax-qualified has been subject of a favorable determination letter from the IRS with respect to all tax law changes with respect to which the IRS is currently willing to provide a determination letter, to the effect that such Company Pension Plan is qualified and exempt from Federal income taxes under Sections 401(a) and 501(a), respectively, of the Code, no such determination letter has been revoked (nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, has revocation been threatened) and no event has occurred since the date of the most recent determination letter or application therefor relating to any such Company Pension Plan that could reasonably be expected to adversely affect the qualification of such Company Pension Plan or materially increase the costs relating thereto or require security under Section 307 of ERISA.  All Company Pension Plans required to have been approved by any foreign Governmental Entity have been so approved, no such approval has been revoked (nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, has revocation been threatened) and no event has occurred since the date of the most recent approval or application therefor relating to any such Company Pension Plan that could reasonably be expected to materially affect any such approval relating thereto or materially increase the costs relating thereto.  The Company has delivered to Parent a complete and accurate copy of the most recent determination letter received prior to the date hereof with respect to each Company Pension Plan, as well as a complete and accurate copy of each pending application for a determination letter, if any.  The Company has also provided to Parent a complete and accurate list of all amendments to any Company Pension Plan as to which a favorable determination letter has not yet been received.
(iii) Neither the Company nor any Commonly Controlled Entity (A) has sponsored, maintained, contributed to or been required to sponsor, maintain or contribute to any Company Benefit Plan that is a "defined benefit plan" (as defined in Section 3(35) of ERISA) or a "multiemployer plan" (within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA), or that is subject to Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 or Title IV of ERISA or (B) has any actual or contingent liability, or could incur any liability, under Title IV of ERISA.
(iv) All reports, returns and similar documents with respect to all Company Benefit Plans required to be filed with any Governmental Entity or distributed to any Company Benefit Plan participant have been duly and timely
21
filed or distributed in all material respects.  None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received notice of, and to the Knowledge of the Company, there are no investigations by any Governmental Entity with respect to, termination proceedings or other claims (except claims for benefits payable in the normal operation of the Company Benefit Plans), suits or proceedings against or involving any Company Benefit Plan or asserting any rights or claims to benefits under any Company Benefit Plan that could give rise to any material liability, and, to the Knowledge of the Company, there are not any facts that could give rise to any material liability in the event of any such investigation, claim, suit or proceeding.
(v) All contributions, premiums and benefit payments under or in connection with the Company Benefit Plans that are required to have been made as of the date hereof in accordance with the terms of the Company Benefit Plans have been timely made or have been reflected on the most recent consolidated balance sheet filed or incorporated by reference into the Filed Company SEC Documents.
(vi) With respect to each Company Benefit Plan, (A) there has not occurred any prohibited transaction (within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code) in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective employees, or, to the Knowledge of the Company, any trustee, administrator or other fiduciary of such Company Benefit Plan, or any agent of the foregoing, has engaged that could reasonably be expected to subject the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective employees, or, to the Knowledge of the Company, a trustee, administrator or other fiduciary of any trust created under any Company Benefit Plan, to the tax or penalty on prohibited transactions imposed by Section 4975 of the Code or the sanctions imposed under Title I of ERISA and (B) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, any trustee, administrator or other fiduciary of any Company Benefit Plan nor any agent of any of the foregoing, has engaged in any transaction or acted in a manner, or failed to act in a manner, that could reasonably be expected to subject the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or, to the Knowledge of the Company, any trustee, administrator or other fiduciary, to any liability for breach of fiduciary duty under ERISA or any other applicable law.  No Company Benefit Plan or related trust has been terminated during the last five years, nor has there been any "reportable event" (as that term is defined in Section 4043 of ERISA) for which the 30-day reporting requirement has not been waived with respect to any Company Benefit Plan during the last five years, and no notice of a reportable event will be required to be filed in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
(vii) Section 3.01(l)(vii) of the Company Disclosure Schedule discloses whether each Company Benefit Plan that is an employee welfare benefit plan is (A) unfunded or self-insured, (B) funded through a "welfare benefit fund", as such term is defined in Section 419(e) of the Code, or other funding mechanism or (C) insured.  Each such employee welfare benefit plan may be amended or
22
terminated (including with respect to benefits provided to retirees and other former employees) without material liability to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries at any time after the Effective Time.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries complies in all material respects with the applicable requirements of Section 4980B(f) of the Code, Sections 601-609 of ERISA and any similar state or local law with respect to each Company Benefit Plan that is a group health plan, as such term is defined in Section 5000(b)(1) of the Code or such state or local law.  Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any material obligations for retiree health or life insurance benefits under any Company Benefit Plan (other than for continuation coverage required under Section 4980B(f) of the Code).
(viii) None of the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the obtaining of the Shareholder Approval, the consummation of the Merger or any other transactions contemplated by this Agreement and any termination of employment on or following the Effective Time will (A) entitle any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to severance or termination compensation or benefits, (B) accelerate the time of payment or vesting, or trigger any payment or funding (through a grantor trust or otherwise), of compensation or benefits under, or increase the amount payable or trigger any other material obligation pursuant to, any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement or otherwise or (C) result in any breach or violation of, or a default under, any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement.  The total amount of all cash compensation and benefit payments and the fair market value of all non-cash benefits (other than Company Stock Options) that may become payable or provided to any director or officer of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries under the Company Benefit Agreements (assuming for such purpose that such individuals' employment were terminated immediately following the Effective Time as if the Effective Time were the date hereof) will not exceed the amount set forth in Section 3.01(l)(viii) of the Company Disclosure Schedule.
(ix) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any material liability or obligations, including under or on account of a Company Benefit Plan, arising out of the hiring of persons to provide services to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and treating such persons as consultants or independent contractors and not as employees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
(x) No deduction by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of any "applicable employee remuneration" (within the meaning of Section 162(m) of the Code) has been disallowed or is subject to disallowance by reason of Section 162(m) of the Code.
(m)   No amount or other entitlement or economic benefit that could be received (whether in cash or property or the vesting of property) as a result of the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the obtaining of the Shareholder Approval, the consummation of the Merger or any other
No Excess Parachute Payments; Tax Gross-Ups.
23
transactions contemplated by this Agreement (including as a result of termination of employment on or following the Effective Time) by or for the benefit of any person who is a "disqualified individual" (as such term is defined in Treasury Regulation Section 1.280G-1) with respect to the Company (each such person, a "") under any Company Benefit Plan, Company Benefit Agreement or otherwise would be characterized as an "excess parachute payment" (as such term is defined in Section 280G(b)(1) of the Code).  Section 3.01(m) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth, calculated as of the date of this Agreement, (i) the "base amount" (as such term is defined in Section 280G(b)(3) of the Code) for each Company Disqualified Individual and (ii) the estimated maximum amount of "parachute payments" (as defined in Section 280G of the Code) that could be paid or provided to each Company Disqualified Individual as a result of the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the obtaining of the Shareholder Approval, the consummation of the Merger or any other transactions contemplated by this Agreement (including as a result of any termination of employment on or following the Effective Time).  No current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is entitled to any gross-up, make-whole or other additional payment from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of any tax (including Federal, state, local and foreign income, excise and other taxes (including taxes imposed under sections 4999(a) or 409A of the Code)) or interest or penalty related thereto.
Company Disqualified Individual
(n)   (i) Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries and each Company Consolidated Group has filed, or has caused to be filed, in a timely manner (within any applicable extension period) all material tax returns required to be filed with any taxing authority pursuant to the Code or applicable state, local or foreign tax laws.  All such tax returns are complete and accurate in all material respects and have been prepared in substantial compliance with all applicable Legal Provisions.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries and each Company Consolidated Group has paid or caused to be paid (or the Company has paid on its behalf) in a timely manner all taxes due and owing, and the most recent financial statements contained in the Filed Company SEC Documents reflect an adequate reserve (determined in accordance with GAAP) (excluding any reserves for deferred taxes established to reflect temporary differences between book and tax income) for all taxes payable by the Company and its Subsidiaries for all taxable periods and portions thereof accrued through the date of such financial statements.
Taxes.
(ii) No tax return of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any Company Consolidated Group is under audit or examination by any taxing authority, and no notice or threat of such an audit or examination has been received by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any Company Consolidated Group.  There is no deficiency, refund litigation, proposed adjustment or matter in controversy with respect to any material amount of taxes due and owing by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any Company Consolidated Group.  Each deficiency resulting from any completed audit or examination relating to taxes by any taxing authority has been timely paid or is being contested in good faith and has been reserved for on the books of the Company.  No issues relating to any material amount of taxes were raised by the relevant taxing authority in any
24
completed audit or examination that could reasonably be expected to recur in a later taxable period.  There is no currently effective agreement or other document extending, or having the effect of extending, the period of assessment or collection of any taxes of the Company or its Subsidiaries or any Company Consolidated Group, nor has any request been made for any such extension, and no power of attorney (other than powers of attorney authorizing employees of the Company to act on behalf of the Company) with respect to any taxes has been executed or filed with any taxing authority.
(iii) None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries will be required to include in a taxable period ending after the Effective Time taxable income attributable to income that accrued (for purposes of the financial statements of the Company included in the Filed Company SEC Documents) in a prior taxable period (or portion of a taxable period) but was not recognized for tax purposes in any prior taxable period as a result of (A) the installment method of accounting, (B) the completed contract method of accounting, (C) the long-term contract method of accounting, (D) the cash method of accounting or Section 481 of the Code or (E) any comparable provisions of state or local tax law, domestic or foreign, or for any other reason, other than any amounts that are specifically reflected in a reserve for taxes on the financial statements of the Company included in the Filed Company SEC Documents.
(iv) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has taken or agreed to take any action or knows of any fact, agreement, plan or other circumstance that is reasonably likely to prevent or impede the Merger from constituting a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code.
(v) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has constituted either a "distributing corporation" or a "controlled corporation" in a distribution of stock qualifying for tax-free treatment under Section 355 of the Code (A) in the two years prior to the date of this Agreement or (B) in a distribution which could otherwise constitute part of a "plan" or "series of related transactions" (within the meaning of Section 355(e) of the Code) in conjunction with the Merger.
(vi) The Company and its Subsidiaries have fully complied with all applicable Legal Provisions relating to the payment and withholding of any material amount of taxes (including withholding of taxes pursuant to Sections 1441, 1442, 3121 and 3402 of the Code and similar provisions under any Federal, state, local or foreign tax laws) and have, within the time and the manner prescribed by law, withheld from and paid over to the proper governmental authorities all material amounts required to be so withheld and paid over under applicable laws.
(vii) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries joins or has joined, for any taxable period in the filing of any affiliated, aggregate, consolidated, combined or unitary tax return, other than tax returns for the
25
affiliated, aggregate, consolidated, combined or unitary group of which the Company is the common parent.
(viii) No written claim has ever been made by any authority in a jurisdiction where any of the Company or its Subsidiaries does not file a tax return that it is, or may be, subject to a material amount of tax by that jurisdiction.
(ix) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to or bound by any tax sharing agreement, tax indemnity obligation or similar agreement, arrangement or practice with respect to taxes (including any advance pricing agreement, closing agreement or other agreement relating to taxes with any taxing authority).
(x) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has entered into any "reportable transaction" (as defined in Treasury Regulation Section 1.6011-4(b)) during the five years prior to the date of this Agreement.
(xi) No taxing authority has asserted any material liens for taxes with respect to any assets or properties of the Company or its Subsidiaries, except for statutory liens for taxes not yet due and payable.
(xii) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has been a United States real property holding corporation within the meaning of Section 897(c)(2) of the Code during the applicable period specified in Section 897(c)(1)(A)(ii) of the Code.
(xiii) As used in this Agreement (A) "" or "" shall include (whether disputed or not) all (x) Federal, state, local and foreign income, franchise, property, sales, use, excise, withholding, payroll, employment, social security, capital gain, alternative minimum, transfer and other taxes and similar governmental charges, including any interest, penalties and additions with respect thereto, (y) liability for the payment of any amounts of the type described in clause (x) as a result of being a member of an affiliated, consolidated, combined, unitary or aggregate group and (z) liability for the payment of any amounts as a result of being party to any tax sharing agreement or as a result of any express or implied obligation to indemnify any other person with respect to the payment of any amounts of the type described in clause (x) or (y); (B) "" means any affiliated group within the meaning of Section 1504(a) of the Code, or any other similar state, local or foreign law, in which the Company (or any Subsidiary of the Company) is or has ever been a member or any group of corporations with which the Company files, has filed or is or was required to file an affiliated, consolidated, combined, unitary or aggregate tax return; (C) "" means any Federal, state, local or foreign government, any subdivision, agency, commission or authority thereof, or any quasi-governmental body exercising tax regulatory authority; and (D) "" or "" means all returns, declarations of estimated tax payments, reports, estimates, information returns and statements, including any related or
tax
taxes
Company Consolidated Group
taxing authority
tax return
tax returns
26
supporting information with respect to any of foregoing, filed or to be filed with any taxing authority in connection with the determination, assessment, collection or administration of any taxes.
(o)   (i) The Company and its Subsidiaries have good and marketable title to, or in the case of leased property and assets, have valid leasehold interests in, all assets (whether real, personal, tangible or intangible) reflected on the most recent audited balance sheet included in the Filed Company SEC Documents, free and clear of all Liens other than Permitted Liens, except for properties and assets sold in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices in accordance with this Agreement.  The assets owned or leased by the Company and its Subsidiaries, or which they otherwise have the right to use, are sufficient to operate their businesses as they are as currently conducted and as currently proposed by its management to be conducted.
Title to Properties.
(ii) Section 3.01(o)(ii)(A) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list of all Owned Property and identifies their addresses.  Section 3.01(o)(ii)(B) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list of all Leased Property and identifies their addresses.  The Company has delivered to Parent a complete and accurate copy of each such lease, sublease or occupancy agreement, together with all amendments thereto, with respect to any Leased Property under which the Company or one of its Subsidiaries is a lessee or sublessee (each, a "").  The Company Properties comprise all of the real property used in, or otherwise related to, the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Lease
(iii) With respect to each Owned Property, (a) the Company or one of its Subsidiaries has good and valid fee simple title, free and clear of all Liens, except Permitted Liens and such Liens as may be set forth in Section 3.01(o)(iii) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, (b) the Company or the applicable Subsidiary has not leased or otherwise granted to anyone the right to use or occupy such Owned Property or any portion thereof, (c) there are no outstanding options, rights of first offer or rights of first refusal to purchase such Owned Property or any portion thereof or interest therein, (d) all improvements on such Owned Property are in good condition and repair and sufficient for the operation of the Company's or the applicable Subsidiary's business and (e) there is no condemnation or other proceeding in eminent domain, pending or threatened, affecting any Owned Property or any portion thereof or interest therein.
(iv) With respect to each Leased Property, (a) each Lease is legal, valid and binding and is in full force and effect, and the Company or one of its Subsidiaries is in possession of such Leased Property, (b) the transactions contemplated by this Agreement does not require the consent of any other party to a Lease, nor will it cause a breach or default under such Lease or cause such Lease to cease being legal, valid, binding, enforceable and in full force and effect on identical terms following the Closing, (c) the Company or applicable Subsidiary or, to the Knowledge of the Company, any other party to the Lease is not in breach or default in any material respect under such Lease, and no event
27
has occurred or circumstance exists which, with the delivery of notice, the passage of time or both, would constitute such a breach or default in any material respect, or permit the termination, modification or acceleration of rent under such Lease,(d) neither the Company nor the applicable Subsidiary has subleased, licensed or otherwise granted anyone the right to use or occupy such Leased Property or any portion thereof, (e) neither the Company nor the Subsidiary has collaterally assigned or granted any other security interest in such Lease or any interest therein, and (f) there are no Liens on the leasehold estate or interest created by such Lease other than Permitted Liens and Liens that have attached to the fee estate or interest to which such Lease is subordinate.
(v)   For purposes of this Agreement, "" means (a) mechanics', carriers', workmen's, repairmen's, warehousemen's or other like Liens arising or incurred in the ordinary course of business relating to obligations that are not delinquent or that are being contested in good faith by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (b) Liens for taxes, assessments and other governmental charges that are not yet due and payable or for any such amounts which are being contested in good faith, (c) easements, covenants, rights-of-way and other encumbrances or restrictions and other imperfections in title that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to impair the continued use and operation of the assets to which they relate as currently conducted, (d) zoning, building and other similar codes and regulations and (e) Liens that have been placed by any developer, landlord or other third party on any real property in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has a leasehold or subleasehold interest and subordination or similar agreements relating thereto.
Definitions.
Permitted Liens
(p)   (i) Subject to Sections 3.01(p)(ii) and 3.01(p)(v), each of the Company and its Subsidiaries owns, or is validly licensed or otherwise has the right to use (without any obligation to make any fixed or contingent payments, including royalty payments), all patents, patent applications, trademarks, trade dress, trademark rights, trade names, trade name rights, domain names, service marks, service mark rights, copyrights, software, technical know-how and other proprietary intellectual property rights and computer programs, other than commercial off the shelf software, (collectively, "") that are material to the conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, in each case free and clear of all Liens.  The Company has the legal power to convey the rights granted to it under any license for any Intellectual Property Right taken by the Company and its Subsidiaries.  The Company is not subject to any contractual, legal or other restriction on the use of any Intellectual Property Rights which are owned by or licensed to the Company.
Intellectual Property.
Intellectual Property Rights
(ii) None of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has received any notice in writing that it has infringed or is infringing, and to the Knowledge of the Company none of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has infringed or is infringing, the valid rights of any person with regard to any Intellectual Property Right which individually or in the aggregate have had or could reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  To the Knowledge of the
28
Company, no person or persons has infringed or are infringing the rights of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to any Intellectual Property Right in a manner which individually or in the aggregate has had or could reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.
(iii) No material claims are pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened with regard to the ownership or licensing by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of any of their respective Intellectual Property Rights.
(iv) Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth, as of the date hereof, a complete and accurate list of all patents and applications therefor, registered trademarks and applications therefor, domain name registrations (if any) and copyright registrations (if any), that, in each case, are owned by or licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.  All patents and patent applications required to be listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule are either (a) owned by, or are subject to an obligation of assignment to, the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company free and clear of all Liens or (b) licensed to the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company free and clear (to the Knowledge of the Company) of all Liens.  The patent applications listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule that are owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries are (and such applications that are licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries are to the Company's Knowledge) pending and have not been abandoned, and have been and continue to be timely prosecuted.  All patents, registered trademarks and applications therefor owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries have been (and all such patents, registered trademarks and applications licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries have been to the Company's Knowledge) duly registered and/or filed with or issued by each appropriate Governmental Entity in the jurisdiction indicated in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, all necessary affidavits of continuing use have been (or, with respect to licenses, to the Company's Knowledge have been) timely filed, and all necessary maintenance fees have been (or, with respect to licenses, to the Company's Knowledge have been) timely paid to continue all such rights in effect.  None of the patents listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule that are owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has (and no such patents that are licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has to the Company's Knowledge) expired or been declared invalid, in whole or in part, by any Governmental Entity.  There are no material ongoing oppositions or cancellations or other proceedings involving any of the trademarks or trademark applications listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule and owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (or to the Knowledge of the Company, licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries).  There are no material ongoing interferences, oppositions, reissues, reexaminations or other proceedings involving any of the patents or patent applications listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule and owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (or to the Company's Knowledge, licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), including ex parte and post-grant proceedings, in the United
29
States Patent and Trademark Office or in any foreign patent office or similar administrative agency.  To the Knowledge of the Company, there are no published patents, patent applications, articles or other prior art references that could adversely affect the validity of any patent listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule in a material way.  Each of the patents and patent applications listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule that are owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries properly identifies (and to the Knowledge of the Company such patents and applications licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries properly identify) each and every inventor of the claims thereof as determined in accordance with the laws of the jurisdiction in which such patent is issued or such patent application is pending.  Each inventor named on the patents and patent applications listed in Section 3.01(p)(iv) of the Company Disclosure Schedule that are owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has executed (and such inventors named on such patents and applications licensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to the Company's Knowledge have executed) an agreement assigning his, her or its entire right, title and interest in and to such patent or patent application, and the inventions embodied and claimed therein, to the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company, or in the case of licensed Patents, to the appropriate owners.  To the Knowledge of the Company, no such inventor has any contractual or other obligation that would preclude any such assignment or otherwise conflict with the obligations of such inventor to the Company or such Subsidiary under such agreement with the Company or such Subsidiary.
(v) Section 3.01(p)(v) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a complete and accurate list of all options, rights, licenses or interests of any kind relating to Intellectual Property Rights granted (i) to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (other than software licenses for generally available software and except pursuant to employee proprietary inventions agreements (or similar employee agreements), non-disclosure agreements and consulting agreements entered into by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business), or (ii) by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to any other person (including any obligations of such other person to make any fixed or contingent payments, including royalty payments).  All obligations for payment of monies by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in connection with such options, rights, licenses or interests have been satisfied in a timely manner.
(vi) The Company and its Affiliates have used commercially reasonable efforts and taken all commercially necessary steps to maintain their trade secrets in confidence, including the development of a policy for the protection of intellectual property and periodic training for all employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries on the implementation of such policy; requiring all employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries to execute confidentiality agreements with respect to intellectual property developed for or obtained from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries; making commercially reasonable efforts to advise employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries that were voluntarily or involuntarily severed from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of their
30
continuing obligation to maintain such trade secrets in confidence; and entering into licenses and Contracts that generally require licensees, contractors and other third persons with access to such trade secrets to keep such trade secrets confidential (which licenses and Contracts will be enforceable to the extent sufficient to fully exploit all such trade secrets).
(vii) The execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Company do not, and the consummation by the Company of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement and compliance by the Company with the provisions of this Agreement will not, conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of, or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of, or result in, termination, cancellation or acceleration of any obligation or to the loss of a benefit under, or result in the creation of any Lien in or upon, any Intellectual Property Right.  Section 3.01(p)(vii) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth, as of the date hereof, all Contracts under which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is obligated to make payments to third parties for use of any Intellectual Property Rights with respect to the commercialization of any products that are, as of the date hereof, being sold by, manufactured by or under development by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
(q)   The Shareholder Approval is the only vote of the holders of any class or series of capital stock of the Company necessary to adopt this Agreement and approve the transactions contemplated hereby.
Voting Requirements.
(r)   No broker, investment banker, financial advisor or other person (other than Needham & Company, LLC ("") and Piper Jaffray & Co. ("")), the fees and expenses of which will be paid by the Company, is entitled to any broker's, finder's, financial advisor's or other similar fee or commission in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement based upon arrangements made by or on behalf of the Company.  The Company has delivered to Parent complete and accurate copies of all Contracts under which any such fees or expenses are payable and all indemnification and other agreements related to the engagement of the persons to whom such fees are payable.  The estimated fees and expenses of all accountants, brokers, financial advisors (including Needham and PiperJaffray), legal counsel (including Dorsey & Whitney LLP) and other persons retained by the Company, incurred or to be incurred by the Company in connection with this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, are set forth in Section 3.01(r) of the Company Disclosure Schedule.
Brokers and Other Advisors.
Needham
PiperJaffray
(s)   The Board of Directors of the Company has received the written opinion of PiperJaffray, dated the date hereof, to the effect that, as of such date, the Merger Consideration is fair, from a financial point of view, to the holders of shares of Company Common Stock.  A signed copy of the written opinion of PiperJaffray has been delivered to Parent.
Opinion of Financial Advisor.
31
(t)   Section 3.01(t) of the Company Disclosure Schedule contains a complete and accurate list of all policies of fire, liability, workers' compensation, title and other forms of insurance owned, held by or applicable to the Company (or its assets or business) as of the date hereof, and the Company has heretofore made available to Parent a complete and accurate copy of all such policies, including all occurrence-based policies applicable to the Company (or its assets or business) for all periods prior to the Closing Date.  All such policies (or substitute policies with substantially similar terms and underwritten by insurance carriers with substantially similar or higher ratings) are in full force and effect, all premiums with respect thereto covering all periods up to and including the Closing Date have been paid, and no notice of cancellation or termination has been received with respect to any such policy except for such policies, premiums, cancellations or terminations that individually or in the aggregate have not had and could not reasonably be expected to have a Company Material Adverse Effect.  Such policies are sufficient, in the reasonable opinion of the Company, for compliance by the Company with (i) all requirements of applicable laws and (ii) all Contracts to which the Company is a party, and each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has complied in all material respects with the provisions of each such policy under which it is an insured party.  The Company has not been refused any insurance with respect to its assets or operations by any insurance carrier to which it has applied for any such insurance or with which it has carried insurance, during the last five years.  There are no pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company, threatened material claims under any insurance policy.
Insurance.
(u)   The Company has taken all actions necessary to (i) render the Rights Agreement inapplicable to this Agreement, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (ii) ensure that (x) none of Parent, Sub or any other Subsidiary of Parent is an "" or a "" (in each case as defined in the Rights Agreement) and (y) a "" or a "" (in each case as defined in the Rights Agreement) does not occur, in the case of clauses (x) and (y), by reason of the execution of this Agreement or the consummation of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (iii) provide that the "" (as defined in the Rights Agreement) shall occur immediately prior to the Effective Time and (iv) ensure that Section 11 or Section 13 of the Rights Agreement will not apply to the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.  The Company has delivered to Parent a complete and accurate copy of the Rights Agreement prior to the date hereof.
Rights Agreement.
Acquiring Person
Principal Party
Distribution Date
Shares Acquisition Date
Final Expiration Date
(v)   Section 302A.471 of the MBCA is not applicable to the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and no shareholder of the Company is entitled to any other dissenters rights or appraisal rights in connection with the Merger, the issuance of the Merger Consideration by Parent or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Dissenting Shares.
(w)   No customer or supplier of the Company that is material to the Company, taken as a whole, has canceled or otherwise terminated, or provided notice of its intent, or threatened, to terminate its relationship with the Company, or, since December 31, 2005, decreased or limited in any
Relationships with Customers and Suppliers.
32
material respect, or provided notice of its intent, or threatened, to decrease or limit in any material respect, its purchases from or sales to the Company.
SECTION 3.02.   Parent and Sub represent and warrant to the Company as follows:
Representations and Warranties of Parent and Sub.
(a)   Each of Parent and Sub is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is incorporated and has all requisite corporate power and authority to carry on its business as now being conducted.  Each of Parent and Sub is duly qualified or licensed to do business and is in good standing in each material jurisdiction in which the nature of its business or the ownership, leasing or operation of its properties makes such qualification or licensing necessary.
Organization, Standing and Corporate Power.
(b)   The authorized capital stock of Parent consists of 85,000,000 shares of Parent Common Stock and 5,000,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $0.10 per share ("").  At the close of business on October 13, 2006, (i) 64,751,920 shares of Parent Common Stock were issued and outstanding, (ii) 11,932,809 shares of Parent Common Stock were reserved for issuance pursuant to the Parent Employee Stock Purchase Plan, the Parent 1990 Stock Option Plan, the Parent 1994 Stock Option Plan for Non-Employee Directors, the Parent 2000 Stock Awards Plan and the Parent 2002 Stock Option Plan for Non-Employee Directors, of which 5,145,620 shares of Parent Common Stock were subject to outstanding options to purchase shares of Parent Common Stock, (iii) no shares of Parent Preferred Stock were issued or outstanding or were held by Parent as treasury shares and (iv) 5,000,000 shares of Parent Preferred Stock designated as Series A Cumulative Junior Participating Preferred Stock were reserved for issuance in connection with the rights to be issued pursuant to the Rights Agreement, dated as of December 11, 1998, between Parent and Harris Trust Savings Bank.
Capital Structure.
Parent Preferred Stock
(c)   Each of Parent and Sub has all requisite corporate power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.  The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of Parent and Sub and no other corporate proceedings on the part of Parent or Sub are necessary to authorize this Agreement or to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby.  This Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, including the issuance of shares of Parent Common Stock pursuant to Article II hereof, do not require approval of the holders of any shares of capital stock of Parent.  All outstanding shares of Parent Common Stock are, and all shares of Parent Common Stock which may be issued pursuant to this Agreement shall when issued in accordance with this Agreement be, duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and not subject to preemptive rights.  This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each of Parent and Sub and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery by the Company, constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of Parent and Sub, as applicable, enforceable against Parent and Sub, as applicable, in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy,
Authority; Noncontravention.
33
insolvency, moratorium, reorganization or similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally and the availability of equitable remedies.  The execution and delivery of this Agreement do not, and the consummation of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement and compliance by Parent and Sub with the provisions of this Agreement will not, conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of, or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of, or result in, termination, cancellation or acceleration of any obligation or to the loss of a benefit under, or result in the creation of any Lien in or upon any of the properties or other assets of Parent or Sub under (x) the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation or By-laws of Parent or the Articles of Incorporation or By-laws of Sub, (y) any Contract to which Parent or Sub is a party or any of their respective properties or other assets is subject, in any way that would prevent, materially impede or materially delay the consummation by Parent of the Merger (including the payments required to be made pursuant to Article II) or the other transactions contemplated hereby or (z) subject to the governmental filings and other matters referred to in the following sentence, any applicable Legal Provisions, and in each case, in any way that would prevent, materially impede or materially delay the consummation by Parent of the Merger (including the payments required to be made pursuant to Article II) or the other transactions contemplated hereby.  No material consent, approval, order or authorization of, action by or in respect of, or registration, declaration or filing with, any Governmental Entity is required by or with respect to Parent or Sub in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement by Parent and Sub or the consummation by Parent and Sub of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, except for (1) the filing of the HSR Filing by Parent and the receipt, termination or expiration, as applicable, of approvals or waiting periods required under the HSR Act or any other applicable competition, merger control, antitrust or similar law or regulation, (2) the filing with the SEC of (A) the Form S-4 and (B) such reports under the Exchange Act as may be required in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (3) the filing of the Articles of Merger with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota and (4) such filings with and approvals of the NYSE to permit the shares of Parent Common Stock issuable to the shareholders of the Company as contemplated by this Agreement to be listed on the NYSE.
(d)   Parent has filed all reports, schedules, forms, statements and other documents (including exhibits and other information incorporated therein) with the SEC required to be filed by Parent since January 1, 2004 (such documents, together with any documents filed during such period by Parent with the SEC on a voluntary basis on Current Reports on Form 8-K, the "").  As of their respective filing dates, the Parent SEC Documents complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act, the Exchange Act, and SOX applicable to such Parent SEC Documents, and none of the Parent SEC Documents contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.  Except to the extent that information contained in any Parent SEC Document has been revised, amended, supplemented or superseded by a later-filed Parent SEC Document, none of the Parent SEC Documents contains any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state any
Parent SEC Documents.
Parent SEC Documents
34
material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(e)   None of the information supplied or to be supplied by Parent or Sub, or on behalf of Parent or Sub by financial, legal or accounting advisors to Parent or Sub, either orally during any in person or telephonic meetings in which representatives of Parent are present or in writing, specifically for inclusion or incorporation by reference in (i) the Form S-4 will, at the time the Form S-4 is filed with the SEC, at any time it is amended or supplemented and at the time it becomes effective under the Securities Act, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, or (ii) the Proxy Statement will, at the date the Proxy Statement is first mailed to the shareholders of the Company and at the time of the Shareholders' Meeting, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, except that no representation, warranty or covenant is made by Parent or Sub with respect to statements made or incorporated by reference therein based on information supplied by the Company, or on behalf of the Company by financial, legal or accounting advisors to the Company, either orally during any in person or telephonic meetings in which representatives of the Company are present or in writing, specifically for inclusion or incorporation by reference in the Form S-4 or the Proxy Statement.  The Form S-4 will comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act.
Information Supplied.
(f)   Except for liabilities incurred in connection with this Agreement and except as disclosed in the Parent SEC Documents (excluding (i) the cautionary, predictive and forward looking disclosures set forth in the risk factor and forward looking statements sections included therein and (ii) disclosures in any other sections included therein, solely to the extent that those sections include disclosures that are cautionary, predictive and forward looking in nature, the ""), since the date of the most recent audited financial statements included in the Filed Parent SEC Documents there has not been any Parent Material Adverse Change.
Absence of Certain Changes or Events.
Filed Parent SEC Documents
(g)   Except as disclosed in the Filed Parent SEC Documents, there is no suit, action or proceeding pending or, to the Knowledge of Parent, threatened against or affecting Parent or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective assets that individually or in the aggregate has had or could reasonably be expected to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect, nor is there any judgment, decree, injunction, rule or order of any Governmental Entity or arbitrator outstanding against, or, to the Knowledge of Parent, investigation by any Governmental Entity involving, Parent or any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective assets that individually or in the aggregate has had or could reasonably be expected to have a Parent Material Adverse Effect.
Litigation.
35
(h)   Sub was formed solely for the purpose of engaging in the transactions contemplated hereby, has engaged in no other business activities and has conducted its operations only as contemplated hereby.
Interim Operations of Sub.
(i)   No vote of the holders of any class or series of capital stock of Parent is necessary to adopt this Agreement or approve the transactions contemplated hereby.
Voting Requirements.
(j)   Neither Parent nor any of its Subsidiaries has taken or agreed to take any action or knows of any fact, agreement, plan or other circumstance that is reasonably likely to prevent or impede the Merger from constituting a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code.
Taxes.
SECTION 4.01.   (a)   During the period from the date of this Agreement to the Effective Time, except as set forth in Section 4.01(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule or as consented to in writing in advance by Parent or as otherwise permitted pursuant to Section 4.01(a)(i) through (xv) of this Agreement, the Company shall, and shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, carry on its business in the ordinary course consistent with past practice and as currently proposed by the Company to be conducted prior to the Closing and in compliance in all material respects with all applicable Legal Provisions and, to the extent consistent therewith, use all commercially reasonable efforts to preserve intact its current business organizations, keep available the services of its current officers, employees and consultants and preserve its relationships with customers, suppliers, licensors, licensees, distributors and others having business dealings with it with the intention that its goodwill and ongoing business shall be unimpaired at the Effective Time.  In addition to and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, during the period from the date of this Agreement to the Effective Time, except as otherwise set forth in Section 4.01(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, the Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, without Parent's prior written consent:
Conduct of Business.
Conduct of Business by the Company.
(i) (x) declare, set aside or pay any dividends on, or make any other distributions (whether in cash, stock or property) in respect of, any of its capital stock, (y) split, combine or reclassify any of its capital stock or issue or authorize the issuance of any other securities in respect of, in lieu of or in substitution for shares of its capital stock or (z) purchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any shares of its capital stock or any other securities thereof or any rights, warrants or options to acquire any such shares or other securities, except for purchases, redemptions or other acquisitions of capital stock or other securities required under the terms of any plans, arrangements or other Contracts existing on the date hereof between the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and any director or employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (to the extent complete and
36
accurate copies of such plans, arrangements or other Contracts have been heretofore delivered to Parent);
(ii) issue, deliver, sell, grant, pledge or otherwise encumber or subject to any Lien any shares of its capital stock, any other voting securities or any securities convertible into, or any rights, warrants or options to acquire, any such shares, voting securities or convertible securities, or any "phantom" stock, "phantom" stock rights, stock appreciation rights or stock-based performance units, including pursuant to Contracts as in effect on the date hereof (other than (x) the issuance of shares of Company Common Stock upon the exercise of Company Stock Options outstanding on the date hereof in accordance with their terms on the date hereof and (y) the issuance of the Rights and capital stock pursuant to the terms of the Rights Agreement);
(iii) amend the Company Articles or the Company By-laws or other comparable charter or organizational documents of any of the Company's Subsidiaries, except as may be required by law or the rules and regulations of the SEC or Nasdaq;
(iv) directly or indirectly acquire (x) by merging or consolidating with, or by purchasing assets of, or by any other manner, any person or division, business or equity interest of any person or (y) any asset or assets that, individually, has a purchase price in excess of $350,000 or, in the aggregate, have a purchase price in excess of $2,000,000, except for new capital expenditures, which shall be subject to the limitations of clause (vii) below, and except for purchases of components, raw materials or supplies in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
(v) (x) sell, lease, license, mortgage, sell and leaseback or otherwise encumber or subject to any Lien or otherwise dispose of any of its properties or other assets or any interests therein (including securitizations), except for sales of inventory and used equipment in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or (y) enter into, modify or amend any lease of property, except for any renewals of existing leases in the ordinary course of business;
(vi) (x) incur any indebtedness for borrowed money or guarantee any such indebtedness of another person, issue or sell any debt securities or calls, options, warrants or other rights to acquire any debt securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, guarantee any debt securities of another person, enter into any "keep well" or other Contract to maintain any financial statement condition of another person or enter into any arrangement having the economic effect of any of the foregoing or (y) make any loans, advances or capital contributions to, or investments in, any other person, other than to employees in respect of travel expenses in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
37
(vii) make any new capital expenditure or expenditures which, individually, is in excess of $350,000 or, in the aggregate, are in excess of $2,000,000;
(viii) except as required by law or any judgment, (v) pay, discharge, settle or satisfy any claims, liabilities, obligations or litigation (absolute, accrued, asserted or unasserted, contingent or otherwise), other than the payment, discharge, settlement or satisfaction in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or in accordance with their terms, of liabilities disclosed, reflected or reserved against in the most recent financial statements (or, if applicable, the notes thereto) of the Company included in the Filed Company SEC Documents (for amounts not in excess of such reserves) or incurred since the date of such financial statements in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (w) cancel any indebtedness, (x) waive or assign any claims or rights of substantial value, (y) waive any benefits of, or agree to modify in any respect, or, subject to the terms hereof, fail to enforce, or consent to any matter with respect to which consent is required under, any standstill or similar Contract to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or (z) waive any material benefits of, or agree to modify in any material respect, or, subject to the terms hereof, fail to enforce in any material respect, or consent to any matter with respect to which consent is required under, any material confidentiality or similar Contract to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party;
(ix) enter into, modify, amend or terminate any Contract or waive, release, assign or fail to exercise or pursue any material rights or claims thereunder, which if so entered into, modified, amended, terminated, waived, released, assigned, or not exercised or pursued could reasonably be expected to (A) adversely affect in any material respect the Company, (B) impair in any material respect the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement or (C) prevent or materially delay the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(x) enter into any Contract to the extent consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or compliance by the Company with the provisions of this Agreement could reasonably be expected to conflict with, or result in a violation or breach of, or default (with or without notice or lapse of time, or both) under, or give rise to a right of, or result in, termination, cancellation or acceleration of any obligation or to the loss of a benefit under, or result in the creation of any Lien (other than an immaterial Lien) in or upon any of the properties or other assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries under, or require Parent to license or transfer any of its Intellectual Property Rights or other material assets under, or give rise to any increased, additional, accelerated, or guaranteed right or entitlements of any third party under, or result in any material alteration of, any provision of such Contract;
(xi) enter into any Contract containing any restriction on the ability of the Company or any of its Affiliates to assign its rights, interests or obligations
38
thereunder, unless such restriction expressly excludes any assignment to Parent or any of its Affiliates in connection with or following the consummation of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(xii) sell, transfer or license to any person or otherwise extend, amend or modify any rights to the Intellectual Property Rights of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
(xiii) except as otherwise contemplated by this Agreement or as required to ensure that any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement is not then out of compliance with applicable Legal Provisions or to comply with any Contract or Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement entered into prior to the date hereof (to the extent complete and accurate copies of which have been heretofore delivered to Parent), (A) adopt, enter into, terminate or amend (I) any collective bargaining agreement or Company Benefit Plan or (II) any Company Benefit Agreement or other agreement, plan or policy involving the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and one or more of their respective current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants, (B) increase in any manner the compensation, bonus or fringe or other benefits of, or pay any bonus of any kind or amount whatsoever to, any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant, (C) pay any benefit or amount not required under any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement or any other benefit plan or arrangement of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries as in effect on the date of this Agreement, (D) grant or pay any change of control, severance or termination compensation or benefits or increase in any manner the change of control, severance or termination compensation or benefits of any current or former director, officer, employee or consultant of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (E) grant any awards under any bonus, incentive, performance or other compensation plan or arrangement, Company Benefit Agreement or Company Benefit Plan (including the grant of Company Stock Options, "phantom" stock, stock appreciation rights, "phantom" stock rights, stock-based or stock-related awards, performance units or restricted stock or the removal of existing restrictions in any Company Benefit Agreements, Company Benefit Plans or agreements or awards made thereunder), (F) amend or modify any Company Stock Option, (G) take any action to fund or in any other way secure the payment of compensation or benefits under any employee plan, agreement, contract or arrangement or Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement, (H) take any action to accelerate the vesting or time of payment of any compensation or benefit under any Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement or (I) materially change any actuarial or other assumption used to calculate funding obligations with respect to any Company Pension Plan or change the manner in which contributions to any Company Pension Plan are made or the basis on which such contributions are determined;
(xiv) except as required by GAAP, revalue any material assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or make any change in accounting methods, principles or practices; or
39
(xv) authorize any of, or commit, resolve, propose or agree to take any of, the foregoing actions.
(b)   The Company, Parent and Sub shall not, and shall not permit any of their respective Subsidiaries to, take any action that would, or that could reasonably be expected to, result in any of the conditions to the Merger set forth in Article VI not being satisfied.
Other Actions.
(c)   The Company and Parent shall promptly advise the other party orally and in writing of (i) any representation or warranty made by it (and, in the case of Parent, made by Sub) contained in this Agreement that is qualified as to materiality becoming untrue or inaccurate in any respect or any such representation or warranty that is not so qualified becoming untrue or inaccurate in any material respect or (ii) the failure of it (and, in the case of Parent, of Sub) to comply with or satisfy in any material respect any covenant, condition or agreement to be complied with or satisfied by it (and, in the case of Parent, of Sub) under this Agreement; , , that no such notification shall affect the representations, warranties, covenants or agreements of the parties (or remedies with respect thereto) or the conditions to the obligations of the parties under this Agreement.  The Company and Parent shall, to the extent permitted by law, promptly provide the other with copies of all filings made by such party with any Governmental Entity in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, other than the portions of such filings that include confidential information not directly related to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Advice of Changes; Filings.
provided
however
(d)   (i) During the period from the date of this Agreement to the Effective Time, the Company shall, and shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, (A) timely file all tax returns ("") required to be filed by or on behalf of each such entity; (B) timely pay all taxes due and payable; (C) accrue a reserve in the books and records and financial statements of any such entity in accordance with past practice for all taxes payable by such entity for which no Post-Signing Return is due prior to the Effective Time; (D) promptly notify Parent of any suit, claim, action, investigation, proceeding or audit (collectively, "") that is or becomes pending against or with respect to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of any material amount of tax and not settle or compromise any such Action without Parent's consent; (E) not make any material tax election or settle or compromise any material tax liability, other than with Parent's consent or other than in the ordinary course of business; and (F) cause all existing tax sharing agreements, tax indemnity obligations and similar agreements, arrangements or practices with respect to taxes to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is or may be a party or by which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is or may otherwise be bound to be terminated as of the Closing Date so that after such date neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries shall have any further rights or liabilities thereunder.  Any tax returns described in this Section 4.01(d) shall be complete and accurate in all material respects and shall be prepared on a basis consistent with the past practice of the Company and in a manner that does not distort taxable income (, by deferring income or accelerating deductions); that no Post-Signing Returns shall be filed with any taxing authority without Parent's prior written consent.
Certain Tax Matters.
Post-Signing Returns
Actions
e.g.
provided
40
(ii) The Company shall deliver to Parent at or prior to the Closing a certificate, in form and substance satisfactory to Parent, duly executed and acknowledged, certifying that the issuance (payment) of the Merger Consideration pursuant to the terms of this Agreement is exempt from withholding pursuant to the Foreign Investment in Real Property Tax Act.
(iii) Each of Parent, Sub and the Company and each of their respective Affiliates shall not take any actions and shall not fail to take any action which action or failure to act would prevent, or would be reasonably likely to prevent, the Merger from qualifying as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code.
SECTION 4.02.   (a) The Company shall not, nor shall it authorize or permit any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective directors, officers or employees or any investment banker, financial advisor, attorney, accountant or other advisor, agent or representative (collectively, "") retained by it or any of its Affiliates to, directly or indirectly through another person, (i) solicit, initiate or encourage, or take any other action designed to, or which could reasonably be expected to, facilitate, any Takeover Proposal or (ii) enter into, continue or otherwise participate in any discussions or negotiations regarding, or furnish to any person any information, or otherwise cooperate in any way with, any Takeover Proposal.  Without limiting the foregoing, it is agreed that any violation of the restrictions set forth in the preceding sentence by any Representative of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries shall be a breach of this Section 4.02(a) by the Company.  The Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, immediately cease and cause to be terminated any existing discussions or negotiations with any person conducted heretofore with respect to any Takeover Proposal and request the prompt return or destruction of all confidential information previously furnished to such person(s).  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, at any time prior to obtaining the Shareholder Approval, in response to a bona fide written Takeover Proposal that the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith by a majority vote of the disinterested members thereof (after consultation with outside counsel and a financial advisor of nationally recognized reputation, it being agreed that the financial advisor may be Needham or PiperJaffray) constitutes or would reasonably be expected to lead to a Superior Proposal, and which Takeover Proposal was not solicited after the date hereof and was made after the date hereof and did not otherwise result from a breach of this Section 4.02(a), the Company may, if its Board of Directors determines in good faith by a majority vote of the disinterested members thereof (after consultation with outside counsel) that it is required to do so in order to comply with its fiduciary duties to the shareholders of the Company under applicable law, and subject to compliance with Section 4.02(c), (x) furnish information with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries to the person making such Takeover Proposal (and its Representatives) pursuant to a customary confidentiality agreement (a copy of which shall be provided to Parent) not less restrictive of such person than the Confidentiality Agreement; that all such information has previously been provided to Parent or is provided to Parent prior to or substantially concurrent with the time it is provided to such person, and (y) participate in discussions or negotiations with the person making such Takeover Proposal (and its Representatives) regarding such Takeover Proposal.
No Solicitation.
Representatives
provided
41
The term "" means any inquiry, proposal or offer from any person relating to, or that would reasonably be expected to lead to, any direct or indirect acquisition or purchase, in one transaction or a series of transactions, of assets or businesses that constitute 15% or more of the revenues, net income or the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or 15% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, any tender offer or exchange offer that if consummated would result in any person beneficially owning 15% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any merger, consolidation, business combination, recapitalization, liquidation, dissolution, joint venture, binding share exchange or similar transaction involving the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to which any person or the shareholders of any person would own 15% or more of any class of equity securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or of any resulting parent company of the Company, other than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Takeover Proposal
The term "" means any bona fide offer made by a third party that if consummated would result in such person (or its shareholders) owning, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of the shares of Company Common Stock then outstanding (or of the surviving entity in a merger or the direct or indirect parent of the surviving entity in a merger) or more than 50% of the assets of the Company, which the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith by a majority vote of the disinterested members thereof (after consultation with outside counsel and a financial advisor of nationally recognized reputation, it being understood that the financial advisor may be Needham or PiperJaffray) to be (i) more favorable to the shareholders of the Company from a financial point of view than the Merger (taking into account all the terms and conditions of such proposal and this Agreement (including any changes to the terms of this Agreement proposed by Parent in response to such offer or otherwise)) and (ii) reasonably capable of being completed, taking into account all financial, legal, regulatory and other aspects of such proposal.
Superior Proposal
(b) Neither the Board of Directors of the Company nor any committee thereof shall (i) (A) withdraw (or modify in a manner adverse to Parent), or publicly propose to withdraw (or modify in a manner adverse to Parent), the approval, recommendation or declaration of advisability by such Board of Directors or any such committee thereof of this Agreement, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement or (B) recommend, adopt or approve, or propose publicly to recommend, adopt or approve, any Takeover Proposal (any action described in this clause (i) being referred to as a "") or (ii) approve or recommend, or propose to approve or recommend, or allow the Company or any of its Affiliates to execute or enter into, any letter of intent, memorandum of understanding, agreement in principle, merger agreement, acquisition agreement, option agreement, joint venture agreement, partnership agreement or other similar agreement constituting or related to, or that is intended to or would reasonably be expected to lead to, any Takeover Proposal (other than a confidentiality agreement referred to in Section 4.02(a)) (an "").  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if at any time prior to obtaining the Shareholder Approval, the Board of Directors of the Company receives a Superior Proposal and as a result thereof determines
Company Adverse Recommendation Change
Acquisition Agreement
42
, , that no Company Adverse Recommendation Change may be made until after the fourth business day following Parent's receipt of written notice (a "") from the Company advising Parent that the Board of Directors of the Company intends to take such action and specifying all material terms and conditions of any Superior Proposal that is the basis of the proposed action by the Board of Directors (it being understood and agreed that any amendment to the financial terms or any other material term of such Superior Proposal shall require a new Notice of Adverse Recommendation and a new four business day period).  In determining whether to make a Company Adverse Recommendation Change, the Board of Directors of the Company shall take into account any changes to the terms of this Agreement proposed by Parent in response to a Notice of Adverse Recommendation or otherwise.
in good faith by a majority vote of the disinterested members of the Board of Directors (after consultation with outside counsel and a financial advisor of nationally recognized reputation, it being understood that the financial advisor may be Needham or PiperJaffray) that it is required to do so in order to comply with its fiduciary duties to the shareholders of the Company under applicable law, the Company may make a Company Adverse Recommendation Change;
provided
however
Notice of Adverse Recommendation
In addition to the obligations of the Company set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section 4.02, the Company shall promptly advise Parent orally and in writing of any Takeover Proposal, the material terms and conditions of any such Takeover Proposal or inquiry (including any material changes thereto) and the identity of the person making any such Takeover Proposal or inquiry.  The Company shall (i) keep Parent promptly and reasonably informed of the status and details (including any material change to the terms thereof) of any such Takeover Proposal or inquiry and (ii) provide to Parent as soon as practicable after receipt or delivery thereof with copies of all material correspondence and other written material sent or provided to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries from any person that describes any of the terms or conditions of any Takeover Proposal.
(c) Nothing contained in this Section 4.02 shall prohibit the Company from (x) taking and disclosing to its shareholders a position contemplated by Rule 14e-2(a) promulgated under the Exchange Act or (y) making any disclosure to the shareholders of the Company if, in the good faith judgment of the Board of Directors, as determined by a majority vote of the disinterested members thereof (after consultation with outside counsel), the failure to so disclose would be inconsistent with its obligations under applicable law, including the Board of Directors' duty of candor to the shareholders of the Company; , , that in no event shall the Company or its Board of Directors or any committee thereof take, or agree or resolve to take, any action prohibited by Section 4.02(b).
provided
however
SECTION 5.01.   (a) As promptly as practicable following the date of this Agreement, the Company and Parent shall prepare and Parent shall file with the SEC the
Preparation of the Form S-4 and the Proxy Statement; Shareholders' Meeting.
43
Form S-4, in which the Proxy Statement will be included as a prospectus.  Each of the Company and Parent shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to respond as promptly as practicable to any comments of the SEC with respect thereto and have the Form S-4 declared effective under the Securities Act as promptly as practicable after such filing.  The Company shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Proxy Statement to be mailed to the shareholders of the Company as promptly as practicable after the Form S-4 is declared effective under the Securities Act.  Parent shall also take any action (other than qualifying to do business in any jurisdiction in which it is not now so qualified or filing a general consent to service of process) required to be taken under any applicable state securities laws in connection with the issuance of shares of Parent Common Stock in the Merger, and the Company shall furnish all information concerning the Company and the holders of shares of Company Common Stock as may be reasonably requested by Parent in connection with any such action and the preparation, filing and distribution of the Form S-4 and the Proxy Statement.  No filing of, or amendment or supplement to, the Form S-4 will be made by Parent, and no filing of, or amendment or supplement to the Proxy Statement will be made by the Company, in each case without providing the other party the opportunity to review and comment thereon.  If at any time prior to the Effective Time any information relating to the Company or Parent, or any of their respective Affiliates, directors or officers, should be discovered by the Company or Parent which should be set forth in an amendment or supplement to either the Form S-4 or the Proxy Statement, so that either such document would not include any misstatement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the party which discovers such information shall promptly notify the other parties hereto and an appropriate amendment or supplement describing such information shall be promptly filed with the SEC and, to the extent required by law, disseminated to the shareholders of the Company.  The parties shall notify each other promptly of the receipt of any comments from the SEC or the staff of the SEC and of any request by the SEC or the staff of the SEC for amendments or supplements to the Form S-4 or the Proxy Statement or for additional information and shall supply each other with copies of all correspondence between it or any of its Representatives, on the one hand, and the SEC or the staff of the SEC, on the other hand, with respect to the Form S-4 or the Proxy Statement.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, prior to filing or mailing the Form S-4 and the Proxy Statement (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or responding to any comments of the SEC or the staff of the SEC with respect thereto, each party shall provide the other party an opportunity to review and comment on such document or response.
(b) The Company shall, as soon as practicable following the date of this Agreement, establish a record date for, duly call, give notice of, convene and hold the Shareholders' Meeting solely for the purpose of obtaining the Shareholder Approval.  Subject to Sections 4.02(b) and 4.02(c), the Company shall, through its Board of Directors, recommend to its shareholders adoption of this Agreement and shall include such recommendation in the Proxy Statement.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and in accordance with Section 302A.613 of the MBCA, the Company's obligations pursuant to the first sentence of this Section 5.01(b) shall not be affected by (i) the commencement, public proposal, public disclosure or communication to the
44
Company of any Takeover Proposal or (ii) the withdrawal or modification by the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof of such Board of Directors' or such committee's approval or recommendation of this Agreement, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
(c) The Company shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause to be delivered to Parent a letter of Grant Thornton LLP and Ernst & Young LLP, the Company's registered public accountants, dated a date within two business days before the date on which the Form S-4 shall become effective and addressed to Parent, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Parent and customary in scope and substance for letters delivered by registered public accountants in connection with registration statements similar to the Form S-4.
SECTION 5.02.   To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Company shall afford to Parent, and to Parent's officers, employees, accountants, counsel, financial advisors and other Representatives, reasonable access (including for the purpose of coordinating integration activities and transition planning with the employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries) during normal business hours and upon reasonable prior notice to the Company during the period prior to the Effective Time or the termination of this Agreement to all its and its Subsidiaries' properties, books, Contracts, personnel and records, including for the purpose of conducting Phase I environmental site assessments and compliance audits of the Company's properties and operations, and, during such period, the Company shall furnish promptly to Parent (a) a copy of each report, schedule, registration statement and other document filed by it during such period pursuant to the requirements of Federal or state securities laws, (b) a copy of each correspondence or written communication with any United States Federal or state Governmental Entity and (c) all other information concerning its and its Subsidiaries' business, properties and personnel as Parent may reasonably request.  Except for disclosures expressly permitted by the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement dated as of April 19, 2005, as amended from time to time, between Parent and the Company (as it may be amended from time to time, the ""), Parent shall hold, and shall cause its officers, employees, accountants, counsel, financial advisors and other Representatives to hold, all information received from the Company, directly or indirectly, in confidence in accordance with the Confidentiality Agreement.  No investigation pursuant to this Section 5.02 or information provided or received by any party hereto pursuant to this Agreement will affect any of the representations or warranties of the parties hereto contained in this Agreement or the conditions hereunder to the obligations of the parties hereto.  The Company agrees that Parent may contact customers, vendors or other persons having business relationships with the Company after consultation with the Company.
Access to Information; Confidentiality.
Confidentiality Agreement
SECTION 5.03.   Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, each of the parties agrees to use its commercially reasonable efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions, and to do, or cause to be done, and to assist and cooperate with the other parties in doing, all things necessary, proper or advisable to consummate and make effective, in the most expeditious manner practicable, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by
Commercially Reasonable Efforts.
45
this Agreement, including using commercially reasonable efforts to accomplish the following:  (i) the taking of all acts necessary to cause the conditions to Closing to be satisfied as promptly as practicable, (ii) the obtaining of all necessary actions or nonactions, consents, approvals and waivers from Governmental Entities and the making of all necessary registrations and filings (including filings with Governmental Entities) and the taking of all steps as may be necessary to obtain an approval or waiver from, or to avoid an action or proceeding by, any Governmental Entity, (iii) the obtaining of all necessary consents, approvals or waivers from third parties and (iv) obtaining or transferring all Environmental Permits necessary for operating the business of the Surviving Corporation pursuant to applicable Environmental Law.  In connection with and without limiting the foregoing, the Company and Parent shall duly file the HSR Filing required under the HSR Act with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement as promptly as practicable.  The HSR Filing shall be in substantial compliance with the requirements of the HSR Act.  Each party shall cooperate with the other party to the extent necessary to assist the other party in the preparation of its HSR Filing, to request early termination of the waiting period required by the HSR Act and, if requested, to promptly amend or furnish additional information thereunder.  The Company and its Board of Directors shall (1) take all action necessary to ensure that no "control share acquisitions", "business combinations", "fair price" (including Sections 302A.671, .673 and .675 of the MBCA) or other state takeover laws or other state takeover statute or similar statute or regulation is or becomes applicable to this Agreement, the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement and (2) if any state takeover laws or other state takeover statute or similar statute or regulation becomes applicable to this Agreement, the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, take all action necessary to ensure that the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement may be consummated as promptly as practicable on the terms contemplated by this Agreement and otherwise to minimize the effect of such statute or regulation on this Agreement, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.  In addition, the Company shall take the actions set forth on Section 5.03 of the Company Disclosure Schedule.  Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to require Parent to agree to, or proffer to, divest or hold separate any assets or any portion of any business of Parent, the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries.
SECTION 5.04.   (a) As soon as practicable following the date of this Agreement, the Board of Directors of the Company (or, if appropriate, any committee thereof administering the Company Stock Plans) shall adopt such resolutions or take such other actions as may be required to effect the following:
Company Stock Options.
(i) adjust the terms of all outstanding Company Stock Options granted in connection with the performance of services for the Company to any person who is an employee or officer on the Closing Date (the ""), whether vested or unvested, as necessary to provide that each Employee Stock Option outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time (each, a "") shall be converted into an option to acquire, on the same terms and conditions as were applicable under the Rolled-Over Option, the number of shares of Parent Common Stock (rounded down to the nearest
Employee Stock Options
Rolled-Over Option
46
whole share), determined by multiplying the number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to such Rolled-Over Option immediately prior to the Effective Time for which such Rolled-Over Option shall not theretofore have been exercised by the Exchange Ratio at an exercise price per share of Parent Common Stock equal to (A) the per share exercise price for the shares of Company Common Stock otherwise purchasable pursuant to such Rolled-Over Option divided by (B) the Exchange Ratio (each, as so adjusted, an ""); that such exercise price shall be rounded up to the nearest whole cent; that any Rolled-Over Option that is intended to be an "incentive stock option" (as defined in Section 422 of the Code), and that may not be adjusted in the foregoing manner and remain an incentive stock option, shall be adjusted in accordance with the requirements of Section 424 of the Code in a manner that most closely produces the economic results obtained with respect to other Adjusted Options (it being understood that it is the intention of the parties that Rolled-Over Options so assumed by Parent qualify, to the maximum extent permissible following the Effective Time, as "incentive stock options" (as defined in Section 422 of the Code), to the extent that such Rolled-Over Options qualified as "incentive stock options" prior to the Effective Time);
Adjusted Option
provided
provided further
(ii) adjust the terms of all outstanding Company Stock Options that are not Employee Stock Options (the ""), whether vested or unvested, as necessary to provide that each Non-Employee Stock Option outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be canceled as of the Effective Time, and the holder thereof shall then become entitled to receive a single lump sum cash payment equal to the product of (A) the number of shares of Company Common Stock for which such Company Stock Option shall not theretofore have been exercised and (B) the excess, if any, of the product of (I) the Exchange Ratio and (II) the per share closing price of Parent Common Stock, as such price is reported on the NYSE Composite Transactions Tape (as reported by Bloomberg Financial Markets or such other source as the parties shall agree in writing), on the date that is two days prior to the Closing Date over the exercise price per share of such Company Stock Option; and
Non-Employee Stock Options
(iii) make such other changes to the Company Stock Plans as the Company and Parent may agree are appropriate to give effect to the Merger.
(b) The Company shall ensure that following the Effective Time, no holder of a Company Stock Option (or former holder of a Company Stock Option) or any participant in any Company Stock Plan, Company Benefit Plan or Company Benefit Agreement shall have any right thereunder to acquire any capital stock of the Company or the Surviving Corporation or any other equity interest therein (including "phantom" stock or stock appreciation rights).
(c) As soon as practicable following the Effective Time, Parent shall either (i) prepare and file with the SEC a registration statement on Form S-8 (or another appropriate form) registering a number of shares of Parent Common Stock equal to the number of shares subject to the Adjusted Options or (ii) assume the Adjusted Options
47
under an existing equity incentive plan of Parent or any of its Affiliates with respect to which a registration statement on Form S-8 (or another appropriate form) is currently effective.   Any such registration statement shall be kept effective (and the current status of the prospectus or prospectuses required thereby shall be maintained) as long as any Adjusted Options may remain outstanding.
(d) All amounts payable to holders of Non-Employee Stock Options pursuant to Section 5.04(a)(ii) shall be subject to any required withholding of taxes and shall be paid without interest as soon as practicable following the Effective Time.
SECTION 5.05.   (a) Parent shall cause the Surviving Corporation to assume the obligations with respect to all rights to indemnification, advancement of expenses and exculpation from liabilities for acts or omissions occurring at or prior to the Effective Time now existing in favor of the current or former directors or officers of the Company as provided in the Company Articles, the Company By-laws or any indemnification Contract between such directors or officers and the Company (in each case, as in effect on the date hereof), without further action, as of the Effective Time and such obligations shall survive the Merger and shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with their terms.
Indemnification; Advancement of Expenses; Exculpation and Insurance.
(b) In the event that the Surviving Corporation or any of its successors or assigns (i) consolidates with or merges into any other person and is not the continuing or surviving corporation or entity of such consolidation or merger or (ii) transfers or conveys all or substantially all of its properties and other assets to any person, then, and in each such case, Parent shall cause proper provision to be made so that the successors and assigns of the Surviving Corporation shall expressly assume the obligations set forth in this Section 5.05.
(c) For six years after the Effective Time, Parent shall maintain (directly or indirectly through the Company's existing insurance programs) in effect the Company's current directors' and officers' liability insurance in respect of acts or omissions occurring at or prior to the Effective Time, covering each person currently covered by the Company's directors' and officers' liability insurance policy (a complete and accurate copy of which has been heretofore delivered to Parent), on terms with respect to such coverage and amounts no less favorable than those of such policy in effect on the date hereof; , , that Parent may (i) substitute therefor policies of Parent containing terms with respect to coverage (including as coverage relates to deductibles and exclusions) and amounts no less favorable to such directors and officers or (ii) request that the Company obtain such extended reporting period coverage under its existing insurance programs (to be effective as of the Effective Time); , , that in satisfying its obligation under this Section 5.05(c), neither the Company nor Parent shall be obligated to pay more than $700,000 in the aggregate to obtain such coverage.  It is understood and agreed that in the event such coverage cannot be obtained for $700,000 or less in the aggregate, Parent shall be obligated to provide such coverage as may be obtained for such $700,000 aggregate amount.
provided
however
provided further
however
48
(d) The provisions of this Section 5.05 (i) are intended to be for the benefit of, and will be enforceable by, each indemnified party, his or her heirs and his or her representatives and (ii) are in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other rights to indemnification or contribution that any such person may have by contract or otherwise.
SECTION 5.06.   (a) All fees and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall be paid by the party incurring such fees or expenses, whether or not the Merger is consummated, except (i) as provided in paragraphs (b) and (d) of this Section 5.06 and (ii) that expenses incurred in connection with the filing, printing and mailing the Proxy Statement and the Form S-4 shall be shared equally by Parent and the Company.
Fees and Expenses.
(b) In the event that (i) this Agreement is terminated by Parent pursuant to Section 7.01(e) or (ii) (A) prior to the obtaining of the Shareholder Approval, a Takeover Proposal shall have been made to the Company or shall have been made directly to the shareholders of the Company generally or shall have otherwise become publicly known or any person shall have publicly announced an intention (whether or not conditional) to make a Takeover Proposal, (B) thereafter this Agreement is terminated by either Parent or the Company pursuant to Section 7.01(b)(i) (but only if a vote to obtain the Shareholder Approval or the Shareholders' Meeting has not been held) or Section 7.01(b)(iii) and (C) within 12 months after such termination, the Company enters into a definitive Contract to consummate, or consummates, the transactions contemplated by any Takeover Proposal, then the Company shall pay Parent a fee equal to $12,000,000 (the "") by wire transfer of same-day funds on the first business day following (x) in the case of a payment required by clause (i) above, the date of termination of this Agreement and (y) in the case of a payment required by clause (ii) above, the date of the first to occur of the events referred to in clause (ii)(C).  The Termination Fee shall be subject to a credit for any expense reimbursement actually paid pursuant to Section 5.06(d).
Termination Fee
(c) The Company and Parent acknowledge and agree that the agreements contained in Section 5.06(b) are an integral part of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and that, without these agreements, Parent would not enter into this Agreement; accordingly, if the Company fails promptly to pay the amount due pursuant to Section 5.06(b), and, in order to obtain such payment, Parent commences a suit that results in a judgment against the Company for the Termination Fee, the Company shall pay to Parent its costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees and expenses) in connection with such suit, together with interest on the amount of the Termination Fee from the date such payment was required to be made until the date of payment at the prime rate of Citibank, N.A. in effect on the date such payment was required to be made.
(d) The Company shall reimburse Parent and Sub for all their out-of-pocket expenses actually incurred in connection with this Agreement, the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement if this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7.01(c)(i).  Parent shall reimburse the Company for all its out-of-pocket expenses actually incurred in connection with this Agreement, the Merger and the
49
other transactions contemplated by this Agreement if this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 7.01(d).  Any such reimbursement shall be paid upon demand following such termination, except that no payment shall be due under the first sentence of this Section 5.06(d) if the Company has previously made any payment due under Section 5.06(b).
SECTION 5.07.   Except with respect to any Company Adverse Recommendation Change made in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, Parent and the Company shall consult with each other before issuing, and give each other the opportunity to review and comment upon, any press release or other public statements with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including the Merger, and shall not issue any such press release or make any such public statement prior to such consultation, except as such party may reasonably conclude may be required by applicable law, court process or by obligations pursuant to any listing agreement with any national securities exchange or national securities quotation system.  The parties agree that all formal Company employee communication programs or announcements with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall be in the forms mutually agreed to by the parties (such agreement not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed).  The parties agree that the initial press release to be issued with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement shall be in the form heretofore agreed to by the parties.
Public Announcements.
SECTION 5.08.   The Company shall give Parent the opportunity to participate in the defense or settlement of any shareholder litigation against the Company and/or its directors relating to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, and no such settlement shall be agreed to without Parent's prior written consent.
Shareholder Litigation.
SECTION 5.09.   As soon as practicable after the date hereof, the Company shall deliver to Parent a letter identifying all persons who are, at the time this Agreement is submitted for adoption by the shareholders of the Company, "affiliates" of the Company for purposes of Rule 145 under the Securities Act.  The Company shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause each such person to deliver to Parent at least 30 days prior to the Closing Date a written agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit B.
Affiliates.
SECTION 5.10.   To the extent Parent does not issue treasury shares in the Merger which are already listed on the NYSE, Parent shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause the shares of Parent Common Stock to be issued in the Merger to be approved for listing on the NYSE, subject to official notice of issuance, prior to the Closing Date.
Stock Exchange Listing.
SECTION 5.11.   (a) The parties intend the Merger to qualify as a reorganization under Section 368(a) of the Code.  This Agreement will constitute a "plan of reorganization" for purposes of Sections 354 and 361 of the Code.  Each party and its Affiliates shall use commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Merger to so qualify and to obtain the opinions of Cravath, Swaine &
Tax-Free Merger Treatment; Transfer Taxes.
50
Moore LLP and Dorsey & Whitney LLP, substantially in the form set forth in Sections 5.11(1)(A) and 5.11(2)(A) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, respectively, to the effect that the Merger will be treated for U.S. Federal income tax purposes as a "reorganization" within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code, and that Parent, Sub and the Company will each be a party to that reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(b) of the Code.  For tax purposes, each party and its Affiliates will report the Merger in a manner consistent with this Section 5.11.  For purposes of the tax opinions described in Sections 6.02(e) and 6.03(c) of this Agreement, each of the Company and Parent shall provide, substantially in the form set forth in Sections 5.11(1)(B) and 5.11(2)(B) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, respectively, representations to Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP and Dorsey & Whitney LLP, including representations and warranties set forth on certificates of officers of the Company, Parent and any of their respective Subsidiaries, each dated on or about the date that is two business days prior to the date the Proxy Statement is mailed to the shareholders of Parent and the Company and reissued in the same form as of the Closing Date.
(b) The Company and Parent shall cooperate in the preparation, execution and filing of all returns, questionnaires, applications or other documents regarding any real property transfer or gains, sales, use, transfer, value added, stock transfer and stamp taxes, any transfer, recording, registration and other fees or any similar taxes which become payable in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement that are required or permitted to be filed on or before the Effective Time.  The Company shall pay on behalf of its shareholders any such Taxes or fees which become payable in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement for which such shareholders are primarily liable and in no event shall Parent pay such amounts.
SECTION 5.12.   (a) Parent will provide or cause the Surviving Corporation to provide to employees of the Company who remain in the employment of the Surviving Corporation and its Subsidiaries (the "") from the Effective Time until the first anniversary thereof either (i) employee benefits that are reasonably comparable in the aggregate to the employee benefits provided to the employees of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time or (ii) employee benefits that are reasonably comparable in the aggregate to the employee benefits provided to similarly situated employees of Parent; that neither Parent nor the Surviving Corporation nor any of their Subsidiaries shall have any obligation to issue, or adopt any plans or arrangements providing for the issuance of, shares of capital stock, warrants, options, stock appreciation rights or other rights in respect of any shares of capital stock of any entity or any securities convertible or exchangeable into such shares; , that no plans or arrangements of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries providing for such issuance shall be taken into account in determining whether employee benefits are reasonably comparable in the aggregate.
Employee Matters.
Continuing Employees
provided
provided further
(b) The service of each Continuing Employee prior to the Effective Time shall be treated as service with Parent or any of its Subsidiaries for purposes of each employee benefit plan of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries in which such employee is eligible to participate after the Effective Time, including for purposes of eligibility,
51
vesting, benefit levels and accruals (but not for purposes of benefit accrual under any defined benefit pension plans); , , that such service shall not be recognized to the extent that such recognition would result in any duplication of benefits.
provided
however
(c) Nothing contained herein shall be construed as requiring, and the Company shall take no action that would have the effect of requiring, Parent or the Surviving Corporation to continue any specific plans or to continue the employment of any specific person.
(d) With respect to any welfare plan maintained by Parent in which Continuing Employees are eligible to participate after the Effective Time, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, (i) waive all limitations as to preexisting conditions and exclusions with respect to participation and coverage requirements applicable to such employees to the extent such conditions and exclusions were satisfied or did not apply to such employees under the welfare plans of the Company and its Subsidiaries prior to the Effective Time and (ii) provide each Continuing Employee with credit for any co-payments and deductibles paid prior to the Effective Time in satisfying any analogous deductible or out-of-pocket requirements to the extent applicable under any such plan.
(e) The provisions of this Section 5.12 are not intended to confer upon any person other than the parties hereto any rights or remedies.
SECTION 5.13.   The Board of Directors of the Company shall take all further actions (in addition to those referred to in Section 3.01(u)) requested by Parent in order to render the Rights issued pursuant to the Rights Agreement inapplicable to the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement.  Except as provided above with respect to the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the Board of Directors of the Company shall not, without the prior written consent of Parent, amend, take any action with respect to, or make any determination under, the Rights Agreement, including a redemption of the Rights or any action to facilitate a Takeover Proposal, including any action by the Board of Directors of the Company, or any subset thereof, deeming any Takeover Proposal a "Permitted Offer" (as defined in the Rights Agreement).
Rights Agreement.
Prior to the Effective Time, each of Parent and the Company shall cause any dispositions of Company Common Stock (including derivative securities with respect to Company Common Stock) or acquisitions of Parent Common Stock (including derivative securities with respect to Parent Common Stock) resulting from the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by each individual who is subject to the reporting requirements of Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act with respect to the Company to be exempt under Rule 16b-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act.
SECTION 5.14.  
Section 16b-3.
SECTION 5.15. (a)  The Company shall take all actions reasonably requested by Parent with respect to the Warrants, dated May 10, 2002 (the ""), including, to the extent required by Section 4(b) of the
Warrants and Convertible Notes.
Warrants
52
Warrants, making appropriate provisions such that holders of Warrants will receive the appropriate number of shares of Parent Common Stock in exchange for their Warrants.
(b) The Company shall take all actions reasonably requested by Parent with respect to the Subordinated Convertible Notes due May 1, 2007 (the " "), including, to the extent required by Section 6(c)(ii) of the Convertible Notes, making appropriate provisions such that holders of Convertible Notes will receive the appropriate number of shares of Parent Common Stock in exchange for their Convertible Notes and giving the notice required by Section 5(c) of the Convertible Notes.
Convertible
Notes
SECTION 6.01.   The respective obligation of each party to effect the Merger is subject to the satisfaction or (to the extent permitted by law) waiver on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions:
Conditions to Each Party's Obligation to Effect the Merger.
(a)   The Shareholder Approval shall have been obtained.
Shareholder Approval.
(b)   The shares of Parent Common Stock issuable to the shareholders of the Company as contemplated by this Agreement shall have been approved for listing on the NYSE, subject to official notice of issuance.
NYSE Listing.
(c)   The waiting period (and any extension thereof) applicable to the Merger under the HSR Act shall have been terminated or shall have expired.
HSR Act.
(d)   No temporary restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction or other judgment or order issued by any court of competent jurisdiction or statute, law, rule, other legal restraint or prohibition (collectively, "") shall be in effect preventing the consummation of the Merger.
No Injunctions or Restraints.
Restraints
(e)   The Form S-4 shall have become effective under the Securities Act and shall not be the subject of any stop order or pending or threatened proceedings seeking a stop order.
Form S-4.
SECTION 6.02.   The obligations of Parent and Sub to effect the Merger are further subject to the satisfaction or (to the extent permitted by law) waiver by Parent on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions:
Conditions to Obligations of Parent and Sub.
(a)   The representations and warranties of the Company contained in this Agreement that are qualified as to materiality shall be true and correct, and the representations and warranties of the Company contained in this Agreement that are not so qualified shall be complete and accurate in all material respects, in each case as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date as
Representations and Warranties.
53
though made on the Closing Date, except to the extent such representations and warranties expressly relate to an earlier date, in which case as of such earlier date.  Parent shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of the Company by the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer of the Company to such effect.
(b)   The Company shall have performed in all material respects all obligations required to be performed by it under this Agreement at or prior to the Closing Date, and Parent shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of the Company by the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer of the Company to such effect.
Performance of Obligations of the Company.
(c)   There shall not be pending or overtly threatened any suit, action or proceeding by any Governmental Entity or by any other person having a reasonable likelihood of prevailing in a manner contemplated in clauses (i), (ii) or (iii) below, (i) challenging the acquisition by Parent or Sub of any shares of Company Common Stock, seeking to restrain or prohibit the consummation of the Merger or any other transaction contemplated by this Agreement, or seeking to place limitations on the ownership of shares of Company Common Stock (or shares of common stock of the Surviving Corporation) by Parent, Sub or any other Affiliate of Parent or seeking to obtain from the Company, Parent, Sub or any other Affiliate of Parent any damages that are material in relation to the Company, (ii) seeking to prohibit or materially limit the ownership or operation by the Company, Parent or any of their respective Subsidiaries of any portion of any business or of any assets of the Company, Parent or any of their respective Subsidiaries, or to compel the Company, Parent or any of their respective Subsidiaries to divest or hold separate any portion of any business or of any assets of the Company, Parent or any of their respective Subsidiaries, in each case, as a result of the Merger or (iii) seeking to prohibit Parent or any of its Affiliates from effectively controlling in any material respect the business or operations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
No Litigation.
(d)   No Restraint that could reasonably be expected to result, directly or indirectly, in any of the effects referred to in clauses (i) through (iii) of paragraph (c) of this Section 6.02 shall be in effect.
Restraints.
(e)   Parent shall have received a written opinion, substantially in the form set forth in Section 6.02(e) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, dated as of the Closing Date, from Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, counsel to Parent, to the effect that the Merger will be treated for U.S. Federal income tax purposes as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code, and that Parent, Sub and the Company will each be a party to that reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(b) of the Code; it being understood that in rendering such opinion,  Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP shall be entitled to rely upon customary assumptions as set forth in such opinion and representations as it reasonably deems relevant and satisfactory, including the representations provided by the parties hereto on the certificates of officers of Parent, the Company and their respective Subsidiaries.
Tax Opinion.
54
(f)   The Company shall have obtained all consents, approvals and waivers set forth in Schedule 6.02(f) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, and such consents, approvals and waivers shall remain in full force and effect.
Consents.
SECTION 6.03.   The obligation of the Company to effect the Merger is further subject to the satisfaction or (to the extent permitted by law) waiver by the Company on or prior to the Closing Date of the following conditions:
Conditions to Obligation of the Company.
(a)   The representations and warranties of Parent and Sub contained in this Agreement that are qualified as to materiality shall be true and correct, and the representations and warranties of Parent and Sub contained in this Agreement that are not so qualified shall be complete and accurate in all material respects, in each case as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date as though made on the Closing Date, except to the extent such representations and warranties expressly relate to an earlier date, in which case as of such earlier date.  The Company shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of Parent by an executive officer of Parent to such effect.
Representations and Warranties.
(b)   Parent and Sub shall have performed in all material respects all obligations required to be performed by them under this Agreement at or prior to the Closing Date, and the Company shall have received a certificate signed on behalf of Parent by an executive officer of Parent to such effect.
Performance of Obligations of Parent and Sub.
(c)   Company shall have received a written opinion, substantially in the form set forth in Section 6.03(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, dated as of the Closing Date, from Dorsey & Whitney LLP, counsel to Company, to the effect that the Merger will be treated for U.S. Federal income tax purposes as a reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(a) of the Code, and that the Company, Parent and Sub will each be a party to that reorganization within the meaning of Section 368(b) of the Code; it being understood that in rendering such opinion, Dorsey & Whitney LLP shall be entitled to rely upon customary assumptions as set forth in such opinion and representations as it reasonably deems relevant and satisfactory, including the representations provided by the parties hereto on the certificates of officers of the Company, Parent and their respective Subsidiaries.
Tax Opinion.
SECTION 6.04.   None of the Company, Parent or Sub may rely on the failure of any condition set forth in Section 6.01, 6.02 or 6.03, as the case may be, to be satisfied if such failure was caused by such party's failure to act in good faith or to use its commercially reasonable efforts to consummate the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement, as required by and subject to Section 5.03.
Frustration of Closing Conditions.
55
SECTION 7.01.   This Agreement may be terminated at any time prior to the Effective Time, whether before or after receipt of the Shareholder Approval:
Termination.
(a) by mutual written consent of Parent, Sub and the Company;
(b) by either Parent or the Company:
(i) if the Merger shall not have been consummated on or before April 16, 2007; , , that the right to terminate this Agreement under this Section 7.01(b)(i) shall not be available to any party whose breach of a representation or warranty in this Agreement or whose action or failure to act has been a principal cause of or resulted in the failure of the Merger to be consummated on or before such date;
provided
however
(ii) if any Restraint having any of the effects set forth in Section 6.01(d) shall be in effect and shall have become final and nonappealable; or
(iii) if the Shareholder Approval shall not have been obtained at the Shareholders' Meeting duly convened therefor or at any adjournment or postponement thereof;
(c) by Parent (i) if the Company shall have breached or failed to perform any of its representations, warranties, covenants or agreements set forth in this Agreement, which breach or failure to perform (A) would give rise to the failure of a condition set forth in Section 6.02(a) or 6.02(b) and (B) is incapable of being cured, or is not cured, by the Company within 30 calendar days following receipt of written notice of such breach or failure to perform from Parent or (ii) if any Restraint having the effects referred to in clauses (i) through (iii) of Section 6.02(c) shall be in effect and shall have become final and nonappealable;
(d) by the Company, if Parent shall have breached or failed to perform any of its representations, warranties, covenants or agreements set forth in this Agreement, which breach or failure to perform (A) would give rise to the failure of a condition set forth in Section 6.03(a) or 6.03(b) and (B) is incapable of being cured, or is not cured, by Parent within 30 calendar days following receipt of written notice of such breach or failure to perform from the Company; or
(e) by Parent:
event that prior to the obtaining of the Shareholder Approval (A) a Company Adverse Recommendation Change shall have occurred or (B) the Board of Directors of the Company fails publicly to reaffirm its
(i) in the
56
recommendation of this Agreement, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement within 10 business days of receipt of a written request by Parent to provide such reaffirmation following a Takeover Proposal; or
(ii) if the Company or any of its officers, directors, employees, representatives or agents takes any actions in violation of Section 4.02.
SECTION 7.02.   In the event of termination of this Agreement by either the Company or Parent as provided in Section 7.01, this Agreement shall forthwith become void and have no effect, without any liability or obligation on the part of Parent, Sub or the Company under this Agreement, other than the provisions of Section 3.01(r), the second sentence of Section 5.02, Section 5.06, this Section 7.02 and Article VIII, which provisions shall survive such termination, and except to the extent that such termination results from the willful and material breach by a party of any of its representations, warranties, covenants or agreements set forth in this Agreement.
Effect of Termination.
SECTION 7.03.   This Agreement may be amended by the parties hereto at any time before or after receipt of the Shareholder Approval; , , that after such approval has been obtained, there shall be made no amendment that by law requires further approval by the shareholders of the Company without such approval having been obtained.  This Agreement may not be amended except by an instrument in writing signed on behalf of each of the parties hereto.
Amendment.
provided
however
SECTION 7.04.   At any time prior to the Effective Time, the parties may (a) extend the time for the performance of any of the obligations or other acts of the other parties, (b) to the extent permitted by law, waive any inaccuracies in the representations and warranties contained herein or in any document delivered pursuant hereto or (c) subject to the proviso to the first sentence of Section 7.03 and to the extent permitted by law, waive compliance with any of the agreements or conditions contained herein.  Any agreement on the part of a party to any such extension or waiver shall be valid only if set forth in an instrument in writing signed on behalf of such party.  The failure of any party to this Agreement to assert any of its rights under this Agreement or otherwise shall not constitute a waiver of such rights.
Extension; Waiver.
SECTION 7.05.   A termination of this Agreement pursuant to Section 7.01 or an amendment of this Agreement pursuant to Section 7.03 shall, in order to be effective, require, in the case of the Company, action by its Board of Directors or, with respect to any amendment of this Agreement pursuant to Section 7.03, the duly authorized committee of its Board of Directors to the extent permitted by law.
Procedure for Termination or Amendment.
SECTION 8.01.   None of the representations and warranties in this Agreement or in any instrument delivered
Nonsurvival of Representations and Warranties.
57
pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the Effective Time.  This Section 8.01 shall not limit any covenant or agreement of the parties which by its terms contemplates performance after the Effective Time.
SECTION 8.02.   Except for notices that are specifically required by the terms of this Agreement to be delivered orally, all notices, requests, claims, demands and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed given if delivered personally, telecopied (which is confirmed) or sent by overnight courier (providing proof of delivery) to the parties at the following addresses (or at such other address for a party as shall be specified by like notice):
Notices.
if to Parent or Sub, to:
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. 3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas 77515
Telecopy No.:  (979) 848-5225 Attention:  Kenneth Barrow
with a copy to:
Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP Worldwide Plaza 825 Eighth Avenue New York, NY 10019
Telecopy No.:  (212) 474-3700 Attention:  Mark I. Greene, Esq.
if to the Company, to:
Pemstar Inc. 3535 Technology Drive Rochester, Minnesota 55901
Telecopy No.:  (507) 280-0838 Attention:  General Counsel
58
with a copy to:
Dorsey & Whitney, LLP 50 South Sixth Street  Suite 1500 Minneapolis, Minnesota 55402-1498
Telecopy No.:  (612) 340-2868 Attention:  William A. Jonason, Esq.
SECTION 8.03.   For purposes of this Agreement:
Definitions.
(a) an "" of any person means another person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, such first person;
Affiliate
(b) "" or "" means any change, effect, event, occurrence, state of facts or development which individually or in the aggregate could reasonably be expected to result in any change or effect, that (i) is materially adverse to the business, condition (financial or otherwise), properties, assets, liabilities (contingent or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) could reasonably be expected to prevent or materially impede, interfere with, hinder or delay the consummation by the Company of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement; that none of the following shall be deemed, either alone or in combination, to constitute, and none of the following shall be taken into account in determining whether there has been or will be, a Company Material Adverse Effect or a Company Material Adverse Change: (A) any change relating to the economies in locations in which the Company has operations or the United States securities markets in general, so long as the changes do not disproportionately impact the Company relative to other companies that have operations located in such economies or that have securities listed in the United States, (B) any adverse change, effect, event, occurrence, state of facts or development reasonably attributable to conditions affecting the industry in which the Company participates (other than as may arise or result from regulatory action by a Governmental Entity), so long as the effects do not disproportionately impact the Company relative to other companies that participate in the industry, or (C) any change to the extent resulting directly from the announcement or consummation of the Transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
Company Material Adverse Change
Company Material Adverse Effect
provided
(c) "" of any person that is not an individual means, with respect to any matter in question, the actual knowledge of such person's executive officers after making reasonable inquiry of the other executives or managers who report to such executive officers and have primary responsibility for such matter;
Knowledge
(d) "" or "" means any change, effect, event, occurrence, state of facts or development which individually or in the aggregate could reasonably be expected to result in any change or
Parent Material Adverse Change
Parent Material Adverse Effect
59
effect, that (i) is materially adverse to the business, condition (financial or otherwise), properties, assets, liabilities (contingent or otherwise) or results of operations of Parent and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) could reasonably be expected to prevent or materially impede, interfere with, hinder or delay the consummation by Parent of the Merger or the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement; that none of the following shall be deemed, either alone or in combination, to constitute, and none of the following shall be taken into account in determining whether there has been or will be, a Parent Material Adverse Effect or a Parent Material Adverse Change: (A) any change relating to the economies in locations in which Parent has operations or the United States securities markets in general, so long as the changes do not disproportionately impact Parent relative to other companies that have operations located in such economies or that have securities listed in the United States, (B) any adverse change, effect, event, occurrence, state of facts or development reasonably attributable to conditions affecting the industry in which Parent participates (other than as may arise or result from regulatory action by a Governmental Entity), so long as the effects do not disproportionately impact Parent relative to other companies that participate in the industry, or (C) any change to the extent resulting directly from the announcement or consummation of the Transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
provided
(e) "" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, association, trust, unincorporated organization or other entity; and
person
(f) a "" of any person means another person, an amount of the voting securities, other voting rights or voting partnership interests of which is sufficient to elect at least a majority of its board of directors or other governing body (or, if there are no such voting interests, 50% or more of the equity interests of which) is owned directly or indirectly by such first person.
Subsidiary
SECTION 8.04.   When a reference is made in this Agreement to an Article, a Section, Annex, Exhibit or Schedule, such reference shall be to an Article of, a Section of, or an Exhibit or Schedule to, this Agreement unless otherwise indicated.  The table of contents and headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.  Whenever the words "include", "includes" or "including" are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words "without limitation".  The words "hereof", "herein" and "hereunder" and words of similar import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement.  References to "this Agreement" shall include the Company Disclosure Schedule.  All terms defined in this Agreement shall have the defined meanings when used in any certificate or other document made or delivered pursuant hereto unless otherwise defined therein.  The definitions contained in this Agreement are applicable to the singular as well as the plural forms of such terms and to the masculine as well as to the feminine and neuter genders of such term.  Any Contract or statute defined or referred to herein or in any Contract that is referred to herein means such Contract or statute as from time to time amended, modified or supplemented, including (in the case of Contracts) by waiver or consent and (in the case of statutes) by succession
Interpretation.
60
of comparable successor statutes and references to all attachments thereto and instruments incorporated therein.  References to a person are also to its permitted successors and assigns.
SECTION 8.05.   For any matter under this Agreement requiring the consent or approval of any party to be valid and binding on the parties hereto, such consent or approval must be in writing.
Consents and Approvals.
SECTION 8.06.   This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts (including by facsimile), all of which shall be considered one and the same agreement and shall become effective when one or more counterparts have been signed by each of the parties and delivered to the other parties.
Counterparts.
SECTION 8.07.   This Agreement and the Confidentiality Agreement (a) constitute the entire agreement, and supersede all prior agreements and understandings, both written and oral, among the parties with respect to the subject matter of this Agreement and the Confidentiality Agreement and (b) except for the provisions of Article II and Section 5.05, are not intended to and do not confer upon any person other than the parties any legal or equitable rights or remedies.
Entire Agreement; No Third-Party Beneficiaries.
SECTION 8.08.   THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE, REGARDLESS OF THE LAWS THAT MIGHT OTHERWISE GOVERN UNDER APPLICABLE PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAWS THEREOF, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THE MBCA IS MANDATORILY APPLICABLE TO THE MERGER.
GOVERNING LAW.
SECTION 8.09.   Neither this Agreement nor any of the rights, interests or obligations hereunder shall be assigned, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise by any of the parties without the prior written consent of the other parties, and any assignment without such consent shall be null and void, except that Parent or Sub, upon prior written notice to the Company, may assign, in its sole discretion, any of or all its rights, interests and obligations under this Agreement (a) in the case of Parent, to any direct or indirect wholly owned Subsidiary of Parent and (b) in the case of Sub, to Parent or to any direct or indirect wholly owned Subsidiary of Parent, but no such assignment shall relieve Parent or Sub, as applicable, of any of its obligations hereunder; that any such assignee of Parent or Sub, as applicable, shall be primarily liable with respect to the obligations hereunder and the liability of Parent or Sub, as applicable, shall be secondary.  Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement will be binding upon, inure to the benefit of, and be enforceable by, the parties and their respective successors and assigns.
Assignment.
provided
SECTION 8.10.   The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur and that the parties would not have any adequate remedy at law in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached.  It is
Specific Enforcement; Consent to Jurisdiction.
61
accordingly agreed that the parties shall be entitled to an injunction or injunctions to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of this Agreement in any Federal court located in the State of Delaware or in any state court in the State of Delaware, this being in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity.  In addition, each of the parties hereto (a) consents to submit itself to the personal jurisdiction of any Federal court located in the State of Delaware or of any state court located in the State of Delaware in the event any dispute arises out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (b) agrees that it will not attempt to deny or defeat such personal jurisdiction by motion or other request for leave from any such court and (c) agrees that it will not bring any action relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement in any court other than a Federal court located in the State of Delaware or a state court located in the State of Delaware.
SECTION 8.11.   Each party hereto hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any right it may have to a trial by jury in respect of any suit, action or other proceeding arising out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.  Each party hereto (a) certifies that no representative, agent or attorney of any other party has represented, expressly or otherwise, that such party would not, in the event of any action, suit or proceeding, seek to enforce the foregoing waiver and (b) acknowledges that it and the other parties hereto have been induced to enter into this Agreement, by, among other things, the mutual waiver and certifications in this Section 8.11.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
SECTION 8.12.   If any term or other provision of this Agreement is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced by any rule of law or public policy, all other conditions and provisions of this Agreement shall nevertheless remain in full force and effect.  Upon such determination that any term or other provision is invalid, illegal or incapable of being enforced, the parties hereto shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law in an acceptable manner to the end that the transactions contemplated hereby are fulfilled to the extent possible.
Severability.
62
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Parent, Sub and the Company have caused this Agreement to be signed by their respective officers hereunto duly authorized, all as of the date first written above.
 
63
ANNEX I TO THE MERGER AGREEMENT
Index of Defined Terms
 
A-
1
 
 
A-
2
 
 
A-
3
EXHIBIT A TO THE MERGER AGREEMENT
Articles of Incorporation of the Surviving Corporation
Article I
The name of this corporation is Pemstar Inc..
Article II
The address of the registered office of this corporation is Suite 340, 201 First Avenue, S.W., Rochester, Minnesota 55902.
Article III
The aggregate number of shares that this corporation has authority to issue is 1,000 shares of Common Stock, with a par value of $0.01 per share.
Article IV
The board shall have authority to establish more than one class or series of shares of this corporation, and the different classes and series shall have such relative rights and preferences, with such designations, as the board may by resolution provide.
Article V
Except as may be otherwise provided by the board in a resolution establishing a class or series of the shares of this corporation, shareholders shall have no preemptive rights.
Article VI
There shall be no cumulative voting by shareholders for the election of directors.
Article VII
Any action required or permitted to be taken at a board meeting, if such action need not be approved by the shareholders, may be taken by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the number of directors that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the board at which all directors were present.
Article VIII
A director of the corporation shall not be personally liable to the corporation or its shareholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director.  The foregoing shall not be deemed to eliminate or limit the liability of a director (i) for any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the corporation or its shareholders, (ii) for acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law, (iii) under Section 302A.559 or 80A.23 of Minnesota Statutes, (iv) for any transaction from which the director derived any improper personal benefit, or (v) for any act or omission occurring prior to the effective date of this Article VIII.  Any repeal or modification of this paragraph by the shareholders of the corporation shall not adversely affect any right or protection of a director of the corporation existing at the time of such repeal or modification.
Article IX
An action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the shareholders may be taken without a meeting by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by shareholders having voting power equal to the voting power that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the shareholders at which all shareholders were present.
Article X
Pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, Section 302A.471, Subd. 1(a), a shareholder of this corporation shall not have the right to dissent from, and obtain payment for the fair value of the shareholder's shares in the event of, an amendment of the Articles of Incorporation that materially and adversely affects the rights or preferences of the shares of the shareholder.
EXHIBIT B TO THE MERGER AGREEMENT
Dear Sirs:
The undersigned, a holder of shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share (""), of PEMSTAR INC., a Minnesota corporation (the ""), acknowledges that the undersigned may be deemed an "affiliate" of the Company within the meaning of Rule 145 ("") promulgated under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""), by the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ""), although nothing contained herein should be construed as an admission of such fact.  Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of October 16, 2006, among BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC., a Texas corporation (""), AUTOBAHN ACQUISITION CORP., a Minnesota corporation and wholly owned subsidiary of Parent (""), and the Company, Sub will be merged with and into the Company (the ""), and in connection with the Merger, the undersigned is entitled to receive shares of common stock, par value $0.10 per share, of Parent ("")
Company Common Stock
Company
Rule 145
Securities Act
SEC
Parent
Sub
Merger
Parent Common Stock
If in fact the undersigned were an affiliate under the Securities Act, the undersigned's ability to sell, assign or transfer the shares of Parent Common Stock received by the undersigned in exchange for any shares of Company Common Stock in connection with the Merger may be restricted unless such transaction is registered under the Securities Act or an exemption from such registration is available.  The undersigned understands that such exemptions are limited and the undersigned has obtained or will obtain advice of counsel as to the nature and conditions of such exemptions, including information with respect to the applicability to the sale of such securities of Rules 144 and 145(d) promulgated under the Securities Act.  The undersigned understands that Parent will not be required to maintain the effectiveness of any registration statement under the Securities Act for the purposes of resale of shares of Parent Common Stock by the undersigned.
The undersigned hereby represents to and covenants with Parent that the undersigned will not sell, assign or transfer any of the shares of Parent Common Stock received by the undersigned in exchange for shares of Company Common Stock in connection with the Merger except (i) pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act, (ii) in conformity with the volume and other limitations of Rule 145 or (iii) in a transaction which, in the opinion of counsel to the undersigned, such counsel to be reasonably satisfactory to Parent and such opinion to be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Parent, or as described in a "no-action" or interpretive letter from the staff of the SEC specifically issued with respect to a transaction to be engaged in by the undersigned, is not required to be registered under the Securities Act.
In the event of a sale or other disposition by the undersigned of the shares of Parent Common Stock pursuant to Rule 145, the undersigned will supply Parent with evidence of compliance with such Rule, in the form of a letter in the form of Annex I hereto and the opinion of counsel or no-action letter referred to above.  The undersigned understands that Parent may instruct its transfer agent to withhold the transfer of any shares of Parent Common Stock disposed of by the undersigned, but that (provided such transfer is not prohibited by any other provision of this letter agreement) upon receipt of such evidence of compliance, Parent shall cause the transfer agent to effectuate the transfer of the shares of Parent Common Stock sold as indicated in such letter.
Parent covenants that it will take all such actions as may be reasonably available to it to permit the sale or other disposition of the shares of Parent Common Stock by the undersigned under Rule 145 in accordance with the terms thereof.
The undersigned acknowledges and agrees that the legend set forth below will be placed on certificates representing the shares of Parent Common Stock received by the undersigned in connection with the Merger or held by a transferee thereof, which legend will be removed by delivery of substitute certificates upon receipt of an opinion in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Parent from counsel reasonably satisfactory to Parent to the effect that such legend is no longer required for purposes of the Securities Act.
There will be placed on the certificates for Parent Common Stock issued to the undersigned in connection with the Merger, or any substitutions therefor, a legend stating in substance:
"The shares represented by this certificate were issued pursuant to a transaction to which Rule 145 promulgated under the Securities Act of 1933 applies.  The shares have not been acquired by the holder with a view to, or for resale in connection with, any distribution thereof within the meaning of the Securities Act of 1933.  The shares may not be sold, pledged or otherwise transferred except in accordance with an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933."
The undersigned acknowledges that (i) the undersigned has carefully read this letter and understands the requirements hereof and the limitations imposed upon the distribution, sale, transfer or other disposition of Parent Common Stock and (ii) the receipt by Parent of this letter is an inducement to Parent's obligations to consummate the Merger.
Very truly yours,
Dated:
ANNEX I TO EXHIBIT B
[Date]
[Name]
On                      , the undersigned sold the securities of BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. ("") described below in the space provided for that purpose (the "").  The Securities were received by the undersigned in connection with the merger of AUTOBAHN ACQUISITION CORP., a Minnesota corporation, with and into PEMSTAR INC., a Minnesota corporation.
Parent
Securities
Based upon the most recent report or statement filed by Parent with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Securities sold by the undersigned were within the prescribed limitations set forth in paragraph (e) of Rule 144 promulgated under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "").
Securities Act
The undersigned hereby represents that the Securities were sold in "brokers' transactions" within the meaning of Section 4(4) of the Securities Act or in transactions directly with a "market maker" as that term is defined in Section 3(a)(38) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.  The undersigned further represents that the undersigned has not solicited or arranged for the solicitation of orders to buy the Securities, and that the undersigned has not made any payment in connection with the offer or sale of the Securities to any person other than to the broker who executed the order in respect of such sale.
Very truly yours,


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20061019134125.txt.gz
TIME:20061019134125
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act  (17 CFR 230.425)
o
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 19, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing third quarter results for the quarter ended September 30, 2006. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits
(d)
                                
Exhibit 99.1            Press release dated October 19, 2006
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
2
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 19, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $770 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, compared to $561 million for the same quarter last year. Third quarter net income was $29.3 million, or $0.45 per diluted share. In the comparable period last year, net income was $20.3 million, or $0.32 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, the Company had net income before special items of $30.0 million, or $0.46 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2006. All share and per share data appearing in this press release has been retroactively adjusted for the 3-for-2 stock split completed on April 3, 2006 to holders of record as of March 27, 2006.
"Our teams continued to deliver solid results during the quarter, while running at record levels. Our focus will be on working capital metric improvements during upcoming quarters in addition to our ongoing focus on volume ramps of programs," stated Benchmark's President and CEO Cary T. Fu.
Third Quarter 2006 Financial Highlights
Operating margin for the third quarter was 4.5% on a GAAP basis and was 4.6%, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
                 
Cash flows used in operating activities for the third quarter were $12 million.
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at September 30, 2006 of $265 million.
                 
No debt outstanding.
                 
Accounts receivable balance at September 30, 2006 of $442 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 52 days.
                 
Inventory of $532 million at September 30, 2006; inventory turns were 5.4 times.
                 
Fourth Quarter 2006 Guidance
Revenues for the fourth quarter of 2006 are expected to be between $710 million and $740 million. Diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.41 and $0.44.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20061221172532.txt.gz
TIME:20061221172532
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):   
December 20, 2006
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Item 8.01.   Other Events.
pursuant to which Pemstar Inc. will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference is a copy of the registrant's press release dated December 20, 2006, announcing that the shareholders of Pemstar Inc., at a special meeting of shareholders, approved the agreement and plan of merger dated October 16, 2006, among Benchmark Electronics, Inc., Autobahn Acquisition Corp. and Pemstar, Inc. pursuant to which Autobahn Acquisition Corp. will merge with and into Pemstar Inc. and Pemstar Inc. will survive the merger as the wholly owned subsidiary of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Pemstar Inc. have entered into a definitive merger agreement
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit    99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
GAYLA J. DELLY
CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER                                                                                                                             December 20, 2006
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, DECEMBER 20, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced that Pemstar Inc. (Nasdaq: PMTR) shareholders approved the adoption of the Agreement and Plan of Merger entered into with Benchmark Electronics and Autobahn Acquisition Corp., a wholly owned subsidiary of Benchmark, dated October 16, 2006, at a special meeting of shareholders held today at Pemstar's headquarters in Rochester, Minnesota.
According to the terms of the merger agreement, each outstanding share of Pemstar common stock will be converted into the right to receive 0.160 of a share of Benchmark common stock, with resulting fractional shares to be paid for in cash at market on the closing date. The transaction is expected to close in the first week of January 2007, at which point Pemstar will cease to be a publicly traded company. As soon as practicable after closing, each former holder of record of shares of Pemstar common stock will receive a transmittal letter which will contain instructions for obtaining the merger consideration, including the shares of Benchmark common stock and cash for any fractional shares of Benchmark common stock, in exchange for shares of Pemstar common stock.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's common shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE. More information about Benchmark can be found at www.bench.com.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark and Pemstar believe that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005, Pemstar's Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended March 31, 2006, and Benchmark's and Pemstar's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"). Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20061222172653.txt.gz
TIME:20061222172653
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 5.02.   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On December 21, 2006, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing changes in executive officers as approved by the Board of Directors. A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
(c)
         
Cary T. Fu, 58, who has held the titles of both Chief Executive Officer and President, will continue as Chief Executive Officer.
Gayla J. Delly, 47, has been promoted to President. Ms. Delly has been with the Company since 1996 and served as Chief Financial Officer of the Company since May 2001. She has served as Executive Vice President of the Company from September 2004, as Vice President Finance of the Company from November 2000 to September 2004, as Treasurer from January 1996 and as Controller of the Company from January 1996 to January 2002. Ms. Delly holds a B.S. degree in accounting from Samford University and is a Certified Public Accountant. In her new role, Ms. Delly will assume responsibility for the day-to-day business operations of the Company.
Donald F. Adam, 43, has been promoted to Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Adam has worked at the Company since January 2002. From January 2002 to July 2005, he served as Corporate Controller. In July 2005, he was promoted to, and has since served as, Vice President and Corporate Controller of the Company. From February 1998 to January 2002, Mr. Adam served as Chief Financial Officer of Specialty Piping Components, Inc. Mr. Adam holds a B.B.A. degree in accounting from The University of Texas and is a Certified Public Accountant. In his new role, Mr. Adam will assume responsibility for the day-to-day financial activities of Benchmark.
Mr. Adam's base salary, as approved by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors, is $240,000. Mr. Adam may also be entitled to an annual bonus award under the Company's incentive bonus plan. For any bonus awards to be made under the incentive bonus plan for any plan period, the earnings before income tax must meet or exceed, or in combination with other factors satisfy, levels targeted by the Company in its business plan, as established at the beginning of each fiscal year, for any bonus awards to be made. The Compensation Committee has the authority to determine the total amount of bonus awards, if any, and the specific amounts of the bonus awards to be made to the Company's employees for any plan year based on its evaluation of the Company's financial condition, results of operations, business and prospects, and each such employee's position, performance and service, respectively, and such other criteria as it may determine to be relevant or appropriate.
The Company has a key contributor severance agreement with Mr. Adam that provides that, if the Company should become subject to any proposed or threatened change of control and, at any time within two years following such change of control, Mr. Adam's employment is terminated without cause, Mr. Adam will be entitled to receive severance equal to one time Mr. Adam's Employee's Earnings (as such term in defined in Section 3(a) of the key contributor severance agreement). A copy of the key contributor severance agreement is attached to this Current Report as Exhibit 10.1 and incorporated herein by reference.
2
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
3

Exhibit 10.1
KEY CONTRIBUTOR SEVERANCE AGREEMENT
SEVERANCE AGREEMENT, dated as of August 27, 2002, by and between BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC. ("Benchmark"), and Don Adam ("Employee").
The Executive Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Benchmark has recommended, and the Board of Directors has approved, that Benchmark enter into severance agreements with key employees who are from time to time designated by the Executive Compensation Committee;
A.
                                  
Should Benchmark become subject to any proposed or threatened Change of Control (as hereinafter defined), the Board of Directors believes it imperative that Benchmark and the Board of Directors be able to rely upon Employee to continue in Employee's position, and that Benchmark be able to receive and rely upon Employee's advice, if requested, as to the best interests of Benchmark and its stockholders without concern that Employee might be distracted by the personal uncertainties and risks created by such a proposal or threat;
B.
                                    
Should Benchmark receive any such proposals, in addition to Employee's regular duties, Employee may be called upon to assist in the assessment of such proposals, advise management and the Board of Directors as to whether such proposals would be in the best interests of Benchmark and its stockholders, and to take such other actions as the Board of Directors of Directors might determine to be appropriate;
C.
                                    
Accordingly, Benchmark and Employee agree as follows:
  In the event a third person begins a tender or exchange offer, circulates a proxy to stockholders, or takes other steps to effect a Change of Control, Employee agrees not to voluntarily leave the employ of Benchmark or its subsidiaries, and to render the services contemplated in the recitals to this Agreement, until the third person has abandoned or terminated his efforts to effect a Change of Control until a Change of Control has occurred.
1.
Services During Certain Events.
                                     
  Except as provided in Section 4 hereof, Benchmark will provide or cause to be provided to Employee the rights and benefits described in Section 3 hereof in the event that Employee's employment is terminated:
2.
Termination Following Change of Control.
                                     
at any time within two years following a Change of Control by Benchmark or its subsidiaries for reasons other than for "cause" (as such term is defined in Section 4 hereof) or other than as a consequence of Employee's death, permanent disability or retirement at or after the normal retirement date as provided under Benchmark's Retirement Plan as in effect immediately preceding such date ("Normal Retirement Date"); or
(a)
                                 
at any time within two years following a Change of Control by Employee following the occurrence of any of the following events without Employee's written consent:
(b)
                                
the reduction of Employee's annual salary (including any deferred portions thereof), annual or long-term cash or stock bonus opportunities, or level of benefits or supplemental compensation; or
(i)
                                    
the transfer of Employee to a location requiring a change in Employee's residence or a material increase in the amount of travel normally required of Employee in connection with Employee's employment.
(ii)
                                 
  In the event of the termination of Employee's employment under any of the circumstances set forth in Section 2 hereof ("Termination"), Benchmark agrees to provide or cause to be provided to Employee the following rights and benefits:
3.
Rights and Benefits upon Termination.
                                     
Employee shall be entitled to receive within 30 days of Termination (i) a lump-sum payment in cash in the amount equal to one (1) time Employee's Earnings (as such term is defined in this Section 3(a)), plus (ii) an additional amount sufficient to pay all excise taxes incurred by Employee in connection with such lump sum payment so that Employee will receive the same net after-tax amount he would have received if no excise tax had been imposed; , , that if there are fewer than 12 months remaining from the date of Termination to Employee's Normal Retirement Date, the amount calculated pursuant to this paragraph will be reduced by multiplying such amount by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months (including any fraction of a month) so remaining to Employee's Normal Retirement Date and the denominator of which is 12.
(a)
Lump Sum Payment at Termination. 
                                 
provided
however
For purposes of this Agreement, "Earnings" shall mean the sum of (1) Employee's Annual Base Pay (as defined below), and (2) Employee's Recent Cash Bonus (as defined below).
"Annual Base Pay" shall mean the greater of (1) the annualized amount of Employee's rate of base pay (as shown in Benchmark's payroll records) immediately before the Change of Control, and (2) the annualized amount of Employee's rate of base pay (as shown in Benchmark's payroll records) immediately before the date of Termination.
"Recent Cash Bonus" shall mean the highest bonus received by the Employee in the year in which a Change of Control occurs or during either of the proceeding two years, calculated as a percentage of Annual Base Pay as of the time of such payment.  To
2
calculate this amount, Benchmark will divide (a) the sum of the bonuses paid to Employee during the first calendar quarter of each of those three years, by (b) the annualized amount of Employee's rate of base pay (as shown in Benchmark's payroll records) at the time of such payment.
  Employee shall be entitled to any individual bonuses or individual incentive compensation not yet paid but payable under Benchmark's plans for years prior to the year of Employee's termination of employment.  Such amounts shall be paid to Employee in a single lump sum cash payment along with the payment of the lump sum severance payment described in 3(a).
(b)
Other Bonuses.
                                 
  Employee's entitlement to benefits hereunder shall not be governed by any duty to mitigate damages by seeking further employment nor offset by any compensation which Employee may receive from future employment.
(c)
Duty to Mitigate.
                                 
  Benchmark's obligation to pay or cause to be paid to Employee the benefits and to make the arrangements provided in this Section 3 shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstances, including, without limitation, any setoff, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right, which Benchmark may have against Employee or anyone else.  All amounts payable by or on behalf of Benchmark hereunder shall be paid without notice or demand.  Each and every payment made hereunder by or on behalf of Benchmark shall be final and Benchmark and its subsidiaries shall not, for any reason whatsoever, seek to recover all or any part of such payment from Employee or from whomever shall be entitled thereto.
(d)
Payment Obligations Absolute.
                                 
  Benchmark shall have no obligation to provide or cause to be provided to Employee the rights and benefits described in Section 3 hereof if either of the following events shall occur:
4.
Conditions to the Obligations of Benchmark.
                                     
  Benchmark or its subsidiaries shall terminate Employee's employment for "cause."  For purposes of this Agreement, the parties agree that the phrase "for cause" should be interpreted in the context of an employment arrangement for an executive with unique responsibilities to participate in the execution of the business plan adopted by Benchmark's Board of Directors.  Accordingly, the term "for cause" includes (i) acts of dishonesty; (ii) knowing violations of any written policy of Company or applicable to Benchmark's operations; (iii) violations of applicable laws, rules or regulations that expose Company to damages or liability; (iv) breach of fiduciary duty; and (v) failure to fulfill assigned responsibilities to achieve the earnings, revenue or profitability targets established by the Board of Directors.
(a)
Termination for Cause.
                                 
3
  Employee shall, promptly after Termination and upon receiving a written request to do so, resign as a director and/or officer of each subsidiary and affiliate of Benchmark of which Employee is then serving as a director and/or officer.
(b)
Resignation as Director.
                                 
5.
Confidentiality; Non-Solicitation; Cooperation.
                                     
  Employee agrees that at all times following Termination, Employee will not, without the prior written consent of Benchmark, disclose to any person, firm or corporation any confidential information of Benchmark or its subsidiaries which is now known to Employee or which hereafter may become known to Employee as a result of Employee's employment or association with Benchmark and which could be helpful to a competitor, unless such disclosure is required under the terms of a valid and effective subpoena or order issued by a court or governmental body; , , that the foregoing shall not apply to confidential information which becomes publicly disseminated by means other than a breach of this Agreement.
(a)
Confidentiality.
                                 
provided
however
  Employee agrees that for a period of three years following the date of Termination (or until Employee's Normal Retirement Date, whichever is sooner) Employee will not induce, either directly or indirectly, any employee of senior to manager level of Benchmark or any of its subsidiaries to terminate his or her employment.
(b)
Non-Solicitation.
                                 
  Employee agrees that, at all times following Termination, Employee will furnish such information and render such assistance and cooperation as may reasonably be requested in connection with any litigation or legal proceedings concerning Benchmark or any of its subsidiaries (other than any legal proceedings concerning Employee's employment).  In connection with such cooperation, Benchmark will pay or reimburse Employee for reasonable expenses.
(c)
Cooperation.
                                 
  It is recognized that damages in the event of breach of this Section 5 by Employee would be difficult, if not impossible, to ascertain, and it is therefore agreed that Benchmark, in addition to and without limiting any other remedy or right it may have, shall have the right to an injunction or other equitable relief in any court of competent jurisdiction, enjoining any such breach, and Employee hereby waives any and all defenses Employee may have on the ground of lack of jurisdiction or competence of the court to grant such an injunction or other equitable relief.  The existence of this right shall not preclude Benchmark from pursuing any other rights and remedies at law or in equity which Benchmark may have.
(d)
Remedies for Breach.
                                 
  This Agreement shall terminate on December 31, 2002; , , that this Agreement shall automatically renew for successive one-year terms
6.
Term of Agreement.
                                     
provided
however
4
unless Benchmark notifies Employee in writing at least 30 days prior to an expiration date that it does not desire to renew the Agreement for an additional term.  This Agreement shall also terminate if and when the management of Benchmark determines that Employee is no longer a key employee for purposes of being a party to a severance agreement with Benchmark and so notifies Employee in writing.  The preceding provisions of this Section 6 to the contrary notwithstanding, this Agreement shall not terminate (i) within three years after a Change of Control or (ii) during any period of time when Benchmark has reason to believe that any third person has begun a tender or exchange offer, circulated a proxy to stockholders, or taken other steps or formulated plans to effect a Change of Control, such period of time to end when, in the opinion of the Executive Compensation Committee, the third person has abandoned or terminated his efforts or plans to effect a Change of Control.
It is the mutual intention of the parties to have any dispute concerning this Agreement resolved out of court.  Accordingly, the parties agree that any claim or controversy of whatever nature arising from or relating in any way to this Agreement or the employment of the Employee by the Company, and any continuing obligations under this Agreement, including disputes arising under the common law or federal or state statutes, laws or regulations and disputes with respect to the arbitrability of any claim or controversy, shall be resolved exclusively by final and binding arbitration before a single experienced employment arbitrator selected in accordance with the Employment Dispute Resolution ("EDR") Rules of the American Arbitration Association ("AAA").  The arbitration will be conducted pursuant to the EDR Rules of the AAA, and the arbitrator shall have full authority to award or grant all remedies provided by law.  The judgment upon the award may be enforced by any court having jurisdiction thereof.  Benchmark shall pay for the fees of the arbitrator and the administrative and filing fees charged by the AAA.
7.
Arbitration. 
                                     
  Benchmark shall pay or reimburse Employee for all costs and expenses, including, without limitation, attorneys' fees, incurred by Employee as a result of any arbitration proceeding (including an arbitration claim or proceeding by Employee against Benchmark) arising out of, or challenging the validity or enforceability of, this Agreement or any provision hereof.
8.
Expenses.
                                     
9.
Miscellaneous.
                                     
  No right, benefit or interest hereunder shall be subject to assignment, anticipation, alienation, sale, encumbrance, charge, pledge, hypothecation or set-off in respect of any claim, debt or obligation, or to execution, attachment, levy or similar process; , , that Employee may assign any right, benefit or interest hereunder if such assignment is permitted under the terms of any plan or policy of insurance or annuity contract governing such right, benefit or interest.
(a)
Assignment.
                                 
provided
however
5
  Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to amend any provision of any plan or policy of Benchmark and its subsidiaries.  This Agreement is not, and nothing herein shall be deemed to create, a commitment of continued employment of Employee by Benchmark or any of its subsidiaries.
(b)
Construction of Agreement.
                                 
  This Agreement may not be amended, modified or canceled except by written agreement of the parties.
(c)
Amendment.
                                 
  No provision of this Agreement may be waived except by a writing signed by the party to be bound thereby.
(d)
Waiver.
                                 
Employee may at any time or from time to time waive any or all of the rights and benefits provided for herein which have not been received by Employee at the time of such waiver.  In addition, prior to the last day of the calendar year in which Employee's Termination occurs, Employee may waive any or all rights and benefits provided for herein which have been received by Employee; provided that prior to the end of such year Employee repays to Benchmark (or, if the benefit was received from an employee benefit plan trust, to such trust) the amount of the benefit received together with interest thereon at the minimum rate required to avoid imputed income.  Any waiver of benefits pursuant to this paragraph shall be irrevocable.  If Employee waives a right or benefit provided for herein and such waiver is determined by the Internal Revenue Service not to be effective, Benchmark shall indemnify Employee for any federal income and excise taxes Employee incurs as a result of that determination, so as to put Employee in the position Employee would have been in had the waiver been given effect.
  In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions of this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
(e)
Severability.
                                 
 This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of Employee and Employee's personal representative and heirs, and Benchmark and any successor organization or organizations which shall succeed to substantially all of the business and property of Benchmark, whether by means of merger, consolidation, acquisition of substantially all of the assets of Benchmark or otherwise, including by operation of law.
(f)
Successors.
                                   
  Any payment or delivery required under this Agreement shall be subject to all requirements of the law with regard to withholding of taxes, filing, making of reports and the like, and Benchmark shall use its best efforts to satisfy promptly all such requirements.
(g)
Taxes.
                                
6
  For purposes of this Agreement, "Change of Control" shall mean:
(h)
Definition of Change of Control.
                                
The acquisition by any individual, entity or group of 20% or more of either (i) the then outstanding shares of common stock of Benchmark (the "Outstanding Common Stock") or (ii) the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities of Benchmark entitled to vote generally in the election of directors (the "Outstanding Voting Securities"); provided, however, that for purposes of this subsection A, the following acquisitions shall not constitute a Change of Control: (i) any acquisition directly from Benchmark, (ii) any acquisition by Benchmark, (iii) any acquisition by any employee benefit plan (or related trust) sponsored or maintained by Benchmark or any corporation controlled by Benchmark or (iv) any acquisition by any corporation pursuant to a transaction which complies with clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) of subsection (h)(3); or
1.
                                      
Individuals who, as of the date hereof, constitute the Board of Directors (the "Incumbent Board") cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority of the Board of Directors; provided, however that any individual becoming a director subsequent to the date hereof whose election, or nomination for election by Benchmark's shareholders, was approved by a vote of at least majority of the directors then comprising the Incumbent Board shall be considered as though such individual were a member of the Incumbent Board, but excluding, for this purpose, any such individual whose initial assumption of office occurs as a result of an actual or threatened election contest with respect to the election or removal of directors or other actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents by or on behalf of a Person other than the Board of Directors; or
2.
                                      
Consummation of a reorganization, merger or consolidation or sale or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of Benchmark (a "Business Combination"), in each case, unless, following such Business Combination, (i) all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who were the beneficial owners, respectively, of the Outstanding Common Stock and Outstanding Voting Securities immediately prior to such Business Combination beneficially own, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of, respectively, the then outstanding voting shares of common stock and the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, as the case may be, of the corporation resulting from such Business Combination (including, without limitation, a corporation which as a result of such transaction owns Benchmark or all or substantially all of Benchmark's assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to such Business Combination, or the Outstanding Common Stock and Outstanding Voting Securities, as the case may be, (ii) no Person (excluding any corporation resulting from such Business Combination or any employee benefit plan (or related trust) of Benchmark or such corporation resulting from
3.
                                      
7
such Business Combination) beneficially owns, directly or indirectly, 20% or more of, respectively, the then outstanding shares of common stock of the corporation resulting from such Business Combination or the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities of such corporation except to the extent that such ownership existed prior to the Business Combination and (iii) at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the corporation resulting from such Business Combination were members of the Incumbent Board at the time of the execution of the initial agreement, or of the action of the Board of Directors, providing for such Business Combination.
Sections (h)(1-3) shall be interpreted in accordance with the provisions of Section 13(d)(3) or 14(d)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act") and in accordance with the meaning of Rule 13(d)-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act.
4.
                                      
Except to the extent that federal law controls, this Agreement shall be governed and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Texas.
(i)
Governing Law. 
                                   
  This Agreement sets forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties hereto with respect to the matters covered hereby, and incorporates into one document any previous severance agreement executed by the parties and all amendments thereto as of the date hereof.
(j)
Entire Agreement.
                                   
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of, August 27, 2002.
 
8

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, DECEMBER 21, 2006  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading provider of electronics manufacturing and design services to original equipment manufacturers, has announced the following executive promotions:
Gayla J. Delly, 47, has been promoted to President of the Company. Ms. Delly has been with the Company since 1996 and served as Chief Financial Officer of the Company since May 2001. In her new role, Gayla will assume responsibility for the day-to-day business operations of Benchmark.
Donald F. Adam, 43, has been promoted to Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Adam has worked at Benchmark since January 2002 and most recently served as Vice President and Corporate Controller. In his new role, Don will assume responsibility for the day-to-day financial activities of Benchmark. Prior to joining the Company in 2002, Mr. Adam had over 16 years of public and corporate accounting experience.
"Gayla and I have worked closely together over the past decade and she has made significant contributions to Benchmark and been an integral part of our executive team," said Cary T. Fu, Benchmark CEO. "Gayla is an accomplished leader and is highly respected both within Benchmark and the industry. Likewise, Don has assumed increased financial responsibilities over the past few years and is well qualified to serve as CFO."
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include facilities in seven countries. Benchmark's common shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE. More information about Benchmark can be found at www.bench.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20070109192049.txt.gz
TIME:20070109192049
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
               
o
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
               
o
& nbsp; Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
               
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
               
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.01.   Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
Effective January 8, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) completed its previously announced acquisition of Pemstar Inc. (Pemstar).  Pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger among the Company, Autobahn Acquisition Corp. and Pemstar dated October 16, 2006 (the Merger Agreement), each issued and outstanding share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of Pemstar was converted into the right to receive 0.16 of a share of common stock, par value $0.10 per share, of the Company.
The foregoing description of the Merger Agreement is a summary only and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Merger Agreement, a copy of which is attached as Exhibit 2.1 hereto and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Financial Statements of businesses acquired.
(a)
               
Pursuant to item 9.01 (a), the financial statements required by this item are not included in this Form 8-K and will be filed by amendment within 71 days of the date that this Form 8-K is required to be filed.
Proforma Financial Statements of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
(b)
              
Pursuant to item 9.01 (b), the pro forma financial statements required by this item are not included in this Form 8-K and will be filed by amendment within 71 days of the date that this Form 8-K is required to be filed.
Exhibits
(d)
              
Agreement and Plan of Merger among Benchmark Electronics, Inc., Autobahn Acquisition Corp. and Pemstar Inc. dated October 16, 2006 (incorporated by reference from exhibit 2.1 to Benchmark Electronics, Inc.'s Form 8-K dated October 16, 2006 and filed on October 18, 2006).
Exhibit 2.1
                       
Press release dated January 8, 2007.
Exhibit 99.1
                 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JANUARY 8, 2007  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading provider of electronics manufacturing and design services to original equipment manufacturers, announced today it has completed its acquisition of Pemstar Inc. Pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger among Benchmark, Autobahn Acquisition Corp. and Pemstar dated October 16, 2006, each issued and outstanding share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, of Pemstar has been converted into the right to receive 0.16 of a share of common stock, par value $0.10 per share, of Benchmark. Information regarding the exchange of share certificates will be sent to Pemstar shareholders.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. With the acquisition of Pemstar, Benchmark's global operations now include 24 facilities in nine countries. Benchmark's common shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE. More information about Benchmark can be found at www.bench.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20070207142058.txt.gz
TIME:20070207142058
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):   
February 6, 2007
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
       Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
       Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
< font size="2" face="Wingdings" style="font-size:10.0pt;">o
       Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
       Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 2.02.  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 6, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing fourth quarter results for the quarter ended December 31, 2006. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibits
(d)
                                
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
2
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. SYKORA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 6, 2007  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $737 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2006, compared to $625 million for the same quarter in the prior year. Fourth quarter net income was $28.3 million, or $0.43 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2005, net income was $24.7 million, or $0.38 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, the Company would have reported net income of $29.0 million, or $0.44 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2006.
Sales for the year ended December 31, 2006 were $2.9 billion, a 29% increase from $2.3 billion in the previous year. Net income for the year ended December 31, 2006 was $111.7 million, or $1.71 per diluted share. In the prior year, net income was $80.6 million, or $1.25 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, the impact of stock-based compensation expense and a tax benefit resulting from the closure of our UK facility, the Company would have reported net income of $113.1 million, or $1.74 per diluted share, in 2006.
"We are pleased with our performance in the fourth quarter. We had a solid finish to 2006 and achieved record annual sales and earnings" stated Benchmark's CEO Cary T. Fu. "Our teams have delivered strong revenue growth for the past five years."
Fourth Quarter 2006 Financial Highlights
Operating margin for the fourth quarter was 4.3% on a GAAP basis and was 4.5%, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
                 
Cash flows used in operating activities for the fourth quarter were $28 million.
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at December 31, 2006 of $224 million.
                 
No debt outstanding.
                 
Accounts receivable balance at December 31, 2006 of $463 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 57 days.
                 
Inventory of $420 million at December 31, 2006, a decrease of $112 million compared to September 30; inventory turns were 6.5 times.
                 
Effective tax rate for the full year 2006 of 15.2% compared to 23.8% in 2005.
                 
2007 Outlook
The outlook for Benchmark remains positive moving into fiscal 2007. A moderation in end market demands and growth rates is expected when compared to 2006. For 2007, including the impact of the acquisition of Pemstar, we expect top line growth of 12-15% for the year and earnings growth in the range of 15-20%, excluding integration costs and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
Specifically, sales for the first quarter of 2007 are expected to be between $735 million and $765 million. Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter, excluding integration costs and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.37 and $0.42.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. In particular, statements, express or implied, concerning future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow are forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, customer actions and the other factors discussed in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 and its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. With the acquisition of Pemstar, Benchmark's global operations now include 24 facilities in nine countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20070227211417.txt.gz
TIME:20070227211417
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):  
February 20, 2007
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Item 5.02.   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On February 20, 2007, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) established the corporate financial targets for the 2007 executive incentive compensation plan for our executive officers. The targets are based on the Company's achievement of corporate financial objectives with equal weighting of the following criteria: earnings per share, inventory turns and revenue.
If the minimum corporate financial objective targets are reached, annual incentive compensation is 50% of the base salary for the chief executive officer, 37.5% of the base salary for the president and 25% of the base salary for the chairman of the board of directors, the chief financial officer and the executive vice president.  If the maximum corporate financial objective targets are reached, annual incentive compensation is 200% of the base salary for the chief executive officer, 150% of the base salary for the president and 100% of the base salary for the chairman of the board of directors, the chief financial officer and the executive vice president.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20070326171419.txt.gz
TIME:20070326171419
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 9.01.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
On January 9, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. ("Benchmark") filed a current report on Form 8-K to report the acquisition of Pemstar Inc. ("Pemstar"). Benchmark indicated in such report that it would file certain financial information by amendment, as permitted under Item 9.01 of Form 8-K.  The purpose of this amendment is to include the required financial information.
Financial Statements of businesses acquired.
(a)
               
The March 31, 2006 financial statements of Pemstar pursuant to Rule 3-05 of Regulation S-X were previously reported in Benchmark's Registration Statement on Form S-4 (File No. 333-138446), which became effective November 20, 2006, and, pursuant to General Instruction B.3 of Form 8-K, are not additionally reported herein.
The Pemstar unaudited consolidated financial statements as of and for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 are incorporated herein by reference to exhibit 99.1
Proforma Financial Statements of Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
(b)
              
The pro forma financial information required by this Item 9.01(b) is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 99.2.
Exhibits.
(d)
              
Pemstar Inc. Unaudited Condensed Consolidated Financial Statements as of and for the nine months ended December 31, 2006.
Exhibit 99.1
                 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. Unaudited Pro Forma Condensed Consolidated Financial Statements.
Exhibit 99.2
                 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
2

Exhibit 99.1
Pemstar Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheet
(In thousands, except per share data)
 
1
Pemstar Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations (Unaudited)
(In thousands, except per share data)
 
See notes to consolidated financial statements.
2
Pemstar Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Unaudited)
(In thousands)
 
See notes to consolidated financial statements.
3
Pemstar Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (Unaudited)
December 31, 2006
(Dollars and share amounts in thousands, except per share data)
Note ABasis of Presentation and Accounting Policies
The accompanying unaudited condensed consolidated financial statements of Pemstar Inc. (the Company) have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for interim financial information and with the instructions to Form 10-Q and Article 10 of Regulation S-X.  Accordingly, they do not include all of the information and footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.  In the opinion of management, all adjustments (consisting of normal recurring accruals) considered necessary for a fair presentation have been included.  Operating results for the nine-month period ended December 31, 2006, are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the year ending March 31, 2007.
Discontinued Operations
On June 22, 2005, the Company announced its decision to discontinue its manufacturing operations in its Guadalajara, Mexico facilities, following several years of operating losses in that site.  In the nine months ended December 31, 2005, the Company recorded asset write-downs pending disposition of the fixed assets totaling $3,054, as well as charges related to personnel severance costs of $916, expected losses on lease commitments of $420 and associated other costs of $540.  All of the personnel severance costs were paid out in the nine months ended December 31, 2005.  The closure of this facility is deemed to be a discontinuation of operations and operating results, cash flows and remaining assets and liabilities have been segregated in the respective statements for the current and comparable periods presented herein.
Stock-Based Compensation
On April 1, 2006, the Company adopted Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 123 (revised 2004), "Share-Based Payment," ("SFAS 123(R)") which requires the measurement and recognition of compensation expense for all share-based payment awards made to employees and directors, including employee stock options. SFAS 123(R) supersedes the Company's previous accounting under Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees" ("APB 25") for periods beginning in fiscal 2007. In March 2005, the Securities and Exchange Commission issued Staff Accounting Bulletin No. 107 ("SAB 107") relating to SFAS 123(R). The Company has applied the provisions of SAB 107 in its adoption of SFAS 123(R).
Prior to fiscal 2007, the Company has adopted the pro forma disclosure only requirements of SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation", and accordingly, accounted for stock options issued to employees using the intrinsic value method of Accounting Principles Board Opinion ("APB") No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees."  Compensation expense is recorded on the date stock options are granted only if the current fair market value of the underlying stock exceeds the exercise price of the option.  Accordingly, no compensation cost has been recognized for grants under these stock option plans since the exercise price equaled the fair market value of the stock on the date of grant.  Had compensation cost for stock option grants been based on the grant date fair values of awards (the method described in SFAS No. 123), reported net loss would have been changed to the pro forma amounts reported in Note H.
SFAS 123(R) requires companies to estimate the fair value of share-based payment awards on the date of grant using an option-pricing model. The value of the portion of the award that is ultimately expected to vest is recognized as expense over the requisite service periods in the Company's Consolidated Statements of Operations. 
The Company's Consolidated Financial Statements for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 reflect the impact of SFAS 123(R).  The Company's Consolidated Financial Statements for prior year
4
periods have not been restated to reflect, and
do not include, the impact of SFAS 123(R), i
n accordance with the modified prospective transition method. 
Stock-based compensation expense recognized under SFAS 123(R) for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 was $139, which consisted of stock-based compensation expense related to employee stock options.
Stock-based compensation expense recognized during the current period is based on the value of the portion of share-based payment awards that is ultimately expected to vest during the period. Stock-based compensation expense recognized in the Company's Consolidated Statements of Operations for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 included compensation expense for share-based payment awards granted prior to, but not yet vested as of March 31, 2006 based on the grant date fair value estimated in accordance with the pro forma provisions of SFAS 123, and compensation expense for the share-based payment awards granted subsequent to March 31, 2006 based on the grant date fair value estimated in accordance with the provisions of SFAS 123(R). Compensation expense for all share-based payment awards will be recognized using the straight-line approach. As stock-based compensation expense recognized in the Consolidated Statements of Operations for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 is based on awards ultimately expected to vest, it has been reduced for estimated forfeitures. SFAS 123(R) requires forfeitures to be estimated at the time of grant and revised, if necessary, in subsequent periods if actual forfeitures differ from those estimates.
Upon adoption of SFAS 123(R), the Company selected the Black-Scholes option-pricing model ("Black-Scholes model") to determine the fair value of share-based awards granted beginning in fiscal 2007, the same model which was previously used for the Company's pro forma information required under SFAS 123. The Company's determination of fair value of share-based payment awards on the date of grant using an option-pricing model is affected by the Company's stock price as well as assumptions regarding a number of complex and subjective variables. These variables include, but are not limited to, the Company's expected stock price volatility over the term of the awards, and actual and projected employee stock option exercise behaviors. Expected volatilities are based on the historical volatility of the Company's common stock. The Company uses historical data to estimate option exercise and employee terminations. The expected term of the options granted represents the period of time that options are expected to be outstanding, based on historical information. The risk-free interest rate is based on the U.S Treasury zero-coupon issues with remaining terms similar to the expected term of the Company's equity awards. The Company does not anticipate paying any cash dividends in the foreseeable future and therefore used an expected dividend yield of zero.
On November 10, 2005, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued FASB Staff Position No. FAS 123(R)-3 "Transition Election Related to Accounting for Tax Effects of Share-Based Payment Awards." This alternative transition method includes simplified methods to establish the beginning balance of the additional paid-in capital pool ("APIC Pool") related to the tax effects of employee stock-based compensation, and to determine the subsequent impact on the APIC Pool and Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows of the tax effects of employee stock-based compensation awards that are outstanding upon adoption of SFAS 123(R). The Company is still in the process of calculating the APIC Pool and has not yet determined if it will elect to adopt this alternative transition method.
During the nine months ended December 31, 2006, employees exercised stock options to acquire 343 shares at average exercise prices of $1.60 per share.
For further information on stock-based compensation, see Note H.
5
Note BInventories
The components of inventories consist of the following:
 
Note CComprehensive Income
Total comprehensive loss was $(21,461) and $(31,585) for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 and 2005.  Comprehensive loss differs from net loss due to foreign currency translation gains and losses.
Note DFinancing Arrangements
At December 31, 2006, the Company had available borrowing capacity under its domestic revolving credit facilities of $19.3 million in excess of outstanding borrowings under the facility.
On July 3, 2006 the Company secured more favorable terms for its revolving line of credit with its domestic lending institutions.  Included in the terms of the agreement were changes in the following key provisions:
Increased the Revolving Loan Commitment from $40 million to $45 million and decreased the Tranche B Loan Commitment from $10.5 million to $9 million.
                 
Extended the maturity date of the Agreement by one year to October 19, 2010.
                 
Reduced the interest rate on the Revolving Loans to prime rate plus a range from 0% to 0.75%, depending on Company liquidity; or to LIBOR plus a range from 2.00% to 2.75%, depending on Company liquidity.
                 
Reduced the interest rate on the Tranche B Loans to prime rate plus 4.75% from prime rate plus 6.00%.
                 
Increased the monthly payments on the Tranche B Loans to $400,000 per month from $250,000 per month.
                 
6
Note EEarnings Per Share Data
 
Common stock equivalents and their impact on net loss have been excluded from the diluted per share calculation for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 and 2005, since the Company incurred net losses and the inclusion of common stock equivalents would have had an anti-dilutive impact.
Potentially dilutive securities, which have been excluded, consist of i) unexercised stock options and warrants to purchase 4,614 and 5,357 shares of the Company's Common Stock as of December 31, 2006 and 2005 respectively, and ii) 2,193 shares of the Company's Common Stock issuable upon conversion of convertible debt as of December 31, 2006 and 2005.
7
Note FRestructuring and Impairment Charges
A roll forward of restructuring provisions from continuing operations is as follows:
 
During fiscal 2005, the Company recorded charges of $4,956 for restructuring related costs to reduce facilities and employee counts to position the Company for stronger operating results.  These charges consisted of asset write-downs of $1,300, primarily leasehold improvements; $917 for employee termination and severance costs related to approximately 165 salaried and hourly employees (137 from domestic and 28 from South American sites); and $2,739 for expected losses on lease commitments in our Taunton, Massachusetts, Chaska, Minnesota and secondary Rochester, Minnesota sites. The fiscal 2005 restructuring actions taken pertain to further reducing general excess capacity and create the opportunity to streamline personnel and capital deployed into the remaining sites.  As of December 31, 2006, accruals of $93 remain related to these future lease costs.
During fiscal 2006, the Company recorded charges of $10,462 for restructuring related costs to further reduce facilities and employee counts to position the Company for stronger operating results.  These charges consisted of asset write-downs of $2,060, primarily leasehold improvements; $421 for employee termination and severance costs related to approximately 161 salaried and hourly domestic employees; and $7,981 of new provisions and adjustments to prior estimates for expected losses on lease commitments in our California and Chaska, Minnesota sites. The fiscal 2006 restructuring actions taken pertain to further reducing general excess capacity and create the opportunity to streamline personnel and capital deployed into the remaining sites.  As of December 31, 2006, there were no further payments expected for these restructuring costs.
During the first nine months of fiscal 2007, the Company recorded charges of $115 for employee termination and severance costs related to approximately 38 salaried and hourly foreign employees and benefits of $2,692 related to the settlement agreements terminating its obligations and resolving all claims under leases relating to its inactive facilities in Taunton, Massachusetts, Mountain View, California and San Jose, California.  As of December 31, 2006, three were no further payments expected for these restructuring costs.
On November 9, 2006, the Company committed to a plan to exit the operations of its Tianjin, China facility over the next several quarters, as the conclusion of its previously announced review of its strategic options for this location and its major customer in this location.  During the three months ended December 31, 2006, the Company recorded charges of $30,282 for restructuring related costs to reduce facilities and employee counts to position the Company for operations subsequent to discontinuation of the relationship with its major customer in this facility.  These charges consisted of asset write-downs of $10,332, primarily building
8
facilities, asset write-downs of $18,925, primarily value added tax receivable, $633 for employee termination and severance costs related to approximately 1,165 salaried and hourly employees and $392 for associated other costs.  As of December 31, 2006, accruals of $633 remain relate to these future costs.
Discontinued operations include restructuring benefits (costs) of $146 and $(5,026) for the first nine months of fiscal 2007 and fiscal years 2006, respectively.
As of December 31, 2006, approximately $3,598, $2,780 and $116 of cash payments had been made against the accrual associated with the fiscal 2005, 2006 and 2007 charges, respectively.
Note GLiquidity
The domestic revolving credit facilities were replaced during fiscal 2004 to provide expanded capacity for funding business growth and to extend arrangements approaching the expiration of their term.  These facilities require the maintenance of certain minimum cash flow levels.  On July 3, 2006, the Company amended and restated the fiscal 2004 agreement and subsequent amendments, which extended the maturity dates and reduced the monthly interest rates.  Please see details in Note D to the consolidated financial statements (unaudited).
During fiscal 2006, the Company obtained significant funding locally for its foreign operations and has obtained commitments for further increases to suit business requirements.  As such, it has become substantially less reliant on domestic lines of credit for needs outside of domestic operations.
The Company's fiscal 2007 operating plan includes an expectation of maintaining the required cash flow levels.  Management believes that, as a result of the restructuring actions it has taken to reduce cash expenditures, the efforts it continues to make to increase revenues from continuing customers and to generate new customers in various industry sectors and the new agreements it has reached to provide additional borrowing capacity, it will meet its fiscal 2007 financial plan and the liquidity requirements of its operations and lending agreements.  However, there can be no assurance that the financial plan will be met.  The Company also believes that, if necessary, it would be able to secure additional financing from its lenders or sell additional Company equity securities; however, there can be no assurance that such funding can be obtained or that future credit facility violations will be waived.
9
Note HStock Option Plan
The Company maintains the 1994 Stock Option Plan, the 1995 Stock Option Plan, the 1997 Stock Option Plan, the 1999 Amended and Restated Stock Option Plan, and the 2000 Stock Option Plan, the 2002 Stock Option Plan.   Options outstanding for the 1994, 1995, 1997, 1999, 2000 and 2002 plans were 0, 0, 146, 1100, 877 and 452, respectively, as of December 31, 2006.  A total of 1,497 shares are reserved for future issuance at December 31, 2006.  However, with the merger as described in Note I, these shares reserved for option issuance will not occur.  Options are generally granted at prices equal to the fair market value on the dates of grant and vest at one third of grant in each of the following three years.  All options are exercisable over a ten year period.
The following table summarizes all option activities from March 31, 2006 through December 31, 2006 (shares in thousands, except per share data):
 
The weighted-average grant-date fair value of options granted during the nine months ended December 31, 2006 was $3.33.  The total intrinsic value of options exercised during the nine months ended December 31, 2006 was $704.  The Company issues new shares upon the exercise of options. There was no tax benefit realized from exercised options. The value of the option grants has been calculated on the date of grant using the Black-Scholes option pricing model with the following weighted-average assumptions:
 
The options outstanding and currently exercisable by exercise price at December 31, 2006 were as follows (options in thousands):
 
10
The aggregate intrinsic value of options in the preceding table was $2.3 million, based on the Company's closing stock price of $3.88 as of December 31, 2006.  The total fair value of options vested during the nine months ended December 31, 2006 and 2005 were $139 and $66, respectively.  As of December 31, 2006, total compensation cost related to unvested stock options not yet recognized was $229, which is expected to be recognized upon the acceleration of vesting of all outstanding unvested options, which occurred upon the completion of the merger on January 8, 2007, as described in Note I.
Valuation and Expense under SFAS 123(R)
On April 1, 2006, the Company adopted SFAS 123(R), which requires the measurement and recognition of compensation expense for all share-based payment awards made to the Company's employees and directors, including employee stock options and employee stock purchases related to the Purchase Plan based on estimated fair values. The stock-based compensation expense related to employee stock options under SFAS 123(R) for the nine months ended December 31, 2006, was charged to selling, general and administrative expenses.
The table below reflects net income and diluted net income per share for the nine months ended December 31, 2006 compared with the pro forma information for the nine months ended December 31, 2005 as follows (in thousands except per-share amounts):
 
Net loss and net loss per share from continuing operations prior to April 1, 2006 did not include stock-based compensation expense for employee stock options under SFAS 123 because the company did not adopt the recognition provisions of SFAS 123.
(1)
         
Stock-based compensation expense prior to April 1, 2006 is calculated based on the pro forma applications of SFAS 123.
(2)
         
Net loss and net loss per share from continuing operations prior to April 1, 2006 represents pro forma information based on SFAS 123.
(3)
         
Upon adoption of SFAS 123(R), the Company began estimating the value of employee stock options on the date of grant using the Black-Scholes model. Prior to the adoption of SFAS 123(R), the value of each employee stock option was estimated on the date of grant using the Black-Scholes model for the purpose of the pro forma financial information in accordance with SFAS 123.
As stock-based compensation expense recognized in the Consolidated Statement of Operations for the first quarter of fiscal 2006 is based on awards ultimately expected to vest, it has been reduced for estimated forfeitures. SFAS 123(R) requires forfeitures to be estimated at the time of grant and revised, if necessary, in subsequent periods if actual forfeitures differ from those estimates. Forfeitures were estimated based on
11
historical experience. In the Company's pro forma information required under SFAS 123 for the periods prior to April 1, 2006, the Company accounted for forfeitures as they occurred.
Note ISubsequent Events
On October 16, 2006, the Company entered an agreement, subject to shareholder approval, with Benchmark Electronics, Inc. ("Benchmark") and Autobahn Acquisition Corp. in which shareholders of Pemstar Inc. will receive 0.160 shares of Benchmark common shares for each held Pemstar Inc. share.  Shareholder approval was received and the merger closed on January 8, 2007.  At the time of the merger closing, present Pemstar Inc. shareholders owned approximately 11% of the outstanding Benchmark common shares and Pemstar Inc. has ceased to be a separate publicly owned company.
12

EXHIBIT 99.2
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
UNAUDITED PRO FORMA CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Effective January 8, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (Benchmark) completed its previously announced acquisition of Pemstar Inc. (Pemstar) (the Merger). With the closing of the Merger, Pemstar became a wholly owned subsidiary of Benchmark. The following unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial information is based upon Benchmark's and Pemstar's historical consolidated financial statements, and has been prepared to reflect the Merger based on the purchase method of accounting. The historical consolidated financial information has been adjusted to give effect to pro forma events that are directly attributable to the Merger and factually supportable. The unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated statements of income, which have been prepared for the twelve months ended December 31, 2006, give effect to the merger as if it had occurred on January 1, 2006. The unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated balance sheet has been prepared as of December 31, 2006 and gives effect to the Merger as if it had occurred on that date.
The unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial information is presented for informational purposes only. The pro forma information is not necessarily indicative of what the financial position or results of operations actually would have been had the Merger been completed at the dates indicated. In addition, the unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial information does not purport to project the future financial position or operating results of Benchmark after completion of the Merger.
The unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial information does not give effect to any potential cost savings or other operating efficiencies that could result from the Merger. In addition, Benchmark's cost to acquire Pemstar will be allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based upon their estimated fair values as of the date of acquisition. Accordingly, the purchase price allocation pro forma adjustments are preliminary and may differ from the final purchase price allocation.
UNAUDITED PRO FORMA CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEET
DECEMBER 31, 2006
 
UNAUDITED PRO FORMA CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF INCOME
YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2006
 
1.
Basis of Pro Forma Presentation
             
The pro forma information related to the Merger has been prepared in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards ("SFAS") No. 141, Business Combinations and SFAS 142, Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets.
The following is an estimate of the purchase price for Pemstar and the preliminary purchase price allocation (in thousands):
 
Benchmark has engaged an independent appraisal firm to assist in finalizing the allocation of the purchase price. This final assessment may materially differ from the estimate presented herein as additional information becomes available and is assessed by Benchmark and the appraisal firm. The fair value of estimated stock options and warrants are assumed to have been exercised as of the Merger date.
Due to different fiscal period ends, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined income statement for the year ended December 31, 2006 combines the historical results for Benchmark for the year ended December 31, 2006 and the historical results of Pemstar for the three months ended March 31, 2006 plus the nine months ended December 31, 2006.
Pro Forma Adjustments
2.
              
The unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated financial statements have been adjusted for the following:
To reflect the adjustment to goodwill for the acquisition of Pemstar based on preliminary purchase price allocation as follows (in thousands):
(a)
         
 
Estimated fair value adjustment to the valuation allowance on deferred tax assets based on Benchmark's expected utilization of net operating loss carryforwards as well as the tax effects of fair value adjustments related to identifiable assets.
(b)
        
To reflect assets and liabilities acquired at estimated fair value, including the estimated costs associated with the planned termination of certain revenue producing facilities, including planned disposition of acquired assets. Final purchase price adjustments based on a third-party valuation may materially differ from these preliminary estimates.
(c)
         
Represents the accrual of estimated direct acquisition costs.
(d)
        
To reflect the elimination of Pemstar's historical equity and the issuance of Benchmark common shares and payment of cash to effect this transaction.
(e)
         
To record the preliminary fair value of intangible assets, principally contractual agreements and customer relationships.
(f)
           
To record adjustment for revenues and costs specifically identifiable with the termination of the revenue producing activities in Tianjin, China.
(g)
        
To reflect adjustments to depreciation and amortization expense based on the estimated fair values of acquired assets calculated over the remaining estimated useful lives of the assets.
(h)
        
To record adjustment to income tax expense for the pro forma adjustments.
(i)
            


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20070424194945.txt.gz
TIME:20070424194945
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):  
April 24, 2007
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
Item 2.02.
            
Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 24, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing first quarter results for the quarter ended March 31, 2007. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 7.01.
            
Regulation FD Disclosure.
On April 24, 2007, the Company issued a press release announcing first quarter results for the quarter ended March 31, 2007. Additional information concerning the Company's future outlook was presented to investors during a conference call on April 24, 2007. Specifically, we updated our full year guidance for 2007.
Our second quarter guidance is slightly below our original expectations as a result of two factors which impact our guidance:
four medical programs totaling approximately $30 million per quarter have been impacted by regulatory actions related to our customers' products which have reduced our medical sector forecasts for the second quarter and the full year. We expect the resolution of these regulatory actions to come over the next two quarters.
-
                   
and the timing of new program ramps.
-
                   
Given the impact of the above factors, the Company now expects 2007 revenue growth of approximately 8% and bottom line growth of approximately 8-10%, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
The information in this Item 7.01 is being furnished and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.
            
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release For More Information, Call:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 24, 2007  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $752 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2007, compared to $651 million for the same quarter in the prior year. First quarter net income was $24.5 million, or $0.34 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2006, net income was $26.5 million, or $0.41 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $27.9 million, or $0.39 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2007. Excluding restructuring charges, the impact of stock-based compensation costs and a tax benefit resulting from the closure of our UK facility, the Company would have reported net income of $24.7 million, or $0.38 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2006.
"Benchmark Electronics, Inc. continues to have solid performance," said Cary T. Fu, the Company's Chief Executive Officer. "We saw strong booking performance in the first quarter derived from both existing and new customers.  Challenges during the first half of 2007 are seen with the softer market conditions and the ongoing customer initiatives focused on reducing inventory levels.  However, we have seen excellent growth opportunities with our new bookings and new product initiatives with several customers and are optimistic that we will see steady improvement in business conditions as the year progresses."
First Quarter 2007 Financial Highlights
Operating margin for the first quarter was 3.6% on a GAAP basis and was 4.2%, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
                 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the first quarter were approximately $95 million.
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance at March 31, 2007 of $257 million.
                 
Total debt outstanding of $23 million.
                 
Accounts receivable balance at March 31, 2007 of $512 million; calculated days sales outstanding were 61 days.
                 
Inventory of $464 million at March 31, 2007; inventory turns were 6.0 times.
                 
Second Quarter 2007 Guidance
Sales for the second quarter of 2007 are expected to be between $740 million and $775 million. Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.36 and $0.41.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Such forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; Benchmark's business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals; and the anticipated effects of any developments or events on financial results. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying
assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include 24 facilities in nine countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20070430172053.txt.gz
TIME:20070430172053
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):  
April 26, 2007
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Item 8.01.   Other Events.
On April 26, 2007, Donald E. Nigbor, Chairman of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. ("Benchmark") adopted a pre-arranged stock trading plan to sell shares of Benchmark stock. This plan was established as part of his individual long-term strategy for asset diversification and liquidity. Mr. Nigbor's plan was adopted in accordance with guidelines specified under Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Under the plan Mr. Nigbor may sell up to 135,000 shares of Benchmark stock, which Mr. Nigbor has the right to acquire under outstanding stock options issued by Benchmark, beginning May 8, 2007. This plan is scheduled to terminate at the latest on July 30, 2007. The transactions under the plan will be disclosed publicly through Form 144 and Form 4 or Form 5, as appropriate, with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Rule 10b5-1 permits individuals who are not in possession of material, non-public information at the time the plan is adopted to establish pre-arranged plans to buy or sell company stock. Using these plans, individuals can prudently and gradually diversify their investment portfolios over an extended period of time.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20070727151107.txt.gz
TIME:20070727151107
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):   
July 26, 2007
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
                                   
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
                                   
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
                                   
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 26, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing second quarter results for the quarter ended June 30, 2007. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 26, 2007  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $756 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2007, compared to $749 million for the same quarter in the prior year. Second quarter net income was $25.9 million, or $0.35 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2006, net income was $27.5 million, or $0.42 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $28.6 million, or $0.39 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2007. Excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $29.4 million, or $0.45 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2006.
"We are pleased with our operating results for the second quarter," said Cary T. Fu, the Company's Chief Executive Officer. "We saw a number of highlights this quarter, notably continued strength in new program bookings, solid performance across our teams and improvements in cash flow management."
"The EMS industry is undergoing change and continues to evolve," Fu continued. "Benchmark anticipated the market evolution years ago, and today, we are seeing the changes take place. We believe Benchmark remains well positioned for profitable growth as the industry is redefined."
Second Quarter 2007 Financial Highlights
Operating margin for the second quarter was 3.7% on a GAAP basis and was 4.2%, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
                 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the second quarter were approximately $66 million.
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance was $318 million at June 30, 2007.
                 
Total debt outstanding was $13 million.
                 
Accounts receivable was $501 million at June 30, 2007; calculated days sales outstanding were 60 days.
                 
Inventory was $385 million at June 30, 2007; inventory turns were 7.3 times.
                 
Third Quarter and Full Year 2007 Guidance
We now expect a more moderate demand environment in the third quarter than previously anticipated. It will likely be a transitional quarter for several of the programs we are ramping. Looking forward, we anticipate new bookings and new program ramps to provide very strong growth for the fourth quarter. The softer demand environment during the third quarter should result in only a slight overall impact to our full year revenue and earnings guidance.
Sales for the third quarter of 2007 are expected to be between $730 million and $770 million. Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.38 and $0.42.
Sales for the full year are expected to be between $3.0 billion and $3.1 billion. Diluted earnings per share for 2007, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $1.58 and $1.66.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that "The EMS industry is undergoing change and continues to evolveWe believe Benchmark remains well positioned for profitable growth as the industry is redefined.", and our sales and earnings per share
guidance for the third quarter and full year of 2007, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; Benchmark's business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals; and the anticipated effects of any developments or events on financial results. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include 25 facilities in ten countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20071004162945.txt.gz
TIME:20071004162945
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 4, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release
revising its guidance for the third quarter of 2007 due to slower than anticipated product and program transitions, as well as softer than projected marketplace demand. The Company provided
third quarter revenue guidance of
$670 million to $680 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share
, including a $6 million tax benefit, of $0.29 to $0.35 on a GAAP basis.
A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
2
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
3

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 4, 2007  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, revised its guidance for the third quarter of 2007 due to slower than anticipated product and program transitions, as well as softer than projected marketplace demand
.
Based on preliminary information, sales for the third quarter of 2007 are expected to be between $670 million and $680 million. During the quarter, we continued to see strong new program bookings and exceeded our anticipated levels of operating cash flows. Our position in the industry continues to be strong despite the current market condition.
Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter, including a $6 million tax benefit, are expected to be between $0.29 and $0.35 on a GAAP basis.
Looking forward, we anticipate new bookings and new program ramps to provide measurable sequential growth for the fourth quarter.
These results are preliminary and therefore subject to the Company's completion of its third quarter closing and review procedures. At this time, the Company is finalizing its financial results for the third quarter of 2007 and will report those results on October 25, 2007. A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held on October 25, 2007 at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its current outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed
to include, among other things, the statement that "[l]ooking forward, we anticipate new bookings and new program ramps to provide measurable growth for the fourth quarter", and our sales and earnings per share guidance for the third quarter of 2007, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; Benchmark's business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals; and the anticipated effects of any developments or events on financial results. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include 25 facilities in ten countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20071026180736.txt.gz
TIME:20071026180736
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On October 25, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing third quarter results for the quarter ended September 30, 2007. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibits
(d)
                                
 
Exhibit 99.1            Press release dated October 25, 2007
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER ENDED SEPTEMBER 30, 2007
 
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 25, 2007  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $673 million for the quarter ended September
 30, 2007, compared to $770 million for the same quarter in the prior year. Third quarter net income was $22 million, or $0.30 per diluted share. Net income for the period included a discrete tax benefit of $6 million relating to a previously closed facility. In the comparable period of 2006, net income was $29 million, or $0.45 per diluted share.
 
Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles, the impact of stock-based compensation costs and the tax benefit, the Company would have reported net income of $17 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2007. Excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $30 million, or $0.46 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2006.
 
"We are clearly disappointed with our revenue performance for the third quarter," said Cary T. Fu, the Company's Chief Executive Officer. "However, as our fourth quarter guidance reflects, we continue to believe that Benchmark is well positioned for the future based on our operating focus and execution,
new program bookings and continued strong cash flows from operations.
"
 
Third Quarter 2007 Financial Highlights
 
Operating margin for the third quarter was 2.2% on a GAAP basis and was 2.6%, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
 - 
                 
Selling, general and administrative expenses for the third quarter were $22 million, a decrease of 9.2% from the second quarter of 2007.
 - 
                 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the third quarter were approximately $66 million.
 - 
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance was $379 million at September 30, 2007.
 - 
                 
Total debt outstanding was $13 million.
 - 
                 
Accounts receivable was $451 million at September 30, 2007; calculated days sales outstanding were 60 days.
 - 
                 
Inventory was $382 million at September 30, 2007; inventory turns were 6.6 times.
 - 
                 
Repurchases of common shares through October 24, 2007 were $30 million.
 - 
                 
 
Fourth Quarter 2007 Guidance
 
Looking forward,
sales for the fourth quarter of 2007 are expected to be between $700 million and $740 million.
Diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.32 and $0.38.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that
"
we continue to believe that Benchmark is well positioned for the future based on our operating focus and execution,
new program bookings and continued strong cash flows from operations"
, and our sales and earnings per share guidance for the fourth quarter of 2007, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; Benchmark's business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals; and the anticipated effects of any developments or events on financial results. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks,
 
uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics,
Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment.
Benchmark's global operations include 25 facilities in ten countries.
Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20071227171932.txt.gz
TIME:20071227171932
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
(17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act
(17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 1.01.
                     
Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
.
Item 2.03.
                     
Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
 
On December 21, 2007, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the "Credit Agreement") by and among the Company and the following Banks: JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as administrative agent, collateral agent and issuing lender; and Bank of America, N.A., Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. and Comerica Bank as co-documentation agents. This agreement amends and restates the Company's existing $100 million secured credit agreement, and is a five year revolving credit facility for general corporate purposes with a maturity date of December 21, 2012. The Credit Agreement includes an accordion feature under which total commitments under the facility may be increased by an additional $100 million, subject to satisfaction of certain conditions.
 
The foregoing summary of the terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement is not complete and is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the full text of the Credit Agreement which is attached to this Current Report as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9-01.
                    
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)
                                
Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
* Certain schedules and exhibits to this agreement have been omitted from the filing.  Any such exhibits or schedules shall be furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.

Exhibit 10.1
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULES:
 
Schedule 1.01A  Existing Letters of Credit
Schedule 1.01B  Unrestricted Subsidiaries
Schedule 2.01  Commitments
Schedule 3.01  Organization
Schedule 3.06  Disclosed Matters
Schedule 3.13  Insurance
Schedule 3.15  Subsidiaries of Company
Schedule 3.19  Liabilities
Schedule 6.01  Existing Indebtedness
Schedule 6.02  Existing Liens
Schedule 6.04  Existing Investments
Schedule 6.10  Restrictive Agreements
EXHIBITS:
 
Exhibit 1.01A  Form of Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit 1.01B  Form of Borrowing Request
Exhibit 1.01C  Form of Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement
Exhibit 1.01D  Form of Borrowing Subsidiary Termination
Exhibit 1.01E  Form of Commitment Increase Agreement
Exhibit 1.01F  Form of New Lender Agreement
 
THIRD AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT (this "") dated as of December 21, 2007 (the ""), among Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the ""), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party hereto, the Lenders party hereto, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, Collateral Agent and Issuing Lender, Bank of America, N.A., Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., and Comerica Bank, as Co-Documentation Agent.
Agreement
Effective Date
Company
 
PRELIMINARY STATEMENT:
 
WHEREAS, on August 24, 1999, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent entered into the Credit Agreement (the "") whereby, upon the terms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to make term loans and revolving loans to the Company up to the aggregate amount of $225,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in of the Original Credit Agreement; and
Original Credit Agreement
Section 5.10
 
WHEREAS, on June 23, 2000, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Agent amended the Original Credit Agreement and entered into Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (as subsequently amended, hereinafter called the "") whereby, upon the terms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to increase the aggregate amount of the revolving loans to $175,000,000, increasing the aggregate amount of the credit facility to $268,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in of the Amended and Restated Agreement; and
Amended and Restated Agreement
Section 5.10
 
WHEREAS, on January 20, 2005, the Company, the Lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent amended the Amended and Restated Agreement and entered into a Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (as subsequently amended, hereinafter called the "") whereby, upon theterms and conditions therein stated, such Lenders agreed to reduce the amount of the credit facility to $100,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in of the Second Amended and Restated Agreement; and
Second Amended and Restated Agreement
Section 5.10
 
WHEREAS, the Company, the Lenders and the Agent mutually desire to amend and restate certain aspects of the Second Amended and Restated Agreement;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants set forth herein, the Borrower, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders agree to amend and restate the Second Amended and Restated Agreement in its entirety as follows:
 
 
Section 1.01  .  As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
 
"" means any acquisition permitted under .
Acquisition
Section 6.04(f)
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Act
Section 9.16
 
"" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries ended on such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, ended on the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company most recently ended prior to such date).
Adjusted Leverage Ratio
 
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
 
"" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
"" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Base CD Rate in effect on such day plus 1% and (c) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1%.  Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
 
"" means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan, or with respect to the commitment fees payable hereunder, as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "ABR Spread", "Eurodollar Spread" or "Commitment Fee Rate", as the case may be, based upon the Adjusted Leverage Ratio as of the end of the most recent fiscal determination date:
Applicable Margin
 
For purposes of the foregoing, (i) the Adjusted Leverage Ratio shall be determined as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Company's fiscal year based upon the Company's consolidated financial statements delivered pursuant to  or  and (ii) each change in the Applicable Margin resulting from a change in the Adjusted Leverage Ratio shall be effective during the period commencing on and including the date of delivery to the Administrative Agent of such consolidated financial statements indicating such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change; that the Adjusted Leverage Ratio shall be deemed to be in Category 1 under each of the above tables at the option of the Administrative Agent or at the request of the Required Lenders if the Company fails to deliver the consolidated financial statements or the related compliance certificate required to be delivered by it pursuant to  or  during the period from the expiration of the time for delivery thereof until such consolidated financial statements are delivered.  In the event that any financial statement or certificate delivered pursuant to ,  or , as applicable, is shown to be inaccurate when delivered (regardless of whether this Agreement or the Commitments are in effect when such inaccuracy is discovered, but in any event not to exceed three (3) years past the Maturity Date), and such inaccuracy, if corrected, would have led to the application of a higher Applicable Margin for any period (an "") than the Applicable Margin applied for such Applicable Period, and only in such case, then the Company shall immediately (i) deliver to the Administrative Agent corrected financial statements for such Applicable Period, (ii) determine the Applicable Margin for such Applicable Period based upon the corrected financial statements, and (iii) immediately pay to the Administrative Agent the accrued additional interest owing as a result of such increased Applicable Margin for such Applicable Period.  This provision is in addition to rights of the Administrative Agents and Lenders with respect to  and their other respective rights under this Agreement.
Section 5.01(a)
(b)
provided
Sections 5.01(a),
(b)
(c)
Section 5.01(a)
Section 5.01(b)
Section 5.01(c)
Applicable Period
Section 2.11(c)
 
"" means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lender's Commitment.  If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
 
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Approved Fund
Section 9.04
 
"" means any of the Republic of Ireland, Scotland, the Kingdom of Sweden or the Republic of Singapore.
Approved Jurisdiction
 
"" means, for any day, the annual assessment rate in effect on such day that is payable by a member of the Bank Insurance Fund classified as "well-capitalized" and within supervisory subgroup "B" (or a comparable successor risk classification) within the meaning of 12 C.F.R. Part 327 (or any successor provision) to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for insurance by such Corporation of time deposits made in dollars at the offices of such member in the United States; that if, as a result of any change in any law, rule or regulation, it is no longer possible to determine the Assessment Rate as aforesaid,
Assessment Rate
provided
then the Assessment Rate shall be such annual rate as shall be determined by the Administrative Agent to be representative of the cost of such insurance to the Lenders.
 
"" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by ), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Section 9.04
Exhibit 1.01A
 
"" means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
 
"" means the sum of (a) the Three-Month Secondary CD Rate multiplied by the Statutory Reserve Rate plus (b) the Assessment Rate.
Base CD Rate
 
"" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
 
"" means the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof duly authorized to act on behalf of such Board.
Board of Directors
 
"" means the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary.
Borrower
 
"" means Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect.
Borrowing
 
"" means a request by the Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with , substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Request
Section 2.03
Exhibit 1.01B
 
"" means, at any time, each Restricted Subsidiary incorporated or organized in a State of the United States of America or an Approved Jurisdiction that has been designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary by the Company pursuant to and that has not ceased to be a Borrowing Subsidiary as provided in such Section.
Borrowing Subsidiary
Section 2.19
 
"" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement
Exhibit 1.01C
 
"" means a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Termination
Exhibit 1.01D
 
"" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; provided that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
Business Day
 
"" means, for any period, all expenditures (whether paid in cash or accrued as a liability, including the portion of Capital Lease Obligations originally incurred during such period that are capitalized on the consolidated balance sheet of the
Capital Expenditures
Company) by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries during such period, that, in conformity with GAAP, are included in "capital expenditures", "additions to property, plant or equipment" or comparable items in the consolidated financial statements of the Company, but excluding expenditures for the restoration, repair or replacement of any fixed or capital asset that was destroyed or damaged, in whole or in part, in an amount equal to any insurance proceeds received in connection with such destruction or damage.
 
"" means, for any period, the sum of all cash payments of interest and prepayment charges, if any, including, without limitation, all net amounts payable (or receivable) under interest rate protection agreements and all imputed interest in respect of Capital Lease Obligations paid by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries on all consolidated basis during such period.
Cash Interest Expense
 
"" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP and any obligations of such Person under any synthetic lease financing whether or not such obligation is classified as a capital lease under GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
 
"" means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission thereunder as in effect on the Effective Date), of Equity Interests representing more than 50% of either the aggregate ordinary voting power or the aggregate equity value represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in the Company; (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the Board of Directors by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the current Board of Directors nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; or (c) a Change of Control or similar event, however denominated, under any Subordinated Indebtedness or any other Material Indebtedness.
Change in Control
 
"" means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the Effective Date, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the Effective Date or (c) compliance by any Lender or the Issuing Lender (or, for purposes of , by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Effective Date.
Change in Law
Section 2.13
 
"" means Bank of America, N.A., Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. and Comerica Bank, each in their capacity as Co-Documentation Agent.
Co-Documentation Agent
 
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
 
"" means any and all "Collateral", as defined in any applicable Security Document.
Collateral
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as collateral agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Collateral Agent
 
"" means, at any time, that the following requirements shall be satisfied (to the extent such requirements are stated to be applicable at the time under clause (a) or (b) below):
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement
 
(a)
                                 
at all times on and after the Effective Date:
 
(i)
                                    
the Guarantee Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time, shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect;
 
(ii)
                                 
one or more Pledge Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time and directly owning any outstanding Equity Interests or any Indebtedness, and there shall have been duly and validly pledged to the Collateral Agent thereunder, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties (A) all the outstanding Equity Interests (other than Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary) owned directly by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary, (B) 65% of the outstanding voting Equity Interests, and 100% of the outstanding non-voting Equity Interests (or, in each case, such lesser percentages as shall be owned by the Company and the Domestic Subsidiaries) in each Foreign Subsidiary owned in whole or in part directly by the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary and (C) all Indebtedness that is owed to the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary; and any certificates, promissory notes or other instruments representing the Equity Interests or Indebtedness pledged or subjected to a charge under the Pledge Agreements, accompanied by stock powers or other instruments of transfer endorsed in blank, shall be in the actual possession of the Collateral Agent and all other steps required under applicable law or requested by the Collateral Agent to ensure that the Pledge Agreements create valid, first priority, perfected Liens (subject to Permitted Encumbrances) on all the Collateral subject thereto shall have been taken;
 
(iii)
                              
one or more Security Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time and there shall have been subjected to security interests thereunder securing the Obligations all the assets of each such Person in which a security interest can be created under the UCC, and all documents and instruments, including UCC financing statements, required by law or reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to create the security interests intended to be created by the Security Agreements and perfect such Liens to the extent required by, and with the priority required by, the
Security Agreements, shall have been filed, registered or recorded (or arrangements satisfactory to the Collateral Agent for such filing, registration or recording shall have been made);
 
(iv)
                             
the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by the Company and each Domestic Subsidiary party to the Guarantee Agreement, any Pledge Agreement or any Security Agreement, shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect; and
 
(v)
                                
each Loan Party shall have obtained all consents and approvals required to be obtained by it in connection with the execution and delivery of all Security Documents to which it is a party, the performance of its obligations thereunder and the granting by it of the Liens thereunder; and
 
(b)
                                
at all times when there shall be one or more Foreign Subsidiaries that are Foreign Borrowers under this Agreement:
 
(i)
                                    
the Guarantee Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by each Foreign Subsidiary that is a direct or indirect parent of any such Foreign Borrower (a "") (it being understood that each Foreign Parent will guarantee only the Obligations of Foreign Borrowers that are its subsidiaries), shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect;
Foreign Parent
 
(ii)
                                 
one or more Pledge Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by each Foreign Borrower and each Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower existing at such time and directly owning any outstanding Equity Interests or any Indebtedness, and there shall have been duly and validly pledged to the Collateral Agent under the Pledge Agreement, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, (A) all the Equity Interests in such Foreign Borrower, each Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower and each Subsidiary directly owned in whole or in part by such Foreign Borrower or any such Foreign Parent, including any such Equity Interests owned by the Company and the Domestic Subsidiaries that are not pledged pursuant to clause (a)(ii) above and (B) all the Indebtedness that is owed to such Foreign Borrower or a Foreign Parent (it being understood that the Equity Interests and Indebtedness referred to in this clause (ii) will secure only the Obligations of such Foreign Borrower); and any certificates, promissory notes or other instruments representing such Equity Interests or Indebtedness, accompanied by stock powers or other instruments of transfer endorsed in blank, shall be in the actual possession of the Collateral Agent and all other steps required under applicable law or requested by the Collateral Agent to ensure that the Pledge Agreements create valid, first priority,
perfected Liens (subject to Permitted Encumbrances) on all the Collateral subject thereto shall have been taken; and
 
(iii)
                              
one or more Security Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by each Foreign Borrower or Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower existing at such time and there shall have been subjected to security interests thereunder securing the Obligations of such Foreign Borrower (but not any obligations of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary) all the personal property or fixtures (within the meaning of the UCC) of such Person in which a security interest can be created under the laws of each applicable jurisdiction, with such exceptions as the Collateral Agent may approve in its sole discretion, and without liability to any party hereto, taking into account the cost and difficulty involved in creating or perfecting any such security interest and the benefits to the Lenders that would result therefrom, and all documents and instruments required by law or reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to create the security interests intended to be created by the Security Agreements and perfect such Liens to the extent required by, and with the priority required by, the Security Agreements, shall have been filed, registered or recorded (or arrangements satisfactory to the Collateral Agent for such filing, registration or recording shall have been made).
 
Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this definition, if the Company or any Subsidiary shall be using commercially reasonable efforts to create or perfect any pledge of Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of any Foreign Subsidiary, the failure to have created or perfected such pledge shall not, in and of itself, prevent the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement from being satisfied until (x) the later of (i) the 90th day after the Effective Date and (ii) the 90th day after the acquisition of such Collateral by the Company or a Domestic Subsidiary or (y) if, in the judgment of the Collateral Agent, the Company is endeavoring in good faith to satisfy the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement, the 180th day after the acquisition of such Collateral by the Company or a Domestic Subsidiary.
 
"" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lender's Revolving Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to or and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to .  The initial amount of each Lender's Commitment is set forth on , or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment, as applicable.  The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Commitments is $100,000,000.
Commitment
Section 2.07
Section 2.18
Section 9.04
Schedule 2.01
 
"" means a Commitment Increase Agreement substantially in the form of among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and a Lender.
Commitment Increase Agreement
Exhibit 1.01E
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Commitment Increase Notice
Section 2.18
 
"" means Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation.
Company
 
"" means, for any period, the EBITDA of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis; that (i) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio and Adjusted Leverage Ratio, but not for any other purpose, Consolidated EBITDA for any period of four fiscal quarters during which an Acquisition shall have occurred shall be computed on a pro forma consolidated basis to include the EBITDA of such Acquisition and (ii) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio but not for any other purpose, all references to Restricted Subsidiaries in this definition and in the definitions referred to herein shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
Consolidated EBITDA
provided
 
"" means, for any Person for any period, the net income (or loss) of such person and its subsidiaries during such period, calculated and consolidated or combined in accordance with GAAP; that there shall be excluded from such net income (to the extent otherwise included therein) the following: (i) any non-cash, non-recurring charges, (ii) gains or losses attributable to Property sales not in the ordinary course of business, and (iii) the cumulative effect of a change in accounting principles and any gains or losses attributable to writeups or writedowns of assets.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
"" means the total assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries less, without duplication, (i) intangible assets including, without limitation, goodwill, research and development costs, trademarks, trade names, patents, franchises, copyrights, licenses and like general intangibles, experimental or organizational expense, unamortized debt discount and expense carried as an asset, all reserves and any write-up in the book of value of assets made after the Effective Date (other than write-ups of assets of a going concern business made within 12 months after the acquisition of such business), net of accumulated amortization and (ii) all reserves for depreciation and other asset valuation reserves (but excluding reserves for federal, state and other income taxes).
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets
 
"" means, at any time:
Consolidated Tangible Net Worth
 
(A) the total assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries which would be shown as assets on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of such time prepared in accordance with GAAP, after eliminating all amounts properly attributable to minority interests, if any, in the stock and surplus of Restricted Subsidiaries,
minus
 
(B) the total liabilities of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries which would be shown as liabilities on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of such time prepared in accordance with GAAP,
minus
 
(C) the net book amount of all assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries (after deducting any reserves applicable thereto)
that would be shown as intangible assets on a consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries as of such time prepared in accordance with GAAP.
 
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.  "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
"" means, for any period, the sum of (a) Cash Interest Expense for such period and(b) scheduled principal payments on Total Indebtedness for such period.
Debt Service
 
"" means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
"" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in .
Disclosed Matters
Schedule 3.06
 
"" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
"" means all Subsidiaries incorporated or organized under the laws of the United States of America, any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Domestic Subsidiaries
 
"" means, for any Person for any period, without duplication, the Consolidated Net Income of such Person for such period , to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, Cash Interest Expense, depreciation, amortization, other non-cash, non-recurring charges and income tax (including state franchise taxes based upon income) expense.
EBITDA
plus
 
"" has the meaning in the preamble of this Agreement.
Effective Date
 
"" means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
 
"" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Company or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
"" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest.
Equity Interests
 
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
 
"" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Company, is treated as a single employer under or of the Code or, solely for purposes of of ERISA and of the Code, is treated as a single employer under of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
Section 414(b) 
(c) 
Section 302
Section 412
Section 414
 
"" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in of the Code or of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to of the Code or of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Company or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Company or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
Section 4043
Section 412
Section 302
Section 412(d) 
Section 303(d) 
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
 
"" has the meaning assigned to such term in ARTICLE VII.
Event of Default
 
"" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Lender or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under ), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure
Excluded Taxes
Section 2.17(b)
to comply with , except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to .
Section 2.15(e)
Section 2.15(a)
 
"" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
"" means the letter agreement dated November 6, 2007, between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
Fee Letter
 
"" means the fiscal quarter of the Company, ending on the last day of each March, June, September and December of each year.
Fiscal Quarter
 
"" means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Borrower.
Financial Officer
 
"" means, for any period, the ratio of (i) Consolidated EBITDA plus Lease Expense and less cash taxes of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period to (ii) the Debt Service plus Capital Expenditures plus Lease Expense of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
"" means any Borrowing Subsidiary that is a Foreign Subsidiary.
Foreign Borrower
 
"" means, with respect to any Borrower, any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which such Borrower is located. For purposed of the definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
 
"" means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
"" means (ii) any authorization, consent, approval, license, waiver, ruling, permit, tariff, rate, certification, exemption, filing, variance, claim, order, judgment, decree, sanction or publication of, by or with; (iii)any notice to; (iv) any declaration of or with; or (v) any registration by or with, or any other action or deemed action by or on behalf of, any Governmental Authority.
Governmental Approval
 
"" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
 
"" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
"" means the Guarantee Agreement dated as of August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Guarantors from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Guarantee Agreement
 
"" means all the Domestic Subsidiaries and the Foreign Parent of each Foreign Borrower who is required to execute a Guarantee Agreement pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of the definition of Collateral and Guarantee Requirement.
Guarantors
 
"" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
 
"" means, as to any Lender or the Issuing Lender, the maximum nonusurious rate of interest that, under applicable law, may be contracted for, taken, reserved, charged or received by such Lender on the Loans or under the Loan Documents at any time or from time to time. If the maximum nonusurious rate of interest which, under applicable law, any of such Lenders are permitted to charge the Borrower on the Loans shall change after the date hereof, to the extent permitted by applicable law, the Highest Lawful Rate shall be automatically increased or decreased, as the case may be, as of the effective time of such change without notice to the Borrower or any other Person.
Highest Lawful Rate
"" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty and (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.
Indebtedness
 
"" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
 
"" means the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement dated as of August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Domestic Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
 
"" means any indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary owed to and held by the Company or any Wholly Owned Subsidiary; that any subsequent issuance or transfer of any Equity Interest which results in any such Wholly Owned Subsidiary ceasing to be a Wholly Owned Subsidiary or any subsequent transfer of such indebtedness (other than to the Company or another Wholly Owned Subsidiary) shall be deemed, in each case, to constitute a new incurrence of Indebtedness other than Intercompany Indebtedness by the issuer thereof.
Intercompany Indebtedness
provided
 
"" means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with .
Interest Election Request
Section 2.06
 
"" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan, the last day of each March, June, September and December, and (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period.
Interest Payment Date
 
"" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in
Interest Period
the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect; provided, that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
 
"" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as the issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in . The Issuing Lender may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of the Issuing Lender, in which case the term "Issuing Lender" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Lender
Section 2.04
 
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company, all Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Parents of all Foreign Borrowers and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreement
 
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company, all Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
 
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company, all Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Parents of all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement
 
"" means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement dated of even date herewith by and among the Company, all Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Parents of all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement
 
"" means all laws, statutes, treaties, ordinances, codes, acts, rules, regulations, Government Approvals and Orders of all Governmental Authorities, whether now or hereafter in effect.
Law
 
"" means a payment made by the Issuing Lender pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
"" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
plus
 
"" for any period shall mean gross operating lease obligations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for any relevant period for which such calculation is being utilized.
Lease Expense
 
"" means the Persons listed on and any other Person that shall have become a Lender hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.
Lenders
Schedule 2.01
 
"" means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement including, without limitation, the existing letters of credit listed on attached hereto.
Letter of Credit
Schedule 1.01A
 
"" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Company ended on such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, ended on the last day of the fiscal quarter of the Company most recently ended prior to such date); provided, that for purposes of determining the Leverage Ratio, all references in the definitions of Total Indebtedness and Consolidated EBITDA (and in the definitions used therein) to Restricted Subsidiaries shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
Leverage Ratio
 
"" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 page (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the "" with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
LIBO Rate
 
"" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities. For the purposes of this
Lien
Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company shall be deemed to be the owner of any Property which it has acquired or holds subject to a conditional sale agreement, financing lease or other arrangement pursuant to which title to the Property has been retained by or vested in some other Person for security purposes.
 
"" means this Agreement, each Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement, each Borrowing Subsidiary Termination, the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement, the Letters of Credit (and any applications therefor and reimbursement agreements relating thereto), the Security Documents, any promissory note issued pursuant to .
Loan Documents
Section 2.08
 
"" means each Borrower and each Subsidiary that is party to any Loan Document.
Loan Parties
 
"" means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement.
Loans
 
 "" means any event, development or circumstance that has had or could reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, property or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the validity or enforceability of any of the Loan Documents or the rights or remedies of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders.
Material Adverse Effect
 
"" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $25,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
 
"" means December 21, 2012.
Maturity Date
 
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
 
"" means a multiemployer plan as defined in of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
Section 4001(a)(3) 
 
 "" means, with respect to any event, (a) the proceeds received in respect of such event net of all brokerage commissions, reasonable fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid by the Company to third parties (other than Affiliates) in connection with such event.
Net Proceeds
 
"" means, at any time and from time to time, the net worth of the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, determined in accordance with GAAP.
Net Worth
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
New Lender
Section 2.18(b)
"" means an agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and a New Lender in substantially in the form of or a form that is reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
New Lender Agreement
Exhibit 1.01F
 
"" means (a) the due and punctual payment by the Borrowers or the applicable Loan Parties of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrowers under this Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements, interest thereon and obligations to provide cash collateral and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Secured Parties under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (b) the due and punctual payment and performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Loan Parties, monetary or otherwise, under or pursuant to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and (c) the due and punctual payment of all obligations of the Company under each Swap Agreement entered into (i) prior to the Effective Date with any counterparty that is a Lender (or an Affiliate thereof) on the date hereof or (ii) on or after the Effective Date with any counterparty that is a Lender (or an Affiliate thereof) at the time such Swap Agreement is entered into.
Obligations
 
"" means an order, writ, judgment, award, injunction, decree, ruling or decision of any Governmental Authority or arbitrator.
Order
 
"" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statement.
Original Credit Agreement
 
"" means any and all present or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement.
Other Taxes
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Participant
Section 9.04
 
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
 
"" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
(a)           Liens imposed by law for taxes that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with ;
Section 5.05
 
(b)           carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, repairmen's and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing
obligations that are not overdue by more than 90 days or are being contested in compliance with ;
Section 5.05
 
(c)           pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
 
(d)           deposits to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(e)           judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under of ;
clause (k) 
Article VII
 
(f)            easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary;
 
(g)           any obligations or duties affecting any of the property of the Company or the Subsidiaries to any municipality or public authority with respect to any franchise, grant, license or permit which do not materially impair the use of such property for the purposes for which it is held;
 
(h)           Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statements regarding operating leases; and
 
(i)            Liens arising out of consignment or similar arrangements for the sale of goods entered into by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business.
 
provided
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
 
"" means investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by any office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of any jurisdiction outside of the United States of America.
Permitted Foreign Investments
 
 "" means:
Permitted Investments
 
(a)           direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
(b)           investments in commercial paper maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moody's;
 
(c)           investments in certificates of deposit, banker's acceptances and time deposits maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which (i) has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000 and (ii) has short-term credit ratings of at least A1 and P1 by S&P and Moody's, respectively;
 
(d)           fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above; the Company shall take possession of all securities purchased by the Company or any Subsidiary under repurchase agreements and shall adhere to customary margin and mark-to-market procedures with respect to fluctuations in value; and
provided
that
 
(e)           money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P and Aaa by Moody's or invest solely in the assets described in through above and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
clauses (a) 
(d) 
 
(f)            municipal investments with a rating of AAA by S&P and Aaa by Moody's and a maximum maturity of one year (for securities where the interest rate is adjusted periodically (e.g. floating rate securities), the interest rate reset date will be used to determine the maturity date); and
 
(g)           variable rate notes issued by, or guaranteed by, any state agency, municipality or domestic corporation rated A-1 (or the equivalent thereof) or better by S&P or P-1 (or the equivalent thereof) or better by Moody's and maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition (the interest rate reset date will be used to determine the maturity date).
 
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
"" means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or of the Code or of ERISA, and in respect of which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in of ERISA.
Plan
Section 412
Section 302
Section 4069
Section 3(5) 
 
"" means (a) the Pledge Agreement dated August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent and (b) in connection with pledges of shares of or other equity interests in Foreign Subsidiaries, other pledge agreements or similar agreements in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, as the same may
Pledge Agreements
be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
 
"" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
"" means a Domestic Subsidiary that does not own any assets other than, or engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of, Equity Interests of one or more Domestic or Foreign Subsidiaries and that does not have any Indebtedness or liabilities other than (a) liabilities incidental to its ownership of such Equity Interests and (b) liabilities as a Guarantor of the Obligations.
Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company
 
"" means the last day of each March, June, September and December in each year.
Quarterly Dates
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Re-Allocation Date
Section 2.18(e)
 
"" has the meaning set forth in .
Register
Section 9.04(b)
 
"" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
"" means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Exposures and unused Commitments representing at least 51% of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
 
"" means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in the Company or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in the Company.
Restricted Payment
 
"" means (a) any Domestic Subsidiary and (b) any Foreign Subsidiary that is not an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
Restricted Subsidiary
 
"" means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the (a) outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans and (b) such Lender's LC Exposure, in each case at such time.
Revolving Exposure
 
"" means a Loan made pursuant to .
Revolving Loan
Section 2.01
 
"" means any period of four consecutive Fiscal Quarters (or, if less, the number of full Fiscal Quarters subsequent to the Effective Date).
Rolling Period
"" means Standard & Poor's Rating Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. and any successor thereto.
S&P
 
"" has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statement.
Second Amended and Restated Agreement
 
 "" means the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, each Lender, the Issuing Lender and each other person to which any of the Obligations is owed.
Secured Parties
 
"" means (a) the Security Agreement dated August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Domestic Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties and (b) in connection with the creation of security interests in the assets of Foreign Subsidiaries, other security agreements or similar agreements in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, as the same may be ratified, amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Security Agreements
 
"" means the Security Agreements, the Pledge Agreements, the Guarantee Agreements, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreements, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement and each other security document or pledge agreement delivered pursuant to or to secure any of the Obligations or in accordance with applicable local or foreign law to grant a valid, perfected security interest in any property, and all UCC or other financing statements or instruments of perfection required by this Agreement or any security agreement to be filed with respect to the security interests in property and fixtures created pursuant to the Security Agreement and any other document or instrument utilized to pledge as collateral for the Obligations any property of whatever kind or nature.
Security Documents
Section 5.11
Section 5.13
 
"" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject (a) with respect to the Base CD Rate, for new negotiable nonpersonal time deposits in dollars of over $100,000 with maturities approximately equal to three months and (b) with respect to the Adjusted LIBO Rate, for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
 
"" means subordinated debt securities issued by the Company that (a) are subordinated to the Obligations pursuant to subordination provisions
Subordinated Indebtedness
approved by Administrative Agent, (b) contain covenants, events of default and mandatory redemption, repayment, prepayment or repurchase requirements approved by Administrative Agent, and (c) do not mature, and are not subject to any scheduled amortization, redemption, repayment, prepayment or repurchase requirement, prior to the date one year after the Maturity Date.
 
"" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
 
"" means any subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
 
"" means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Borrower or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
 
"" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
 
"" means, for any day, the secondary market rate for three-month certificates of deposit reported as being in effect on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next preceding Business Day) by the Board through the public information telephone line of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (which rate will, under the current practices of the Board, be published in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15(519) during the week following such day) or, if such rate is not so reported on such day or such next preceding Business Day, the average of the secondary market quotations for three-month certificates of deposit of major money center banks in New York City received at approximately 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, on the next preceding Business Day) by the Administrative Agent from three negotiable certificate of deposit dealers of recognized standing selected by it.
Three-Month Secondary CD Rate
 
"" means, as of any date, the sum of (a) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date, in the amount that would be reflected on a balance sheet prepared as of such date on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, plus (b) the aggregate principal amount of
Total Indebtedness
 
Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date that is not required to be reflected on a balance sheet in accordance with GAAP, determined on a consolidated basis; provided that, (i) for purposes of clause (b) above, the term "Indebtedness" shall not include contingent obligations of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty unless such letter of credit or letter of guaranty supports an obligation that constitutes Indebtedness and
(ii) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio but not for any other purpose, all references to Restricted Subsidiaries in this definition and in the definitions referred to herein shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
 
"" means the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the borrowing of Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
 
"", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
 
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effect in the State of Texas or, where applicable as to specific Collateral, any other relevant state.
UCC
 
"" means (i) any Foreign Subsidiary of the Company that at the time of determination shall have been designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary by the Company in the manner provided below (and shall not subsequently have been designated as a Restricted Subsidiary) and (ii) any subsidiary of an Unrestricted Subsidiary.  The Company may from time to time designate any Foreign Subsidiary (other than a Foreign Subsidiary that, immediately after such designation, shall hold any Indebtedness of or Equity Interest in the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary) as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, and may designate any Unrestricted Subsidiary as a Restricted Subsidiary so long as, immediately after giving effect to such designation, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.  Any designation by the Company pursuant to this definition shall be made in an officer's certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent and containing a certification that such designation is in compliance with the terms of this definition.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Borrowing Subsidiary shall at any time be an Unrestricted Subsidiary.  contains a list of the Foreign Subsidiaries that have been designated by the Company as Unrestricted Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date.
Unrestricted Subsidiary
Schedule 1.01B
 
"" means any Subsidiary of the Company all the Equity Interests of which (other than directors' qualifying shares and Equity Interests held by other than the Persons to the extent such Equity Interests are required by applicable law to be held by a Person other than the Company or one of its Subsidiaries) is owned by the Company or one or more Wholly Owned Subsidiaries.
Wholly Owned Subsidiary
 
"" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
Section 1.02           .  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation".  The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall".  Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally
 
Section 1.03           .  Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Company notifies the Administrative Agent that the Company requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Company that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until  such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision  amended in accordance herewith.
Accounting Terms; GAAP
provided
 
 
Section 2.01           .  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to any Borrower from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (i) such Lender's Revolving Exposure exceeding such Lender's Commitment or (ii) in the case of any Foreign Borrower, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans of all Foreign Borrowers exceeding $20,000,000.  Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, any Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments
 
Section 2.02           .  (a) Each Loan made pursuant to Section 2.01 shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments.  The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations
Loans and Borrowings
 
 
hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Loans as required.
provided
(b)           Subject to , each Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith.  Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 2.12
provided
 
(c)           At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $1,000,000.  At the time that each ABR Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000; provided that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Commitments.  Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of eight Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
 
(d)           Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, no Borrower shall be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
 
Section 2.03           .  To request a Borrowing, the applicable Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the
Requests for Borrowings
proposed
Borrowing.  Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.  Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with :
Section 2.02
 
(i)            the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
 
(ii)           the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)          whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
 
(iv)          in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "";
Interest Period
 
(v)           the Borrower requesting such Borrowing; and
 
(vi)          the location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of .
Section 2.05(a)
 
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing.  If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.  Promptly following receipt of a  Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
 
Section 2.04           .  (a) .  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Company may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account or for the joint and several account of the Company and a Borrowing Subsidiary in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period.  Such Letters of Credit may be used for the benefit of any Subsidiary and may identify such Subsidiary in the text thereof so long as either the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary is the account party thereon.  In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Company to, or entered into by the Company with, the Issuing Lender relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Letters of Credit
General
 
(b)           .  To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Company shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the Issuing Lender) to the Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit.  If requested by the Issuing Lender, the Company also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Lender's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit.  A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Company shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $20,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Exposures shall not exceed the total Commitments.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions
 
(c)           .  Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; , , that any Letter of Credit with a one-year tenor may provide for the renewal thereof for additional one-year periods (which shall in no event extend beyond the date referred to in clause (ii) above).
Expiration Date
provided
however
 
(d)           .  By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Lender or the Lenders, the Issuing Lender hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Lender, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit.  In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Lender and not reimbursed by the Company on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Company for any reason.  Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations
 
(e)           .  If the Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Company shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Company shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Company prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Company receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Company receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt.  If the Company fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Company in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof.  Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Company, in the same manner as provided in with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders.  Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Company pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Lender or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Lender, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Lender as their interests may appear.  Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Lender for any LC Disbursement  shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Company of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement
Section 2.05
Section 2.05
mutatis mutandis
 
(f)            .  The Company's obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability
Obligations Absolute
 
 
of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Lender under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Company's obligations hereunder.  Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Lender, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Lender; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Lender from liability to the Company to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Company to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Company that are caused by the Issuing Lender's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof.  The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Lender (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Lender shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination.  In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Lender may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
provided
 
(g)           .  The Issuing Lender shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Company by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any demand for payment under a Letter of Credit and whether the Issuing Lender has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Company of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Lender and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures
provided
 
(h)           .  If the Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Company shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Company reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Company fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then shall apply.  Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Lender, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section
Interim Interest
provided
Section 2.11(c) 
 
to reimburse the Issuing Lender shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
 
(i)            .  The Issuing Lender may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Company, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Lender and the successor Issuing Lender.  The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Issuing Lender.  At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Company shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Lender pursuant to .  From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of the Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Lender" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Lender, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Lenders, as the context shall require.  After the replacement of an Issuing Lender hereunder, the replaced Issuing Lender shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of the Issuing Lender
Section 2.10(b)
 
(j)            .  If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Company receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Company shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in or of .  The Company also shall deposit cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph as and to the extent required by .  Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Company under this Agreement.  The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account.  Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Company's risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest.  Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account.  Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Lender for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Company for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Lenders with LC Exposure  representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Company under this Agreement.  If the Company is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Company within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.  If the Company is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to , such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned
Cash Collateralization
provided
clause (h) 
(i) 
ARTICLE VII
Section 2.09(b)
Section 2.09(b)
 
to the Company as and to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, the Company would remain in compliance with and no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Section 2.09(b) 
 
Section 2.05   .  (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders.  The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the applicable Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower maintained with the Administrative Agent in New York City and designated by such Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request.
Funding of Borrowings
 
(b)           Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the applicable Borrower a corresponding amount.  In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans.  If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
 
Section 2.06   .  (a) Each Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request.  Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section.  The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.
Interest Elections
 
(b)           To make an election pursuant to this Section, the applicable Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under if the Borrower were requesting a Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election.  Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.
Section 2.03
 
(c)           Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with :
Section 2.02
 
(i)            the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
 
(ii)           the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)          whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
(iv)          if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
 
(d)           Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
 
(e)           If the applicable Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing.  Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent so notifies the Company, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
 
Section 2.07   .
Termination and Reduction of Commitments
 
(a)           Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
 
(b)           The Company may at any time terminate or from time to time reduce the Commitments; provided that (A) each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $5,000,000 and (B) the Company shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Loans in accordance with , the sum of the Revolving Exposures would exceed the total Commitments.
Section 2.09
 
(c)           The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the
 
effective date thereof.  Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each notice delivered by the Company pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Company may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Company (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied.  Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent.  Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
provided
 
Section 2.08   .  (a) Each Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan of such Lender on the Maturity Date.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
 
(b)           Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of each Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
(c)           The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrowers to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
 
(d)           The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of any Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
 
(e)           Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note.  In such event, the applicable Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and the Company.  Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to ) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
Section 9.04
 
Section 2.09   .  (a) Each Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans
 
 
(b)           In the event and on each occasion that the sum of the Revolving Exposures exceeds the total Commitments, the Borrowers shall prepay Borrowings (or, if no such Borrowings are outstanding, deposit cash collateral in an account with the Administrative Agent pursuant to ) in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
Section 2.04(j)
 
(c)
                                 
The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment.  Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of optional prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by , then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with .  Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in .  Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing.  Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by .
provided
Section 2.07
Section 2.07
Section 2.02
Section 2.11
 
Section 2.10
  
Fees
. (a) The Company shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Margin on the daily amount of the unused Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which such Commitment terminates. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the third Business Day following the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
 
(b)
                                
The Company shall pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Margin used to determine the interest rate applicable to Eurodollar Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates and the date on which it ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to the Issuing Lender a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 0.125% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as the Issuing Lender's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder.  Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third Business Day following such
last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; provided that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand.  Any other fees payable to the Issuing Lender pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand.  All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
 
(c)
                                 
The Company shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times set forth in the Fee Letter.
 
(d)
                                
All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the Issuing Lender, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders.  Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
 
Section 2.11
  
Interest
. (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Margin.
 
(b)
                                
The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Margin.
(c)
                                 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
 
(d)
                                
Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and, in the case of Loans, upon termination of the Commitments; provided that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
 
(e)
                                 
All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  The applicable Alternate Base Rate,
Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
Section 2.12
  
Alternate Rate of Interest
. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
 
(i)
                                    
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
 
(ii)
                                 
the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Company and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing; that if the circumstances giving rise to such notice affect only one Type of Borrowings, then the other Type of Borrowings shall be permitted.
provided
 
Section 2.13
  
Increased Costs
. (a)  If any Change in Law shall:
 
(i)
                                    
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or the Issuing Lender; or
 
(ii)
                                 
impose on any Lender or the Issuing Lender or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or the Issuing Lender of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the Issuing Lender hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Company will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b)
                                
If any Lender or the Issuing Lender determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the Issuing
Lender's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Lender, to a level below that which such Lender or the Issuing Lender or such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Company will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender or such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
(c)
                                 
A certificate of a Lender or the Issuing Lender setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Company and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Company shall pay such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
(d)
                                
Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the Issuing Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's right to demand such compensation; that the Company shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the Issuing Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, notifies the Company of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the Issuing Lender's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
 
Section 2.14
  
Break Funding Payments
. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Revolving Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under  and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the applicable Borrower pursuant to , then, in any such event, the applicable Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market. A
Section 2.09(c)
Section 2.17
certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The applicable Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
Section 2.15
  
Taxes
. (a)  Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Documents shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if such Loan Party shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Lender (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) such Loan Party shall make such deductions and (iii) such Loan Party shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
provided
 
(b)
                                
In addition, the Company shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
 
(c)
                                 
The Company shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Issuing Lender, within 10 Business Days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan Documents (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority.  A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Company by a Lender or the Issuing Lender, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the Issuing Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
(d)
                                
As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Company shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(e)
                                 
Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the law of the jurisdiction in which a Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate.
(f)
                                   
If the Administrative Agent, a Lender or the Issuing Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Company or with respect to which any Loan Party has paid additional amounts pursuant to this , it shall pay over such refund to the Company (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Company under this with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); provided, that the Company, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Company (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender in the event the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes that it deems confidential) to the Company or any other Person.
Section 2.15
Section 2.15
 
Section 2.16
  
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
(a)  Each Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under , or , or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, Houston time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 712 Main Street, Houston, Texas, except payments to be made directly to the Issuing Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to , , and shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments hereunder shall be made in dollars.
Section 2.13
2.14
2.15
Section 2.13
2.14
2.15
9.03
 
(b)
                                
If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
 
(c)
                                 
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans, or participations in LC Disbursements resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans, and participations in LC
Disbursements, and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by a Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply).  Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
(d)
                                
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Lender hereunder that such Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount due.  In such event, if such Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Lender with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
(e)
                                 
If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to , or , , or , then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
Section 2.04(d)
(e)
2.05(b)
2.16(d) 
9.03(c)
 
Section 2.17
  
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
. (a)  If any Lender requests compensation under , or if a Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to or , as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or
Section 2.13
Section 2.15
Section 2.13
2.15
 
 
expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrowers shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
 
(b)
                                
If any Lender requests compensation under , or if a Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , or if any Lender defaults in its obligation to fund Loans hereunder, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in ), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); provided that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and if a Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Lender), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.15, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments.  A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such  assignment and delegation cease to apply.
Section 2.13
Section 2.15
Section 9.04
Section 2.13
 
Section 2.18
  
Increase of Commitments
. (a)  If no Default, Event of Default or Material Adverse Effect shall have occurred and be continuing and all of the conditions described in  are satisfied, the Company may at any time and from time to time request an increase of the aggregate Commitments by notice to the Administrative Agent in writing of the amount of such proposed increase (such notice, a ""); provided, however, that (i) each such increase shall be at least $10,000,000, (ii) the cumulative increase in Commitments pursuant to this shall not exceed $100,000,000, (iii) the Commitment of any Lender may not be increased without such Lender's consent, and (iv) the aggregate amount of the Lenders' Commitments shall not exceed $200,000,000. Any such Commitment Increase Notice must offer each Lender the opportunity to subscribe for its pro rata share of the increased Commitments. If any portion of the increased Commitments is not subscribed for by such Lenders, the Company may, in its sole discretion, but with the consent of the Administrative Agent as to any Person that is not at such time a Lender (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), offer to any existing Lender or to one or more additional banks or financial institutions the opportunity to participate in all or a portion of such unsubscribed portion of the increased Commitments pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) below, as applicable.
Section 4.02(a) and (d)
Commitment Increase Notice
Section 2.18
 
(b)
                                
Any additional bank or financial institution that the Company selects to offer participation in the increased Commitments shall become a party to this Agreement by executing and delivering to the Administrative Agent a New Lender Agreement setting forth its Commitment, whereupon such bank or financial institution (a "") shall become a
New Lender
Lender for all purposes and to the same extent as if originally a party hereto and shall be bound by and entitled to the benefits of this Agreement, and the signature pages hereof shall be deemed to be amended to add the name of such New Lender and the definition of Commitment in hereof shall be deemed amended to increase the aggregate Commitments of the Lenders by the Commitment of such New Lender, that the Commitment of any New Lender shall be an amount not less than $5,000,000 (or any remaining portion of the increased Commitments not subscribed to by the Lenders).
Section 1.01
provided
 
(c)
                                 
Any Lender that accepts an offer to it by the Borrower to increase its Commitment pursuant to this shall, in each case, execute a Commitment Increase Agreement with the Company and the Administrative Agent, whereupon such Lender shall be bound by and entitled to the benefits of this Agreement with respect to the full amount of its Commitment as so increased, and the definition of Commitment in hereof shall be deemed to be amended to reflect such increase.
Section 2.18
Section 1.01
 
(d)
                                
The effectiveness of any New Lender Agreement or Commitment Increase Agreement shall be contingent upon receipt by the Administrative Agent of such corporate resolutions of the Company and legal opinions of counsel to the Company as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request with respect thereto, in each case in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(e)
                                 
If any bank or financial institution becomes a New Lender pursuant to or any Lender's Commitment is increased pursuant to , additional Loans made on or after the effectiveness thereof (the "") shall be made pro rata based on their respective Commitments in effect on or after such Re-Allocation Date (except to the extent that any such pro rata borrowings would result in any Lender making an aggregate principal amount of Loans in excess of its Commitment, in which case such excess amount will be allocated to, and made by, such New Lender and/or Lenders with such increased Commitments to the extent of, and pro rata based on, their respective Commitments), and continuations of Loans outstanding on such Re-Allocation Date shall be effected by repayment of such Loans on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto and the making of new Loans pro rata based on the respective Commitments in effect on and after such Re-Allocation Date.
Section 2.18(b) 
Section 2.18(c)
Re-Allocation Date
 
(f)
                                   
If on any Re-Allocation Date there is an unpaid principal amount of  Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans, such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans shall remain outstanding with the respective holders thereof until the expiration of their respective Interest Periods (unless the Company elects to prepay any thereof in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Agreement), and interest on and repayments of such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans will be paid thereon to the respective Lenders holding such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans pro rata based on the respective principal amounts thereof outstanding.
 
Section 2.19
  
Borrowing Subsidiaries
. On or after the Effective Date, the Company may designate any Restricted Subsidiary of the Company as a Borrowing Subsidiary by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement executed by such Restricted Subsidiary and the Company, and five (5) Business Days following (i) such delivery and (ii) receipt of documentation reasonably requested by the Lenders in order to comply with
 
 
the Act (as defined in ), such Restricted Subsidiary shall for all purposes of this Agreement be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement until the Company shall have executed and delivered to the Administrative Agent a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination with respect to such Restricted Subsidiary, whereupon such Restricted Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, no Borrowing Subsidiary Termination will become effective as to any Borrowing Subsidiary at a time when any principal of or interest on any Revolving Loan to such Borrowing Subsidiary or any Letter of Credit issued for the account of such Borrowing Subsidiary shall be outstanding hereunder; that such Borrowing Subsidiary Termination shall be effective to terminate such Borrowing Subsidiary's right to make further Borrowings or to request Letters of Credit under this Agreement. As soon as practicable upon receipt of a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement, the Administrative Agent shall send a copy thereof to each Lender.
Section 9.16
provided
 
Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders that:
 
Section 3.01
  
Organization
.  As of the Effective Date, each of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (i) is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, (ii) has the requisite power and authority to conduct its business as it is presently being conducted, and (iii) is duly qualified or licensed to conduct business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction listed in .  Each Borrower and its Subsidiaries are qualified and licensed in all jurisdictions where they are required to be so qualified or licensed to operate their business and where the failure to so qualify or be in good standing, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.  No proceeding to dissolve any Loan Party is pending or, to the Borrower's knowledge, threatened except for any merger, consolidation, liquidation, or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Schedule 3.01
 
Section 3.02
  
Authorization; Enforceability
.  The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Party's corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action.  This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrowers and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Borrowers or such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
 
Section 3.03
  
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
.  The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect, (ii) filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents and (iii) those the failure to obtain or make which, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be
expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement or other material instrument binding upon the Company  or any of its Subsidiaries or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, except Liens created under the Loan Documents.
 
Section 3.04
  
Financial Statements; No Material Adverse Change
.  (a) The Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2006, reported on by KPMG LLP, independent certified public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the current fiscal year ended September 30, 2007, certified by its chief financial officer. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
 
(b)
                                
Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of the Company or its Subsidiaries has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities, unusual long-term commitments or unrealized losses.
 
(c)
                                 
Since December 31, 2006, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, property, condition (financial or otherwise), of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
 
Section 3.05
  
Properties
. (a)  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that (i) do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and (ii) individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(b)
                                
Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, trade names, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by the Company and its Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Section 3.06
  
Litigation and Environmental Matters
.  (a)  There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result
in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
 
(b)
                                
Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
 
(c)
                                 
Since the Effective Date, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Section 3.07
  
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all Laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, material agreements and other material instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  No Default has occurred and is continuing.
 
Section 3.08
  
Intellectual Property
.  The Company and each of its Subsidiary owns, or is licensed to use, all patents, trademarks, trade names, service marks, copyrights, technology, know-how and processes (together with all applications therefor and licenses granting rights therein, "") reasonably necessary for the conduct of its business as currently conducted, except for those the failure to own or be licensed to use which could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  To the knowledge of the Company, (a) the use of Intellectual Property by the Company and its Subsidiaries does not infringe on the rights of any person, (b) no Intellectual Property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is being infringed upon by any person, and (c) no claim is pending or threatened in writing challenging the use or the validity of any Intellectual Property of the Company or any Subsidiary, except for infringements and claims referred to in the foregoing clauses (a), (b) and (c) that, in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Intellectual Property
 
Section 3.09
  
Investment Company Status
.  Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
 
Section 3.10
  
Taxes
.  Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) any Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Company or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Section 3.11         
ERISA
.  No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $10,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
 
Section 3.12         
Labor Matters
.  As of the Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened. The hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries have not been in violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other Law dealing with such matters in any manner that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. All payments due from the Company or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against any of them, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries except to the extent non-payment could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is bound.
 
Section 3.13         
Insurance
.  lists all policies or binders of fire, liability, worker's compensation, vehicular or other insurance held by or for the benefit of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (specifying the insurer, the policy number or covering note number with respect to binders) as of the Effective Date. As of the Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid. All insurance required by is in full force and effect, is with financially sound and reputable insurers and is in amounts and provides coverage that are reasonable and customary for Persons engaged in businesses similar to those conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Schedule 3.13
Section 5.07
 
Section 3.14         
Solvency
.  Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date, and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Effective Date and after giving effect to the application of the proceeds of such Loans, (a) the fair market value of the assets of each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinate, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities; (c) each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinate, contingent or otherwise as they become absolute and mature; and (d) each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will not have
 
unreasonably small capital with which to conduct its business as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
 
Section 3.15         
Subsidiaries
.   sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Company in, each Subsidiary of the Company and identifies each Subsidiary that is a Domestic Subsidiary and each that is a Foreign Subsidiary, in each case as of the Effective Date. As of Effective Date, there are no Borrowing Subsidiaries and no Person has executed a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement (as defined in the Second Amended and Restated Agreement) or obtained a Loan under of the Original Credit Agreement, as amended.
Schedule 3.15
Section 2.01
 
Section 3.16         
Disclosure
.  The Company has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to it, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any Loan Document or delivered hereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contain any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, taken as a whole in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, the Borrowers represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
provided
 
Section 3.17         
Margin Stock
.  Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is engaged principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of buying or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board). The proceeds of the Loans and the Letters of Credit will not be used, directly or indirectly, immediately, incidentally or ultimately, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any margin stock or for the purpose of reducing or retiring any Indebtedness which was originally incurred to purchase or carry margin stock or for any other purpose which might cause any of the Loans or the Letters of Credit under this Agreement to be "purpose credit" within the meaning of Regulation U or Regulation X of the Board.
 
Section 3.18         
Use of Proceeds
.  The proceeds of the Loans shall be used only for working capital and other general corporate purposes, including without limitation, Acquisitions. Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent that all Loans will be for business, commercial, investment or other similar purpose and not primarily for personal, family, household or agricultural use, as such terms are used in the Texas Finance Code.
 
Section 3.19         
No Undisclosed Liabilities
.  Except as set forth in , the Company and its Subsidiaries have no liabilities or obligations of any nature (whether known or unknown, and whether absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise) except for (i) liabilities or obligations reflected or reserved against in the financial statements most recently delivered by the Borrower pursuant to , (ii) current liabilities incurred in the ordinary course of business since the date of such financial statements, (iii) liabilities or obligations that are not
Schedule 3.19
Section 5.01
required to be included in financial statements prepared in accordance with GAAP, (iv) liabilities or obligations arising under Governmental Approvals or contracts to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or otherwise subject and (v) liabilities or obligations incurred after the most recently delivered financial statements and specifically permitted to be incurred under this Agreement.
 
ARTICLE IV
 
Conditions
 
Section 4.01         
Effective Date
.  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with ):
Section 9.02
 
(a)           The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
 
(b)           The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Bracewell & Guiliani, L.L.P., counsel for the Company, and of Fees & Burgess, P.C., local Alabama counsel for the Company, both in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and Required Lenders, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions as the Required Lenders shall reasonably request. The Company hereby requests such counsel to deliver such opinion.
 
(c)           The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of each Loan Party, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, this Agreement or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
(d)           .
Intentionally Deleted
 
(e)           The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable legal fees) required to be reimbursed or paid by any Loan Party hereunder or under any Loan Documents.
 
(f)            All material governmental and third party approvals necessary or, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, advisable in connection with the financing contemplated
 
hereby and the continuing operations of the Borrowers and its Subsidiaries shall have been obtained and be in full force and effect.
 
(g)           The Lenders shall have received (i) audited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the two most recent fiscal years ended prior to the Effective Date as to which such financial statements are available and (ii) satisfactory unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for each fiscal quarterly period ended subsequent to the date of the latest financial statements delivered pursuant to clause (i) of this paragraph as to which such financial statements are available which financial statements shall not be materially inconsistent with the financial statements or forecasts previously provided.
 
(h)           The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) Amended and Restated Promissory Notes for each of the Lenders and (ii) each of the Security Documents and they shall constitute satisfactory security documentation to create first priority security interests in the Collateral (free and clear of all Liens, other than Liens permitted by ).
Section 6.02
 
(i)            The Collateral and Guarantee Requirement shall have been satisfied.
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to ).
Section 9.02
 
Section 4.02         
Each Credit Event
.  The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of the Issuing Lender to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
 
(a)           The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be deemed to have been made as a part of said request for a Borrowing and shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
 
(b)           No Material Adverse Effect shall have occurred since the date of the most recent Borrowing by the Company.
 
(c)           The Administrative Agent shall have received a request for a Borrowing as required by or the Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent shall have received a request for the issuance of a Letter of Credit as required by ;
Section 2.03
Section 2.04(b)
 
(d)           At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this Section.
 
Section 4.03         
Initial Credit Event for each Borrowing Subsidiary
.  The obligation of the Lenders to make Loans to any Borrowing Subsidiary and the obligations of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit for the account of any Borrowing Subsidiary are subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
 
(a)           The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement duly executed by such Borrowing Subsidiary and the other parties thereto.
 
(b)           The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion of counsel for such Borrowing Subsidiary, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Administrative Agent and Required Lenders, and covering such other matters relating to such Borrowing Subsidiary and its Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request.
 
(c)           The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of such Borrowing Subsidiary, the authorization of the Transactions insofar as they relate to such Borrowing Subsidiary, the satisfaction of the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement insofar as it relates to the assets of such Borrowing Subsidiary and any other legal matters relating to such Borrowing Subsidiary, its Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement or such Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
ARTICLE V
 
Affirmative Covenants
 
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
Section 5.01         
Financial Statements and Other Information
.  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
 
(a)           within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, the audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries as of such year, all reported on by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of
 
operations of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
 
(b)           within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries and Company and the Restricted Subsidiaries as of such year, all certified by one of the Company's Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries or the Company on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)           concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with , and , (iii) setting forth in a reasonably detailed schedule, a comparison of the consolidated results under clause (a) or (b) above with the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Restricted Subsidiaries, and (iv) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
Section 6.15
6.16
6.18
Section 3.04
 
(d)           concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, any management letter delivered to the management of the Company by the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements, and concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clauses (a) or (b) written notice of any new office or facility at which Collateral owned by a Loan Party is located;
 
(e)           promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
 
(f)            promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of this Agreement, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request;
 
(g)           within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year, a summary description of the insurance policies of the Company and its Subsidiaries; and
 
(h)           promptly following any request thereof, all information and/or documentation necessary to comply with the Act or for Administrative Agent to confirm compliance with the Act.
 
Documents required to be delivered pursuant to may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date (i) on which the Borrower posts such documents, or provides a link thereto on the Borrower's website on the Internet at or (ii) on which such documents are delivered to the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent shall post such documents on the Borrower's behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative Agent have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent); that the Borrower shall deliver such documents in a form acceptable to the Administrative Agent; further that Borrower shall be obligated to pay for all start-up and on-going maintenance costs associated with such Internet or intranet website. Except for such compliance certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
Section 5.01
www.bench.com
provided
provided
 
Section 5.02         
Notices of Material Events
.  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt and, in any event, within five Business Days, written notice of the following:
 
(a)           the occurrence of any Default;
 
(b)           the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Company or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect or that in any manner questions the validity of the Loan Documents;
 
(c)           the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties);
 
(d)           the occurrence of any event or any other development by which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) fails to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) becomes subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) receives notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) becomes aware of any basis for any Environmental Liability and in each of the preceding clauses, which individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; and
 
(e)           any other development (including the termination of any material contract) that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth the details of the event or
development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
 
Section 5.03         
Information Regarding Collateral
.  The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change (i) in any Loan Party's corporate name or in the ownership of its properties, (ii) in any Loan Party's identity or corporate structure or (iii) in any Loan Party's Federal Taxpayer Identification Number and, at the time of the delivery of the financial statements required under , the Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent written notice of any change in the location of any office in which any Loan Party maintains books or records relating to Collateral owned by it. The Company agrees not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the UCC or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral. The Company also agrees promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
Section 5.01(a)
 
Section 5.04         
Existence; Conduct of Business
.  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under .
provided
Section 6.03
 
Section 5.05         
Payment of Obligations
.  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other obligations, including Tax liabilities, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (b) the Company or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Section 5.06         
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
.  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Section 5.07         
Insurance
.  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies (a) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (b) all insurance required to be maintained pursuant to the Security Documents.
 
 
Section 5.08         
Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights
.  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all material dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested, all at the Administrative Agent's or such Lender's expense, except with respect to any inspection or examination and related discussions during a Default or Event of Default, in which case, the provisions of shall apply.
Section 9.03
 
Section 5.09         
Compliance with Laws
.  The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all Laws (including Environmental Laws) and Orders applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Section 5.10         
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
.  The proceeds of the Loans will be used only for working capital and other general corporate purposes, including, without limitation, Acquisitions. No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
 
Section 5.11         
Additional Subsidiaries
.  If any additional Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Effective Date, the Company will, no more than thirty days after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired, notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof and cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied (to the extent applicable) with respect to such Subsidiary and with respect to any Equity Interest in or Indebtedness of such Subsidiary owned or to be owned by or on behalf of the Company or any other Subsidiary.
 
Section 5.12         
Ownership of Subsidiaries
.  (a) The Company will, and will cause each of the Subsidiaries to, ensure that all Equity Interests in Domestic Subsidiaries are owned directly or indirectly at all times only by the Company or one or more other Domestic Subsidiaries and that all the Equity Interests of such latter Domestic Subsidiaries are pledged to secure the Obligations.
 
(b)           The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, ensure that any Foreign Subsidiary (including each Foreign Subsidiary acquired in connection with an Acquisition), is owned directly or indirectly at all times by the Company or a Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company and that all the Equity Interests of such Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company are pledged to secure the Obligations.
 
Section 5.13         
Further Assurances
.  The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, at its own cost and expense, execute, acknowledge and deliver any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments and take all such further actions, (including the filing and recording of financing statements, and other documents) which may be required under any applicable Law, or which may from time to time be reasonably necessary or
 
as the Required Lenders may from time to time reasonably request in order to carry out the intent and purpose of the Loan Documents and the Transactions, including all such actions to establish, preserve, protect and perfect the estate, right, title and interest of the Lenders, or the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, to the Collateral (including Collateral acquired after the date hereof) and preserve, protect and perfect first priority Liens (subject to Liens permitted by ) in favor of the Lenders, or the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, on any and all assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries, now owned or hereafter acquired, that are not Collateral on the date hereof.
Section 6.02
 
ARTICLE VI
 
Negative Covenants
 
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
Section 6.01         
Indebtedness
.  The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
 
(a)           the Obligations;
 
(b)           Subordinated Indebtedness;
 
(c)           Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or shorten the maturity or the weighted average life thereof;
Schedule 6.01
 
(d)           Intercompany Indebtedness (to the extent permitted by );
Section 6.04
 
(e)           Guarantees by the Company or any Subsidiary of Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary which Indebtedness is permitted under this , provided, in no event shall the Company or any Subsidiary guarantee the Indebtedness of any Unrestricted Subsidiary or any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party hereunder other than guarantees of trade payables of Unrestricted Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business not to exceed $10,000,000 at any time outstanding.
Section 6.01
 
(f)            Indebtedness of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary or any Foreign Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations, and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 90 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (f) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
(g)           Indebtedness of any Person that becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower after the Effective Date; that (i) such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower, as the case may be, and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (g) shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of pro forma Consolidated EBITDA for the rolling four quarter period ending on the last day of the immediately prior fiscal quarter at the time such Person becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower;
provided
 
(h)           Indebtedness of Unrestricted Subsidiaries for which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary shall be liable as obligor, under any Guarantee or otherwise;
 
(i)            other unsecured Indebtedness so long as, after giving effect thereto, the Company is in proforma compliance with the financial covenants in , and ; and
Section 6.15
Section 6.16
Section 6.18
 
(j)            other secured Indebtedness incurred by Foreign Subsidiaries that are Restricted Subsidiaries for working capital purposes in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding twenty-five percent (25%) of Consolidated EBITDA for the rolling four quarter period ending on the last day of the immediately prior fiscal quarter at the time such Indebtedness is incurred.
 
Section 6.02     .   The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens
 
(a)           Liens created under the Loan Documents;
 
(b)           Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(c)           any Lien on any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary existing on the Effective Date and set forth in ; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the Effective Date, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
Schedule 6.02
provided
 
(d)           any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Company or any Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that is merged or consolidated with or into the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person is so merged or consolidated or becomes a Subsidiary; provided that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
 
(e)           Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Company or any Subsidiary, including Liens deemed to exist in respect of assets subject to Capital Lease Obligations; that (i) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by clause (f) of , (ii) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 90 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (iii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (iv) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary;
provided
Section 6.01
 
(f)            Liens securing Intercompany Indebtedness permitted under ;
Section 6.01(d)
 
(g)           Extensions, renewals or replacements of any Lien referred to in clauses (c), (d) and (e); that the principal amount of the Indebtedness or obligations secured thereby is not increased and that any such extension, renewal or replacement is limited to the assets originally encumbered thereby;
provided
 
(h)           Liens on the assets of Unrestricted Subsidiaries securing Indebtedness permitted under ;
Section 6.01(h)
 
(i)            Liens securing Indebtedness permitted under Section 6.01(j); and
 
(j)            additional Liens incurred by the Company and its Subsidiaries so long as the value of the property subject to such Liens, and the Indebtedness and other obligations secured thereby do not exceed $5,000,000 at any time.
 
Section 6.03     .   (a)     The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or substantially all of its assets, or all or substantially all of the Equity Interests of any of its Subsidiaries (in each case, whether now owned or hereafter acquired), or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing
Fundamental Changes
 
(i)            any Person may merge into the Company in a transaction in which the Company is the surviving corporation;
 
(ii)           any Person may merge with or into any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary; that (A) if any party to such merger is a Loan Party the surviving Person must also be a Loan Party and must succeed to all the obligations of such Loan Party under the Loan Documents and (B) if any party to such merger is a Restricted Subsidiary the surviving Person shall also be a Restricted Subsidiary unless designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary pursuant to the definition of such term;
provided
 
(iii)          any Subsidiary (other than a Loan Party) may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders; and
(iv)          sales permitted by .
Section 6.05
 
that any such merger involving a Person that is not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by .
provided
Section 6.04
 
(b)           The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries on the Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto.
 
Section 6.04     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests in or evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person (all of the foregoing being collectively called ""), or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person (other than inventory acquired in the ordinary course of business) constituting a business unit or are substantial in relation to the consolidated assets of the Company, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions
Investments
 
(a)           Permitted Investments by the Company and any Subsidiary and Permitted Foreign Investments by any Foreign Subsidiary, to the extent such Permitted Foreign Investments are either (i) generated by a Foreign Subsidiary organized in the same jurisdiction of organization of the commercial bank with which such Investment is maintained or (ii) consist of capital contributions made to such Foreign Subsidiary for the purpose of operations in the ordinary course of business;
 
(b)           Investments existing on the Effective Date and set forth on ;
Schedule 6.04
 
(c)           Investments existing on the Effective Date in Subsidiaries;
 
(d)           additional Investments in Persons that, immediately prior to such investments, are Restricted Subsidiaries;
 
(e)           Investments by Unrestricted Subsidiaries in Persons that, immediately prior to such investments, are Unrestricted Subsidiaries;
 
(f)            Investments consisting of all the issued and outstanding capital stock, or all or substantially all the assets, of Persons engaged in lines of business permitted under ; that (A) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing at the time any such Investment is made or would occur as a result thereof and (B) immediately after giving effect to such Investments permitted under this subsection (f), the proforma Leverage Ratio shall not exceed 2.0 to 1.0; or the cash consideration payable for such investments made under this clause (f) in the capital stock or assets of other persons shall not exceed $100,000,000 in the aggregate over the term of this Agreement;
Section 6.03(b)
provided
(g)           Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by ; that a Subsidiary shall not Guarantee any Subordinated Indebtedness;
Section 6.01
provided
 
(h)           investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(i)            accounts receivable arising in the ordinary course of business;
 
(j)            Investments held by any Subsidiary at the time it becomes a Subsidiary in a transaction permitted by this Section;
 
(k)           reasonable advances to officers and employees of the Company and any Subsidiary for travel arising in the ordinary course of business;
 
(l)            loans to officers and employees of the Company or any Subsidiary, not to exceed $1,000,000 in the aggregate at any one time outstanding;
 
(m)          promissory notes and other noncash consideration received by the Company and its Subsidiaries in connection with any asset sale permitted hereunder;
 
(n)           advances in the form of prepayments of expenses, so long as such expenses were incurred in the ordinary course of business and are paid in accordance with customary trade terms of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
 
(o)           Guarantees by the Company of obligations of Restricted Subsidiaries incurred in the ordinary course of business and not constituting Indebtedness; and
 
(p)           other Investments made by the Company, any Domestic Subsidiary or any Foreign Subsidiary at times when no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a result thereof and that, taken together with all other investments made after the Effective Date under this clause (p) would not exceed $25,000,000.
 
Section 6.05     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interest, except:
Asset Sales, etc
 
(a)           sales of inventory, used or surplus equipment, Permitted Investments and Permitted Foreign Investments in the ordinary course of business or as expressly permitted elsewhere in this Agreement;
 
(b)           sales, transfers and dispositions to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary;
 
(c)           sales, transfers and dispositions to any Unrestricted Subsidiary; that such sales, transfers and dispositions are in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Borrower or such Unrestricted Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties; and
provided
(d)           sales, transfers and other dispositions of other assets (other than transfers of less than 100% of the Equity Interests in any Subsidiary); provided that (x) the aggregate proceeds from such sales, transfers and other dispositions during any fiscal year shall not exceed the greater of (A) 10% of Consolidated Net Tangible Assets as of the beginning of such fiscal year and (B) 10% of Consolidated Net Income of the Company (excluding Unrestricted Subsidiaries) for such fiscal year and (y) not more than 25% of the aggregate proceeds from such sales, transfers and other dispositions shall be received in noncash proceeds during any fiscal year.
 
Section 6.06     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred.
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
 
Section 6.07     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Company or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of the Company or any Subsidiary.
Swap Agreements
 
Section 6.08     .  (a) The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except that (i) Restricted Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their capital stock and (ii) if no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or would occur as a result thereof, the Company may make any Restricted Payment if after giving effect to such Restricted Payment the proforma Leverage Ratio would not exceed 1.75 to 1.0.
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments in Respect of Indebtedness
 
(b)           The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, make or agree to make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of the principal of or interest on any Subordinated Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, defeasance, cancellation or termination of any Subordinated Indebtedness, except scheduled and other mandatory payments of interest and principal in respect of Subordinated Indebtedness; provided that no payment shall be made in respect of Subordinated Indebtedness that is prohibited by the subordination provisions applicable to such Subordinated Indebtedness.
 
Section 6.09     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) in the ordinary course of business at
Transactions with Affiliates
prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries not involving any other Affiliate, (c) transactions among or between Unrestricted Subsidiaries and (d) any Restricted Payment permitted by .
Section 6.08
 
Section 6.10     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Restricted Subsidiary (i) to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any shares of its capital stock, (ii) to make or repay loans or advances to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary, (iii) to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Company or any other Subsidiary, or (iv) sell, lease or transfer any of its Property to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by this Agreement, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Restricted Subsidiary pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Restricted Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness and (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases and other contracts restricting the assignment thereof.
Restrictive Agreements
provided
Schedule 6.10
 
Section 6.11     .  The Company will not change the end if its fiscal year to a date other than December 31.
Change in Fiscal Year
 
Section 6.12     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, amend it charter or by-laws or other constitutive documents in any manner which could adversely and materially affect the rights of the Lenders under this Agreement or their ability to enforce the same, except as otherwise permitted pursuant to or .
Constitutive Documents
Sections 6.03
6.04
 
Section 6.13     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, sell or assign, with or without recourse, for discount or otherwise, any income or revenues, including notes and accounts receivable.
Sales and Assignments of Income, Revenues and Receivables
 
Section 6.14     .  The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive in any respect materially adverse to the Company or to the rights or interests of the Lenders any of its rights under any document evidencing or governing Subordinated Indebtedness.
Amendment of Material Documents
Section 6.15     .  (a)  The Company will not permit the Adjusted Leverage Ratio as of the end of any fiscal quarter to exceed the ratio of 2.75 to 1.00.
Adjusted Leverage Ratio; Leverage Ratio
 
(b)           The Company will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of the end of any fiscal quarter to exceed the ratio of 2.75 to 1.00.
 
Section 6.16     .  The Company will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio for any Rolling Period ending after the Effective Date to be less than the ratio of 1.20 to 1.00.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
Section 6.17     .
Intentionally Deleted
 
Section 6.18     .  The Company will not permit Consolidated Tangible Net Worth as of any date to be less than the sum of (a) $680,000,000 plus (b) 50% of Consolidated Net Income of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries (but only to the extent such amount is positive) for fiscal quarters ended after September 30, 2007 plus (z) 75% of the aggregate Net Proceeds from the issuance by the Company of Equity Interests subsequent to the Effective Date.
Minimum Tangible Net Worth
 
Events of Default and Remedies
 
Section 7.01     .  If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
Events of Default
 
(a)           any Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)           any Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this ) payable under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five days;
Section 7.01
 
(c)           any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver hereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement, Loan Document or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver hereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
(d)           the Company or any Subsidiary shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in , (with respect to the existence of any Borrower) or or in ;
Section 5.02
5.04
5.10
Article VI
(e)           any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article) or in any other Loan Document, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the earlier of (i) the Company's obtaining knowledge thereof or (ii) written notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Company (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
 
(f)            the Company or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable after giving effect to any applicable grace period;
 
(g)           any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
 
(h)           an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Company or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any  Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i)            the Company or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
 
(j)            the Company or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
(k)           one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $25,000,000 shall be rendered against the Company, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a
judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of the Company or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
 
(l)            an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Company and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $10,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) in any year or (ii) $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) for all periods;
 
(m)          any Loan Document or any material provision thereof shall at any time cease to be in full force and effect, or a proceeding shall be commenced by any Loan Party or any other Person seeking to establish the invalidity or unenforceability thereof (exclusive of questions of interpretation thereof), or any Loan Party shall repudiate or deny that it has any liability or obligation for the payment of principal or interest or other obligations purported to be created under any Loan Document;
 
(n)           any Lien created by any of the Security Documents shall at any time fail to constitute a valid and (to the extent required by the Security Documents) perfected Lien on any material portion of the Collateral purported to be subject thereto, securing the obligations purported to be secured thereby, with the priority required by the Loan Documents, or any Loan Party shall so assert in writing; or
 
(o)           a Change in Control shall occur;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Company, take any or all of the following actions, at the same or different times:  (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall become  due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers; and in case of any event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers, and (iii) exercise any or all of the remedies available to it under the Security Documents, at law or in equity.
 
Section 7.02     .  Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default, the Company shall, if requested by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, pay to the Administrative Agent an amount in immediately available funds (which funds shall be held as collateral pursuant to arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid
Cash Collateral
interest thereon under all Letters of Credit then outstanding at such time; provided that, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default specified in  or , the Company shall pay such amount forthwith without any notice or demand or any other act by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders.
Section 7.01(h)
(i)
 
 
 
The Administrative Agent
 
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ), and (c) except as expressly set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.  The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct.  The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Company or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection herewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Section 9.02
Section 9.02
Article IV
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person.  The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon.  The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Company), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent.  The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties.  The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
 
In addition, each of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender hereby indemnifies the Administrative Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrowers), ratably according to its respective pro rata share of the total of the Commitments, or if no Commitments are outstanding, the respective pro rata share of the total of the Commitments immediately prior to the time Commitments ceased to be outstanding held by each of them, from and against any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, penalties, actions, judgments, suits, costs, expenses or disbursements of any kind or nature whatsoever which may be imposed on, incurred by, or asserted against the Administrative Agent in any way relating to or arising out of this Agreement or any action taken or omitted by the Administrative Agent under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents (including any action taken or omitted under Article II of this Agreement); that such indemnity shall not be available to the extent such liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, penalties, actions, judgments, suits, costs, expenses or disbursements are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and non-appealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Administrative Agent.  Without limitation of the foregoing, each Lender and the Issuing Lender agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent promptly upon demand for its respective pro rata share of the total of the Commitments of any out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred by the Administrative Agent in connection with the preparation, execution, administration or enforcement of, or legal advice in respect of rights or responsibilities under, this Agreement or the other Loan Documents to the extent that the Administrative Agent is not reimbursed for such expenses by the Borrowers.  The provisions of this section shall survive the termination of this Agreement and the payment of the Obligations.
provided
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Lender and the Company.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, with the consent of Company unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, to appoint a successor.  If no successor shall have been so appointed
 
by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  The fees payable by the Company to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Company and such successor.  After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and . shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Section 9
03
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
It is expressly understood that the Co-Documentation Agent shall not have any duties or responsibilities under this Agreement.
 
 
Miscellaneous
 
Section 9.01           .
Notices
  (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
 
 
(i)            if to the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary, to it, or to it in care of the Company:
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas
Attention:  Kenneth S. Barrow
Telecopy No.:  979-848-5225
Telephone No.: 979-849-6550 (ext. 1247)
 
(ii)           if to the Administrative Agent, to
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
2200 Ross Avenue, Floor 3
Dallas, Texas 75201
Attention:  Brian McDougal
Telecopy No.: 214-965-2044
Telephone No.: 214-965-3049
 
with a copy to:
 
JPMorgan Chase, N.A.
10 South Dearborn, Floor 7
IL1-0010
Chicago, Illinois  60603-2003
Attention:  Maribel Lorenzo
Telecopy No.: 312-385-7096
Telephone No.: 312-732-5548
 
with a copy to:
 
Andrews Kurth LLP
600 Travis, Suite 4200
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention:  Thomas J. Perich
Telecopy No.:  713-220-4285
Telephone No.: 713-220-4268
 
(iii)          if to the Issuing Lender, to
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
2200 Ross Avenue, Floor 3
Dallas, Texas 75201
Attention:  Brian McDougal
Telecopy No.: 214-965-2044
Telephone No.: 214-965-3049
 
with a copy to:
 
JPMorgan Chase, N.A.
10 South Dearborn, Floor 7
IL1-0010
Chicago, Illinois  60603-2003
Attention:  Maribel Lorenzo
Telecopy No.: 312-385-7096
Telephone No.: 312-732-5548
(iv)          if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
(b)           Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; provided that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender.  The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; provided that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
Article II
 
(c)           Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.  All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
 
Section 9.02           .
Waivers; Amendments
  (a)  No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders hereunder are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by the Loan Parties therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
 
(b)           Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Company and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan Documents, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders; provided that no such agreement shall (i) increase  the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change .or in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any
Section 2
16(b) 
(c) 
 
other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, (vi) release all or substantially all the Guarantors from their Guarantees under the Guarantee Agreement except as expressly provided in the Guarantee Agreement or ., or limit the liability of the Guarantors in respect of their Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender or (vii) release all or substantially all of the Collateral without the written consent of each Lender, provided, that nothing herein shall prohibit the Administrative Agent from releasing any Collateral, or require the consent of the other Lenders for such release, in respect of items sold to the extent such sale is permitted or not prohibited hereunder; provided further that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, any provision of this Agreement may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by the Company, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent (and, if their rights or obligations are affected thereby the Issuing Lender) if (i) by the terms of such agreement the Commitment of each Lender not consenting to the amendment provided for therein shall terminate upon the effectiveness of such amendment and (ii) at the time such amendment becomes effective, each Lender not consenting thereto receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by it and all other amounts owing to it or accrued for its account under this Agreement.
Section 9
14
 
Section 9.03           .
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
  (a)  The Company shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel and consultants for the Administrative Agent and such Affiliates, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, due diligence undertaken by the Administrative Agent with respect to the financing contemplated by this Agreement, the preparation and administration of this Agreement or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Issuing Lender in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or, after the occurrence and during the continuance of any Default, any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel and consultant for the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with this Agreement, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
 
(b)           The Company shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "Indemnitee") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, the Commitment Letter dated November 6, 2007 among the Borrower, the
 
Administrative Agent and JP Morgan Securities, Inc., or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the Issuing Lender to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property currently or formerly owned or operated by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto ; provided that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
and whether or not caused by the ordinary, sole or contributory negligence of any Indemnitee
 
(c)           .
Reserved
 
(d)           To the extent permitted by applicable Law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
 
(e)           All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
 
Section 9.04           .
Successors and Assigns
  (a)  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) a Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by a Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section.  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement, other than rights, remedies or claims in favor of the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders.
 
(b)           (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under
 
this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
 
(A) the Borrower, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee; and
provided
Article VII
 
(B) the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender, that no such consent shall be required for an assignment of any Commitment to an assignee that is a Lender with a Commitment immediately prior to giving effect to such assignment;
provided
 
(ii)           Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
(A) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Company and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Company shall be required if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of has occurred and is continuing;
provided
Article VII
 
(B) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement;
 
(C) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500;
 
(D) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire; and
 
(E) in the case of an assignment to  CLO (as defined below), the assignment Lender shall retain the sole right to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provisions of this Agreement, provided that the Assignment and Assumption between such Lender and such CLO may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of such CLO, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to .that affects such CLO.
Section 9
02(b) 
 
For the purposes of this ., the terms "" "" have the following meanings:
Section 9
04(b)
Approved Fund
CLO
"" means (a) a CLO and (b) with respect to any Lender that is a fund which invests in bank loans and similar extensions of credit, any other fund that invests in bank loans and similar extensions of credit and is managed by the same investment advisor as such lender or by an Affiliate of such investment advisor.
Approved Fund
 
"" means any entity (whether a corporation, partnership, trust or otherwise) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
CLO
 
(iii)          Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of ., ., . and .).  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this . shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
Section 2
13
2
14
2
15
10
03
Section 9
04
 
(iv)          The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the "").  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by any Borrower, the Issuing Lender and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(v)           Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register.  No assignment shall be effective
 
 
for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
 
(c)           (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Company, the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement.  Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to .that affects such Participant.  Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of ., . and . to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section.  To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of . as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to .as though it were a Lender.
Participant
provided
provided
Section 9
02(b) 
Section 2
13
2
14
2
15
Section 9
08
Section 2
16(c) 
 
(ii)           A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under . or . than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Company's prior written consent.  A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of . unless the Company is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Company, to comply with .as though it were a Lender.
Section 2
13
2
15
Section 2
15
Section 2
15(e) 
 
(d)           Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
 
Section 9.05           .
Survival
  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties herein and in the certificates or other instruments  delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, the
 
Issuing Lender or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated.  The provisions of ., ., . and . and shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Section 2
13
2
14
2
15
9
03
Article VIII
 
Section 9.06           .
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
  This Agreement may be executed in counterparts and may be delivered in original or facsimile form (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and the Fee Letter constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.  Except as provided in ., this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Section 4
01
 
Section 9.07           .  Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability
 
Section 9.08           .
Right of Setoff
  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the obligations of any Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
 
Section 9.09           .
Governing Law; Consent to Service of Process
  (a)      This Agreement and the Loan Documents shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of Texas.
 
(b)           The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the court of the State of Texas sitting in
 
Harris County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of Texas, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such Texas State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement against any Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)           Each Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
Without limitation of the foregoing, nothing in this Agreement, or in the Notes or in any other Loan Document shall be deemed to constitute a waiver of any rights which any Lender, or the holder of any Note may have under applicable federal legislation relating to the amount of interest which such Lender or holder may contract for, take, receive or charge in respect of the Loan and the Loan Documents, including any right to take, receive, reserve and charge interest at the rate allowed by the law of the state where any Lender is located.  The Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Borrower further agree that insofar as the provisions of Chapter 303 of the Texas Finance Code, as amended, are applicable to the determination of the Highest Lawful Rate with respect to the Notes and the Obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, the indicated rate ceiling of such Article shall be applicable; provided, however, that to the extent permitted by such Article, the Administrative Agent may from time to time by notice to the Borrower revise the election of such interest rate ceiling as such ceiling affects the then current or future balances of the Loans.  The provisions of Chapter 346 of the Texas Finance Code, as amended, do not apply to this Agreement, any Note issued hereunder or the other Loan Documents.
 
Section 9.10           . EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
Section 9.11           .  Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
Section 9.12           .  Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the enforcement of rights hereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii)  any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to any Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Company or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than the Borrower.  For the purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from the Company relating to the Company or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by the Company; that, in the case of information received from the Company after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.  Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
Confidentiality
Information
provided
 
Section 9.13           .  Each provision in this Agreement and each other Loan Document is expressly limited so that in no event whatsoever shall the amount paid, or otherwise agreed to be paid, to the Administrative Agent or any Lender or charged, contracted for, reserved, taken or received by the Administrative Agent or any such Lender, for the use, forbearance or detention of the money to be loaned under this Agreement or any Loan Document or otherwise (including any sums paid as required by any covenant or obligation contained herein or in any other Loan Document which is for the use, forbearance or detention of such money), exceed that amount of money which would cause the effective rate of interest to exceed the Highest Lawful Rate, and all amounts owed under this Agreement and each other Loan Document shall be held to be subject to reduction to the effect that such amounts so paid or agreed to be paid, charged, contracted for, reserved, taken or received which are for the use, forbearance or detention of money under this Agreement or such Loan Document shall in no event exceed that amount of money which would cause the effective rate of interest to exceed the Highest Lawful Rate.  Anything in any Note or any other Loan Document to the contrary notwithstanding, the Borrowers shall not be required to pay unearned interest on any Note and the Borrowers shall not be required to pay interest on the Obligations at a rate in excess of the
Interest
Highest Lawful Rate, and if the effective rate of interest which would otherwise be payable under such Note and such Loan Documents would exceed the Highest Lawful Rate, or if the holder of such Note shall receive any unearned interest or shall receive monies that are deemed to constitute interest which would increase the effective rate of interest payable by the Borrowers under such Note and the other Loan Documents to a rate in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate, then (a) the amount of interest which would otherwise be payable by the Borrowers shall be reduced to the amount allowed under applicable law and (b) any unearned interest paid by the Borrowers or any interest paid by the Borrowers in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate shall in the first instance be credited on the principal of the obligations of the Borrowers (or if all such obligations shall have been paid in full, refunded to the Borrowers).  It is further agreed that, without the limitation of the foregoing, all calculations of the rate of interest contracted for, reserved, taken, charged or received by any Lender under the Notes and the Obligations and under the other Loan Documents are made for the purpose of determining whether such rate exceeds the Highest Lawful Rate, and shall be made, to the extent permitted by usury laws applicable to such Lender, by amortizing, prorating and spreading in equal parts during the period of the full stated term of the Notes and this Agreement and all interest at any time contracted for, charged or received by such Lender in connection therewith.
 
Section 9.14           .  In the event that the Company or any Subsidiary sells, transfers or otherwise disposes of all or any portion of any of the Equity Interests, assets or property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary in a transaction not prohibited by this Agreement, the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent shall promptly (and the Lenders hereby authorize and instruct the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent to) take such action and execute any such documents as may be reasonably requested by the Company and at the Company's expense to release any Liens created by any Loan Document in respect of such Equity Interests, assets or property, including the release and satisfaction of record of any mortgage or deed of trust granted in connection herewith, and, in the case of a disposition of all or substantially all the Equity Interests or assets of any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party, terminate such Subsidiary's obligations under the Guarantee Agreement and each other Loan Document. In addition, the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent agree to take such actions as are reasonably requested by the Company and at the Borrower's expense to terminate the Liens and security interests created by the Loan Documents when all the Obligations have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit and Commitments terminated.
Release of Liens and Guarantees
 
Section 9.15           .  The execution, delivery and effectiveness of this Agreement shall not extinguish the obligations for the payment of money outstanding under the Original Credit Agreement, as amended or discharge or release the Lien or priority of any Security Document or any other security therefor. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the obligations outstanding under the Original Credit Agreement, as amended or any agreements securing the same, which shall remain in full force and effect, except as modified hereby or by agreements executed concurrently herewith. Nothing expressed or implied in this Agreement or any other document contemplated hereby shall be construed as a release or other discharge of Company under the Original Credit Agreement, as amended, or any Guarantor under any Loan Document from any of its obligations and liabilities thereunder. Each of the Amended and Restated Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall remain in full force and effect until and except as expressly modified hereby.
No Novation
Section 9.16           .  Each Lender hereby notifies the Borrowers that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001) (the ""), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers, which information includes the name and address of any Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify any Borrower in accordance with the Act.
USA Patriot Act
Act
 
Section 9.17           .  Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the Lenders hereby acknowledge and agree that, so long as no Default or Event of Default exists hereunder, upon delivery to the Administrative Agent of (a) a written request by the Company that Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("") be released as a Guarantor and (b) written evidence satisfactory to Administrative Agent that Benchmark BV has no assets and that proceedings have been commenced to dissolve Benchmark BV, Benchmark BV shall be released as a Guarantor and upon the request of Company, the Administrative Agent shall provide evidence of such release to the Company.
Release of Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc
Benchmark BV
 
Section 9.18           .  The Obligations of the Company and each of its Domestic Subsidiaries that are Borrowing Subsidiaries hereunder and under the Loan Documents are joint and several and the obligations of the Domestic Subsidiaries that are Guarantors under the Loan Documents are joint and several.  The Obligations of the Foreign Borrowers hereunder and under the Loan Documents are joint and several.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein or under the Loan Documents, no Foreign Borrower shall have any liability whatsoever in respect of the Obligations of the Company or any of its Domestic Subsidiaries.
Joint and Several Liability
 
Section 9.19           .  THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING THE SCHEDULES AND EXHIBITS HERETO), THE NOTES AND OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS CONSTITUTE A "LOAN AGREEMENT" AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26.02(a) OF THE TEXAS BUSINESS AND COMMERCIAL CODE, AND REPRESENT THE FINAL AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES RELATING TO THE SUBJECT MATTER HEREOF AND THEREOF AND MAY NOT BE CONTRADICTED BY EVIDENCE OF PRIOR, CONTEMPORANEOUS OR SUBSEQUENT ORAL AGREEMENTS OF THE PARTIES.  THERE ARE NO UNWRITTEN ORAL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
FINAL AGREEMENT OF THE PARTIES
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20080114150249.txt.gz
TIME:20080114150249
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
    
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
    
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
    
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
    
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On January 10, 2008, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release
reaffirming its guidance for the fourth quarter of 2008. The Company provided fourth
quarter revenue guidance of
$700 million to $740 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share
, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, of $0.32 to $0.38.
A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)
                                
Exhibits
                                                Exhibit 99.1            Press release dated January 10, 2008
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REAFFIRMS
GUIDANCE FOR FOURTH QUARTER 2007
 
ANGLETON, TX, JANUARY 10, 2008  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced today it continues to expect fourth quarter revenue to be between $700 million to $740 million.
Diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.32 and $0.38
.
 
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2007.  Results for the fourth quarter will be announced on February 5, 2008.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on February 5, 2008 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that
"it continues to expect fourth quarter revenue to be"
, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; Benchmark's business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals; and the anticipated effects of any developments or events on financial results. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
###
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20080206160611.txt.gz
TIME:20080206160611
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
    
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
    
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
 
    
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
    
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
                                                           
On February 5, 2008, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing fourth quarter results for the quarter ended December 31, 2007. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)
                                
Exhibits
 
                                                Exhibit 99.1            Press release dated February 5, 2008
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 

Exhibit   99.1
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER AND YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2007
 
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 5, 2008  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $735 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2007, compared to $737 million for the same quarter in the prior year. Fourth quarter net income was $21 million, or $0.29 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2006, net income was $28 million, or $0.43 per diluted share.
 
Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $25 million, or $0.35 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2007. Excluding restructuring charges and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $29 million, or $0.44 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2006.
 
Sales for the years ended December 31, 2007 and 2006 were each $2.9 billion. Net income for the year ended December 31, 2007 was $93 million, or $1.28 per diluted share. In the prior year, net income was $112 million, or $1.71 per diluted share.
 
Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles, the impact of stock-based compensation costs and a discrete tax benefit related to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $98 million, or $1.35 per diluted share, in 2007. Excluding restructuring charges, the impact of stock-based compensation expense and a tax benefit resulting from the closure of our UK facility, the Company would have reported net income of $113 million, or $1.74 per diluted share, in 2006.
 
"In 2007 we achieved several major goals  we expanded our customer base, enhanced our manufacturing and engineering capabilities, completed the integration of recent acquisitions, and realigned our manufacturing facilities," said Cary T. Fu, the Company's Chief Executive Officer. "We are delighted to have the heavy lifting behind us. We are on an excellent pathway for increased business from new and existing customers in 2008."
 
Fourth Quarter 2007 Financial Highlights
 
                 
Operating margin for the fourth quarter was 3.0% on a GAAP basis and was 3.7%, excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
                 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the fourth quarter were approximately $59 million.
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance was $382 million at December 31, 2007.
                 
Total debt outstanding was $13 million.
                 
Accounts receivable was $486 million at December 31, 2007; calculated days sales outstanding were 60 days.
                 
Inventory was $362 million at December 31, 2007; inventory turns were 7.6 times.
                 
Repurchases of common shares through February 4, 2008 were $74 million.
 
2008 Outlook
 
For 2008, we expect top line growth of 5-8% for the year and earnings per share growth in the range of 15-20%, excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
 
Looking forward, sales for the first quarter of 2008 are expected to be between $700 million and $725 million. Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter, excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.33 and $0.37.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that excludes certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
Non-GAAP information is not necessarily comparable to Non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement
that "we expect top line growth of 5-8% for the year and earnings per share growth in the range of 15-20%, excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense", and our sales and earnings per share guidance for the first quarter of 2008, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmark's business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2006, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20080317164302.txt.gz
TIME:20080317164302
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
2
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
 
This Restricted Stock Agreement (the "Award Agreement") sets forth the terms and conditions of an award of [                           ] shares of the Company's common stock, $0.10 par value (the "Common Stock"), that are subject to certain restrictions on transfer and risks of forfeiture and other terms and conditions specified herein (the "Restricted Shares") and that are granted to you under the Benchmark Electronics, Inc. 2000 Stock Awards Plan (the "Plan").
 
THIS AWARD OF RESTRICTED SHARES IS SUBJECT TO ALL TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE PLAN AND THIS AWARD AGREEMENT, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, THE DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROVISIONS SET FORTH IN SECTION 10 OF THIS AWARD AGREEMENT.  BY SIGNING YOUR NAME BELOW, YOU WILL HAVE CONFIRMED YOUR ACCEPTANCE OF THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THIS AWARD AGREEMENT.
 
SECTION 1. 
The Plan.
  This award of Restricted Shares is made pursuant to the Plan, all the terms of which are hereby incorporated in this Award Agreement.  In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and the terms of this Award Agreement, the terms of this Award Agreement shall govern.  In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Award Agreement and the terms of any individual employment agreement between you and the Company or any of its Affiliates (an "Employment Agreement"), the terms of your Employment Agreement will govern.
 
SECTION 2. 
Definitions.
  Capitalized terms used in this Award Agreement that are not defined in this Award Agreement have the meanings as used or defined in the Plan.  As used in this Award Agreement, the following terms have the meanings set forth below:
 
"Business Day"
means a day that is not a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which banking institutions are legally permitted to be closed in the City of New York.
 
"" means the date on which your rights with respect to all or a portion of the Restricted Shares subject to this Award Agreement may become fully vested, and the restrictions with respect to such Restricted Shares may lapse, as provided in Section 3(a) of this Award Agreement.
Vesting Date
 
SECTION 3. 
Vesting and Delivery.
  (a)    On each Vesting Date set forth below, your rights with respect to the number of Restricted Shares subject to this Award Agreement that correspond to such Vesting Date, as specified in the chart below, shall become vested, and the restrictions set forth in this Award Agreement with respect to such Restricted Shares shall lapse, provided that you must be employed by the Company or an Affiliate on the relevant Vesting Date in order for your rights with respect
Vesting.
to the applicable portion of the Restricted Shares to become vested and the applicable restrictions to lapse, except as otherwise determined by the Committee in its sole discretion or as otherwise provided in your Employment Agreement.
 
 
(b)    On or following the date of this Award Agreement, the Restricted Shares awarded to you pursuant to this Award Agreement shall be registered in your name and deposited into an account in book-entry format with [Company's Transfer Agent], and shall be held in the account subject to the transfer restrictions described in this Award Agreement and the Plan until such time, if any, as your rights with respect to such Restricted Shares become vested.  Upon the vesting of your rights with respect to such Restricted Shares, the restrictions related to this account shall lapse in accordance with Section 3(a) of this Agreement.
Delivery of Restricted Shares.
 
SECTION 4. 
Forfeiture of Restricted Shares.
  Unless the Committee determines otherwise, and except as otherwise provided in your Employment Agreement, if your rights with respect to any Restricted Shares awarded to you pursuant to this Award Agreement have not become vested prior to the date on which your employment with the Company and its Affiliates terminates for any reason other than a Change of Control, your rights with respect to such Restricted Shares shall immediately terminate, and you will be entitled to no further payments or benefits with respect thereto.
 
SECTION 5. 
Voting Rights; Dividend Equivalents.
  Prior to the date on which your rights with respect to a Restricted Share have become vested, and the restrictions set forth in this Award Agreement with respect to such Restricted Share have lapsed, you shall be entitled to exercise voting rights with respect to such Restricted Share and shall be entitled to receive dividends or other distributions with respect thereto; that any such dividends or distributions paid in shares of the Company's Common Stock shall constitute Restricted Shares and be subject to all of the same restrictions as the Restricted Shares with respect to which they were paid.
provided
 
SECTION 6. 
Non-Transferability of Restricted Shares.
  Unless otherwise provided by the Committee in its discretion, Restricted Shares may not be sold, assigned, alienated, transferred, pledged, attached or otherwise encumbered except as provided in Paragraph XIV(e) of the Plan.  Any purported sale, assignment, alienation, transfer,
pledge, attachment or other encumbrance of a Restricted Share in violation of the provisions of this Section 6 and Paragraph XIV(e) of the Plan shall be void.
 
SECTION 7. 
Withholding, Consents and Legends.
  (a)    The delivery of share certificates pursuant to Section 3(b) of this Award Agreement is conditioned on satisfaction of any applicable withholding taxes in accordance with Paragraph XIV(c) of the Plan; provided that you may elect to satisfy any applicable withholding taxes (i) by having the Company retain share certificates that you would have otherwise received upon vesting of your rights with respect to such Restricted Shares or (ii) by delivery to the Company of shares of Common Stock that you then own, in each case that have an aggregate Fair Market Value (valued as of the day immediately prior to the date of delivery of such share certificates) equal to the amount of such withholding taxes.
Withholding.
 
(b) 
Consents.
  Your rights in respect of the Restricted Shares are conditioned on the receipt to the full satisfaction of the Committee of any required consents that the Committee may determine to be necessary or advisable (including, without limitation, your consenting to the Company's supplying to any third-party recordkeeper of the Plan such personal information as the Committee deems advisable to administer the Plan).
 
(c) 
Legends.
  The Company may affix to certificates for the Restricted Shares issued pursuant to this Award Agreement any legend that the Committee determines to be necessary or advisable (including to reflect any restrictions to which you may be subject under any applicable securities laws).  The Company may advise the applicable transfer agent to place a stop order against any legended Restricted Shares.
 
SECTION 8. 
Successors and Assigns of the Company.
  The terms and conditions of this Award Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the Company and its successors and assigns.
 
SECTION 9. 
Committee Discretion.
  The Committee shall have full and plenary discretion with respect to any actions to be taken or determinations to be made in connection with this Award Agreement, and its determinations shall be final, binding and conclusive.
 
SECTION 10. 
Dispute Resolution.
  (a)    Notwithstanding any provision in your Employment Agreement, you and the Company hereby irrevocably submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of (i) the United States District Court for the Southern District of Texas and (ii) the courts of the State of Texas for the purposes of any suit, action or other proceeding arising out of this Award Agreement or the Plan.  You and the Company agree to commence any such action, suit or proceeding either in the United States District Court for the Southern District of Texas or, if such action, suit or other proceeding may not be brought in such court for jurisdictional reasons, in the courts of the State of Texas.  You and the Company further agree that service of any process, summons, notice or document by U.S. registered mail to the applicable address set forth in Section 11 of this Award Agreement shall be effective
Jurisdiction and Venue.
 
service of process for any action, suit or proceeding in Texas with respect to any matters to which you have submitted to jurisdiction in this Section 10(a).  You and the Company irrevocably and unconditionally waive any objection to the laying of venue of any action, suit or proceeding arising out of this Award Agreement or the Plan in (A) the United States District Court for the Southern District of Texas or (B) the courts of the State of Texas, and hereby and thereby further irrevocably and unconditionally waive and agree not to plead or claim in any such court that any such action, suit or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
 
(b) 
Waiver of Jury Trial.
  You and the Company hereby waive, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any right either of you may have to a trial by jury in respect to any litigation directly or indirectly arising out of, under or in connection with this Award Agreement or the Plan.
 
(c) 
Confidentiality.
  You hereby agree to keep confidential the existence of, and any information concerning, a dispute described in this Section 10, except that you may disclose information concerning such dispute to the court that is considering such dispute or to your legal counsel (provided that such counsel agrees not to disclose any such information other than as necessary to the prosecution or defense of the dispute).
 
SECTION 11. 
Notice.
  All notices, requests, demands and other communications required or permitted to be given under the terms of this Award Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered by hand or overnight courier or three Business Days after they have been mailed by U.S. registered mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party as set forth below:
 
 
The parties may change the address to which notices under this Award Agreement shall be sent by providing written notice to the other in the manner specified above.
 
SECTION 12. 
Headings.
  Headings are given to the Sections and subsections of this Award Agreement solely as a convenience to facilitate reference.  Such headings shall not be deemed in any way material or relevant to the construction or interpretation of this Award Agreement or any provision hereof.
 
SECTION 13. 
Amendment of this Award Agreement.
  The Committee may waive any conditions or rights under, amend any terms of, or alter, suspend, discontinue, cancel or terminate this Award Agreement prospectively or retroactively;
provided
, , that any such waiver, amendment, alteration, suspension, discontinuance, cancelation or termination that would materially and adversely impair your rights under this Award Agreement shall not to that extent be effective without your consent (it being understood, notwithstanding the foregoing proviso, that this Award Agreement and the Restricted Shares shall be subject to the provisions of Paragraph XII of the Plan).
however
 
SECTION 14. 
Counterparts.
  This Award Agreement may be signed in counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have duly executed this Award Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20080424164642.txt.gz
TIME:20080424164642
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
                                                           
On April 24, 2008, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing first quarter results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d)
                                
Exhibits
 
                                                Exhibit 99.1            Press release dated April 24, 2008
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
2
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER ENDED MARCH 31, 2008
 
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 24, 2008  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $684 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2008, compared to $752 million for the same quarter in the prior year. First quarter net income was $23 million, or $0.33 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2007, net income was $24 million, or $0.34 per diluted share.
 
Excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $23 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2008. Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $28 million, or $0.39 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2007.
 
"We are pleased with our first quarter operating results considering the soft demand environment in several of the industries that we serve," said Cary T. Fu, the Company's Chief Executive Officer. "We have seen an increase in interest from customers and prospective customers, as they continue to expand their outsourcing efforts. We believe our new program bookings provide excellent opportunities for near-term stability and long-term growth even while some of the industries we serve may experience lackluster demand during 2008."
 
First Quarter 2008 Financial Highlights
 
                 
Operating margin for the first quarter was 3.1% on a GAAP basis and was 3.3%, excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense.
                 
Cash flows provided by operating activities for the first quarter were approximately $46 million.
                 
Cash and short-term investments balance was $302 million at March 31, 2008 after the reclassification of $77 million of auction rate securities to long-term.
                 
Accounts receivable was $453 million at March 31, 2008; calculated days sales outstanding were 60 days.
                 
Inventory was $397 million at March 31, 2008; inventory turns were 6.4 times.
                 
Repurchases of common shares for the first quarter totaled $37 million. Total repurchases under the plan through April 23, 2008 were $103 million.
 
2008 Outlook
 
Looking forward, sales for the second quarter of 2008 are expected to range from $715 million to $750 million. Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter, excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.35 and $0.41.
 
For the year-ended December 31, 2008, we now expect revenues to grow at a more moderated pace of 2% to 5%, which will come primarily from the ramp of new programs. At the same time, we are maintaining our earnings per share growth in the range of 15% to 20%.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the company's performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "predict," and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that "we believe our new program bookings provide excellent opportunities for near-term stability and long-term growth even while some of the industries we serve may experience lackluster demand during 2008", and our sales and earnings per share guidance for the second quarter and full year of 2008, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmark's business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable
 
 
assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmark's Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. is in the business of manufacturing electronics and provides its services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmark's global operations include 20 manufacturing locations in ten countries. Benchmark's Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20080724170220.txt.gz
TIME:20080724170220
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
o 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 24, 2008, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 7.01.
 
Regulation FD Disclosure.
On July 24, 2008, the Company issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008. Additional information concerning the Companys future outlook was presented to investors during a conference call on July 24, 2008. During the conference call, a representative of the Company stated that because of fluctuating market conditions in the portion of the computing sector that Benchmark serves, the Company is not able to provide specific full year guidance at this time and it is not reaffirming the full year guidance provided in the Companys earnings release for the quarter ended March 31, 2008. The Companys guidance for the third quarter in the attached press release is based on its current expectations regarding the business environment of the markets that the Company serves, new program ramps and specific customer information regarding future revenues.
The Company expects revenues and diluted earnings per share, excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, to grow sequentially in the fourth quarter of 2008 which will lead to modest earnings per share growth for the full year of 2008 compared to 2007.
The information in this Item 7.01 is being furnished and shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Exchange Act or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibit 99.1
 
  
Press release dated July 24, 2008
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 24, 2008 Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $682 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2008, compared to $756 million for the same quarter in the prior year. Second quarter net income was $22 million, or $0.33 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2007, net income was $26 million, or $0.35 per diluted share.
Excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $24 million, or $0.35 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2008. Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation costs, the Company would have reported net income of $29 million, or $0.39 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2007.
Our focus in this environment is on strong operational execution and solid program bookings, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. Operationally our execution was solid during the second quarter,
although revenues were impacted by maturing programs declining at a more rapid pace than our new programs ramped, and by the impact of
a soft macro environment. We believe
this is a near-term challenge and that
we are well positioned for growth, given the number of new programs that we have won.
 
Second Quarter 2008 Financial Highlights
 
 
Third Quarter 2008 Outlook
 
Looking forward, sales for the third quarter of 2008 are expected to range from $650 million to $690 million. Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter, excluding amortization of intangibles and the impact of stock-based compensation expense, are expected to be between $0.32 and $0.37.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that we believe
this is a near-term challenge and that
we are well positioned for growth, given the number of new programs that we have won, and our sales and earnings per share guidance for the third quarter of 2008, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com
.
 
 
 
   


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20080911170436.txt.gz
TIME:20080911170436
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On September 10, 2008, Donald E. Nigbor, Chairman of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (Benchmark) adopted a pre-arranged stock trading plan to sell shares of Benchmark stock. This plan was established as part of his individual long-term strategy for asset diversification and liquidity. Mr. Nigbors plan was adopted in accordance with guidelines specified under Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
Under the plan Mr. Nigbor may sell up to 112,500 shares of Benchmark stock, which Mr. Nigbor has the right to acquire under outstanding stock options issued by Benchmark, beginning October 27, 2008. This plan is scheduled to terminate at the latest on February 27, 2009. The transactions under the plan will be disclosed publicly in Form 144 and Form 4 or Form 5 filings, as appropriate, with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Rule 10b5-1 permits individuals who are not in possession of material, non-public information at the time the plan is adopted to establish pre-arranged plans to buy or sell company stock. Using these plans, individuals can prudently and gradually diversify their investment portfolios over an extended period of time.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20081015170939.txt.gz
TIME:20081015170939
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under theExchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On October 13, 2008, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the appointment of Clay C. Williams to the Board of Directors of the Company effective October 10, 2008 as an independent director. Mr. Williams serves as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of National Oilwell Varco, Inc., a global service provider and manufacturer of equipment for oil and gas producers. He served as the Chief Financial Officer of Varco International, Inc. prior to Varcos merger with National-Oilwell. Mr. Williams began his career at Shell Oil Company in 1985, and has held various positions in the energy industry for more than 20 years. Mr. Williams received a B.S. degree in Civil/Geological Engineering from Princeton University and a MBA from the University of Texas at Austin.
At a special meeting of the Board of Directors held on October 10, 2008, the Board appointed Mr. Williams to serve as a director and as a member of the Companys Audit Committee and Compensation Committee until the next Annual Meeting of Shareholders planned for May 2009. Mr. Williams will receive compensation as a non-employee director as described in the Companys Proxy Statement dated March 28, 2008. On October 10, 2008, Mr. Williams received a stock option grant to purchase 10,000 Common Shares of the Company under the Companys 2002 Stock Option Plan for Non-Employee Directors with an exercise price of $10.27 and a term of 10 years.
The press release announcing the appointment of Mr. Williams is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1
 
Press release dated October 13, 2008
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, October 13, 2008 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) announced today the appointment of Clay C. Williams as an independent director to the Board of Directors of the Company effective October 10, 2008. Mr. Williams serves as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of National Oilwell Varco, Inc., a global service provider and manufacturer of equipment for oil and gas producers. He also served as the Chief Financial Officer of Varco International, Inc. prior to Varcos merger with National-Oilwell. Mr. Williams began his career at Shell Oil Company in 1985, and has held various positions in the energy industry for more than 20 years. Mr. Williams received a B.S. degree in Civil/Geological Engineering from Princeton University and a MBA from the University of Texas at Austin.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20081024155846.txt.gz
TIME:20081024155846
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
    On October 23, 2008, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended September 30, 2008. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1
 
Press release dated October 23, 2008
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 23, 2008 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $642 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, compared to $673 million for the same quarter in the prior year. Third quarter net income was $24 million, or $0.36 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2007, net income was $22 million, or $0.30 per diluted share.
Excluding restructuring charges, amortization of intangibles, the impact of stock-based compensation costs and a discrete tax benefit relating to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $21 million, or $0.32 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2008. Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs, amortization of intangibles, the impact of stock-based compensation costs and a discrete tax benefit relating to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $17 million, or $0.24 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2007.
The recent deterioration and unprecedented volatility in end market demands which began in late September resulted in revenue softness that began to materialize in the third quarter, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. Generally, I am pleased with our overall operating performance during the quarter and am confident in the ability of our organization to manage through, and take advantage of, the additional outsourcing opportunities that this environment may bring.  Our revenue diversification and new program wins have been strong, but not strong enough to allow us to sidestep the current macro downturn.
Third Quarter 2008 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter 2008 Outlook
 
Recent demand weakness is expected to continue into the fourth quarter of 2008. While it is not possible to forecast with precision the specific impacts to each of the industries we serve, it is anticipated that the slowdown in technology spending will continue. Sales for the fourth quarter of 2008 are expected to range from $600 million to $640 million. To maintain consistency with published analysts reports, earnings guidance going forward will only exclude restructuring charges and will no longer exclude the impact of stock-based compensation and amortization of intangibles. Diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.25 and $0.32.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that it is anticipated that the slowdown in technology spending will continue, that we are confident in the ability of our organization to not only manage through, but to take advantage of, the additional outsourcing opportunities that this environment may bring, and our sales and diluted earnings per share, excluding restructuring charges, guidance for the fourth quarter of 2008, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
 
 
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com
.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20081104165327.txt.gz
TIME:20081104165327
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b) On November 4, 2008, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the retirement of Steven A. Barton and Donald E. Nigbor effective December 1, 2008. Both have served as directors for more than twenty years and were among the original founders of the Company. Mr. Barton and Mr. Nigbor will continue to serve as directors until the 2009 annual meeting of shareholders. The Board intends to nominate Cary T. Fu to succeed Mr. Nigbor as Chairman of the Board, effective in May 2009.
Mr. Nigbor has been a director of the Company since 1986, Chairman of the Board since May 2001, Chief Executive Officer from May 2001 to September 2004, and President from 1986 to May 2001. Mr. Barton has been a director and Executive Vice President of the Company since 1990, Executive Vice President -Marketing and Sales from 1988 to 1990, and Vice President from 1986 to 1988. Each will continue to provide consulting services to the Company through 2009.
The press release announcing the retirement of Messrs. Barton and Nigbor is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
(e)
Employment Termination and Consulting Services Agreements
On November 4, 2008, the Company entered into employment termination and settlement agreements (the Termination Agreements) with Steven A. Barton and Donald E. Nigbor (the Executives), pursuant to which the Company and each Executive agreed that the Executives employment with the Company and its Affiliates would terminate effective December 1, 2008.
In consideration for entering into the Termination Agreements, the Company engaged the Executives as consultants pursuant to Consulting Services Agreements (the Consulting Agreements) with the Executives. Pursuant to his Consulting Agreement, Mr. Barton will be paid $250,000 in the aggregate, which will be paid in equal installments over a twelve (12) month period commencing on December 1, 2008 and ending on November 30, 2009. Pursuant to Mr. Nigbors Consulting Agreement, he will be paid $270,833 in the aggregate, which will be paid over a thirteen (13) month period commencing December 1, 2008 and ending on December 31, 2009. In addition, under the Termination Agreements, the Company will (i) provide the Executives a cash payment on January 4, 2010, as a health care benefit bridge to Medicare eligibility (Mr. Nigbors - $79,348; Mr. Bartons - $39,946), and (ii)
extend the exercise period for all stock options granted to the Executives and fully vested prior to December 1, 2008, such extension equal to twenty four (24) months after December 1, 2008, allowing the Executives to exercise any and all vested shares subject to any and all stock options granted to the Executive (provided that any such extension shall not extend the maximum term during which any such option may be exercised beyond ten (10) years).
The form of the Termination Agreements is attached hereto as exhibit 10.1 and the form of the Consulting Agreements is attached hereto as exhibit 10.2.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 10.1
 
THIS AGREEMENT
(the Agreement) is entered into on this ___ day of _______, 2008 by and between Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation with a principal place of business at 3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas 77515 (the Company), and ___________, whose street address is _____________________________________ (the Executive).
 
WHEREAS,
the Executive has been employed by the Company pursuant to the terms of an Employment Agreement dated ________________, by and between the Company and the Executive (the Employment Agreement); and
 
WHEREAS,
the Company and the Executive have mutually agreed that the Employment Agreement, and the Executives employment with the Company, shall terminate and Executive shall resign, effective as of December 1, 2008 (the Termination Date); and
 
WHEREAS,
the Company and the Executive now wish to fully and completely settle, compromise and dispose of all claims which could have been asserted based on the Employment Agreement and otherwise, and further, the Company and Executive wish to set forth in this Agreement all of their respective rights and obligations resulting from such termination of employment and the termination of the Employment Agreement.
 
NOW, THEREFORE,
in consideration of the mutual promises and covenants between the parties, the sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive hereby agree to the following terms and conditions (which also include the above-referenced recitals):
 
1.
Termination of Employment Agreement
. The Company and the Executive each acknowledge and agree that the Executives employment with the Company and its Affiliates shall terminate as of the Termination Date, and that the Employment Agreement shall terminate and be of no further force and effect as of the Termination Date. For purposes of this Agreement, the term Affiliate includes all of the Companys direct and indirect subsidiaries and any other entities that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, control, are controlled by or are under common control with the Company. Executive agrees to resign from any officer positions he may hold
with the
Company
or any of its Affiliates and the Executive agrees to
 
resign as a director of the C
ompany
in accordance with Paragraph 3(c) and any of its Affiliates and to sign any documentation necessary to give effect to this
Paragraph 1
.
 
Page 1 of 10
 
 
 
2.
Payments under Consulting Agreement
. In consideration for the termination of the Employment Agreement and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the Company agrees to pay Executive a payment equal to $__________ in the aggregate, which shall be payable in equal installments over a _________ month period commencing on December 1, 2008 consistent with the Consulting Agreement (Consulting Agreement) executed contemporaneously with this Agreement, and attached hereto as Addendum A. The parties specifically intend that Executive is to perform services under the Consulting Agreement as an independent contractor to the Company. The parties agree that if any conflict or inconsistency exists between this Agreement and the Consulting Agreement, the language of this Agreement will control. Neither Executive nor any agent or employee of Executive shall be deemed to be the agent, employee, partner or joint venture of the Company. Nothing in this Agreement, or otherwise, creates or shall be construed to create the relationship of master and servant or employer and employee between the Company and Executive after the Termination Date. Executive acknowledges that from and after that date he will have absolutely no authority to represent, contract on behalf of, or obligate the Company. Executive is not required to provide any such services or assistance after the final payment under this Agreement.
3.
Benefits and Other Agreements
. In consideration for the termination of the Employment Letter and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the Company and the Executive agree that the Company shall provide the Executive with the following benefits (together with the payments set forth in Section 2 hereof, the Benefits), in each case reduced by any applicable employment and withholding taxes:
(a)
Bridge of Health Benefits to Medicare
. The Company will provide the Executive with a cash sum, payable in one installment on January 4, 2010, such sum equal to the estimated company medical coverage contributions as of the date hereof, for the Executives and his spouses participation in a plan comparable to the Companys plan available to Company employees from the Termination Date until the Executive and his spouse reaches Medicare eligibility. In lieu of reimbursing for such comparable coverage, Executive has elected to receive the cash payment described above. This sum, together with a payment schedule is provided in Addendum B.
 
(b)
Extension of Exercise Period for Vested Stock Options
. The Company will
extend the exercise period for all stock options granted to Executive and fully vested prior to the Termination Date, such extension equal to twenty four (24) months after the Termination Date, allowing Executive to exercise any and all vested shares subject to any and all stock options granted to Executive (provided that any such extension shall not extend the maximum term during which any such option may be exercised beyond ten (10) years). A description of Executives stock options applicable to this Paragraph 3(b) is provided in Addendum C.
(c)
Retirement from Board; other benefits
. As of the Termination Date, Executive will offer his resignation from the Company Board pursuant to the Companys Governance Guidelines, and the Company will agree to allow the Executive to retain the title, duties and responsibilities of Director until the first regularly scheduled meeting of the Board of Directors of
the Company
following the Annual Shareholders Meeting in May 2009 (the Board Retirement Date), at which time Executive will relinquish the title, duties and responsibilities as Director on the Board, unless Executive is elected to serve an additional term on the Board at the Annual Shareholders Meeting. The Company acknowledges Executives desire to serve on the Company Board for at least one year beyond the Board Retirement Date.
 
Page 2 of 10
 
(d)
Certain Violations
. The Executives violation of any of the provisions of the Employment Agreement through the Termination Date shall, in addition to any other remedy, result in a cessation of all benefits and other rights of the Executive hereunder. The Company may offset any amounts payable under this Agreement against any amounts payable by the Executive to the Company. The Company will provide the Executive with written notice of the reason for any offset and Executive will have 45 days from receipt of this written notice to remedy said violation before any such suspension or offset of payments shall occur.
 
4.
No Further Compensation
. The Executive acknowledges and agrees that other than the compensation described in Section 2 above and the Benefits described in Section 3 above, no further compensation or benefits or other monies are owed to the Executive by the Company arising out of the Employment Agreement, this Agreement or otherwise on account of his employment or termination of employment with the Company and its Affiliates.
 
5.
Restrictions
.
 
(a)
Nondisclosure
. The Executive shall not at any time divulge, communicate, use to the detriment of the Company or for the benefit of any other person or persons, or misuse in any way, any Confidential Information (as hereinafter defined) pertaining to the business of the Company. Any Confidential Information or data now or hereafter acquired by the Executive with respect to the business of the Company (which shall include, but not be limited to, information concerning the Companys financial condition, prospects, technology, customers, suppliers, sources of leads and methods of doing business) shall be deemed a valuable, special and unique asset of the Company that was received by the Executive in confidence and as a fiduciary, and Executive shall remain a fiduciary to the Company with respect to all of such information. For purposes of this Agreement, Confidential Information means information disclosed to the Executive or known by the Executive as a consequence of or through his employment by the Company or during his service as a consultant to the Company (including information conceived, originated, discovered or developed by the Executive) prior to or after the date hereof, and not generally known, about the Company or its business. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall be deemed to restrict the Executive from disclosing Confidential Information to the extent required by law.
 
(b)
Noncompetition
. During his remaining employment and for the one year period that immediately follows the Termination Date, the Executive shall not do any of the following, either directly or indirectly, during the period of time consisting of one year from the Termination Date but only to the extent the Company complies with its payment obligations hereunder (the Applicable Non-Competition Period), anywhere in the world: directly or indirectly, own any interest in, manage, operate, control, consult for, be an officer or director of, work for, or be employed in any capacity by, any sole proprietorship, corporation, company, partnership, association, venture or business any company or any other business, entity, agency or organization (whether as an employee, officer, director, partner, agent, security holder, creditor, consultant or otherwise) that directly or indirectly (or through any affiliated entity) engages in Competitive Activity; provided that such provision shall not apply to the Executives ownership of securities of the Company or the acquisition by the Executive, solely as an investment, of securities of any issuer that is registered under Section 12(b) or 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and that are listed or admitted for trading on any United States national securities exchange. For purposes of this Agreement, Competitive Activity shall mean any activity relating to, in respect of or in connection with, directly or indirectly, the electronic manufacturing services business. In the event that Executive improperly competes with the Company in violation of this Section 5, the period during which he engages in such competition shall not be counted in determining the Applicable Non-Competition Period.
 
Page 3 of 10
 
 
 
6.
Mutual Releases
.
 
(a) In consideration of the promises and undertakings contained in this Agreement, the Company for itself and for each its Affiliates,
divisions, predecessors, successors, assigns, employees, insurers, directors, officers, shareholders, agents, attorneys, representatives, owners, managers, contractors and their employees, contractors, subcontractors and their employees, does hereby forever generally, completely and absolutely release and discharge the Executive of and from any and all claims, demands, actions, choices in action, obligations, liabilities and damages of every kind and nature whatsoever, in law or equity, whether as of this date known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, which any such person or entity may now have or may claim to have in the future, due to, arising from, or based in whole or in part upon, any act, omission, event, transaction, matter or thing involved, alleged or referred to, or arising directly or indirectly from or in connection with, any of the past transactions, agreements, understandings, associations, relationships and/or courses of dealings between the Company and Executive.
(b) In consideration of the promises and undertakings contained in this Agreement, the Executive does hereby forever generally, completely and absolutely release and discharge the Company and each of its Affiliates, divisions, predecessors, successors, assigns, employees, insurers, directors, officers, shareholders, agents, attorneys, representatives, owners, managers, contractors and their employees, contractors, subcontractors and their employees, of and from any and all claims, demands, actions, choices in action, obligations, liabilities and damages of every kind and nature whatsoever, in law or in equity, whether as of this date known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, which any such person or entity may now have or may claim to have in the future, due to, arising from, or based in whole or in part upon, any act, omission, event, transaction, matter or thing involved, alleged or referred to, or arising directly or indirectly from or in connection with, any of the past transactions, agreements, understandings, associations, relationships and/or courses of dealings between the Company and Executive.
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing release, the release in this Paragraph 6(b) shall include: (i) all claims or potential claims arising under any federal, state or local laws relating to the parties' employment relationship, including any claims Executive may have under the Civil Rights Acts of 1866, 1964, and 1991, as amended, 42 U.S.C.  1981 and 2000(e)
et
 
seq
.; the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, as amended, 29 U.S.C.  621
et
 
seq.
; the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, 42 U.S.C.  12,101 et
seq
.; the Fair Labor Standards Act 29 U.S.C.  201
et
 
seq.
; the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, 29 U.S.C.  2101
et
 
seq
.; and any other federal, state or local law governing the parties' employment relationship; (ii) any claims on account of, arising out of or in any way connected with Executives employment with the Company or leaving of that employment; (iii) any claims al1eged or which could have been al1eged in any charge or complaint against the Company; (iv) any claims relating to the conduct of any employee, officer, director, agent or other representative of the Company; (v) any claims of discrimination, harassment or retaliation on any basis; (vi) any claims arising from any legal restrictions on an employer's right to separate its employees; (vii) any claims for personal injury, compensatory or punitive damages or other forms of relief; and (viii) all other causes of action sounding in contract, tort or other common law basis, including (a) the breach of any alleged oral or written contract, (b) negligent or intentional misrepresentations, (c) defamation, (d) wrongful discharge, (e) interference with contract or business relationship or (f) negligent or intentional infliction of emotional distress.
 
Page 4 of 10
 
(c) The parties agree that the foregoing provisions of release are contractual and are not mere recitals.
(d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to release any party from any claims by the other party arising out of or related to this Agreement or the Indemnity Agreement dated June 4, 2003, by and between Executive and the Company.
7.
Additional Representations and Warranties
. Each party hereto represents and warrants that no promise or inducement has been given to it other than such promises and inducements that are set forth herein and that, in executing this Agreement, it is not relying upon any statement, representation or commitment of any kind not stated herein, and is relying only upon the statements, representations and warranties set forth herein and upon its own, respective, independent investigation, judgment and the advice of its own, respective legal counsel.
8.
Other Provisions
.
(a) This Agreement is the entire agreement between and among the parties hereto and no modification hereof shall be effective unless in writing and signed by the party against whom or which it is sought to be enforced. This Agreement supersedes all prior understandings, negotiations and agreements between and among the parties to the extent they are inconsistent with this Agreement.
(b) The parties acknowledge that each bears co-extensive and identical responsibility for the language and for any ambiguity or alleged ambiguity contained herein. Any ambiguity will not be construed in favor of or against either party.
(c) This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument.
(d) In the event any provision of this Agreement is deemed unenforceable for any reason whatsoever or is deemed unenforceable as against any person or entity for any reason whatsoever, then the remainder of this Agreement shall be enforced as against all other parties and entities, in whole or in part, as permitted by applicable law.
(e) This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Texas.
 
Page 5 of 10
 
(f) Any controversy or claim arising out of or related to this Agreement or the breach thereof shall be settled by arbitration, in accordance with the rules then existing of the American Arbitration Association and judgment upon the award may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.
(g) This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to he benefit of all successors, assigns, divisions, Affiliates, attorneys, agents, representatives, employees, directors, officers and shareholders of each party hereto.
(h) The Company and Executive agree that they shall execute such further documents and enter into such further agreements and deliver such documents and supply such information that shall be necessary or appropriate or convenient to accomplish the purposes of this Agreement without any other compensation or consideration paid thereto.
(i) The Company and Executive respectively represent and warrant that they have not heretofore assigned or transferred, or attempted to assign or transfer, to any person, firm, corporation or other entity any of the claims which are intended to be released and discharged pursuant to this Agreement.
(j) Executive acknowledges that he has been advised by the Company to consult with a tax advisor or attorney with respect to the tax consequences, if any, of this Agreement.
(k) The Company and Executive expressly understand and agree that the consideration paid hereunder is for the settlement and release of all claims and allegations which could have been made as a result of disputes under the Employment Agreement and that each party has consulted and been advised by its counsel that there may be claims that are unknown which each party is agreeing to forego by signing this Agreement.
(l) The Company and Executive
agree that this Agreement shall not become effective and enforceable until the date this Agreement is signed by both parties or seven (7) calendar days after its execution by Executive, whichever is later. Executive may revoke this Agreement for any reason by providing written notice of such intent to the Company within seven (7) days after he has signed this Agreement. The parties acknowledge that it is their mutual and specific intent that this Agreement fully comply with the requirements of the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act (29 U.S.C.  626) and any similar law governing release of claims. Accordingly, Executive hereby acknowledges that: (a) he has carefully read and fully understands all of the provisions of this Agreement and that he has entered into this Agreement knowingly and voluntarily; (b) the benefits of Paragraph 3 offered in exchange for Executives release of claims exceed in kind and scope that to which he would have otherwise been legally entitled; (c) prior to signing this Agreement, Executive had been advised, and is being advised by this Agreement, to consult with an attorney of his choice concerning its terms and conditions; and (d) he
 
has been offered at least twenty-one (21) days within which to review and consider this Agreement.
 
Page 6 of 10
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement on the dates set forth below in their respective acknowledgments intending that this Agreement be effective as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page 7 of 10
 
 
Page 8 of 10
 
 
Page 9 of 10
 
 
Page 10 of 10
 

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
This Consulting Services Agreement (hereinafter called Agreement) effective this 1
st
day of December 2008 is between ____________, whose street address is ____________________________ (hereinafter called Consultant), and Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Texas, with a principal place of business at 3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas 77515 (hereinafter called Benchmark).
1.
 
Employment Status
 
1.1
 
Benchmark retains Consultant as an independent contractor and not as an employee of Benchmark. Consultant shall not act as an agent for Benchmark and will hold Benchmark harmless from any liability which may arise due to any unauthorized acts he may perform in carrying out this Agreement, or due to his failure to comply with applicable local, state or federal laws or regulations.
 
1.2
 
Benchmark shall not withhold monies for income tax, social security, unemployment tax, or the like. Benchmark shall make payments for Consultants services to Consultant.
 
1.3
 
The selection of the details and means by which Consultant fulfills his obligations under this Agreement is the responsibility of Consultant and not of Benchmark, which shall exercise no control in this regard. Rather, Benchmark shall be entitled only to direct Consultant with respect to the elements of services to be performed by Consultant and the results to be derived by Benchmark; to inform Consultant as to when and where such services shall be performed; and to review and assess the performance of such services by Consultant for the limited purposes of assuring that such services have been performed and confirming that such results were satisfactory.
 
2.
 
Scope of Agreement
 
Consultant shall be responsible for, and shall complete, the projects or services designated from time to time by Benchmarks CEO (as described on the attached Exhibit A), agreed to by Consultant, and pre-approved in writing by Benchmarks General Counsel (using the approved form attached as Exhibit B or something substantially similar), within the term of this Agreement. Consultant shall provide these services at times and places as in his judgment are appropriate and as are required by Benchmarks management and shall provide his own support services, although Benchmark agrees to loan such work space, telephones or other services as may be available should Consultant deem it necessary to visit Benchmark facilities in the course of carrying out his duties.
 
 
1
 
 
3.
 
Availability of Consultant
 
Consultant shall make his services available to Benchmark upon execution of this Agreement and at agreed-upon times thereafter. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Consultants services may be requested or arranged for in any convenient manner, including by telephone, so long as written confirmation is made within three (3) weeks of the original request. It is understood that at any given time Consultant may be engaged by another customer or client as long as such customer or client does not compete with Benchmark, and that as a result he/she may not be able to devote full consecutive working days to Benchmark projects.
 
4.
 
Work Product
 
4.1
 
All projects, services, designs, drawings, inventions, charts, memoranda, manuals, computer programs (including but not limited to source code for such programs), and physical articles and data of every description made by or for Consultant in the performance of this Agreement (hereinafter Work Product) is work made for hire and shall be given to and become the property of Benchmark, who shall have sole right, title and interest to such property, and all originals and copies thereof not already in the possession of Benchmark shall be immediately delivered by Consultant to Benchmark upon termination of this Agreement. Consultant will seek permission from Benchmark should Consultant wish to keep copies of materials for archival purposes.
 
4.2
 
To the extent that Consultants Work Product is copyrightable, Consultant hereby transfers, grants, conveys, assigns and relinquishes exclusively to Benchmark all right title and interest in such Work Product, including all rights in copyright. Consultant shall perform any acts that may be deemed necessary or desirable by Benchmark to evidence more fully the transfer of ownership of all such Work Product generated or developed hereunder to Benchmark to the fullest extent possible, including, without limitation, the making of further written assignment in a form determined by Benchmark. To the extent that any preexisting rights are embodied or reflected in the Work Product generated by Consultant hereunder, Consultant hereby grants to Benchmark the irrevocable, perpetual, nonexclusive, worldwide, royalty-free right and license to 1) use, execute, reproduce, display, perform, distribute copies of and prepare derivative works based upon such preexisting rights and any derivative works thereof, and 2) authorize others to do any or all of the foregoing.
 
 
2
 
 
4.3
 
To the extent the Consultant invents anything or first reduces to practice an invention in the course of performance of this Agreement, the Consultant hereby assigns such invention and any resulting patent to Benchmark and agrees to execute such documents as deemed necessary by Benchmark to assign such invention to Benchmark, and further agrees to do all things necessary to assist Benchmark in applying for any patent on such invention and any resulting patent and make all assignments and execute all documents necessary with regard to the patent application and any resulting patent.
 
4.4
 
No rights or licenses to trademarks, inventions, copyrights, patents or other intellectual property are implied or granted under this Agreement. Proprietary Information shall not be reproduced in any form except as required to accomplish the intent of this Agreement.
 
5.
 
Confidential Information
 
5.1
 
During the term of this Agreement and thereafter, Consultant shall treat as confidential all information obtained by him for and from Benchmark and all information compiled or generated by him under this Agreement for Benchmark including, but not limited to, business information, manufacturing information, technical data, drawings, flow charts, program listings, software code, and other software, plans and projections. Consultant shall not disclose or refer to the work to be performed under this Agreement in any manner that would identify Benchmark without the advance written permission of Benchmark.
 
5.2
 
Nothing, however, in this Agreement shall obligate Consultant to treat as confidential any information which:
 
5.2.1
 
is or becomes generally known to the public, without the fault of the Consultant;
 
5.2.2
 
is disclosed to Consultant, without obligation of confidentiality, by a third party having the right to make such disclosure;
 
 
3
 
 
5.2.3
 
was previously known to Consultant, without obligation of confidentiality, which fact can be demonstrated by means of documents which are in the possession of Consultant upon the date of this Agreement; or
 
5.2.4
 
is required to be disclosed by law, except to the extent eligible for special treatment under an appropriate protective order, provided that Consultant shall promptly advise Benchmark of any requirement to make such disclosure of which he becomes aware of, to allow Benchmark the opportunity to obtain a protective order and assist Benchmark in so doing.
 
5.3
 
It is Benchmarks policy not to unlawfully or improperly receive or use confidential information, including trade secrets, belonging to others. This policy precludes Benchmark from obtaining, directly or indirectly from any employee, consultant, or other individual rendering services to Benchmark confidential information of a prior employer, client or any other person which such employee, consultant, or individual is under an obligation not to disclose. The Consultant agrees to abide by this policy.
 
6.
 
Payment of Fees and Expenses
 
Benchmark shall pay Consultant for services rendered in accordance with Exhibit A hereto. In addition to the foregoing, Benchmark shall pay Consultant for his actual expenses (including coach-class travel, reasonable lodging, food and other related and out-of-pocket expenses) which have been approved in advance by Benchmarks General Counsel and which are reasonable and necessary.
7.
 
Term
 
The term of this Agreement shall commence on the effective date hereof, and unless modified by mutual agreement of the parties or terminated earlier pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, shall continue for one year. The term may be extended for additional periods by mutual written agreement of the parties. The obligations of Paragraphs 4 and 5, and obligations to make payments for expenses incurred and work done under Paragraph 6, shall, however, survive termination.
 
 
4
 
 
8.
 
Termination
 
8.1
 
This Agreement may be terminated by either party upon prior written notice, if the other party materially breaches any term hereof,
by giving the breaching party one-month prior written notice of the termination to allow the breaching party to cure the breach. If the breaching party fails to cure the breach during such one-month period, the Agreement will terminate.
 
8.2
 
This Agreement may be terminated by either party at any time for any reason upon prior written notice to the other party, provided however, if Benchmark terminates this Agreement pursuant to this Section 8.2, Consultant shall continue to receive the fees detailed in Exhibit A for the remainder of the term.
 
8.2.1
 
Upon termination of this Agreement for any reason, Consultant shall promptly return to Benchmark all copies of any Benchmark data, records, or materials of whatever nature or kind, including all materials incorporating the proprietary information of Benchmark. Consultant shall also furnish to Benchmark all Work Product and work in progress or portions thereof, including all incomplete work.
 
8.3
 
No termination shall affect Benchmarks or Consultants rights and responsibilities under Paragraphs 4, 5 and 6 hereof.
 
9.
 
Conflicting Agreements and Non-Competition
 
Prior to and during the term of this Agreement, Consultant shall disclose to Benchmark any existing or proposed agreements to which Consultant is a party and which constitute a potential conflict of interest. Without the prior written consent of the Company, Consultant agrees that he will not during the term of this agreement directly or indirectly engage in any business competitive with Benchmark and not solicit, for other than personal use, from any of Benchmarks clients, customers, suppliers or contacts for the purposes of doing business with such persons or entities and will not interfere with the business relationship between Benchmark and such persons and/or entities.
 
 
5
 
 
10.
 
Entire Agreement
 
This Agreement sets forth the entire understanding and agreement of the parties as to the subject matter of this Agreement and merges and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous agreements or representations, written or oral. It may be changed only by an agreement in writing signed by the party against whom enforcement or any waiver, change, modification, extension or discharge is sought and expressly referring to this Agreement.
 
11.
 
Construction
 
This Agreement shall be governed and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Texas, United States of America.
 
12.
 
Partial Invalidity
 
If any provision of this Agreement is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, void, or unenforceable, the remaining provisions shall nevertheless continue in full force without being impaired or invalidated in any way.
 
13.
 
Warranty
 
Consultant represents and warrants (a) that all services shall be performed in a workmanlike manner and with professional diligence and skill, and (b) that Consultant will perform all work called for in compliance with applicable law.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement on the dates below written.
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
 
 
    
Under specific assignment by the CEO and agreed upon by Consultant, represent the Companys interests before customers, suppliers, government officials, and others as designated by the CEO; Consultant agrees that from time to time, at reasonable times and upon reasonable advance notice from the Company, he will respond within a reasonable time to answer questions or other inquiries from the Company and advise the Company as reasonably requested by the Company. In addition, subject to the oversight and review by the Companys Board of Directors and its CEO, Consultant agrees to (i) assist the Company in obtaining financing relating to business operations and acquisitions and assist with any subsequent negotiations with lenders; (ii) assist the Company in developing tax planning strategies; (iii) assist the Company with filings required under and compliance with applicable federal securities laws; (iv) assist the Company with preparation of its internal and public financial statements, budgets and other financial planning processes; and (v) provide and assist in such other services as may be reasonably requested by the Company. and
     
Perform other such duties as may be requested from time to time by the CEO.
In consideration of the services to be performed by Consultant, Benchmark shall pay Consultant $___________ in the aggregate, which shall be payable in equal installments over a __________ month period commencing on December 1, 2008 and ending on ______________. Benchmark shall provide reasonable telephone and e-mail support during the term of this Agreement. Consultant and Benchmark agree to make an estimate of hours prior to initiation of work defined in (1) above. Consultant will inform Benchmark if work identified in (1) above is to exceed the projected hours prior to exceeding any estimate. Authorization to exceed estimate is valid only with prior written consent by Benchmarks General Counsel.
 
7
 
Date: ______________________
Description of Work:____________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
Approved on this ______ day of _________________, 2008 by:
___________________________________
Name: Kenneth S. Barrow
Title: VP, General Counsel
 
8
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
INVESTOR RELATIONS            
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
November 4, 2008
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, November 4, 2008 - Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) announced today that co-founders Steven A. Barton and Donald E. Nigbor will retire from the Company effective December 1, 2008. Both have served as directors for more than twenty years and were among the original founders of the Company. Mr. Barton and Mr. Nigbor will continue to serve as directors until the 2009 annual meeting of shareholders. The Board intends to nominate Cary T. Fu to succeed Mr. Nigbor as Chairman of the Board, effective in May 2009.
On behalf of the Board of Directors and the entire Benchmark family, Id like to thank Don and Steve for their long-term commitment and service to the Company, stated Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. The three of us founded Benchmark in 1986. Don and Steve leave a lasting imprint on Benchmark. They were instrumental in growing the company from a fledgling start-up into a multi-billion dollar global company. We owe them a great deal of gratitude for their dedicated service over the years.
Mr. Nigbor has been a director of the Company since 1986, Chairman of the Board since May 2001, Chief Executive Officer from May 2001 to September 2004, and President from 1986 to May 2001. Mr. Barton has been a director and Executive Vice President of the Company since 1990, Executive Vice President -Marketing and Sales from 1988 to 1990, and Vice President from 1986 to 1988. Each will continue to provide consulting services to the Company through 2009.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20081211060244.txt.gz
TIME:20081211060244
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01.  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On December 10, 2008, the Board of Directors of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company), authorized and approved Amendment No. 1 (the Amendment) to the Rights Agreement dated as of December 11, 1998 (as amended, the Rights Agreement), between the Company and ComputerShare Trust Company, N.A., as rights agent (as successor rights agent to Harris Trust and Savings Bank) (the Rights Agent), in order to (i) extend the Final Expiration Date (as defined in the Rights Agreement) until December 11, 2018, (ii) amend the definition of Beneficial Owner and beneficial ownership to clarify that a person will be deemed to beneficially own any securities that are the subject of specified derivative transactions entered into by such person or such persons affiliates or associates and (iii) make certain other changes that the Board of Directors determined were necessary or desirable and did not adversely affect the interests of the holders of the Rights (as defined in the Rights Agreement).
The foregoing summary of the Amendment is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Amendment, which is filed as Exhibit 4.1 hereto, and the full text of the unamended Rights Agreement, which was filed as Exhibit 1 to the Companys Form 8-A filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 11, 1998, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 3.03.  Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders.
The information set forth in Item 1.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
AMENDMENT NO. 1 (this ) dated as of December 10, 2008, to the Rights Agreement dated as of December 11, 1998 (the ), between BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC., a Texas corporation (the ), and COMPUTERSHARE TRUST COMPANY, N.A., a national banking association, as rights agent (as successor rights agent to Harris Trust and Savings Bank) (the ).
Amendment
Rights Agreement
Company
Rights Agent
 
WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of the Company has determined to amend the Rights Agreement in order to extend the Final Expiration Date (as defined in the Rights Agreement) and to make certain other changes, all as set forth below; and
 
WHEREAS, the Company has directed the Rights Agent to enter into this Amendment pursuant to Section 27 of the Rights Agreement;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual agreements herein set forth, the parties hereby agree as follows:
 
.
Section 1.  
Amendments to Section 1
 
The definition of Acquiring Person set forth in Section 1 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the following parenthetical immediately after the words a sufficient number of shares of Common Stock:
(a)  
 
(or, in the case solely of Derivative Common Shares, such Person shall have failed (x) to terminate the subject derivative transaction or transactions or otherwise dispose of the subject derivative security or securities and (y) to establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Directors of the Company that such Derivative Common Shares are no longer beneficially owned with any intention of obtaining, changing or influencing the control of the Company)
 
The definition of Beneficial Owner and beneficially own set forth in Section 1 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by (i) deleting the word or immediately after the semicolon at the end of clause (ii) thereof and (ii) inserting the following words immediately after the semicolon at the end of clause (iii) thereof:
(b)  
 
or
 
(iv) that are the subject of, or the reference securities for, or that underlie, any Derivative Interest of such Person or any of such Persons Affiliates or Associates, with the number of shares of Common Stock deemed beneficially owned being the notional or other number of shares of Common Stock specified in the documentation evidencing the Derivative Interest as being subject to be acquired upon the exercise or settlement of the Derivative Interest or as the basis upon which the value or settlement amount of such Derivative Interest is to be calculated in whole or in part or, if no such number of shares of Common Stock is specified in such documentation, as determined by the Board of Directors of the Company in its sole discretion to be the number of shares of Common Stock to which the Derivative Interest relates;
 
 
 
 
 
The definition of Business Day set forth in Section 1 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the words the State of New York or the State of Illinois and substituting therefor the words the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
(c)  
 
Section 1 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the following definitions in appropriate alphabetical order:
(d)  
 
Derivative Common Shares, when used with reference to an Acquiring Person, shall mean shares of Common Stock that are deemed beneficially owned by an Acquiring Person solely as a result of the application of clause (iv) of the definition of Beneficial Owner and beneficial ownership set forth herein.
 
and
 
Derivative Interest shall mean (i) any derivative securities (as defined under Rule 16a-1 under the Exchange Act) and any other derivatives or similar agreements or arrangements with an exercise or conversion privilege or a periodic or settlement payment or payments or mechanism at a price or in an amount or amounts related to any security of the Company or with a value derived or calculated in whole or in part from the value of any security of the Company and (ii) any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of any security of the Company, in each case, regardless of whether (x) such interest conveys any voting rights in such security, (y) such interest is required to be, or is capable of being, settled through delivery of such security or (z) any other transactions hedge the economic effect of such interest.
 
The definition of Final Expiration Date set forth in Section 1 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the date December 11, 2008 and substituting therefor the date December 11, 2018.
(e)  
 
The definition of Purchase Price set forth in Section 1 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by deleting the reference to Section 4(a) and substituting therefor Section 4.
(f)  
 
.  Section 2 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended as follows:
Section 2.  
Amendments to Section 2
 
The words and the holders of the Rights (who, in accordance with Section 3 hereof, shall prior to the Distribution Date also be the holders of the Common Stock) are deleted in their entirety.
(a)  
 
 
2
 
 
The last sentence thereof is deleted and replaced with the following sentences:
(b)  
 
The Company may from time to time appoint such co-Rights Agents as it may deem necessary or desirable, upon 10 days notice in writing to the Rights Agent.  The Rights Agent shall have no duty to supervise, and shall in no event be liable for, the acts or omissions of any such co-Rights Agent.
 
.  Section 18(a) of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the word gross immediately before the word negligence and after the word without in the second sentence thereof.
Section 3.  
Amendment to Section 18
 
.  Section 20(c) of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the word gross immediately before the word negligence and after the word own.
Section 4.  
Amendment to Section 20
 
.  Section 21 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the following sentence immediately after the second sentence thereof:
Section 5.  
Amendments to Section 21
 
In the event the transfer agency relationship in effect between the Company and the Rights Agent terminates, the Rights Agent will be deemed to have resigned automatically and be discharged from its duties under this Agreement as of the effective date of such termination, and the Company shall be responsible for sending any required notice.
 
.
Section 6.  
Amendments to Section 26
 
The notice information for the Company set forth in Section 26 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
(a)  
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas  77515
Attention:  Corporate Secretary
Telephone No.:  (979) 849-6550
Facsimile No.:  (979) 848-5269
 
The notice information for the Rights Agent set forth in Section 26 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to read as follows:
(b)  
 
Computershare Trust Company, N.A.
350 Indiana Street, Suite 800
Golden, Colorado  80401
Attention:  Client Services
 
 
3
 
.  Section 32 of the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the following sentence immediately after the period at the end thereof:
Section 7.  
Amendments to Section 32
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company and the Rights Agent may mutually agree to a jurisdiction other than Texas for any suit, action or other proceeding directly between and solely involving the Company and the Rights Agent arising out of this Agreement.
 
. The Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the following new Section 35:
Section 8.  
Amendment to Rights Agreement
 
Section 35.  FORCE MAJEURE.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the Rights Agent shall not be liable for any delays or failures in performance resulting from acts beyond its reasonable control, including, without limitation, acts of God, terrorist acts, shortage of supply, breakdowns or malfunctions, interruptions or malfunction of computer facilities, loss of data due to power failures or mechanical difficulties with information storage or retrieval systems, labor difficulties, war or civil unrest.
 
.  Exhibit A to the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the Form of Statement of Resolution Increasing Number of Shares set forth as hereto.
Section 9.  
Amendments to Exhibit A
Annex I
 
.  Exhibit B to the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by (a) deleting each reference to the date December 11, 2008 set forth therein and substituting therefor the date December 11, 2018 and (b) deleting each reference to 19__ set forth therein and substituting therefor 20__.
Section 10.  
Amendments to Exhibit B
 
.  Exhibit C to the Rights Agreement is hereby amended by (a) inserting immediately prior to the parenthetical (the Rights Agreement) in the first paragraph thereof the words as it may from time to time be supplemented or amended and (b) deleting the date December 11, 2008 set forth in the third paragraph thereof and substituting therefor the date December 11, 2018.
Section 11.  
Amendments to Exhibit C
 
.  The officer of the Company executing this Amendment on behalf of the Company hereby certifies on behalf of the Company that this Amendment complies with the terms of Section 27 of the Rights Agreement.
Section 12.  
Certification
 
.  This Amendment shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Texas and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such State applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such State.
Section 13.  
Governing Law
 
.  This Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and each of such counterparts shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument.
Section 14.  
Execution in Counterparts
 
.  Upon the effectiveness of this Amendment, the term Agreement as used in the Rights Agreement shall refer to the Rights Agreement as amended hereby.
Section 15.  
Rights Agreement as Amended
 
.  Except as otherwise expressly set forth herein, the Rights Agreement is hereby ratified and confirmed and remains in full force and effect as originally entered into as of December 11, 1998.
Section 16.  
Ratification of Rights Agreement
 
 
4
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and their respective corporate seals to be hereunto affixed and attested, all as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
5
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the Corporation), pursuant to the provisions of Article 2.13 of the Texas Business Corporation Act and authority expressly vested in the Board of Directors of the Corporation by its Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended, hereby submits the following statement for the purpose of amending the Statement of Resolution, filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Texas on December 14, 1998, establishing and designating the Series A Cumulative Junior Participating Preferred Stock, par value $0.10 per share, of the Corporation (the Series A Preferred Stock), to increase the number of authorized shares of the Series A Preferred Stock.
The name of the Corporation is Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
The following recitals and resolutions were duly adopted by the Board of Directors of the Corporation on December 10, 2008:
the Board of Directors of the Corporation deems it desirable and in the best interests of the Corporation and its shareholders to amend the Statement of Resolution, filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Texas on December 14, 1998 (the Original Statement of Resolution), establishing and designating the Series A Cumulative Junior Participating Preferred Stock, par value $0.10 per share, of the Corporation (the Series A Preferred Stock), to increase the authorized number of shares of Series A Preferred Stock from 30,000 to 145,000;
WHEREAS,
 
 
6
 
that the Board of Directors of the Corporation does hereby fix and determine the new number of authorized shares of Series A Preferred Stock to be 145,000 and does hereby amend Section 1 of the Original Statement of Resolution to read in its entirety as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED,
1. ESTABLISHMENT AND DESIGNATION OF SERIES.  There is hereby established, out of the authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock of the Corporation, a series of Preferred Stock to be designated Series A Cumulative Junior Participating Preferred Stock (the Series A Preferred Stock), to consist of an aggregate of 145,000 shares and to have the preferences, limitations and relative rights set forth herein.
; and further
that the officers of the Corporation be, and each of them hereby is, authorized and directed to make, execute and file with the Secretary of State of the State of Texas, in accordance with the provisions of Article 2.13 of the Texas Business Corporation Act, a copy of these resolutions, and to take, or cause to be taken, such further action and to prepare or cause to be prepared and to execute and deliver, or to cause to be executed and delivered, in the name and on behalf of the Corporation all such further instruments and documents as any officer may deem to be necessary or advisable to effect the purpose and intent of the these resolutions and to be in the best interests of the Corporation (as conclusively evidenced by the taking of such action or the execution and delivery of such instruments, as the case may be, by or under the direction of any authorized officer).
RESOLVED,
The foregoing recitals and resolutions have been duly adopted by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Corporation.
Except as provided herein, the Original Statement of Resolution shall otherwise remain in full force and effect, as amended hereby.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation has caused its corporate seal to be affixed and this certificate to be signed by its Chief Executive Officer, and attested to by its Secretary, the 10 day of December, 2008.
th
 
 
 
 
7
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20090206184932.txt.gz
TIME:20090206184932
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
On February 5, 2009, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2008. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 5, 2009  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $582 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2008, compared to $735 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported a fourth quarter 2008 net loss of $204 million, or $3.13 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2007, net income was $21 million, or $0.29 per diluted share.
 
During the fourth quarter of 2008, the Company recorded a non-cash goodwill impairment charge of $247 million ($219 million, net of tax). The Companys annual goodwill impairment analysis indicated there was an impairment of goodwill in two of its reporting segments, the Americas and Europe, primarily due to a decline in the Companys market capitalization and recent market turmoil. The impairment charge did not result in any cash expenditures and did not affect the Companys cash position, cash flows from operating activities or availability under its credit facility.
 
Excluding goodwill impairment and restructuring charges, the Company would have reported net income of $17 million, or $0.27 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2008. Excluding restructuring charges and integration costs, the Company would have reported net income of $24 million, or $0.33 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2007.
 
Sales for the year ended December 31, 2008 were $2.6 billion, compared to $2.9 billion in 2007. The net loss for the year ended December 31, 2008 was $136 million, or $2.02 per diluted share. In the prior year, net income was $93 million, or $1.27 per diluted share.
 
Excluding goodwill impairment, restructuring charges and a discrete tax benefit related to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $82 million, or $1.22 per diluted share, in 2008. Excluding restructuring charges, integration costs and a discrete tax benefit related to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $94 million, or $1.29 per diluted share, in 2007.
 
 
 
The deterioration in end markets which began earlier in the year accelerated in the fourth quarter, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. While 2009 will present significant challenges and uncertainties, we are confident that our customer centric business model, our focus on cost controls and our strong cash position will keep us in an excellent competitive position to manage through this downturn and subsequently benefit from its recovery.
 
Fourth Quarter 2008 Financial Highlights
 
 
First Quarter 2009 Outlook
 
Sales for the first quarter of 2009 are expected to range from $525 million to $570 million. Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.16 and $0.26.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income (loss) and earnings (loss) per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income (loss) or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that while 2009 will present significant challenges and uncertainties, we are confident that our customer centric business model, our focus on cost controls and our strong cash position will keep us in an excellent competitive position to manage through this downturn and subsequently benefit from its recovery and our sales and diluted earnings per share, excluding restructuring charges, guidance for the first quarter of 2009, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
The results for the three months and year ended December 31, 2007, as well as the year ended December 31, 2008, reflect an immaterial correction of the Companys prior period financial statements related to stock-based compensation expense.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20090313171756.txt.gz
TIME:20090313171756
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 1.01.   Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On March 10, 2009, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) entered into a one-year employment agreement with Donald F. Adam effective March 10, 2009 (the Agreement) which Agreement superseded the Companys prior severance agreement with Mr. Adam dated as of August 27, 2002.
Under the terms of the Agreement, Mr. Adam has agreed to serve as the Companys Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, for an initial term of one (1) year, commencing March 10, 2009. The Agreement automatically renews thereafter for successive one (1) year terms (each such renewal term, a Renewal Term), unless either party gives written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of any such Renewal Term. The Initial Term, as the same may be extended by any Renewal Term, is referred to as the Employment Term. In connection with such service, Mr. Adam receives an annual base salary of $300,000, subject to annual increases at the discretion of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company, and an annual bonus with a target opportunity of 50% of his base salary for each calendar year in the Employment Term if the Company attains certain performance objectives for such year, and an over achievement bonus opportunity of up to 100% of his base salary if the Company exceeds the foregoing performance objectives by predetermined amounts. The Company may terminate Mr. Adams employment at any time and Mr. Adam may terminate his employment upon 30 days prior written notice. In the event his employment is terminated by the Company without cause or he terminates his employment for good reason, he is entitled to receive the following cash severance benefits:
Mr. Adam has agreed not to disclose any confidential information pertaining to the Companys business and has agreed not to compete with the Company during his employment and for two years following termination of his employment.
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement
 
 
 
 

 
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT
This Employment Agreement, dated as of March 10, 2009, (the Agreement), is by and between Donald F. Adam (the Employee) and Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the Company).
WITNESSETH:
In consideration of the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein, the parties hereto agree as follows:
Section 1.  .  The Company hereby agrees to employ the Employee, and the Employee hereby accepts employment by the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth.  During the term of his employment, the Employee shall have the title of Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
Employment
Section 2.  .  In his capacity as Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of the Company, the Employee shall perform such reasonable executive duties as a Vice President and Chief Financial Officer would normally perform or as otherwise specified in the By-laws of the Company, and such other reasonable executive duties as the Board of Directors of the Company may from time to time reasonably prescribe with the concurrence of the Employee.  Except as otherwise provided herein, except as may otherwise be approved by the Board of Directors of the Company, and except during vacation periods and reasonable periods due to sickness, personal injury or other disability, the Employee agrees to devote substantially all of his available time to the performance of his duties to the Company hereunder, provided that nothing contained herein shall preclude the Employee from (i) serving on the board of directors of any business or corporation on which he is serving on the date hereof or, with the consent of the Board of Directors, serving on the board of directors of any other business or corporation, (ii) serving on the board of, or working for, any charitable or community organization, and (iii) pursuing his personal financial and legal affairs so long as such activities do not materially interfere with the performance of the Employees duties hereunder.
Duties
Section 3.  .  Except as otherwise provided herein, the term of this Agreement shall be for one (1) year (the Initial Term), commencing on the date of this Agreement.  This Agreement shall be automatically renewed thereafter for successive one (1) year terms (each such renewal term, a Renewal Term), unless either party gives to the other written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of any such Renewal Term, which notice shall expressly refer to this Section 3 of the Agreement and state that such party does not wish to extend this Agreement (any such notice, a Non-Renewal Notice).  Any such Non-Renewal Notice given by the Company shall constitute a termination of the Employees employment without Cause for purposes of this Agreement.  The Initial Term, as the same may be extended by any Renewal Term, is referred to herein as the Employment Term.  The provisions of this Agreement shall survive any termination hereof.
Term
 
 
1 of 16
 
Section 4.  .  In consideration for the services of the Employee hereunder, the Company shall compensate the Employee and perform its other obligations as provided in this Section 4.
Compensation and Benefits
(a) .  Commencing on the date hereof, the Employee shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay the Employee in equal bi-weekly installments, a base salary at a rate per annum of Three Hundred Thousand United States Dollars ($300,000), as increased from time to time by  the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the Compensation Committee).  Commencing in 2006 and from time to time at least annually thereafter, the Compensation Committee shall review and evaluate the annual base salary of the Employee in accordance with its standard policies and practices for key executive employee compensation and, in its discretion, may increase the Employees annual base salary commencing on August 1, 2009 and on anniversaries of such date thereafter.  The amount of such base salary for each respective annual one (1) year period, including any increases hereafter approved, is referred to as the Base Salary for such respective one year period.  The Employees Base Salary may not and shall not be decreased or reduced more than ten percent (10%) in any year, including but not limited to after giving effect to any such increase.
Base Salary
(b) .  During the Employment Term, the Employee shall be eligible to participate in any annual fiscal year bonus program that may be provided by the Company for its key executive employees, subject to its terms and conditions.  On February 17, 2009, the Compensation Committee adopted a formal bonus plan (the Executive Bonus Plan) for eligible senior executive officers, including the Employee.  The Executive Bonus Plan provides the Employee with a target bonus opportunity of Fifty percent (50%) of Base Salary for each calendar year in the Employment Term if the Company attains specified performance objectives for such year, and an over achievement bonus opportunity of up to One Hundred percent (100%) of Base Salary if the Company exceeds the foregoing performance objectives by predetermined amounts.  Such objectives and targets shall be determined on an annual basis each year during the Employment Term, and shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Company and the Employee.  All bonuses payable to the Employee under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other annual bonus plan shall be determined and paid on or prior to March 31 of the year following the year for which such bonus is payable.
Bonus
(c) .  The Employee shall be entitled to participate in all long-term incentive compensation programs for key executives (if any) at a level commensurate with his position.
Other Long Term Incentive Compensation
 
 
2 of 16
 
(d) .  During the term of this Agreement, the Employee shall be entitled to participate in and receive benefits under any and all pension, profit-sharing, life and other insurance, medical, dental, health and other welfare and fringe benefit plans and programs, and be provided any and all other perquisites, that are from time to time made available to executive employees or other employees of the Company.  The Employee shall also be entitled to an amount of paid vacation per calendar year, and sick leave and illness and disability benefits, in accordance with such reasonable Company policy as may be applicable from time to time to key executive employees.
Other Benefits
Section 5.  .  It is acknowledged by the parties that the Employee, in connection with the services to be performed by him pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, will be required to make payments for travel, entertainment and similar expenses.  The Company shall reimburse the Employee for all reasonable expenses incurred by the Employee in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company.
Expenses and Other Employment-Related Matters
Section 6.  .  The Employees employment may terminate prior to the end of the Employment Term as provided in this Section 6.
Termination
(a) .  The Employees employment will terminate (x) immediately upon the death of the Employee during the term of his employment hereunder or (y) at the option of the Company, upon thirty (30) days prior written notice to the Employee, in the event of the Employees disability.  The Employee shall not be deemed disabled unless, as a result of the Employees incapacity due to physical or mental illness (as determined by a physician selected by the Employer or its insurers and reasonably acceptable to the Employee or his representative), the Employee shall have been absent from and unable to perform his duties with the Company on a full-time bases for one hundred twenty (120) consecutive business days.   In the event of termination of the Employees employment pursuant to this Section 6(a):
Death or Disability
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will make a lump sum cash payment equal to the Employees Base Salary and a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Twenty-Five percent (25%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employees annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Twenty-Five percent (25%) of Base Salary, the Employee or his estate shall be entitled to receive, at the time such bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
 
3 of 16
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
(b) .  The Company may terminate the employees employment for Cause (as defined below) upon written notice by the Company to the Employee, such termination to take effect on the date determined in accordance with the last paragraph of this Section 6(b) below to be the termination date for such purpose.  In the event of termination of the Employees employment for Cause pursuant to this Section 6(b):
For Cause
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and (ii) all payments and reimbursement under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Cause shall mean the Employees (i) gross negligence in the performance of his duties with the Company, which gross negligence results in a material adverse effect on the Company, provided that no such gross negligence will constitute Cause if it relates to an action taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company; (ii) habitual neglect or disregard of his duties with the Company that is materially and demonstrably injurious to the Company, after written notice from the Company stating the duties the Employee has failed to perform; (iii) engaging in conduct or misconduct that materially harms the reputation or financial position of the Company; (iv) obstruction, impedance, or failure to materially cooperate with an investigation authorized by the Board, a self-regulatory organization empowered with self-regulatory responsibilities under federal or state laws, or a governmental department or agency; or (v) conviction of a felony, provided that no such conviction will constitute Cause if it relates to an action taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interest of the Company.  The Employees employment may not and shall not be terminated for Cause unless the (1) Board of Directors provides the Employee with written notice stating the conduct alleged to give rise to such Cause, (2) the Employee has been given an opportunity to be heard by the Board, (3) in the case of clause (i) or (ii) of the definition of Cause, the Employee has been given a reasonable time to cure, and the Employee has not cured such negligence or failure to the reasonable satisfaction of the Board, and (4) the Board has approved such termination by majority vote of the members of the Board of Directors, excluding the Employee.
 
 
4 of 16
 
(c) .  The Company may terminate the Employees employment at any time for any reason without Cause.  In the event of any termination of the Employees employment by the Company without Cause:
By Company Without Cause
(1) The Company shall pay the Employee severance pay for the Severance Period (as defined below) at the per annum rate which shall equal one hundred percent (100%) of his Base Salary at the date of such termination.  The Company shall pay such severance pay in lump sum six (6) months after the date of such termination.  The Companys obligation to make such payments shall be absolute and unconditional.  Without limiting the foregoing, such payments shall not be subject to any right of offset or similar right, and the Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect thereto.
(2) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee the portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will pay a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Twenty Five percent (25%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employees annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Twenty Five percent (25%) of Base Salary, the Employee (or his estate) shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay, at the time the bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
 
5 of 16
 
(3) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
(4) Following such termination, the Employee shall be entitled to continue participation in all medical, dental, health and other welfare benefits (or receive comparable coverage if such participation is not permitted under the terms of such plans or if the Board, at its option, determines that it is in the best interest of the Company to provide such comparable coverage rather than continued participation in the Companys plans) until the end of the Severance Period upon the same terms and conditions that would have applied if the Employee continued to be employed by the Company, provided that the benefits referred to in this clause (4) will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment.
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Severance Period means a period equal to one (1) full year beginning on the date of such termination.
(d) .  The Employee may terminate his employment at any time for Good Reason (as defined below).  In the event of any termination of the Employees employment by the Employee for Good Reason:
By Employee for Good Reason
(1) The Company shall pay the Employee severance pay for the Severance Period (as defined above) at the per annum rate which shall equal one hundred percent (100%) of his Base Salary at the date of such termination.  The Company shall pay such severance pay in lump sum six (6) months after the date of such termination.  The Companys obligation to make such payments shall be absolute and unconditional.  Without limiting the foregoing, such payments shall not be subject to any right of offset or similar right, and the Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect thereto.
(2) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee the portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.  Six (6) months after the date of termination, the Company will pay a prorated annual bonus for the year of termination equal to Twenty Five percent (25%) of the amount calculated by dividing the Employees annual Base Salary at the date of such termination by twelve (12) and multiplying the result by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of such termination.  If the Company achieves target performance objectives for the entire year in which such termination occurs that, under the Executive Bonus Plan or any other then effective bonus plan, would have entitled the Employee to receive an annual bonus for such year calculated at a percent greater than Twenty Five percent (25%) of Base Salary, the Employee (or his estate) shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay, at the time the bonus would have normally been payable or six (6) months after the termination of employment (whichever later occurs), an additional amount equal to (x) such larger bonus amount divided by twelve (12) and multiplied by the number of months in the year of such termination that began or ended prior to the date of termination minus (y) the amount previously paid pursuant to the preceding sentence.
 
 
6 of 16
 
(3) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
(4) Following such termination, the Employee shall be entitled to continue participation in all medical, dental, health and other welfare benefits (or receive comparable coverage if such participation is not permitted under the terms of such plans or if the Board, at its option, determines that it is in the best interest of the Company to provide such comparable coverage rather than continued participation in the Companys plans) until the end of the Severance Period upon the same terms and conditions that would have applied if the Employee continued to be employed by the Company, provided that the benefits referred to in this clause (4) will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment.
For purposes of this Agreement, Good Reason means (A) a material diminution of the Employees duties or responsibilities, (B) a reduction in the Employees Base Salary greater than ten percent (10%), or annual bonus or long-term incentive compensation opportunity, (C) a Change of Control (as defined in Section 7 hereof), but only if the Employee terminates his employment pursuant to this subsection within ninety (90) days after the date of such Change of Control, or (D) a material breach by the Company of any other provision of this Agreement that is not cured promptly after written notice to the Company by the Employee.
(e) .  The Employee may terminate his employment at any time without Good Reason upon thirty (30) days prior written notice to the Company.  In the event of any such termination of the Employees employment by the Employee without Good Reason:
By Employee Without Good Reason
(1)  The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the date of such termination and (ii) all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
 
7 of 16
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
(f) .  If a Change of Control or other transaction triggers or results in the imposition upon the Employee of any excise or similar tax under Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (or any similar or successor provision) pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any employee stock option agreement or plan in which the Employee is a participant, the Company shall pay (or cause any acquirer in such transaction to pay) any such excise or similar tax and make gross-up payments to the Employee to the extent necessary so that the Employee will receive the same net after-tax amount he would have received if no excise tax had been imposed on him.
Excise Tax Gross-Up Payment
(g) .  Any termination by the Employee of his employment with the Company in accordance with the terms hereof shall be without penalty, forfeiture, or liability arising out of such termination of any kind or nature.  Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, any termination of the Employees employment on or after the occurrence of a Change of Control shall be deemed to be a termination by the Company without Cause if by the Company.
No Penalty, Forfeiture or Liability
Section 7. .  For purposes of this Agreement, (1) the term Person means any corporation, partnership, trust, company, business, firm, association, organization, individual, governmental instrumentality or entity, or other person or entity, (2) the term Voting Stock shall mean, as to any Person, the then-outstanding securities of or other interests in such corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, trustees or similar managers of such Person, and (3) the term Change in Control shall mean:
Change in Control
(a) The Company is merged, consolidated or reorganized into or with another corporation or other Person, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a merger, consolidation or reorganization, and as a result of such merger, consolidation or reorganization, the holders of the Voting Stock of the Company immediately prior to such transaction hold or would hold in the aggregate less than seventy percent (70%) of the combined voting power of the then-outstanding Voting Stock of the surviving corporation or Person immediately after such transaction; or
 
 
8 of 16
 
(b) The Company sells or otherwise transfers all or substantially all of its assets to another corporation or other Person, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a sale or transfer, and either (x) as a result of such sale or transfer, the holders of the Voting Stock of the Company immediately prior to such sale or transfer hold or would hold in the aggregate less than seventy percent (70%) of the combined voting power of the then-outstanding Voting Stock of such corporation or Person immediately after such sale or transfer, or (y) such corporation or Person does not assume all of the Companys obligations to the Employee pursuant to an instrument in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Employee; or
(c) The Company is liquidated or dissolved, or the stockholders of the Company approve such a liquidation or dissolution; or
(d) Any Person or group [as the term group is used in Section 13(d)(3) or Section 14(d)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act)] becomes, or a report is filed on Schedule 13D or Schedule 14D-1 (or any successor schedule, form or report), each as promulgated pursuant to the Exchange Act, disclosing that any Person or group (as the term group is used in Section 13(d)(3) or Section 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) has become, the beneficial owner (as the term beneficial owner is defined under Rule 13d-3 or any successor rules or regulations promulgated under the Exchange Act) of securities representing thirty percent (30%) or more of the combined voting power of the then outstanding Voting Stock of the Company or fifty percent (50%) or more of the then outstanding shares of Voting Stock of the Company; or
 
 
9 of 16
 
(e) The Company files a report or proxy statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Exchange Act disclosing in response to Form 8-K or Schedule 14A (or any successor schedule, form, report or item therein) that a change in control of the Company has occurred or will occur in the future pursuant to any then-existing contract or transaction; or
(f) If, during any period of two consecutive years, individuals who at the beginning of any such period constitute the Directors of the Company cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority thereof; provided, however, that for purposes of this clause (f), each Director who is first elected, or first nominated for election by the Companys  stockholders, by a vote of at least two-thirds of the Directors of the Company then still in office who were Directors of the Company at the beginning of any such period (other than an election or nomination of any individual whose initial assumption of office is in connection with an actual or threatened election contest relating to the election of the Directors of the Company, as such terms are used in Rule 14a-11 or any successor rule or regulation promulgated under the Exchange Act) will be deemed to have been a Director of the Company at the beginning of such period.
 Section 8.  .  The Employee recognizes and acknowledges that certain proprietary, non-public information owned by the Company and its affiliates, including without limitation proprietary, non-public information regarding customers, pricing policies, methods of operation, proprietary computer programs, sales products, profits, costs, markets, key personnel, technical processes, and trade secrets (hereinafter called Confidential Information), are valuable, special and unique assets of the Company and its affiliates.  The Employee will not, during or after his term of employment, without the prior written consent of a member of the Board believed by the Employee to have been authorized by the Board for such purpose, knowingly and intentionally disclose any of the Confidential Information obtained by him while in the employ of the Company to any person, firm, corporation, association or other entity for any reason or purpose whatsoever, directly or indirectly (other than to an employee of the Company of its affiliates, a director of the Company or its affiliates, or a person to whom disclosure is necessary or appropriate in the Employees good faith judgment in connection with the performance of his duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company), unless and until such Confidential Information becomes publicly available (other than as a consequence of the breach by the Employee of his confidentiality obligations under this Section 8), and except as may be required (or as the Employee may be advised by counsel is required) in connection with any judicial, administrative or other governmental proceeding or inquiry.  In the event of the termination of his employment, whether voluntary or involuntary and whether by the Company or the Employee, the Employee will deliver to the Company and will not take with his any documents, or any other reproductions (in whole or in part) of any items, comprising Confidential Information (except that the Employee may retain his personal address, telephone and other contact lists and information and any other documents or reproductions retained upon the advice of counsel).  Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the term Confidential Information does not include any information that (a) is or becomes publicly available other than as the result of the breach by the Employee of his confidentiality obligations under this Section 8, (b) became, is or becomes available to the Employee on a non-confidential basis from a source, other than the Company, that to the Employees knowledge is not prohibited from disclosing such information to the Employee by a confidentiality obligation owed to the Company or (c) was known to the Employee prior to becoming an officer of the Company.  The provisions of this Section 8 shall expire and be of no further force and effect on the third anniversary of the date of termination of the Employees employment with the Company.
Confidential Information
 
 
10 of 16
 
Section 9.  .  The Company promises that during the term of this Agreement and before the Company can exercise any right to terminate the Employees employment without cause, the Company shall provide the Employee with Confidential Information that the Employee did not possess and had not received prior to the execution of this Agreement.  In exchange for and ancillary to the Companys enforceable promise to provide him with that Confidential Information, the Employee agrees that he will not disclose or make improper use of any of the Confidential Information.  In order to enforce that promise by the Employee, he agrees to the provisions of this Section 9.  Accordingly, during his employment with the Company pursuant to this Agreement and for a period of two (2) years thereafter, the Employee will not knowingly and intentionally (i) engage, directly or indirectly, alone or as a partner, officer, director, employee, or consultant of any other business organization, in any business activities that are substantially and directly competitive with the business activities then conducted by the Company anywhere in the world (the Designated Industry), (ii) divert to any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry any customer of the Company or (iii) solicit or encourage any officer, employee, or consultant of the Company to leave its employ for employment by or with any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry.  The parties hereto acknowledge that the Employees non-competition obligations hereunder will not preclude the Employee from (i) owning less than 5% of the common stock of any publicly traded corporation or other Persons conducting business activities in the Designated Industry or (ii) serving as a director of a corporation or other Person engaged in the manufacturing or electronics industry whose business operations are not substantially and directly competitive with those of the Company.
Non-Competition
 Section 10.  .
Arbitration
(a) . The Company and the Employee agree that all (i) disputes and claims of any nature that the employee may have against the Company and any subsidiaries or affiliates and their officers and employees, including all federal or state statutory, contractual, and common law claims (including all employment discrimination claims) arising from, concerning, or relating in any way to our employment relationship, (ii) all disputes and claims of any nature that the Company may have against the Employee, or (iii) any dispute among us about the arbitrability of any claims or controversy will be resolved out of court.  Any such claims will be submitted exclusively first to mandatory mediation and, if mediation is unsuccessful, to mandatory arbitration.
Subject Claims; Initiation of Binding Arbitration
 
 
11 of 16
 
(b) .  Unless otherwise agreed in writing by the Company and the Employee, any arbitration proceeding will be held in Houston, Texas.  The arbitration will be conducted under the National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes of the American Arbitration Association (AAA Rules).  The claim will be submitted to a single experienced, neutral employment arbitrator selected in accordance with the AAA Rules.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to award or grant all remedies provided by law.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to permit adequate discovery.  At the conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator shall issue a written, reasoned award.  The award of the arbitration shall be final and binding.  A judgment upon the award may be entered and enforced by any court having jurisdiction.  Each party shall pay the fees of their respective attorneys, the expenses of their witnesses, and any other expenses incurred by such party in connection with the arbitration, provided, however, that the Company shall pay for the fees of the arbitrator and the administrative and filing fees charged by the AAA.
Arbitration Procedure
(c) . All information regarding the dispute or claim or mediation or arbitration proceedings, including the mediation settlement or arbitration award, will not be disclosed by the Employee or by the Company or any mediator or arbitrator to any third party without the written consent of the Employee and the Company.  In no event may an arbitrator allow any party to join claims of any other employee in a single arbitration proceeding without consent of the Employee and the Company.  In the event that the dispute or claim involves a written agreement between the Employee and the Company (including this Agreement) or a compensation plan, the arbitrator will have no authority to add to, detract from, or otherwise modify the agreement or plan provisions other than as expressly set forth in that agreement or plan.  Should this arbitration agreement conflict with the arbitration provisions of any other agreement that the Employee has with the Company, the terms of this agreement will govern.
Confidentiality; Nonjoinder
(d) .  In the event that irreparable injury could occur during the pendency of a mediation or arbitration proceeding, to restore or maintain the status quo until the dispute has been resolved by mediation or arbitration a party may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to obtain a temporary or preliminary injunction in aid of mediation and arbitration.
Equitable Relief
(e) .  Notwithstanding any policy of the Company permitting it to alter its policies, procedures, and the terms and conditions of employment, this agreement to arbitrate is binding and cannot be modified or superseded except by a written agreement signed by an authorized representative of the Company and the Employee.
Binding Agreement
 
 
12 of 16
 
Section 11.  .
General
(a) .  All notices and other communications hereunder will be in writing, and will be deemed to have been duly given if delivered personally, or three (3) business days after being mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, or upon receipt if sent by written telecommunications, to the relevant address set forth below, or to such other address as the recipient of such notice or communication will have specified to the other party hereto in accordance with this Section 11(a):
Notices
If to Company, to:
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas 77515
Attn: Corporate Secretary
Fax No.: 979/848-5269
If to Employee, to:
Donald F. Adam
2409 Sarasoto
Friendswood, Texas 77546
(b) .  All payments required to be made by the Company under this Agreement to the Employee will be subject to the withholding of such amounts, if any, relating to federal, state and local taxes as may be required by law.  No payment under this Agreement will be subject to offset or reduction attributable to any amount of obligation the Employee may owe or be liable for to the Company or any other Person.
Withholding; No Offset
(c) .  Each of the parties hereto acknowledges and agrees that upon any breach by the Employee of his obligations under any of Sections 8 and 9 hereof, the Company will have no adequate remedy at law, and accordingly will be entitled to specific performance and other appropriate injunctive and equitable relief.
Equitable Remedies
(d) .  If any provision of this Agreement is held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, such provision will be fully severable and this Agreement will be construed and enforced as if such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision never comprised a part hereof; and the remaining provisions hereof will remain in full force and effect and will not be affected by the illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision or by its severance herefrom.  Furthermore, in lieu of such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision, there will be added automatically as part of this Agreement a provision as similar in its terms to such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision as may be possible and be legal, valid, and enforceable.
Severability
 
 
13 of 16
 
  (e) .  No delay or omission by either party hereto in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder will impair such right, power or privilege, nor will any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or privilege preclude any further exercise of any other right, power or privilege.
Waivers
(f) .  This Agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, and all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
(g) .  The captions in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and will not limit or otherwise affect any of the terms or provisions hereof.
Captions
(h) .  Use of the words herein, hereof, and hereto and the like in this Agreement refer to this Agreement only as a whole and not to any particular Section, subsection or provision of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.  Any reference to a Section or subsection shall refer to a Section or subsection of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.
Reference to Agreement
(i) .  The Company shall require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company, by agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Employee, expressly to assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent the Company would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any successor to the Company, including without limitation any Persons acquiring directly or indirectly all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company whether by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization, or otherwise ( and such successor shall thereafter be deemed the Company for the purposes of this Agreement), but shall not otherwise be assignable, transferable, or delegable by the Company.  Without limiting the foregoing, the surviving or transferee corporation or other person in any such transaction (whether by merger, consolidation, reorganization, transfer of business or assets, or otherwise) shall be subject to the provisions of Section 7 hereof and shall be deemed to be the Company for purposes of such provisions, regardless of whether such transaction itself constituted a Change of Control of the Company.
Successors and Binding Agreement
 
 
14 of 16
 
(j) .  This Agreement contains the entire understanding of the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between them, relating to the subject matter hereof including that certain Key Contributor Severance Agreement between the parties dated January 24, 2002.  This Agreement may not be amended or modified except by a written instrument hereafter signed by each of the parties hereto, and may not be waived except by a written instrument hereafter signed by the party granting such waiver.  The Company has not made any promise or entered into any agreement that is not expressed in this Agreement, and the Employee is not relying upon any statement or representation of any agent of the Company.  In executing this Agreement, the Employee is relying solely on his judgment and has been represented by the legal counsel of his choice in connection with this Agreement who has read and explained to the Employee the entire contents of this Agreement, as well as explained the legal consequences.  No agreements or representation, oral or otherwise, express or implied, with respect to the subject matter hereof have been made by either party which are not set forth expressly in this Agreement.
Entire Agreement; Amendments and Waivers
(k) .  This Agreement and the performance hereof shall be governed and construed in all respects, including but not limited to as to validity, interpretation and effect, by the laws of the State of Texas, without regard to the principles or rules of conflict of laws thereof.
Governing Law
 
 
15 of 16
 
Executed as of the date and year first above written.
 
16 of 16
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20090507110254.txt.gz
TIME:20090507110254
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.01.   Regulation FD Disclosure.
On May 7, 2009, the Board of Directors of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. resolved that it intends to submit for shareholder approval the Companys rights agreement, as amended on
December 10, 2008,
during the Companys 2010 annual meeting of shareholders
.
The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 7.01 and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20090521163820.txt.gz
TIME:20090521163820
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 5.02.   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b) On May 21, 2009, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the appointment of Cary T. Fu as Chairman of the Board of Directors effective May 20, 2009. Mr. Fu succeeds outgoing Chairman Donald E. Nigbor who has retired. The press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1
Press release dated May 21, 2009
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, May 21, 2009  Benchmark Electronics, Inc., (NYSE: BHE) announced today the appointment of Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer, as Chairman of the Board, effective May 20, 2009. Mr. Fu, a co-founder of the Company, succeeds outgoing Chairman Donald E. Nigbor who has retired.
Mr. Fu will serve as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. He has been a director since 1990 and Chief Executive Officer since September 2004. Mr. Fu holds an M.S. degree in accounting from the University of Houston and is a Certified Public Accountant.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20090729160244.txt.gz
TIME:20090729160244
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    July 29, 2009
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
Exhibit 99.1       Press release dated July 29, 2009
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
                                         
 
 

 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 29, 2009  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $482 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2009, compared to $682 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported second quarter net income of $12 million, or $0.18 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2008, net income was $22 million, or $0.33 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, the Company would have reported net income of $12 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2009.
End market demand stabilized during the quarter, except for the computing sector, which saw declines from the first quarter. These declines were offset by increased sales in all the other sectors we serve, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. We improved profitability from the first quarter, reduced inventories and generated operating cash flows and, at the same time, aligned our capacity with customer demand.  In recent weeks we have seen the pipeline of opportunities increase, but we remain guarded about the overall economy.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Third Quarter 2009 Outlook
 
Sales for the third quarter of 2009 are expected to range from $470 million to $520 million. Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.17 and $0.22.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding restructuring charges), guidance for the third quarter of 2009, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
 
 
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 24 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2008 reflect an immaterial correction of the Companys prior period financial statements related to stock-based compensation expense.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20091027164021.txt.gz
TIME:20091027164021
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit 99.1          Press release dated October 27, 2009
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 27, 2009  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $510 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2009, compared to $642 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported third quarter net income of $16 million, or $0.25 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2008, net income was $24 million, or $0.35 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges and a discrete tax benefit related to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $17 million, or $0.27 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2009 and $20 million, or $0.31 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2008.
We are seeing positive signs that the economy is beginning to slowly recover as our customers are more confident, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. Our team has done a great job during this downturn.  Weve expanded our customer base and service capabilities, aggressively reduced our costs, realigned our capacity and improved our efficiencies. These actions have put us in a great position to benefit from the economic recovery.
Third Quarter 2009 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter 2009 Outlook
 
Sales for the fourth quarter of 2009 are expected to range from $520 million to $560 million. Diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.22 and $0.26.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding restructuring charges) guidance for the fourth quarter of 2009, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 24 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
The results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2008 reflect an immaterial correction of the Companys prior period financial statements related to stock-based compensation expense.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20100112094338.txt.gz
TIME:20100112094338
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    January 12, 2010
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
On January 12, 2010, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release indicating that it expects sales and earnings per share to exceed the high end of its guidance for the fourth quarter of 2009. On October 27, 2009, the Company had provided fourth quarter guidance for sales between $520 million to $560 million and diluted earnings per share, excluding restructuring charges, between $0.22 and $0.26. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JANUARY 12, 2010  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced today that it expects sales and earnings per share to exceed the high end of guidance for the fourth quarter of 2009. On October 27, 2009, the Company had provided fourth quarter guidance for sales between $520 million to $560 million and diluted earnings per share, excluding restructuring charges, between $0.22 and $0.26.
The Company is currently finalizing its financial closing for the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2009.  Results for the fourth quarter will be announced on February 4, 2010.  A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held at 10:00 am (Central time) on February 4, 2010 to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding restructuring charges) guidance for the fourth quarter of 2009, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
 
 
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 24 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20100204152308.txt.gz
TIME:20100204152308
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 4, 2010  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $600 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2009, compared to $582 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported fourth quarter net income of $17 million, or $0.26 per diluted share. In the comparable period of 2008, the Company reported a net loss of $204 million, or $3.13 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges and goodwill impairment charges in 2008, the Company would have reported net income of $19 million, or $0.29 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2009 and $17 million, or $0.27 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2008.
 
Sales for the year ended December 31, 2009 were $2.1 billion, compared to $2.6 billion in 2008. The net income for the year ended December 31, 2009 was $54 million, or $0.83 per diluted share. In the prior year, the net loss was $136 million, or $2.02 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges and a discrete tax benefit related to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $59 million, or $0.90 per diluted share, in 2009. Excluding goodwill impairment, restructuring charges and a discrete tax benefit related to a previously closed facility, the Company would have reported net income of $82 million, or $1.22 per diluted share, in 2008.
 
I am pleased with the solid performance of our team in the fourth quarter. The strong demand from our existing customers as well as the progress of our new program ramps contributed to an 18% sequential increase in revenues over the third quarter, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. Our fourth quarter revenue and operating margin improvements were achieved in the face of numerous challenges, including the inefficiencies caused by component lead time constraints. We have gained significant momentum in new business bookings and program ramps and are well positioned to continue to gain share in our key markets.
 
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter 2009 Financial Highlights
 
First Quarter 2010 Outlook
Sales for the first quarter of 2010 are expected to range from $580 million to $620 million. Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.28 and $0.32.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement we have gained significant momentum in new business bookings and program ramps and are well positioned to continue to gain share in our key markets, and our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding restructuring charges) guidance for the first quarter of 2010, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
 
 
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 24 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20100304143432.txt.gz
TIME:20100304143432
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
     [  ] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
     (17 CFR 230.425)
     [  ] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
     (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
     [  ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
     Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
     [  ] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
     Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.   Other Events.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1                                Press release dated March 4, 2010
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit
                                           
Number
Description
            Exhibit 99.1                                                  Press release dated March 4, 2010

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, MARCH 4, 2010  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced today that its Board of Directors approved the repurchase of up to $100 million of the Companys outstanding common shares. This repurchase program is in addition to the current, active 2008 repurchase program in which the Company is authorized to purchase up to $100 million of the Companys outstanding common shares. Share repurchases under both programs may be made in the open market, in privately negotiated transactions or block transactions, at the discretion of the Companys management, and as market conditions warrant. During 2010 the Company has repurchased 632,400 shares totaling $12 million and has $38 million remaining under the 2008 repurchase program. The timing and amount of specific repurchases are subject to the requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission, market conditions, alternative uses of capital and other factors. The Company may enter into Rule 10b5-1 plans to facilitate repurchases under the program. A Rule 10b5-1 plan would generally permit the Company to repurchase the shares at times when it might otherwise be prevented from doing so under certain securities laws. Purchases will be funded from available cash and may be commenced, suspended or discontinued at any time without prior notice. Shares repurchased under the program will be retired.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks common shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
###


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20100503061553.txt.gz
TIME:20100503061553
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    April 29, 2010
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
o
 (17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
o
 (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
o
 Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
o
 Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
  
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 29, 2010  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $572 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2010, a 15% increase compared to $497 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported first quarter net income of $18 million, or $0.29 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2009, the Company reported net income of $9 million, or $0.14 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, the Company would have reported net income of $19 million, or $0.30 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2010, which represented an 88% increase in earnings per diluted share when compared to $10 million, or $0.16 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2009.
 
We delivered yet another quarter of strong performance despite continued component constraints in the supply chain, which impacted our revenues and inventory levels in the first quarter, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. We achieved record new program bookings during the quarter which are expected to provide a solid foundation for future growth, generating estimated annual revenue at full production of $300 million to $375 million.
 
First Quarter 2010 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
Second Quarter 2010 Outlook
Sales for the second quarter of 2010 are expected to range from $600 million to $630 million. Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.31 and $0.34.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement we achieved record new program bookings during the quarter which are expected to provide a solid foundation for future growth, generating estimated annual revenue at full production of $300 million to $375 million, and our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding restructuring charges) guidance for the second quarter of 2010, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 23 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20100520060303.txt.gz
TIME:20100520060303
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    May 18, 2010
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act 
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act 
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07.   Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20100730060849.txt.gz
TIME:20100730060849
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1        Press release dated July 29, 2010
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 29, 2010  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $589 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2010, a 22% increase compared to $482 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported second quarter net income of $21 million, or $0.33 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2009, the Company reported net income of $12 million, or $0.18 per diluted share. The Companys net income of $21 million, or $0.33 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2010, represented a 74% increase in earnings per diluted share when compared to $12 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, excluding restructuring charges in the second quarter of 2009. The Company did not report any restructuring charges in the second quarter of 2010.
Throughout the second quarter we have seen increases in customer demand, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. The supply chain constraints as well as customer mix changes adversely impacted both revenue and inventory levels for the second quarter.
Second Quarter 2010 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
Industry Sectors
The following table sets forth sales by industry sector for the quarter ended June 30, 2010 and March 31, 2010.
 
Third Quarter 2010 Outlook
Sales for the third quarter of 2010 are expected to range from $590 million to $630 million. Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.33 and $0.36.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding restructuring charges) guidance for the third quarter of 2010, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 23 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20101026171700.txt.gz
TIME:20101026171700
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit 99.1    Press release dated October 26, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 26, 2010  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $614 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2010, a 20% increase compared to $510 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported third quarter net income of $23 million, or $0.37 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2009, the Company reported net income of $16 million, or $0.25 per diluted share. Excluding special items, the Company would have reported $0.38 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2010, which represented a 41% increase when compared to $0.27 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2009. The reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP financial results at the end of this press release includes a description of our special items.
 
We are pleased with another quarter of solid operating results, which were driven by strong revenue growth and excellent execution, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. Strategic initiatives expanding our precision technology services and diversification of our customer base have strengthened our business model and further enhanced our margin potential.
 
Third Quarter 2010 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
Industry Sectors
The following table sets forth sales by industry sector for the quarters ended September 30, 2010, June 30, 2010 and March 31, 2010.
 
 
Fourth Quarter 2010 Outlook
Sales for the fourth quarter of 2010 are expected to range from $590 million to $630 million. Diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter, excluding special items, are expected to be between $0.33 and $0.37. This guidance reflects a recent increase in cautiousness from our customers regarding the economic climate.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement strategic initiatives expanding our precision technology services and diversification of our customer base have strengthened our business model and further enhanced our margin potential, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the fourth quarter of 2010, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 23 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110207061531.txt.gz
TIME:20110207061531
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 3, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $627 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2010, compared to $600 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported fourth quarter net income of $19 million, or $0.31 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2009, the Company reported net income of $17 million, or $0.26 per diluted share. Excluding special items, the Company would have reported net income of $23 million, or $0.37 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2010, compared to net income of $19 million, or $0.29 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2009. The reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP financial results at the end of this press release includes a description of our special items.
 
Sales for the year ended December 31, 2010 were $2.4 billion, compared to $2.1 billion in 2009. The net income for the year ended December 31, 2010 was $81 million, or $1.29 per diluted share. In the prior year, the net income was $54 million, or $0.83 per diluted share. Excluding special items, the Company would have reported net income of $86 million, or $1.37 per diluted share, in 2010, compared to net income of $59 million, or $0.90 per diluted share, in 2009.
 
We saw a strong close to the fourth quarter due to increased demand from our computing customers, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. Our 2010 new program wins and our recent precision technology services expansion will position us for continued revenue growth in the second half of 2011.
 
Fourth Quarter 2010 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Industry Sectors
 
The following table sets forth sales by industry sector for the quarters ended December 31, 2010, September 30, 2010 and December 31, 2009.
 
First Quarter 2011 Outlook
 
Sales for the first quarter of 2011 are expected to range from $565 million to $605 million. Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter, excluding special items, are expected to be between $0.30 and $0.36.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement our 2010 new program wins and our recent precision technology services expansion will position us for continued revenue growth in the second half of 2011, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the first quarter of 2011, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at
www.bench.com
.
 
 
###
 
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
 
 
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110304172533.txt.gz
TIME:20110304172533
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act 
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act 
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02.   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b) On March 2, 2011, the Board of Directors of Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) approved, based on the recommendation of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors, the grant of performance based restricted stock units pursuant to the 2010 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan (the 2010 Plan) to the following executive officers:
 
The Award is a performance based award of restricted stock units (RSUs). The number of RSUs that will ultimately be earned will not be determined until the end of the performance period, which is December 31, 2014,and may vary from as low as zero to as high as three times the target number. The number of RSUs actually earned will depend on the level of achievement of certain performance goals. The level of achievement of these goals is based upon the audited financial results for the last full calendar year within the performance period (the year ending December 31, 2014) as compared to the base year (the year ended December 31, 2010). The Companys performance goals consist of certain levels of achievement in the following Company financial metrics: annual revenue growth, operating income margin expansion, and return on invested capital. If the Companys performance goals are not met, the applicable RSU award will not vest and would be forfeited. Additional terms and provisions are included in the Performance Based Restricted Stock Unit Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 10.1.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Performance-Based Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the Benchmark Electronics, Inc. 2010 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan, dated as of [], between Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the ), a Texas corporation, and [NAME].
Company
 
This Performance-Based Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement (this ) sets forth the terms and conditions of a target award (the ) of [] restricted stock units that are subject to the terms and conditions specified herein () and that are being granted to you on the date hereof under the Benchmark Electronics, Inc. 2010 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan (the ).  Each RSU subject to this Award constitutes an unfunded and unsecured promise of the Company to deliver (or cause to be delivered) to you, subject to the terms of this Award Agreement, a share of the Companys common stock, $0.10 par value (a ), as set forth in Section 3 of this Award Agreement.
Award Agreement
Award
RSUs
Plan
Share
 
THIS AWARD IS SUBJECT TO ALL TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE PLAN AND THIS AWARD AGREEMENT, INCLUDING THE DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROVISIONS SET FORTH IN SECTION 10 OF THIS AWARD AGREEMENT.  BY SIGNING YOUR NAME BELOW, YOU SHALL HAVE CONFIRMED YOUR ACCEPTANCE OF THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THIS AWARD AGREEMENT.
 
SECTION 1.
 
  This Award is made pursuant to the Plan, all the terms of which are hereby incorporated in this Award Agreement.  In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and the terms of this Award Agreement, the terms of the Plan shall govern.  In the event of any conflict between the terms of this Award Agreement and the terms of any individual employment agreement between you and the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (an ), the terms of your Employment Agreement shall govern.
The Plan.
Employment Agreement
 
SECTION 2.
 
  Capitalized terms used in this Award Agreement that are not defined in this Award Agreement have the meanings as used or defined in the Plan.  As used in this Award Agreement, the following terms have the meanings set forth below:
Definitions.
 
(a)
 
 means a day that is not a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which banking institutions are legally permitted to be closed in the City of New York.
Business Day
 
(b)
 
 means the occurrence of any one of the following:
Cause
 
(i)
 
your gross negligence in the performance of your duties with the Company, which gross negligence results in a material adverse effect on the Company, provided that no such gross negligence shall constitute Cause if it relates to an action taken or omitted by you in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company;
 
(ii)
 
your habitual neglect or disregard of your duties with the Company that is materially and demonstrably injurious to the Company, after written notice from the Company stating the duties you have failed to perform;
 
(iii)
 
your engaging in conduct or misconduct that materially harms the reputation or financial position of the Company;
 
(iv)
 
your obstruction, impedance or failure to materially cooperate with an investigation authorized by the Board, a self-regulatory organization empowered with self-regulatory responsibilities under Federal or state laws, or a governmental department or agency; or
 
 
 
 
 
(v)
 
your conviction of a felony, provided that no such conviction will constitute Cause if it relates to an action taken or omitted by you in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company.
 
(c)
 
 means the occurrence of any one of the following:
Good Reason
 
(i)
 
a material diminution of your duties or responsibilities;
 
(ii)
 
a greater than 10% reduction in your base salary, annual bonus opportunity or long-term incentive compensation opportunity; or
 
(iii)
 
a material breach by the Company of any provision of your Employment Agreement or any other agreement between you and the Company.
 
A termination of your employment by you for Good Reason shall be effectuated by giving the Company written notice (), not later than 90 days following the date of the occurrence of the circumstance that constitutes Good Reason, setting forth in reasonable detail the specific conduct of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that constitutes Good Reason and the specific provisions of this Award Agreement, your Employment Agreement or any other agreement between you and the Company on which you relied.  The Company shall be entitled, during the 30-day period following receipt of a Notice of Termination for Good Reason, to cure the circumstances that gave rise to Good Reason, provided that the Company shall be entitled to waive its right to cure or reduce the cure period by delivery of written notice to that effect to you (such 30-day or shorter period, the ).  If, during the Cure Period, such circumstance is remedied, you shall not be permitted to terminate your employment for Good Reason as a result of such circumstance.  If, at the end of the Cure Period, the circumstance that constitutes Good Reason has not been remedied, you shall be entitled to terminate your employment for Good Reason during the 90-day period that follows the end of the Cure Period (the ).  If you do not terminate your employment during the Termination Period, you shall not be permitted to terminate your employment for Good Reason as a result of such circumstance.
Notice of Termination for Good Reason
Cure Period
Termination Period
(d)
 
 means the formula set forth in Attachment A that determines the number of RSUs that shall vest pursuant to this Award Agreement based on whether, or the extent to which, the Performance Goals are achieved.
Payment Formula
 
(e)
 
 means the goals set forth in Attachment A, the achievement of which determine the number of RSUs that shall vest pursuant to this Award Agreement.
Performance Goals
 
(f)
 
 means the period of time specified in Attachment A, over which the achievement of the Performance Goals shall be measured.
Performance Period
 
SECTION 3.
 
  
Vesting and Delivery.
(a)  
Performance-Based Vesting.
 
Except as otherwise provided in your Employment Agreement or Section 3(b) of this Award Agreement, the vesting of your rights with respect to the RSUs shall be contingent on the achievement of the Performance Goals as set forth in Attachment A.  Accordingly, unless otherwise provided in your Employment Agreement or Section 3(b) of this Award Agreement, your rights with respect to the RSUs subject to this Award Agreement shall not become vested unless and until the Committee, in its sole discretion, determines whether, or the extent to which, the Performance Goals have been achieved.  As soon as reasonably practicable following the end of the Performance Period and in no event later than March 15 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the Performance Period ends, the Committee shall determine whether, or the extent to which, the Performance Goals have been achieved (the date of such determination, the ) and shall provide notice to you of such determination as soon as reasonably practicable following such determination in accordance with Section 11 of this Award Agreement.  Upon such determination by the Committee and subject to the provisions of the Plan and this Award Agreement (including Section 3(c) of this Award Agreement), you shall vest in that percentage of the target number of RSUs that is determined pursuant to the Payment Formula set forth in Attachment A.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, pursuant to Section 4 of this Award Agreement and except as otherwise provided in your Employment Agreement or Section 3(b) of this Award Agreement, in order for your rights with respect to any RSUs to become vested, you must be employed by the Company or one of its Subsidiaries on the last day of the Performance Period and by March 15 of the following calendar year.
Determination Date
th
 
 
2
 
 
(b)
 
  If, during the two-year period immediately following a Change of Control, your employment is terminated by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries without Cause or you terminate your employment for Good Reason on or prior to the last day of the Performance Period, then you shall vest in 100% of the target number of RSUs set forth in Attachment A, and the date of such termination of employment shall be deemed to be the Determination Date.
Vesting following a Change of Control.
 
(c)
 
  This Award is intended to constitute a Performance Compensation Award that qualifies as qualified performance-based compensation under Section 162(m) of the Code and, therefore, is subject to all provisions of Section 6(e) of the Plan, including the Committees authority to reduce or eliminate the number of RSUs awarded to you pursuant to this Award Agreement, even if the Performance Goals have been achieved and without regard to your Employment Agreement.
Negative Discretion.
 
(d)
 
  As soon as reasonably practicable following the Determination Date and in no event later than March 15 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which (i) the Performance Period ends or (ii) in the event Section 3(b) of this Award Agreement applies, the Determination Date occurs, the Company shall deliver to you one Share for each RSU awarded to you pursuant to this Award Agreement that has vested in accordance with the terms of this Award Agreement, subject to tax withholding provisions of Section 7 (a) below.
Delivery of Shares.
 
SECTION 4.
 
  Unless the Committee determines otherwise, and except as otherwise provided in your Employment Agreement or Section 3(b) of this Award Agreement, if your rights with respect to any RSUs awarded to you pursuant to this Award Agreement have not become vested prior to the date on which your employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries terminates, your rights with respect to such RSUs shall immediately terminate, and you shall be entitled to no further payments or benefits with respect thereto.
Forfeiture of RSUs.
 
SECTION 5.
 
  Prior to the date on which Shares are delivered to you in settlement of the RSUs pursuant to this Award Agreement, you shall not be entitled to exercise any voting rights with respect to the Shares underlying such RSUs and shall not be entitled to receive dividends or other distributions with respect to such Shares.
Voting Rights; Dividend Equivalents.
 
SECTION 6.
 
  Unless otherwise provided by the Committee in its discretion, RSUs may not be sold, assigned, alienated, transferred, pledged, attached or otherwise encumbered except as provided in Section 9(a) of the Plan.  Any purported sale, assignment, alienation, transfer, pledge, attachment or other encumbrance of an RSU in violation of the provisions of this Section 6 and Section 9(a) of the Plan shall be void.
Non-Transferability of RSUs.
 
SECTION 7.
 
    The delivery of Shares pursuant to Section 3 of this Award Agreement is conditioned on satisfaction of any applicable withholding taxes in accordance with Section 9(d) of the Plan.  In the event that there is withholding tax liability in connection with the settlement of RSUs, you may satisfy, in whole or in part, any withholding tax liability by having the Company withhold from the Shares you would be entitled to receive upon settlement of the RSUs a number of Shares having a Fair Market Value (which shall either have the meaning set forth in the Plan or shall have such other meaning as determined by the Company in accordance with applicable withholding requirements) equal to such withholding tax liability.
Withholding, Consents and Legends.
(a)  
Withholding.
 
 
3
 
 
(b)
 
  Your rights in respect of the RSUs are conditioned on the receipt to the full satisfaction of the Committee of any required consents that the Committee may determine to be necessary or advisable (including your consenting to the Companys supplying to any third-party recordkeeper of the Plan such personal information as the Committee deems advisable to administer the Plan) and, in accordance with Section 9(l) of the Plan, subject to the Committees determination that the issuance of Shares pursuant to this Award Agreement is compliant with applicable law.
Consents; Compliance with Law.
 
(c)
 
  The Company may affix to certificates for Shares issued pursuant to this Award Agreement any legend that the Committee determines to be necessary or advisable (including to reflect any restrictions to which you may be subject under any applicable securities laws).  The Company may advise the transfer agent to place a stop order against any legended Shares.
Legends.
 
SECTION 8.
 
  The terms and conditions of this Award Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the Company and its successors and assigns.
Successors and Assigns of the Company.
 
SECTION 9.
 
  Subject to the terms of this Award Agreement and your Employment Agreement, the Committee shall have discretion with respect to any actions to be taken or determinations to be made in connection with this Award Agreement, and its determinations shall be final, binding and conclusive.
Committee Discretion.
 
SECTION 10.
 
    Notwithstanding any provision in your Employment Agreement, you and the Company hereby irrevocably submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of (i) the United States District Court for the Southern District of Texas and (ii) the courts of the State of Texas for the purposes of any action, suit or other proceeding arising out of this Award Agreement or the Plan.  You and the Company agree to commence any such action, suit or other proceeding either in the United States District Court for the Southern District of Texas or, if such action, suit or other proceeding may not be brought in such court for jurisdictional reasons, in the courts of the State of Texas.  You and the Company further agree that service of any process, summons, notice or document by U.S. registered mail to the applicable address set forth in Section 11 of this Award Agreement shall be effective service of process for any action, suit or other proceeding in Texas with respect to any matters to which you have submitted to jurisdiction in this Section 10(a).  You and the Company irrevocably and unconditionally waive any objection to the laying of venue of any action, suit or other proceeding arising out of this Award Agreement or the Plan in (A) the United States District Court for the Southern District of Texas or (B) the courts of the State of Texas, and hereby and thereby further irrevocably and unconditionally waive and agree not to plead or claim in any such court that any such action, suit or other proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
Dispute Resolution.
(a)  
Jurisdiction and Venue.
 
(b)
 
  You and the Company hereby waive, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any right either of you may have to a trial by jury in respect to any litigation directly or indirectly arising out of, under or in connection with this Award Agreement or the Plan.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
 
(c)
 
  You hereby agree to keep confidential the existence of, and any information concerning, a dispute described in this Section 10, except that you may disclose information concerning such dispute to the court that is considering such dispute or to your legal counsel, accountants and other representatives (provided that such counsel, accountants and other representatives agree not to disclose any such information other than as necessary to the prosecution or defense of the dispute).
Confidentiality.
 
SECTION 11.
 
  All notices, requests, demands and other communications required or permitted to be given under the terms of this Award Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given when delivered by hand or overnight courier or three Business Days after they have been mailed by U.S. registered mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, addressed to the other party as set forth below:
Notice.
 
 
4
 
 
The parties may change the address to which notices under this Award Agreement shall be sent by providing written notice to the other in the manner specified above.
 
SECTION 12.
 
  This Award Agreement shall be deemed to be made in the State of Texas, and the validity, construction and effect of this Award Agreement in all respects shall be determined in accordance with the laws of the State of Texas, without giving effect to the conflict of law principles thereof.
G
overning Law.
 
SECTION 13.
 
  Headings are given to the Sections and subsections of this Award Agreement solely as a convenience to facilitate reference. Such headings shall not be deemed in any way material or relevant to the construction or interpretation of this Award Agreement or any provision thereof.  Whenever the words include, includes or including are used in this Award Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words but not limited to.  The term or is not exclusive.
Headings and Construction.
 
SECTION 14.
 
  The Committee may waive any conditions or rights under, amend any terms of, or alter, suspend, discontinue, cancel or terminate this Award Agreement prospectively or retroactively; , , that any such waiver, amendment, alteration, suspension, discontinuance, cancelation or termination that would materially and adversely impair your rights under this Award Agreement shall not to that extent be effective without your consent (it being understood, notwithstanding the foregoing proviso, that this Award Agreement and the RSUs shall be subject to the provisions of Section 7(c) of the Plan).
Amendment of this Award Agreement.
provided
however
 
SECTION 15.
 
  For purposes of Section 409A of the Code (), it is intended that amounts payable pursuant to this Award Agreement qualify for the short-term deferral exception under Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-1(b)(4) or any successor thereto, and all provisions of this Award Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in a manner consistent with such exception.
Section 409A.
(a)  
Section 409A
 
(b)
 
In the event that it is determined that any amounts payable pursuant to this Award Agreement do not qualify for the short-term deferral exception under Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-1(b)(4) or any successor thereto, it is intended that the provisions of this Award Agreement comply with Section 409A, and all provisions of this Award Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in a manner consistent with the requirements for avoiding taxes or penalties under Section 409A and any similar state or local law.
 
(c)
 
Neither you nor any of your creditors or beneficiaries shall have the right to subject any deferred compensation (within the meaning of Section 409A) payable under this Award Agreement to any anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, attachment or garnishment.  Except as permitted under Section 409A, any deferred compensation (within the meaning of Section 409A) payable to you or for your benefit under this Award Agreement may not be reduced by, or offset against, any amount owing by you to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
 
(d)
 
To the extent required by Section 409A, any amount payable under the Award Agreement that constitutes deferred compensation (within the meaning of Section 409A) subject to, and not exempt from, Section 409A, payable or provided to you upon a termination of employment shall only be paid or provided to you upon your separation from service (within the meaning of Section 409A).  If, at the time of your separation from service, (i) you are a specified employee (within the meaning of Section 409A and using the identification methodology selected by the Company from time to time) and (ii) the Company shall make a good faith determination that an amount payable under this Award Agreement constitutes deferred compensation the payment of which is required to be delayed pursuant to the six-month delay rule set forth in Section 409A in order to avoid taxes or penalties under Section 409A, then the Company (or its Subsidiary, as applicable) shall not pay such amount on the otherwise scheduled payment date but shall instead accumulate such amount and pay it, without interest, on the first business day after such six-month period.
 
 
5
 
 
(e)
 
You shall be solely responsible and liable for the satisfaction of all taxes and penalties that may be imposed on you or for your account in connection with this Award Agreement (including any taxes and penalties under Section 409A), and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries shall have any obligation to indemnify or otherwise hold you harmless from any or all such taxes or penalties.
 
SECTION 16.
 
  This Award Agreement may be signed in counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.
Counterparts.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have duly executed this Award Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
6
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110323114156.txt.gz
TIME:20110323114156
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act 
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act 
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02.   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On March 21, 2011, Laura W. Lang, a member of our Board of Directors, notified us that she will not stand for re-election at the Companys 2011 Annual Meeting of Shareholders on May 17, 2011 in order to devote more time to other professional commitments requiring increasing amounts of her time.  Ms. Lang informed the board that her decision was not because of any disagreement with the Company or any matter related to the Companys operations, policies or practices. Ms. Lang has served the Company for six years as a member of our Board of Directors. In commenting on her decision, Mr. Fu stated that the Company expresses its gratitude for her leadership and service.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110411122349.txt.gz
TIME:20110411122349
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act 
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act 
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibit 99.1                      Press release dated April 11, 2011
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit
                                           
Number
Description
            Exhibit 99.1                                         Press release dated April 11, 2011
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 11, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading contract manufacturing provider, lowered its guidance for the first quarter of 2011 due to softer than projected demand and temporary inventory corrections from some of its customers.
 
Based on preliminary information, sales for the first quarter of 2011 are expected to be approximately $540 million. We anticipate a reversal of this sales decline and expect a rebound in the second quarter. Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter, excluding special items, are expected to range from $0.23 and $0.26.
 
These results are preliminary and therefore subject to the Companys completion of its first quarter closing and review procedures. At this time, the Company is finalizing its financial results for the first quarter of 2011 and will report those results on April 28, 2011. A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held on April 28, 2011 at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its current outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement that [w]e anticipate a reversal of this sales decline and expect a rebound in the second quarter, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the first quarter of 2011, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
 
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of the release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
###
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110428175208.txt.gz
TIME:20110428175208
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 28, 2011
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code: 
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
INVESTOR RELATIONS April 28, 2011
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 28, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $538 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2011, compared to $572 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported first quarter net income of $15 million, or $0.25 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2010, the Company reported net income of $18 million, or $0.29 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, the Company would have reported net income of $19 million, or $0.30 per diluted share, in the first quarter of 2010. The Company did not report any restructuring charges in the first quarter of 2011.
 
During the quarter we saw weaker than expected demand primarily due to customer inventory adjustments following strong fourth quarter demand, said Cary Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. We expect sales in the second quarter to rebound, as our customers achieve balancing of inventory levels to match demand.
 
First Quarter 2011 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
 
 
Industry Sectors
 
The following table sets forth sales by industry sector for the quarters ended March 31, 2011, December 31, 2010 and March 31, 2010.
 
Second Quarter 2011 Outlook
 
Sales for the second quarter of 2011 are expected to range from $560 million to $600 million. Diluted earnings per share for the second quarter, excluding special items, are expected to be between $0.28 and $0.34.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement we expect sales in the second quarter to rebound as our customers achieve balancing of inventory levels to match demand, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the second quarter of 2011, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
 
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110518125716.txt.gz
TIME:20110518125716
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act 
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act 
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110610142410.txt.gz
TIME:20110610142410
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act 
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act 
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02.   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On June 7, 2011, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the appointment of David W. Scheible to the Board of Directors of the Company (the Board) effective June 6, 2011 as an independent director. Mr. Scheible serves as Chief Executive Officer, President and Director of Graphic Packaging Holding Company, a global manufacturer of custom packaging, paperboard, laminations and coatings, systems and machinery and contract packaging services to multinational companies. He also served as the Chief Operating Officer of Graphic Packaging from 1999 to 2006 and joined Graphic Packaging in 1998 as President of the Flexible Packaging Division. Prior to joining Graphic Packaging, Mr. Scheible had been an executive with Avery Dennison Corporation (1986 to 1998) a global manufacturer of self-adhesive products, office products and specialized label systems. Mr. Scheible began his career at B.F. Goodrich Corporation in 1980, and has held various positions in the manufacturing industry for more than 30 years. Mr. Scheible received a Masters of Business Administration in Finance and a Bachelor of Science in Biochemistry from Purdue University.
The Board has appointed Mr. Scheible to serve as a director and as a member of the Companys Compensation Committee until the next Annual Meeting of Shareholders planned for May 9, 2012. For his service as a non-employee director of the Company, Mr. Scheible will receive (a) $60,000 per annum; (b) $1,000 per Board meeting attended and (c) $1,000 per Committee meeting attended as a member of such committee. On June 6, 2011, Mr. Scheible received a restricted stock unit award grant of 5,810 Common Shares of the Company under the Companys 2010 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan. These restricted stock units will vest in equal quarterly installments over a one-year period following the date of grant.
The press release announcing the appointment of Mr. Scheible is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, June 7, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE:BHE) announced today the appointment of David W. Scheible as an independent director to the Board of Directors of the Company effective June 6, 2011. Mr. Scheible serves as Chief Executive Officer, President and Director of Graphic Packaging Holding Company, a global manufacturer of custom packaging, paperboard, laminations and coatings, systems and machinery and contract packaging services to multinational companies. He also served as the Chief Operating Officer of Graphic Packaging from 1999 to 2006 and joined Graphic Packaging in 1998 as President of the Flexible Packaging Division. Prior to joining Graphic Packaging, Mr. Scheible had been an executive with Avery Dennison Corporation (1986 to 1998) a global manufacturer of self-adhesive products, office products and specialized label systems. Mr. Scheible began his career at B.F. Goodrich Corporation in 1980, and has held various positions in the manufacturing industry for more than 30 years. Mr. Scheible received a Masters of Business Administration in Finance and a Bachelor of Science in Biochemistry from Purdue University.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
###
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20110728175822.txt.gz
TIME:20110728175822
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    July 28, 2011
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
      Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act 
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
      Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act 
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
      Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the 
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1                      Press release dated July 28, 2011
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                                                              
 
 
 
 

Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
INVESTOR RELATIONS July 28, 2011
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 28, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $586 million for the quarter ended June 30, 2011, compared to $589 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported second quarter net income of $15 million, or $0.24 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2010, the Company reported net income of $20 million, or $0.32 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, the Company would have reported net income of $15 million, or $0.25 per diluted share, in the second quarter of 2011. The Company did not report any restructuring charges in the second quarter of 2010.
 
During the quarter we saw strong demand across our customer base, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. However, we incurred unexpected costs which had an unfavorable impact on our operating results. These were $3.1 million of settlement costs associated with the transfer of a major program and higher than expected new program ramp and capacity expansion costs. For the remainder of the year we expect operating margins to improve through increased operating efficiencies. Additionally, revenues are expected to increase in the second half of 2011 as new business awards come on-line.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Industry Sectors
The following table sets forth sales by industry sector for the quarters ended June 30, 2011, March 31, 2011 and June 30, 2010.
 
Third Quarter 2011 Outlook
Sales for the third quarter of 2011 are expected to range from $585 million to $620 million. Diluted earnings per share for the third quarter, excluding special items, are expected to be between $0.30 and $0.36.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement revenues are expected to increase in the second half of 2011 as new business awards come on-line, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the third quarter of 2011, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
 
 
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at .
www.bench.com
 
 
 
 
       
 
 
 
 
 
 
The results for the three and six months ended June 30, 2010, as well as the six months ended June 30, 2011, reflect corrections to the Companys prior period financial statements, related to inventory and accounts payable balances, that the Company deems immaterial. The aggregate impact of these corrections on earnings per share was $0.01 for both the three and six months ended June 30, 2010 and $0.01 for the six months ended June 30, 2011.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20111013173041.txt.gz
TIME:20111013173041
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    October 13, 2011
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
On October 13, 2011, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing the temporary closing of its Thailand facility due to flooding. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, October 13, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced today that its subsidiary, Benchmark Electronics (Thailand) Public Company Limited, has temporarily suspended operations as a result of flooding in the surrounding areas of the Hi-Tech Industrial Estate in Ayudhaya, Thailand. The industrial park is without power and officials have ordered an evacuation of the area. Benchmark has moved equipment and inventory to higher ground and, as of today, its facility has not been flooded, however the dike surrounding the Hi-Tech Industrial Estate has been compromised.
 
The entire Benchmark team extends our sympathy to those affected by the extensive flooding throughout Thailand, said Cary T. Fu, chief executive officer. We have first focused our efforts on ensuring the safety of our Thailand team and have begun assessing the impact of the temporary suspension of our operations in Thailand.  Our teams are working on recovery plans jointly with our customers to ensure customer needs are met thru various options currently, including shifting production to other facilities.
 
While the full impact and extent of damage is unknown at this time, Benchmark has insurance coverage for any flood/water damage to its facility and additionally carries business interruption coverage. The company will remain focused on restoring operations to full production levels as quickly as conditions permit.  Benchmark expects to address any financial impact of the flood on its upcoming earnings release call scheduled for October 27, 2011 at 10:00 a.m. Central Time.
 
About Benchmark Electronics
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20111018155140.txt.gz
TIME:20111018155140
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    October 17, 2011
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
o
(17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
o
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
o
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, October 17, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced that flood waters breached the south-side levee protecting the industrial park and the waters have now inundated the Benchmark campus. The Company has extended its suspension of operations in Ayudhaya. The Company has begun utilizing capacity in the Asia Pacific region, including re-starting its Korat, Thailand facility, to support the transfer of customer production.
 
The Company expects that the flooding of its Ayudhaya facility will have a significant impact on its revenues and operations for the fourth quarter. Benchmark has insurance coverage for the flood/water damage to its facility and also carries business interruption coverage. The Company remains focused on restoring operations to full production as quickly as conditions permit, and expects to address the financial impact of the flood on its upcoming earnings release call scheduled for October 27, 2011 at 10:00 a.m. Central Time.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 concerning the impact of flooding in Thailand on Benchmarks operations. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to the extent of damage to the Companys facilities, uncertainties about the timeframe for the flood waters to recede and the associated costs to restore production to its operations. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
 
 
About Benchmark Electronics
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20111028060401.txt.gz
TIME:20111028060401
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
(17 CFR 230.425)
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Item 7.01.   Regulation FD Disclosure.
As a result of the flooding in Thailand, the Companys previously announced suspension of its operations in Ayudhaya continues to be in effect. Local officials have estimated that the flooding will continue through the middle of November 2011, at which time they will begin to pump water from the industrial park.
The uncertainties of the impact of the Thailand flooding on the Companys operations make it challenging to provide guidance. The guidance provided in the press release attached as Exhibit 99.1 was developed using the following assumptions: (1) production at the Korat, Thailand facility will resume on the first week of November 2011, (2) the Company will gain access to the Ayudhaya, Thailand facilities in December to assess damage and begin recovery efforts and (3) $4 million in related insurance recovery proceeds will be received by the Company by December 2011. The guidance does not include any charges or expenses directly related to the flooding and resuming production at the Ayudhaya facilities after the water recedes. The statements included in this release reflect the Companys assessment of information available to it as of the date of this release, but should any of the underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
 
 
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
Exhibit 99.1        Press release dated October 27, 2011
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 27, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $570 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2011, compared to $614 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported third quarter net income of $20 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, which includes a discrete income tax benefit of $9 million, or $0.16 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2010, the Company reported net income of $22 million, or $0.36 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring charges, the Company would have reported net income of $20 million, or $0.34 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2011 and $23 million, or $0.37 per diluted share, in the same quarter of 2010.
 
During the quarter we experienced an unanticipated decline in demand primarily concentrated in the test and instrumentation industry. The significant drop in revenues, and to a lesser extent, transition costs to low-cost geographies, adversely impacted our operating margin for the quarter, said Cary T. Fu, the Companys Chief Executive Officer.
 
Recently, we announced that our Thailand facilities have been impacted by severe regional flooding. Our teams first focused on ensuring the safety of our employees and jointly working disaster recovery plans with our customers. To ensure that our customers critical requirements are met in Q4 and beyond, we are rapidly ramping capacity at our other facilities around the world including our recently restarted facility in Korat, Thailand. We are grateful for our dedicated employees in Thailand who have worked tirelessly supporting customers while managing personal challenges associated with the flood. We also want to thank our customers for their support with our transition activities. While there are many unknowns remaining at this time, we anticipate resuming full support for customer demands in Q1 of 2012.
 
 
 
 
Third Quarter 2011 Financial Highlights
 
Industry Sectors
 
The following table sets forth sales by industry sector for the quarters ended September 30, 2011, June 30, 2011 and September 30, 2010.
 
Fourth Quarter 2011 Outlook
 
The uncertainties of the impact of the unprecedented Thailand flooding on our operations make it challenging to provide guidance. Without giving effect to further adverse changes in the Thailand situation or the effect of the costs and expenses of returning that facility to operation after the waters recede, sales for the fourth quarter of 2011 are expected to range from $475 million to $525 million. Diluted earnings per share for the fourth quarter, excluding restructuring charges, are expected to be between $0.00 and $0.11. The guidance provided includes the benefit of mitigation efforts to support production at alternate sites and a projected level of insurance recoveries associated with our business interruption coverage.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
 
 
 
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, statements related to suspending operations at our manufacturing facilities in Ayudhaya, Thailand, the potential recovery of insurance proceeds associated with our business interruption coverage, and the potential related effects on our future revenues, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the fourth quarter of 2011, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to uncertainties concerning Thailand and the extent of damage to our facilities and equipment, the timeframe for the flood waters in Thailand receding and the restoration of operations and associated costs with such restoration, our ability to effectively shift production from our Ayudhaya facilities to other facilities in order to maintain supply continuity for our customers, industry and economic conditions, and customer actions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
 
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. As previously reported, the Company will provide an update of the impact of the severe flooding in Thailand on its Ayudhaya facility. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The results for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2010 reflect corrections to the Companys prior period financial statements, related to inventory and accounts payable balances, that the Company deems immaterial. The aggregate impact of these corrections on earnings per share was $0.01 and $0.02 for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2010, respectively.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20111109120300.txt.gz
TIME:20111109120300
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b)
Retirement of Current CEO
On November 8, 2011, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the retirement of Cary T. Fu effective December 31, 2011.  Mr. Fu has served as the Companys CEO for more than 7 years and is one of the original founders of the Company.  Mr. Fu will continue to serve as Chairman of the Board of Directors (the Board) through the end of 2012.
Mr. Fu has been a director of the Company since 1990, Chairman of the Board since May 2009, and Chief Executive Officer since September 2004.  He served as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company from September 2004 to December 2006, President and Chief Operating Officer of the Company from May 2001 to September 2004, and Executive Vice President from 1990 to May 2001.  Mr. Fu will provide consulting services to the Company through 2014.
A description of the Employment Termination and Settlement Agreement entered into by Mr. Fu and the Company, and a description of the Consulting Services and Non-Compete Agreement entered into by Mr. Fu and the Company is set forth below.
(c) and (d)
Appointment of New CEO; Director
Also on November 8, 2011, the Board announced that Ms. Gayla J. Delly (age 51), the Companys President, will succeed Mr. Fu as CEO effective January 1, 2012.  A description of the Amended and Restated Employment Agreement entered into by the Company and Ms. Delly in connection with her promotion from President to President and CEO is set forth below.
The Company further announced on November 8, 2011 that, effective immediately, Ms. Delly is appointed to serve as a member of the Companys Board of Directors.  Ms. Delly will not serve on any Board committees.  Ms. Delly will not be entitled to any additional compensation in connection with her service on the Board.
Ms. Delly has been with the Company since 1996.  She served as the Companys Controller from January 1996 to January 2002, Treasurer from January 1996 to December 2006, Vice President Finance from November 2000 to September 2004, Chief Financial Officer from May 2001 to December 2006, Executive Vice President from September 2004 to December 2006 and President of the Company from December 2006 to present.  Ms. Delly brings to the Board extensive business experience (including service as a certified public accountant), strong values and passion.  Ms. Delly also currently serves as a member of the board of directors of Flowserve Corporation.
(e)
Compensatory Arrangements
(i) Employment Termination and Settlement Agreement with Cary T. Fu
On November 8, 2011, the Company entered into an Employment Termination and Settlement Agreement (the Termination Agreement) with Cary T. Fu, pursuant to which the Company and Mr. Fu have agreed that Mr. Fus employment with the Company and its affiliates would terminate effective December 31, 2011.
Under the terms of the Termination Agreement, the Company and Mr. Fu agreed that: (1) the Company will pay Mr. Fu a lump sum payment equal to $775,000.00 which will be paid on December 30, 2011; (2) the Company and Mr. Fu will enter into a Consulting Services and Non-Compete Agreement (the Consulting Agreement) to be executed contemporaneously with the Termination Agreement; and (3) the Company will pay Mr. Fu any earned but unpaid bonus for calendar year 2011 owing to Mr. Fu, which will be paid in 2012 at the time when other Company executives are paid such bonus.  In addition, the Company will (i) provide Mr. Fu a cash payment of $27,513.00 on January 2, 2012, as a health care benefit bridge to Medicare eligibility, and (ii) extend the exercise period for all stock options granted to Mr. Fu and fully vested prior to December 31, 2011, such extension to be twenty-four (24) months after December 31, 2011, allowing Mr. Fu to exercise any and all vested stock options granted to him (however, any such extension shall not extend the maximum term during which any such option may be exercised beyond ten (10) years).   Under the Termination Agreement, Mr. Fu is subject to a nondisclosure covenant pursuant to which he is required not to disclose confidential information relating to the Company and its business.  Mr. Fu is also subject to a noncompetition covenant during the remaining period of his employment and three years thereafter pursuant to which, as long as the Company complies with its payment obligations under the Termination Agreement, Mr. Fu cannot directly or indirectly engage in activity that is competitive with the business of the Company.  The Termination Agreement also contains a mutual release of claims.
 
 
 
 
(ii) Consulting Services and Non-Compete Agreement with Cary T. Fu
The Company has engaged Mr. Fu as a consultant pursuant to a Consulting Services and Non-Compete Agreement (the Consulting Agreement).  The Consulting Agreement, which is effective as of January 1, 2012, has a term of two (2) years and may be extended by mutual agreement between Mr. Fu and the Company.  Mr. Fu will provide services on a part-time basis (no more than 20 hours per week) and will be responsible for projects designated by the Companys CEO.  For his consulting services, the Company has agreed to pay Mr. Fu $775,000.00 in one lump sum on December 30, 2012.  Under the Consulting Agreement, Mr. Fu is subject to a confidentiality and work product covenant and cannot, during the three year period after the effective date of the Consulting Agreement ( a period of three years after termination of his employment), engage in activities that are competitive with the business activities of the Company or solicit the Companys customers, clients, suppliers and contacts.  The Consulting Agreement may be terminated by either party upon written notice.  To the extent that the Consulting Agreement is terminated by the Company for reasons other than a breach of the agreement, Mr. Fu will continue to be entitled to his consulting fees.
i.e.,
(iii) Amended and Restated Employment Agreement with Gayla J. Delly
Also on November 8, 2011, the Company entered into an Amended and Restated Employment Agreement  (the Employment Agreement) with Gayla J. Delly in connection with Ms. Dellys promotion from President to President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, effective on January 1, 2012.  The Employment Agreement will have an initial term of four (4) years, and will be automatically renewed thereafter for successive one (1) year terms, unless either party gives to the other written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of the initial term or any subsequent term.
Under the Employment Agreement (1) Ms. Delly will be entitled to receive a base salary at a rate per annum of Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00), as increased or decreased from time to time by the Compensation Committee of the Board; (2) Ms. Delly will be eligible to participate in any annual fiscal year bonus plan maintained by the Company for its key executive employees, subject to the terms and conditions thereunder (the Executive Bonus Plan) and, for the Companys fiscal year 2012, Ms. Dellys target bonus opportunity under the Executive Bonus Plan will be 100 percent (100%) of Base Salary and maximum bonus opportunity will be 200 percent (200%) of Base Salary(with actual payouts being based on the Companys attainment of applicable performance goals); (3) the Compensation Committee will submit to the independent members of the Board for their ratification three (3) equity-based long-term incentive awards under the Companys 2010 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan (the Plan), each such award to have a grant date of January 1, 2012 and a grant date fair value of $500,000 (one such award will be a non-statutory stock option subject only to service-based vesting conditions, one such award will be an award of either restricted stock units or shares of restricted stock that will be subject only to service-based vesting conditions, and one such award will be an award of either restricted stock units or shares of restricted stock subject to both service-based and performance-based vesting conditions) and (4) Ms. Delly will be eligible to participate in long-term incentive compensation programs and other compensation and benefit plans and programs maintained by the Company for similarly situated executives, in each case in accordance with the terms of the applicable plan or program.
 
 
 
 
 
In the event that Ms. Dellys employment pursuant to the Employment Agreement is terminated by the Company without Cause or by Ms. Delly for Good Reason (in each case, as defined in the Employment Agreement), Ms. Delly will be entitled to receive any earned but unpaid base salary and benefits under the Company benefit plans that are accrued and vested as of the termination date.  Ms. Delly will also be eligible to receive, subject to Ms. Dellys execution of a release of claims in favor of the Company and compliance with other conditions set forth in the Employment Agreement (1) a severance payment equal to ( upon any such termination within 24 months of a Change in Control of the Company (as defined in the Employment Agreement)) the sum of base salary at the rate in effect on the date of termination and target bonus under the Executive Bonus Plan for the year in which termination occurs, payable in a lump sum within 60 days of the date of termination, (2) a pro-rated target annual bonus for the year in which termination occurs, and (3) 18 months continuation of group health insurance coverage, with the Company paying the portion of the premium costs that it would have paid if Ms. Delly had remained actively employed with the Company.
two
times
three
times
(x)
(y)
The Employment Agreement also provides that, if payments and benefits provided to Ms. Delly in connection with a Change in Control of the Company under the Employment Agreement along with other payments and benefits provided the Company would collectively constitute parachute payments for purposes of the golden parachute excise tax provisions under Sections 280G and 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, such payments and benefits will be reduced to an amount sufficient to avoid application of the golden parachute excise tax provisions but only if the net after-tax amount received by Mr. Delly in respect of such payments and benefits in the absence of such reduction would be less than the net after-tax amount received by Ms. Delly in respect of such payments and benefits as a result of such reduction.
Under the Employment Agreement, Ms. Delly is subject to a nondisclosure covenant pursuant to which she is required not to disclose confidential information relating to the Company and its business.  Also, under the Employment Agreement, Ms. Delly cannot, during her period of employment and two years thereafter (1) directly or indirectly engage in activities that are competitive with the Companys business, (2) divert to any competitor of the Company a customer of the Company, (3) solicit or hire the employees or consultants of the Company (or encourage any such individual to leave employment or service with the Company) or (4) engage in conduct or statements that disparage, criticize or impair the reputation of the Company, its subsidiaries, their products and services or their past and present officers, directors, employees and consultants (and the Company is subject to a similar requirement with respect to Ms. Delly).
Mr. Fus Termination Agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1; his Consulting Agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.2; and Ms. Dellys Employment Agreement is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.3.  Each Exhibit is incorporated herein by reference and the foregoing description is qualified in its entirety by reference to the applicable Exhibit.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
                                                  
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
 

 
(the Agreement) is entered into on this 8th day of November, 2011 by and between Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation with a principal place of business at 3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas 77515 (the Company), and Cary T. Fu, whose street address is 3214 Creekstone, Sugar Land, Texas 77479 (the Executive).
THIS AGREEMENT
 
the Executive has been employed by the Company pursuant to the terms of an Employment Agreement dated January 1, 2006, by and between the Company and the Executive (the Employment Agreement); and
WHEREAS,
 
the Company and the Executive have mutually agreed that the Employment Agreement, and the Executives employment with the Company, shall terminate and Executive shall resign, effective as of December 31, 2011 (the Termination Date); and
WHEREAS,
 
the Company and the Executive now wish to fully and completely settle, compromise and dispose of all claims which could have been asserted based on the Employment Agreement and otherwise, and further, the Company and Executive wish to set forth in this Agreement all of their respective rights and obligations resulting from such termination of employment and the termination of the Employment Agreement.
WHEREAS,
 
in consideration of the mutual promises and covenants between the parties, the sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the Company and Executive hereby agree to the following terms and conditions (which also include the above-referenced recitals):
NOW, THEREFORE,
1.   .  The Company and the Executive each acknowledge and agree that the Executives employment with the Company and its Affiliates shall terminate as of the Termination Date, and that the Employment Agreement shall terminate and be of no further force and effect as of the Termination Date.  For purposes of this Agreement, the term Affiliate includes all of the Companys direct and indirect subsidiaries and any other entities that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, control, are controlled by or are under common control with the Company.  Executive agrees to resign from any officer positions he may hold       with the Company or any of its Affiliates and the Executive agrees to resign as a director of the Company in accordance with Paragraph 3(c) and any of its Affiliates and to sign any documentation necessary to give effect to this Paragraph 1.
Termination of Employment Agreement
 
2.   . The Company and Executive agree that: (1) the Company shall pay Executive a lump sum payment equal to $775,000.00  which shall be paid on December 30, 2011; (2) the Company and Executive shall enter into a Consulting Services and Non-Compete Agreement (Consulting Agreement) in the form attached hereto as Addendum A which shall be executed contemporaneously with this Agreement; (3) the Company shall pay Executive any earned but unpaid bonus for calendar year 2011 owing to Executive, which shall be paid in 2012 at the time when other Company executives are paid; and (4) the Company shall provide the Executive with the benefits described in paragraphs 3(a) and 3(b) below (together with the payments set forth in clauses (1) and (3), the Benefits).   The parties specifically intend that Executive is to perform services under the Consulting Agreement as an independent contractor to the Company.  The parties agree that if any conflict or inconsistency exists between this Agreement and the Consulting Agreement, the language of this Agreement will control.  Neither Executive nor any agent or employee of Executive shall be deemed to be the agent, employee, partner or joint venture of the Company.  Nothing in this Agreement, or otherwise, creates or shall be construed to create the relationship of master and servant or employer and employee between the Company and Executive after the Termination Date. Executive acknowledges that from and after that date he will have absolutely no authority to represent, contract on behalf of, or obligate the Company.  Executive is not required to provide any such services or assistance after the final payment under this Agreement.
Payments and Consulting Agreement
 
 
Page 1 of 10
 
3.  . The Company and the Executive will be subject to the following:
Benefits and Other Agreements
(a)  .  The Company will provide the Executive with a cash sum, payable in one installment on January 2, 2012, such sum equal to the estimated company medical coverage contributions as of the date hereof, for the Executive and his spouses participation in a plan comparable to the Companys plan available to Company employees from the Termination Date until the Executive and his spouse reach Medicare eligibility.  In lieu of reimbursing for such comparable coverage, Executive has elected to receive the cash payment described above.  This sum is described in Addendum B.
Bridge of Health Benefits to Medicare
(b)  .  The Company will extend the exercise period for all stock options granted to Executive and fully vested prior to the Termination Date, such extension equal to twenty four (24) months after the Termination Date, allowing Executive to exercise any and all vested shares subject to any and all stock options granted to Executive (provided that any such extension shall not extend the maximum term during which any such option may be exercised beyond ten (10) years).    A description of Executives stock options applicable to this Paragraph 3(b) is provided in Addendum C.
Extension of Exercise Period for Vested Stock Options
(c)   .  As of the Termination Date, Executive will offer his resignation pursuant to the Companys Governance Guidelines, and the Company agrees that the Executive will retain the title, duties and responsibilities of Director and Chairman of the Board until December 31, 2012 (subject to the Executives re-election to the board of directors by the shareholders of the Company at the Annual Shareholders Meeting in May 2012).  During the period from January 1, 2013 until January 1, 2015, Executive will serve in an honorary position with the Company, in the position of Chairman Emeritus.  From the Termination Date through January 1, 2015, Executive will not be an employee and will have no duties or responsibilities as an employee other than providing assistance as requested by the Company and agreed to by the Executive.  Also, during the time that Executive serves as Chairman Emeritus, the Company in its discretion will: (1) invite Executive to all or part of one or more meetings or informal gatherings of the Board of Directors; (2) maintain reasonable Company telephone and e-mail privileges; (4) provide Executive with appropriate business cards; and (5) upon Executives request, provide Executive with reasonable IT support.
Retirement from Board; other benefits
 
 
Page 2 of 10
 
 
(d)   . The Executives violation of any of the provisions of the Employment Agreement through the Termination Date shall, in addition to any other remedy, result in a cessation of all benefits and other rights of the Executive hereunder. The Company may offset any amounts payable under this Agreement against any amounts payable by the Executive to the Company.  The Company will provide the Executive with written notice of the reason for any offset and Executive will have 45 days from receipt of this written notice to remedy said violation before any such suspension or offset of payments shall occur.
Certain Violations
 
4.  .  The Executive acknowledges and agrees that other than the compensation described in Section 2 above and the Benefits described in Section 3 above, no further compensation or benefits or other monies are owed to the Executive by the Company arising out of the Employment Agreement, this Agreement or otherwise on account of his employment or termination of employment with the Company and its Affiliates.
No Further Compensation
 
5.  .
Restrictions
 
(a)  . The Executive shall not at any time divulge, communicate, use to the detriment of the Company or for the benefit of any other person or persons, or misuse in any way, any Confidential Information (as hereinafter defined) pertaining to the business of the Company.  Any Confidential Information or data now or hereafter acquired by the Executive with respect to the business of the Company (which shall include, but not be limited to, information concerning the Companys financial condition, prospects, technology, customers, suppliers, sources of leads and methods of doing business) shall be deemed a valuable, special and unique asset of the Company that was received by the Executive in confidence and as a fiduciary, and Executive shall remain a fiduciary to the Company with respect to all of such information.  For purposes of this Agreement, Confidential Information means information disclosed to the Executive or known by the Executive as a consequence of or through his employment by the Company or during his service as a consultant to the Company (including information conceived, originated, discovered or developed by the Executive) prior to or after the date hereof, and not generally known, about the Company or its business. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing herein shall be deemed to restrict the Executive from disclosing Confidential Information to the extent required by law.
Nondisclosure
 
(b)  . During his remaining employment and for the three (3) year period that immediately follows the Termination Date, the Executive shall not do any of the following, either directly or indirectly, during the period of time consisting of three (3) years from the Termination Date but only to the extent the Company complies with its payment obligations hereunder (the Applicable Non-Competition Period), anywhere in the world: directly or indirectly, own any interest in, manage, operate, control, consult for, be an officer or director of, work for, or be employed in any capacity by, any sole proprietorship, corporation, company, partnership, association, venture or business any company or any other business, entity, agency or organization (whether as an employee, officer, director, partner, agent, security holder, creditor, consultant or otherwise) that directly or indirectly (or through any affiliated entity) engages in Competitive Activity; provided that such provision shall not apply to the Executives ownership of securities of the Company or the acquisition by the Executive, solely as an investment, of securities of any issuer that is registered under Section 12(b) or 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and that are listed or admitted for trading on any United States national securities exchange.  For purposes of this Agreement, Competitive Activity shall mean any activity relating to, in respect of or in connection with, directly or indirectly, the contract electronic manufacturing services (EMS) business, including but not limited to original design manufacturing services that compete with EMS business.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Executive may serve as a director of another company that may engage in Competitive Activity as long as Executive receives the Companys prior written consent to such service.  In the event that Executive improperly competes with the Company in violation of this Section 5, the period during which he engages in such competition shall not be counted in determining the Applicable Non-Competition Period.
Noncompetition
 
 
Page 3 of 10
 
 
6.  .
Mutual Releases
 
(a)  In consideration of the promises and undertakings contained in this Agreement, the Company for itself and for each its Affiliates, divisions, predecessors, successors, assigns, employees, insurers, directors, officers, shareholders, agents, attorneys, representatives, owners, managers, contractors and their employees, contractors, subcontractors and their employees, does hereby forever generally,  completely and absolutely release and discharge the Executive of and from any and all claims, demands, actions, choices in action, obligations, liabilities and damages of every kind and nature whatsoever, in law or equity, whether as of this date known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, which any such person or entity may now have or may claim to have in the future, due to, arising from, or based in whole or in part upon, any act,  omission, event, transaction, matter or thing involved, alleged or referred to, or arising directly or indirectly from or in connection with, any of the past transactions, agreements, understandings, associations, relationships and/or courses of dealings between the Company and Executive.
(b)  In consideration of the promises and undertakings contained in this Agreement, the Executive does hereby forever generally, completely and absolutely release and discharge the Company and each of its Affiliates, divisions, predecessors, successors, assigns, employees, insurers, directors, officers, shareholders, agents, attorneys, representatives, owners, managers, contractors and their employees, contractors, subcontractors and their employees, of and from any and all claims, demands, actions, choices in action, obligations, liabilities and damages of every kind and nature whatsoever, in law or in equity, whether as of this date known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, which any such person or entity may now have or may claim to have in the future, due to, arising from, or based in whole or in part upon, any act, omission, event, transaction, matter or thing involved, alleged or referred to, or arising directly or indirectly from or in connection with, any of the past transactions, agreements, understandings, associations, relationships and/or courses of dealings between the Company and Executive.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing release, the release in this Paragraph 6(b) shall include: (i) all claims or potential claims arising under any federal, state or local laws relating to the parties' employment relationship, including any claims Executive may have under the Civil Rights Acts of 1866, 1964, and 1991, as amended, 42 U.S.C.  1981 and 2000(e) .; the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, as amended, 29 U.S.C.  621 ; the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, 42 U.S.C.  12,101 et ; the Fair Labor Standards Act 29 U.S.C.  201 ; the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, 29 U.S.C.  2101 ; and any other federal, state or local law governing the parties' employment relationship; (ii) any claims on account of, arising out of or in any way connected with Executives employment with the Company or leaving of that employment; (iii) any claims al1eged or which could have been al1eged in any charge or complaint against the Company; (iv) any claims relating to the conduct of any employee, officer, director, agent or other representative of the Company; (v) any claims of discrimination, harassment or retaliation on any basis; (vi) any claims arising from any legal restrictions on an employer's right to separate its employees; (vii) any claims for personal injury, compensatory or punitive damages or other forms of relief; and (viii) all other causes of action sounding in contract, tort or other common law basis, including (a) the breach of any alleged oral or written contract, (b) negligent or intentional misrepresentations, (c) defamation, (d) wrongful discharge, (e) interference with contract or business relationship or (f) negligent or intentional infliction of emotional distress.
et
seq
et
seq.
seq.
et
seq.
et
seq.
 
 
Page 4 of 10
 
(c)  The parties agree that the foregoing provisions of release are contractual and are not mere recitals.
 
(d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to release any party from any claims by the other party arising out of or related to this Agreement or the Indemnity Agreement dated June 4, 2003, by and between Executive and the Company, and nothing in this Agreement will limit the protection afforded to Executive through the Companys Directors and Officers Liability Insurance policy.
7.  .  Each party hereto represents and warrants that no promise or inducement has been given to it other than such promises and inducements that are set forth herein and that, in executing this Agreement, it is not relying upon any statement, representation or commitment of any kind not stated herein, and is relying only upon the statements, representations and warranties set forth herein and upon its own, respective, independent investigation, judgment and the advice of its own, respective legal counsel.
Additional Representations and Warranties
8.  .
Other Provisions
   (a)  This Agreement is the entire agreement between and among the parties hereto and no modification hereof shall be effective unless in writing and signed by the party against whom or which it is sought to be enforced. This Agreement supersedes all prior understandings, negotiations and agreements between and among the parties to the extent they are inconsistent with this Agreement.
 (b)  The parties acknowledge that each bears co-extensive and identical responsibility for the language and for any ambiguity or alleged ambiguity contained herein.  Any ambiguity will not be construed in favor of or against either party.
 
 
Page 5 of 10
 
(c)  This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument.
(d)  In the event any provision of this Agreement is deemed unenforceable for any reason whatsoever or is deemed unenforceable as against any person or entity for any reason whatsoever, then the remainder of this Agreement shall be enforced as against all other parties and entities, in whole or in part, as permitted by applicable law.
(e)  This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Texas.
(f)  Any controversy or claim arising out of or related to this Agreement or the breach thereof shall be settled by arbitration, in accordance with the rules then existing of the American Arbitration Association and judgment upon the award may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.
(g)  This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the Executives estate, and to all successors, assigns, divisions, estates, Affiliates, attorneys, agents, representatives, employees, directors, officers and shareholders of each party hereto.The Company shall require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company, by agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Executive, expressly to assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent the Company would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any successor to the Company, including without limitation any Persons acquiring directly or indirectly all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company whether by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization, or otherwise (and such successor shall thereafter be deemed the Company for the purposes of this Agreement), but shall not otherwise be assignable, transferable, or delegable by the Company.
 
(h)  The Company and Executive agree that they shall execute such further documents and enter into such further agreements and deliver such documents and supply such information that shall be necessary or appropriate or convenient to accomplish the purposes of this Agreement without any other compensation or consideration paid thereto.
(i)  The Company and Executive respectively represent and warrant that  they have not heretofore assigned or transferred, or attempted to assign or transfer, to any person, firm, corporation or other entity any of the claims which are intended to be released and discharged pursuant to this Agreement.
 
 
Page 6 of 10
 
(j)  Executive acknowledges that he has been advised by the Company to consult with a tax advisor or attorney with respect to the tax consequences, if any, of this Agreement.
(k)  The Company and Executive expressly understand and agree that the consideration paid hereunder is for the settlement and release of all claims and allegations which could have been made as a result of disputes under the Employment Agreement and that each party has consulted and been advised by its counsel that there may be claims that are unknown which each party is agreeing to forego by signing this Agreement.
(l)   The Company and Executive agree that this Agreement shall not become effective and enforceable until the date this Agreement is signed by both parties or seven (7) calendar days after its execution by Executive, whichever is later.  Executive may revoke this Agreement for any reason by providing written notice of such intent to the Company within seven (7) days after he has signed this Agreement.  The parties acknowledge that it is their mutual and specific intent that this Agreement fully comply with the requirements of the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act (29 U.S.C.  626) and any similar law governing release of claims.  Accordingly, Executive hereby acknowledges that: (a) he has carefully read and fully understands all of the provisions of this Agreement and that he has entered into this Agreement knowingly and voluntarily; (b) the benefits of Paragraph 3 offered in exchange for Executives release of claims exceed in kind and scope that to which he would have otherwise been legally entitled; (c) prior to signing this Agreement, Executive had been advised, and is being advised by this Agreement, to consult with an attorney of his choice concerning its terms and conditions; and (d) hehas been offered at least twenty-one (21) days within which to review and consider this Agreement.
 
 IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement on the dates set forth below in their respective acknowledgments intending that this Agreement be effective as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
Page 7 of 10
 
 
Page 8 of 10
 
 
Page 9 of 10
 
 
 
Page 10 of 10
 

 
This Consulting Services Agreement (hereinafter called Agreement) effective this 1 day of January 2012 (the Effective Date) is between Cary T. Fu, whose street address is Creekstone, Sugar Land, Texas 77479 (hereinafter called Consultant), and Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Texas, with a principal place of business at 3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas 77515 (hereinafter called Benchmark).
st
1.
 
Employment Status
 
1.1
 
Benchmark retains Consultant as an independent contractor and not as an employee of Benchmark.  Consultant shall not act as an agent for Benchmark and will hold Benchmark harmless from any liability which may arise due to any unauthorized acts he may perform in carrying out this Agreement, or due to his failure to comply with applicable local, state or federal laws or regulations.
 
1.2
 
Benchmark shall not withhold monies for income tax, social security, unemployment tax, or the like.  Benchmark shall make payments for Consultants services to Consultant.
 
1.3
 
The selection of the details and means by which Consultant fulfills his obligations under this Agreement is the responsibility of Consultant and not of Benchmark, which shall exercise no control in this regard.  Rather, Benchmark shall be entitled only to direct Consultant with respect to the elements of services to be performed by Consultant and the results to be derived by Benchmark; to inform Consultant as to when and where such services shall be performed; and to review and assess the performance of such services by Consultant for the limited purposes of assuring that such services have been performed and confirming that such results were satisfactory.
 
2.
 
Scope of Agreement
 
Consultant shall be responsible for, and shall complete, the projects or services designated from time to time by Benchmarks CEO (as described on the attached Exhibit A), agreed to by Consultant, and pre-approved in writing by Benchmarks General Counsel (using the approved form attached as Exhibit B or something substantially similar), within the term of this Agreement.  Consultant shall provide these services at times and places as in his judgment are appropriate and as are required by Benchmarks management and shall provide his own support services, although Benchmark agrees to loan such work space, telephones or other services as may be available should Consultant deem it necessary to visit Benchmark facilities in the course of carrying out his duties.
 
 
 
 
 
3.
 
Availability of Consultant
 
Consultant shall make his services available to Benchmark upon execution of this Agreement and at agreed-upon times thereafter.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Consultants services may be requested or arranged for in any convenient manner, including by telephone, so long as written confirmation is made within three (3) weeks of the original request.  It is understood that Consultants services under this Agreement is part-time (no more than 20 hours per week) and at any given time Consultant may be engaged by another customer or client as long as such customer or client does not compete with Benchmark, and that as a result he/she may not be able to devote full consecutive working days to Benchmark projects.
 
4.
 
Work Product
 
4.1
 
All projects, services, designs, drawings, inventions, charts, memoranda, manuals, computer programs (including but not limited to source code for such programs), and physical articles and data of every description made by or for Consultant in the performance of this Agreement (hereinafter Work Product) is work made for hire and shall be given to and become the property of Benchmark, who shall have sole right, title and interest to such property, and all originals and copies thereof not already in the possession of Benchmark shall be immediately delivered by Consultant to Benchmark upon termination of this Agreement.  Consultant will seek permission from Benchmark should Consultant wish to keep copies of materials for archival purposes.
 
4.2
 
To the extent that Consultants Work Product is copyrightable, Consultant hereby transfers, grants, conveys, assigns and relinquishes exclusively to Benchmark all right title and interest in such Work Product, including all rights in copyright.  Consultant shall perform any acts that may be deemed necessary or desirable by Benchmark to evidence more fully the transfer of ownership of all such Work Product generated or developed hereunder to Benchmark to the fullest extent possible, including, without limitation, the making of further written assignment in a form determined by Benchmark.  To the extent that any preexisting rights are embodied or reflected in the Work Product generated by Consultant hereunder, Consultant hereby grants to Benchmark the irrevocable, perpetual, nonexclusive, worldwide, royalty-free right and license to 1) use, execute, reproduce, display, perform, distribute copies of and prepare derivative works based upon such preexisting rights and any derivative works thereof, and 2) authorize others to do any or all of the foregoing.
 
 
2
 
 
4.3
 
To the extent the Consultant invents anything or first reduces to practice an invention in the course of performance of this Agreement, the Consultant hereby assigns such invention and any resulting patent to Benchmark and agrees to execute such documents as deemed necessary by Benchmark to assign such invention to Benchmark, and further agrees to do all things necessary to assist Benchmark in applying for any patent on such invention and any resulting patent and make all assignments and execute all documents necessary with regard to the patent application and any resulting patent.
 
4.4
 
No rights or licenses to trademarks, inventions, copyrights, patents or other intellectual property are implied or granted under this Agreement.  Proprietary Information shall not be reproduced in any form except as required to accomplish the intent of this Agreement.
 
5.
 
Confidential Information
 
5.1
 
During the term of this Agreement and thereafter, Consultant shall treat as confidential all information obtained by him for and from Benchmark and all information compiled or generated by him under this Agreement for Benchmark including, but not limited to, business information, manufacturing information, technical data, drawings, flow charts, program listings, software code, and other software, plans and projections.  Consultant shall not disclose or refer to the work to be performed under this Agreement in any manner that would identify Benchmark without the advance written permission of Benchmark.
 
5.2
 
Nothing, however, in this Agreement shall obligate Consultant to treat as confidential any information which:
 
5.2.1
 
is or becomes generally known to the public, without the fault of the Consultant;
 
5.2.2
 
is disclosed to Consultant, without obligation of confidentiality, by a third party having the right to make such disclosure;
 
5.2.3
 
was previously known to Consultant, without obligation of confidentiality, which fact can be demonstrated by means of documents which are in the possession of Consultant upon the date of this Agreement; or
 
 
3
 
 
5.2.4
 
is required to be disclosed by law, except to the extent eligible for special treatment under an appropriate protective order, provided that Consultant shall promptly advise Benchmark of any requirement to make such disclosure of which he becomes aware of, to allow Benchmark the opportunity to obtain a protective order and assist Benchmark in so doing.
 
5.3
 
It is Benchmarks policy not to unlawfully or improperly receive or use confidential information, including trade secrets, belonging to others.  This policy precludes Benchmark from obtaining, directly or indirectly from any employee, consultant, or other individual rendering services to Benchmark confidential information of a prior employer, client or any other person which such employee, consultant, or individual is under an obligation not to disclose.  The Consultant agrees to abide by this policy.
 
6.
 
Payment of Fees and Expenses
 
Benchmark shall pay Consultant for services rendered in accordance with Exhibit A hereto.  In addition to the foregoing, Benchmark shall pay Consultant for his actual expenses (including coach-class travel for domestic flights and business-class travel for international flights, reasonable lodging, food and other related and out-of-pocket expenses) which have been approved in advance by Benchmarks General Counsel and which are reasonable and necessary.
7.
 
Term
 
The term of this Agreement shall commence on the effective date hereof, and unless modified by mutual agreement of the parties or terminated earlier pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, shall continue for two years.  The term may be extended for additional periods by mutual written agreement of the parties.  The obligations of Paragraphs 4; Paragraph 5; obligations to make payments for expenses incurred and work done under Paragraph 6; and Paragraph 9 shall, however, survive termination.
 
 
4
 
 
8.
 
Termination
 
8.1
 
This Agreement may be terminated by either party upon prior written notice, if the other party materially breaches any term hereof, by giving the breaching party one-month prior written notice of the termination to allow the breaching party to cure the breach.  If the breaching party fails to cure the breach during such one-month period, the Agreement will terminate.
 
8.2
 
This Agreement may be terminated by either party at any time for any reason upon prior written notice to the other party, provided however, if Benchmark terminates this Agreement pursuant to this Section 8.2, Consultant shall continue to receive the fees detailed in Exhibit A for the remainder of the term.
 
8.2.1
 
Upon termination of this Agreement for any reason, Consultant shall promptly return to Benchmark all copies of any Benchmark data, records, or materials of whatever nature or kind, including all materials incorporating the proprietary information of Benchmark.  Consultant shall also furnish to Benchmark all Work Product and work in progress or portions thereof, including all incomplete work.
 
8.3
 
No termination shall affect Benchmarks or Consultants rights and responsibilities under Paragraphs 4, 5 and 6 hereof.
 
8.4
 
If this Agreement is terminated by the Company pursuant to Section 8.1, Consultant shall be entitled to receive or retain only that portion of the consulting fee specified in Exhibit A (the Earned Portion) as is calculated by multiplying the total amount of the consulting fee by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of whole months elapsed between January 1, 2012 and the effective date of the termination of this Agreement, and the denominator of which is 24.  If the Earned Portion has not yet been paid by the Company, the Company shall promptly pay such amount to the Consultant following termination.  If more than the Earned Portion has been paid to the Consultant, the Consultant shall promptly refund the overpayment to the Company.
 
9.
 
Conflicting Agreements and Non-Competition
 
Prior to and during the term of this Agreement, Consultant shall disclose to Benchmark any existing or proposed agreements to which Consultant is a party and which constitute a potential conflict of interest.  Without the prior written consent of the Company, Consultant agrees that he will not during the three (3) years following the Effective Date of this Agreement directly or indirectly engage in any contract electronics manufacturing services (EMS) business, including but not limited to original design manufacturing services that compete with EMS business, competitive with Benchmark and not solicit, for other than personal use, from any of Benchmarks clients, customers, suppliers or contacts for the purposes of doing business with such persons or entities and will not interfere with the business relationship between Benchmark and such persons and/or entities.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Consultant may serve as a director of another company in the EMS business as long as Consultant receives the Companys prior written consent to such service.
 
 
5
 
 
10.
 
Entire Agreement
 
This Agreement sets forth the entire understanding and agreement of the parties as to the subject matter of this Agreement and merges and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous agreements or representations, written or oral.  It may be changed only by an agreement in writing signed by the party against whom enforcement or any waiver, change, modification, extension or discharge is sought and expressly referring to this Agreement.
 
11.
 
Construction
 
This Agreement shall be governed and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Texas, United States of America.
 
12.
 
Partial Invalidity
 
If any provision of this Agreement is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, void, or unenforceable, the remaining provisions shall nevertheless continue in full force without being impaired or invalidated in any way.
 
13.
 
Warranty
 
Consultant represents and warrants (a) that all services shall be performed in a workmanlike manner and with professional diligence and skill, and (b) that Consultant will perform all work called for in compliance with applicable law.
 
14.
 
Successors and Binding Agreement
 
The Company shall require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company, by agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Consultant, expressly to assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent the Company would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any successor to the Company, including without limitation any Persons acquiring directly or indirectly all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company whether by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization, or otherwise (and such successor shall thereafter be deemed the Company for the purposes of this Agreement), but shall not otherwise be assignable, transferable, or delegable by the Company.
 
6
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement on the dates below written.
 
 
 
7
 
 
 
 
 
 
In consideration of the services to be performed by Consultant, Benchmark shall pay Consultant $775,000.00 in the aggregate, which shall be payable in one lump sum on December 30, 2012.  Benchmark shall provide reasonable telephone, laptop computer, and e-mail support during the term of this Agreement.  Consultant and Benchmark agree to make an estimate of hours prior to initiation of work defined in (1) above.  Consultant will inform Benchmark if work identified in (1) above is to exceed the projected hours prior to exceeding any estimate.  Authorization to exceed estimate is valid only with prior written consent by Benchmarks General Counsel.
 
 
8
 
 
 
9
 
 

This Amended and Restated Employment Agreement, dated as of January 1, 2012, (the Agreement), is hereby entered into by and between Gayla J. Delly (the Employee) and Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the Company).
The Employee and the Company have been parties to an Employment Agreement dated December 1, 2005 (the Prior Agreement); and
 
In connection with the Employees promotion from President toPresident and Chief Executive Officer, the Employee and the Company desire to amend and restate the Prior Agreement in its entirety.
 
 
In consideration of the mutual covenants and conditions contained herein, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
Section 1.  .  The Company hereby agrees to employ the Employee, and the Employee hereby accepts employment by the Company, upon the terms and subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth.  During the term of her employment, the Employee shall have the title of President and Chief Executive Officer.
Employment
 
Section 2.  .  In her capacity as President and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, the Employee shall perform such reasonable executive duties as President and Chief Executive Officer would normally perform or as otherwise specified in the By-laws of the Company, and such other reasonable executive duties as the Board of Directors of the Company may from time to time reasonably prescribe with the concurrence of the Employee.  Except as otherwise provided herein, except as may otherwise be approved by the Board of Directors of the Company, and except during vacation periods and reasonable periods due to sickness, personal injury or other disability, the Employee agrees to devote substantially all of her available time to the performance of her duties to the Company hereunder, provided that nothing contained herein shall preclude the Employee from (i) serving on the board of directors of any business or corporation on which she is serving on the date hereof or, with the consent of the Board of Directors, serving on the board of directors of any other business or corporation, (ii) serving on the board of, or working for, any charitable or community organization, and (iii) pursuing her personal financial and legal affairs so long as such activities do not materially interfere with the performance of the Employees duties hereunder.
Duties
 
Section 3.  .  Except as otherwise provided herein, the term of this Agreement shall be for four (4)years (the Initial Term), commencing on the date of this Agreement.  This Agreement shall be automatically renewed thereafter for successive one (1) year terms (each such renewal term, a Renewal Term), unless either party gives to the other written notice of termination no fewer than ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of the Initial Term or any such Renewal Term, which notice shall expressly refer to this Section 3 of the Agreement and state that such party does not wish to extend the Employees employment beyond the end of the Initial Term or the Renewal Term then in effect (any such notice, a Non-Renewal Notice).  The Initial Term, as the same may be extended by any Renewal Term, is referred to herein as the Employment Term.  The provisions of this Agreement shall survive any termination hereof.
Term
 
 
Section 4.  .  In consideration for the services of the Employee hereunder during the Employment Term, the Company shall compensate the Employee and perform its other obligations as provided in this Section 4.
Compensation and Benefits
 
(a) .  Commencing on the date hereof, the Employee shall be entitled to receive, and the Company shall pay the Employee in equal bi-weekly installments, a base salary at a rate per annum of Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00)as increased or decreased from time to time by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the Compensation Committee).  The annualized amount of such base salary for each respective annual one (1) year period, including any increases hereafter approved, is referred to as the Base Salary for such respective one year period.  The Employees Base Salary may not and shall not be decreased or reduced more than ten percent (10%) in any year, including but not limited to after giving effect to any such increase.
Base Salary
 
 
 
1
 
 
(b) .  During the Employment Term, the Employee shall be eligible to participate in any annual fiscal year bonus plan that may be provided by the Company for its key executive employees, as adopted by the Compensation Committee, subject to the terms and conditions of any such bonus plan (the Executive Bonus Plan).  For the Companys fiscal year 2012, the Employees target bonus opportunity under the Executive Bonus Plan shall be 100 percent (100%) of Base Salary if the Company attains specified performance objectives for such year, with a maximum bonus opportunity of 200 percent (200%) of Base Salaryif the Company exceeds the foregoing performance objectives by predetermined amounts.  For each of the Companys fiscal years during the Employment Term after the Companys fiscal year 2012, the Employees target and maximum bonus opportunities under the Executive Bonus Plan then in effect, and the specified performance objectives under the Executive Bonus Plan then in effect, shall be determined on an annual basis and shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Company and the Employee.  All bonuses payable to the Employee under the Executive Bonus Plan in effect from time to time shall be determined and paid on or prior to March 15 of the year following the year for which such bonus is earned and payable.
Bonus
 
(c) .  The Employee shall be entitled to participate in all long-term incentive compensation programs for key executives (if any) at a level commensurate with her position.
Other Long Term Incentive Compensation
(d) .  During the term of this Agreement, the Employee shall be entitled to participate in and receive benefits under any and all pension, profit-sharing, life and other insurance, medical, dental, health and other welfare and fringe benefit plans and programs, and be provided any and all other perquisites, that are from time to time made available to executive employees or other employees of the Company.  The Employees participation in any employee benefit plan or program will be subject to the provisions, rules, and regulations of, or applicable to, the plan or program.  The Company provides no assurance as to the adoption or continuation of any particular employee benefit plan or program.The Employee shall also be entitled to an amount of paid vacation per calendar year, and sick leave and illness and disability benefits, in accordance with such reasonable Company policy as may be applicable from time to time to key executive employees.
Other Benefits
 
(e)
Compensation Recovery Policy
.  To the extent that any compensation paid or payable pursuant to this Agreement is considered incentive-based compensation within the meaning and subject to the requirements of Section 10D of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act), such compensation shall be subject to potential forfeiture or recovery by the Company in accordance with any compensation recovery policy adopted by the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof in response to the requirements of Section 10D of the Exchange Act and any implementing rules and regulations thereunder adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission or any national securities exchange on which the Companys common stock is then listed.  This Agreement may be unilaterally amended by the Company to comply with any such compensation recovery policy.
(f) .  The Compensation Committee will submit to the independent members of the Board of Directors of the Company for their ratification three equity-based long-term incentive awards to be provided to the Employee under the Companys 2010 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan (the Plan), each such award to have a grant date of January 1, 2012 and a grant date fair value of $500,000.  For these purposes, the per share grant date fair value of any restricted stock or restricted stock unit award will be equal to the fair market value (as defined in the Plan) of a share of the Companys common stock on the grant date.  One such award will be a non-statutory stock option to acquire shares of the Companys common stock that will be subject only to service-based vesting conditions, one such award will be an award of either restricted stock units or shares of restricted stock that will be subject only to service-based vesting conditions, and one such award will be an award of either restricted stock units or shares of restricted stock that will be subject to both service-based vesting conditions and performance-based vesting conditions.  The Compensation Committee will specify the terms and conditions of these awards, including the applicable performance-based vesting conditions to be satisfied.
Initial Equity Awards
 
2
 
 
Section 5.  .  It is acknowledged by the parties that the Employee, in connection with the services to be performed by her pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, will be required to make payments for travel, entertainment and similar expenses.  The Company shall reimburse the Employee for all reasonable expenses incurred by the Employee in connection with the performance of her duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company.
Expenses and Other Employment-Related Matters
 
Section 6.  .  The Employees employment may terminate prior to the end of the Employment Term as provided in this Section 6.  The date upon which the Employees termination of employment with the Company occurs is the Termination Date.  For purposes of Sections 6(c) and 6(d) of this Agreement only, with respect to the timing of any payments thereunder, the Termination Date shall mean the date on which a separation from service has occurred for purposes of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (Code), and the regulations and guidance thereunder.
Termination
 
(a) .  The Employees employment will terminate (x) immediately upon the death of the Employee during the term of her employment hereunder or (y) at the option of the Company, upon thirty (30) days prior written notice to the Employee, in the event of the Employees disability.  The Employee shall not be deemed disabled unless, as a result of the Employees incapacity due to physical or mental illness (as determined by a physician selected by the Employer or its insurers and reasonably acceptable to the Employee or her representative), the Employee shall have been absent from and unable to perform her duties with the Company on a full-time bases for one hundred twenty (120) consecutive business days.   In the event of termination of the Employees employment pursuant to this Section 6(a):
Death or Disability
 
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (or her estate) (i) any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the Termination Date and (ii) all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
(2) The Employee (or her estate) shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(b) .  The Company may terminate the employees employment for Cause (as defined below) upon written notice by the Company to the Employee, such Termination Date to be determined in accordance with the last paragraph of this Section 6(b) below.  In the event of termination of the Employees employment for Cause pursuant to this Section 6(b), then the Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the Termination Date and (ii) all payments and reimbursement under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
For Cause
 
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Cause shall mean the Employees (i) gross negligence in the performance of her duties with the Company, which gross negligence results in a material adverse effect on the Company, provided that no such gross negligence will constitute Cause if it relates to an action taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interests of the Company; (ii) habitual neglect or disregard of her duties with the Company that is materially and demonstrably injurious to the Company, after written notice from the Company stating the duties the Employee has failed to perform; (iii) engaging in conduct or misconduct that materially harms the reputation or financial position of the Company; (iv) obstruction, impedance, or failure to materially cooperate with an investigation authorized by the Board, a self-regulatory organization empowered with self-regulatory responsibilities under federal or state laws, or a governmental department or agency; or (v) conviction of a felony, provided that no such conviction will constitute Cause if it relates to an action determined by the Board, in its sole discretion, to have been taken or omitted by the Employee in the good faith, reasonable belief that such action or omission was in or not opposed to the best interest of the Company.  The Employees employment may not and shall not be terminated for Cause unless the (1) Board of Directors provides the Employee with written notice stating the conduct alleged to give rise to such Cause, (2) the Employee has been given an opportunity to be heard by the Board, (3) in the case of clause (i) or (ii) of the definition of Cause, the Employee has been given a reasonable time to cure, and the Employee has not cured such negligence or failure to the reasonable satisfaction of the Board, and (4) the Board has approved such termination by majority vote of the members of the Board of Directors, excluding the Employee.
 
3
 
 
(c) .  The Company may terminate the Employees employment at any time for any reason without Cause.  In the event of any termination of the Employees employment by the Company without Cause pursuant to this Section 6(c):
By Company Without Cause
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the Termination Date and (ii) all payments and reimbursement under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
(3) Subject to the Employee satisfying the conditions in Section 6(f), the Company shall pay the Employee severance pay equal to two (2) times the sum of (i) her Base Salary at the Termination Date plus (ii) her target bonus under theExecutive Bonus Plan in effect for the year in which the Termination Date occurs.  Such amount, less applicable withholdings, shall be payable in a lump sum sixty (60) calendar days after the Termination Date.  In addition, if (and only if) the Termination Date occurs within twenty-four (24) months after a Change in Control (as defined below), then the Company shall pay the Employee additional severance pay equal to one (1) times the sum of (i) her Base Salary at the Termination Date plus (ii) her target bonus under theExecutive Bonus Plan in effect for the year in which the Termination Date occurs.  Such additional amount, less applicable withholdings, shall also be payable in a lump sum sixty (60) calendar days after the Termination Date.  The Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect to such payment.
 
 
 
(4) Subject to the Employee satisfying the conditions in Section 6(f), the Company will pay the Employee a prorated annual bonus for the year in which the Termination Date occurs that is equal to the Employees target bonus under theExecutive Bonus Plan in effect for the year in which the Termination Date occurs multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days the Employee was employed by the Company during the year in which the Termination Date occurs and the denominator of which is 365, less applicable withholdings, payable in a lump sum sixty (60) calendar days after the Termination Date.
 
(5) Subject to the Employee satisfying the conditions in Section 6(f), if Employee is eligible for and properly elects to continue Employees (or her dependents) group health insurance coverage, as in place immediately prior to the Termination Date, the Company shall pay for the portion of the premium costs for such coverage that the Company would pay if Employee remained employed by the Company, at the same level of coverage that was in effect as of the Termination Date, for a period of eighteen (18) consecutive months after the Termination Date, provided that such benefits continuation will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment or the Employee otherwise is no longer eligible for continuation coverage pursuant to applicable laws and plans.
 
(d) .  The Employee may terminate her employment at any time for Good Reason (as defined below).  In the event of any termination of the Employees employment by the Employee for Good Reason pursuant to this Section 6(d):
By Employee for Good Reason
 
(1) The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the Termination Date and (ii) all payments and reimbursement under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
(3) Subject to the Employee satisfying the conditions in Section 6(f), the Company shall pay the Employee severance pay equal to two (2)times the sum of (i) her Base Salary at the Termination Date plus (ii) her target bonus under theExecutive Bonus Plan in effect for the year in which the Termination Date occurs.  Such amount, less applicable withholdings, shall be payable in a lump sum sixty (60) calendar days after the Termination Date.  In addition, if (and only if) the Termination Date occurs within twenty-four (24) months after a Change in Control (as defined below), then the Company shall pay the Employee additional severance pay equal to one (1) times the sum of (i) her Base Salary at the Termination Date plus (ii) her target bonus under theExecutive Bonus Plan in effect for the year in which the Termination Date occurs.  Such additional amount, less applicable withholdings, shall also be payable in a lump sum sixty (60) calendar days after the Termination Date.  The Employee shall have no obligation of mitigation or similar obligation with respect to such payment.
 
 
 
 
 
4
 
 
(4) Subject to the Employee satisfying the conditions in Section 6(f), the Company will pay the Employee a prorated annual bonus for the year in which the Termination Date occurs that is equal to the Employees target bonus under theExecutive Bonus Plan in effect for the year in which the Termination Date occurs multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days the Employee was employed by the Company during the year in which the Termination Date occurs and the denominator of which is 365, less applicable withholdings, payable in a lump sum sixty (60) calendar days after the Termination Date.
 
(5) Subject to the Employee satisfying the conditions in Section 6(f), if Employee is eligible for and properly elects to continue Employees (or her dependents) group health insurance coverage, as in place immediately prior to the Termination Date, the Company shall pay for the portion of the premium costs for such coverage that the Company would pay if Employee remained employed by the Company, at the same level of coverage that was in effect as of the Termination Date, for a period of eighteen (18) consecutive months after the Termination Date, provided that such benefits continuation will cease if and to the extent the Employee becomes eligible for similar benefits by reason of new employment or the Employee otherwise is no longer eligible for continuation coverage pursuant to applicable laws and plans.
 
For purposes of this Agreement, Good Reason means the occurrence of any of the following events without the Employees consent: (A) a material diminution of the Employees duties or responsibilities, (B) a reduction in the Employees Base Salary greater than ten percent (10%), or annual bonus or long-term incentive compensation opportunity, or (C) a material breach by the Company of any provision of this Agreement; provided, however, that the occurrence of any of the events described in clauses (A) through (C)above will not constitute Good Reason unless (i) the Employee gives the Company written notice within sixty (60)days after the initial
 
 
occurrence of any of such event that the Employee believes that such event constitutes Good Reason and, (ii) the Company thereafter fails to cure any such event within thirty (30) days after receipt of such notice, and (iii) the Employees Termination Date as a result of such event occurs within 180days after the initial occurrence of such event.
 
 
(e) .  The Employee may terminate her employment at any time without Good Reason upon thirty (30) days prior written notice to the Company.  In the event of any such termination of the Employees employment by the Employee without Good Reason pursuant to this Section 6(e):
By Employee Without Good Reason
 
(1)  The Company shall immediately pay the Employee (i) any portion of the Employees Base Salary accrued but unpaid through the Termination Date and (ii) all payments and reimbursements under Section 5 hereof for expenses incurred prior to such termination.
 
(2) The Employee shall be entitled to receive all vested benefits under the Companys otherwise applicable plans and programs.
 
(f) . Notwithstanding anything above to the contrary, any obligation of the Company to provide the severance or benefits continuation payments under Sections 6(c)(3) through 6(c)(5) or under Sections 6(d)(3) through 6(d)(5) above shall be contingent upon (1) the Employee executing and not rescinding a general release in a form prepared by the Company, and (2) the Employee strictly complying with the terms of this Agreement, the Confidentiality Agreement (defined below) and any other written agreements between the Company and the Employee, including without limitation the Employees compliance with the obligations under Sections 8 and 9 below that survive the termination of the Employees employment.
Conditions For Severance and Benefits Continuation Payments
 
 
5
 
 
(g) .  If any payment or benefit to be paid or provided to the Employee under this Agreement, taken together with any payments or benefits otherwise paid or provided to the Employee by the Company or any corporation that is a member of an affiliated group (as defined in Section 1504 of the Code without regard to Section 1504(b) of the Code) of which the Company is a member (the other arrangements), would collectively constitute a parachute payment (as defined in Section 280G(b)(2) of the Code), and if the net after-tax amount of such parachute payment to the Employee is less than what the net after-tax amount to the Employee would be if the aggregate payments and benefits otherwise constituting the parachute payment were limited to three times the Employees base amount (as defined in Section 280G(b)(3) of the Code) less $1.00, then the aggregate payments and benefits otherwise constituting the parachute payment shall be reduced to an amount that shall equal three times the Employees base amount, less $1.00.  Should such a reduction in payments and benefits be required, the Employee shall be entitled, subject to the following sentence, to designate those payments and benefits under this Agreement or the other arrangements that will be reduced or eliminated so as to achieve the specified reduction in aggregate payments and benefits to the Employee and avoid characterization of such aggregate payments and benefits as a parachute payment.  The Company will provide the Employee with all information reasonably requested by the Employee to permit the Employee to make such designation.  To the extent that the Employees ability to make such a designation would cause any of the payments and benefits to become subject to any additional tax under Code Section 409A, or if the Employee fails to make such a designation within ten business days of receiving the requested information from the Company, then the Company shall achieve the necessary reduction in such payments and benefits by first reducing or eliminating the portion of the payments and benefits that are payable in cash and then by reducing or eliminating the non-cash portion of the payments and benefits, in each case in reverse order beginning with payments and benefits which are to be paid or provided the furthest in time from the date of the Companys determination.  For purposes of this Section 6(g), a net after-tax amount shall be determined by taking into account all applicable income, excise and employment taxes, whether imposed at the federal, state or local level, including the excise tax imposed under Section 4999 of the Code.  
Parachute Payment Restrictions
Section 7.  .  For purposes of this Agreement, (1) the term Person means any individual, corporation, partnership, trust, company, business, firm, association, organization, governmental instrumentality, other entity, syndicate or group, (2) the term Voting Securities shall mean, as to any Person, the then-outstanding securities of or other interests in such Person entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, trustees or similar managers of such Person, (3) the term Affiliate means any entity that, directly or indirectly, is controlled by, controls or is under common control with, the Company or any entity in which the Company has a significant equity interest, and (4) the term Change in Control shall mean the occurrence of any of the following events:
Change in Control
 
(a)  during any period of 24 consecutive calendar months, individuals who were Directors of the Company on the first day of such period (the Incumbent Directors) cease for any reason to constitute a majority of the Companys Board of Directors; , , that any individual becoming a Director subsequent to the first day of such period whose election, or nomination for election, by the Companys shareholders was approved by a vote of at least a majority of the Incumbent Directors shall be considered as though such individual were an Incumbent Director, but excluding, for purposes of this proviso, any such individual whose initial assumption of office occurs as a result of an actual or threatened proxy contest with respect to election or removal of directors or other actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents by or on behalf of a Person, in each case, other than the management of the Company or the Board of Directors;
provided
however
 
(b)   the consummation of a merger, consolidation, statutory share exchange or similar form of corporate transaction involving (x) the Company or (y) any of its subsidiaries, but in the case of this clause (y) only if Company Voting Securities are issued or issuable, or the sale or other disposition of all or substantially all the assets of the Company to a Person that is not an Affiliate (each of the foregoing events being hereinafter referred to as a Reorganization), in each case, unless, immediately following such Reorganization, (i) all or substantially all the Persons who were the beneficial owners (as such term is defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act (or a successor rule thereto)) of the Company Voting Securities outstanding immediately prior to the consummation of such Reorganization continue to beneficially own, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of the combined voting power of the then outstanding Voting Securities of the corporation or other entity resulting from such Reorganization (including, without limitation, a corporation that, as a result of such transaction, owns the Company or all or substantially all the Companys assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries) (the Continuing Company) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to the consummation of such Reorganization, of the outstanding Company Voting Securities (excluding, for purposes of determining such proportions, any outstanding voting securities of the Continuing Company that such beneficial owners hold immediately following the consummation of the Reorganization as a result of their ownership prior to such consummation of voting securities of any corporation or other entity involved in or forming part of such Reorganization other than the Company), (ii) no Person (excluding any employee benefit plan (or related trust) sponsored or maintained by the Continuing Company or any corporation controlled by the Continuing Company) beneficially owns, directly or indirectly, 50% or more of the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities of the Continuing Company and (iii) at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the Continuing Company (or equivalent body) were Incumbent Directors at the time of the execution of the definitive agreement providing for such Reorganization or, in the absence of such an agreement, at the time at which approval of the Board of Directors was obtained for such Reorganization;
 
 
6
 
 
(c)  the shareholders of the Company approve a plan of complete liquidation or dissolution of the Company unless such liquidation or dissolution is part of a transaction or series of transactions described in paragraph (b) above that does not otherwise constitute a Change in Control; or
 
(d)  any Person (other than (A) the Company, (B) any trustee or other fiduciary holding securities under an employee benefit plan of the Company or an Affiliate or (C) any company owned, directly or indirectly, by the shareholders of the Company in substantially the same proportions as their ownership of the voting power of the Company Voting Securities) becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of securities of the Company representing 50% or more of the combined voting power of the Company Voting Securities; , , that for purposes of this paragraph (d), the following acquisitions shall not constitute a Change in Control:  (i) any acquisition directly from the Company, (ii) any acquisition by an underwriter temporarily holding such Company Voting Securities pursuant to an offering of such securities or (iii) any acquisition pursuant to a Reorganization that does not constitute a Change in Control for purposes of paragraph (b) above.
provided
however
Section 8.  .  The Employee recognizes and acknowledges that certain proprietary, non-public information owned by the Company and its affiliates, including without limitation proprietary, non-public information regarding customers, pricing policies, methods of operation, proprietary computer programs, sales products, profits, costs, markets, key personnel, technical processes, and trade secrets (hereinafter called Confidential Information), are valuable, special and unique assets of the Company and its affiliates.  The Employee will not, during or after her term of employment, without the prior written consent of a member of the Board believed by the Employee to have been authorized by the Board for such purpose, knowingly and intentionally disclose any of the Confidential Information obtained by her while in the employ of the Company to any person, firm, corporation, association or other entity for any reason or purpose whatsoever, directly or indirectly (other than to an employee of the Company of its affiliates, a director of the Company or its affiliates, or a person to whom disclosure is necessary or appropriate in the Employees good faith judgment in connection with the performance of her duties hereunder or otherwise on behalf of the Company), unless and until such Confidential Information becomes publicly available (other than as a consequence of the breach by the Employee of her confidentiality obligations under this Section 8), and except as may be required (or as the Employee may be advised by counsel is required) in connection with any judicial, administrative or other governmental proceeding or inquiry.  In the event of the termination of her employment, whether voluntary or involuntary and whether by the Company or the Employee, the Employee will deliver to the Company and will not take with her any documents, or any other reproductions (in whole or in part) of any items, comprising Confidential Information (except that the Employee may retain her personal address, telephone and other contact lists and information and any other documents or reproductions retained upon the advice of counsel).  Notwithstanding any other provision hereof, the term Confidential Information does not include any information that (a) is or becomes publicly available other than as the result of the breach by the Employee of her confidentiality obligations under this Section 8, (b) became, is or becomes available to the Employee on a non-confidential basis from a source, other than the Company, that to the Employees knowledge is not prohibited from disclosing such information to the Employee by a confidentiality
Confidential Information
obligation owed to the Company or (c) was known to the Employee prior to becoming an officer of the Company.  The provisions of this Section 8 shall expire and be of no further force and effect on the third anniversary of the Termination Date of the Employees employment with the Company.
 
 
7
 
 
Section 9.  .  During the period of Employees employment with the Company pursuant to this Agreement and for a period of two (2) years thereafter, the Employee will not knowingly and intentionally (i) engage, directly or indirectly, alone or as a partner, officer, director, employee, or consultant of any other business organization, in any business activities that are substantially and directly competitive with the business activities then conducted by the Company anywhere in the world (the Designated Industry); (ii) divert to any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry any customer of the Company; (iii) solicit or encourage any officer, employee, or consultant of the Company to leave its employ for employment by or with any competitor of the Company in the Designated Industry or, on behalf of herself or any other Person, hire, employ or engage any such person; or (iv) engage at any time in any form of conduct or make any statements, or direct any other person or entity to engage in any conduct or make any statements, that disparage, criticize or otherwise impair the reputation of the Company, its subsidiaries, their products and services, or their past and present officers, directors, employees and consultants.  The parties hereto acknowledge that (A) the Employees non-competition obligations hereunder will not preclude the Employee from (x) owning less than 5% of the common stock of any publicly traded corporation or other Person conducting business activities in the Designated Industry or (y) serving as a director of a corporation or other Person engaged in the manufacturing or electronics industry whose business operations are not substantially and directly competitive with those of the Company; and (B) the restrictions set forth in clause (iv) of the preceding sentence shall not apply to any statements by the Employee that are made truthfully in response to a subpoena or as otherwise required by applicable law or other compulsory legal process.  Upon the termination of Employees employment with the Company for any reason, the Company agrees to direct the then-current members of its Board of Directors and executive management team to not engage in any conduct or to make any statements, or direct any other person to engage in any conduct or to make any statements, that disparage, criticize or otherwise impairs the reputation of Employee.
Non-Competition, Non-Solicitation
, Non-Disparagement
 
Section 10.  .  The Employee and the Company are parties to that certain Inventions, Confidentiality and No Solicitation Agreement dated December 15, 2004 (the Confidentiality Agreement).  The Employee and the Company agree that nothing in this Agreement limits or supersedes any of the provisions contained in the Confidentiality Agreement, all of which remain in full force and effect between the Employee and the Company and are hereby reaffirmed in all respects.
Confidentiality Agreement
 
Section 11.  .
Arbitration
 
(a)
Subject Claims; Initiation of Binding Arbitration
. The Company and the Employee agree that all (i) disputes and claims of any nature that the employee may have against the Company and any subsidiaries or affiliates and their officers and employees, including all federal or state statutory, contractual, and common law claims (including all employment discrimination claims) arising from, concerning, or relating in any way to our employment relationship, (ii) all disputes and claims of any nature that the Company may have against the Employee, or (iii) any dispute among us about the arbitrability of any claims or controversy will be resolved out of court.  Any such claims will be submitted exclusively first to mandatory mediation and, if mediation is unsuccessful, to mandatory arbitration.
 
(b)
Arbitration Procedure
.  Unless otherwise agreed in writing by the Company and the Employee, any arbitration proceeding will be held in Houston, Texas.  The arbitration will be conducted under the National Rules for the Resolution of Employment Disputes of the American Arbitration Association (AAA Rules).  The claim will be submitted to a single experienced, neutral employment arbitrator selected in accordance with the AAA Rules.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to award or grant all remedies provided by law.  The arbitrator shall have full authority to permit adequate discovery.  At the conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator shall issue a written, reasoned award.  The award of the arbitration shall be final and binding.  A judgment upon the award may be entered and enforced by any court having jurisdiction.  Each party shall pay the fees of their respective attorneys, the expenses of their witnesses, and any other expenses incurred by such party in connection with the arbitration, provided, however, that the Company shall pay for the fees of the arbitrator and the administrative and filing fees charged by the AAA.
 
(c)
Confidentiality; Nonjoinder
. All information regarding the dispute or claim or mediation or arbitration proceedings, including the mediation settlement or arbitration award, will not be disclosed by the Employee or by the Company or any mediator or arbitrator to any third party without the written consent of the Employee and the Company.  In no event may an arbitrator allow any party to join claims of any other employee in a single arbitration proceeding without consent of the Employee and the Company.  In the event that the dispute or claim involves a written agreement between the Employee and the Company (including this Agreement) or a compensation plan, the arbitrator will have no authority to add to, detract from, or otherwise modify the agreement or plan provisions other than as expressly set forth in that agreement or plan.  Should this arbitration agreement conflict with the arbitration provisions of any other agreement that the Employee has with the Company, the terms of this agreement will govern.
 
 
8
 
 
(d)
Equitable Relief
.  In the event that irreparable injury could occur during the pendency of a mediation or arbitration proceeding, to restore or maintain the status quo until the dispute has been resolved by mediation or arbitration a party may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to obtain a temporary or preliminary injunction in aid of mediation and arbitration.
 
(e)
Binding Agreement
.  Notwithstanding any policy of the Company permitting it to alter its policies, procedures, and the terms and conditions of employment, this agreement to arbitrate is binding and cannot be modified or superseded except by a written agreement signed by an authorized representative of the Company and the Employee.
 
 Section 12.  .
General
 
(a) .  All notices and other communications hereunder will be in writing, and will be deemed to have been duly given if delivered personally, or three (3) business days after being mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, or upon receipt if sent by written telecommunications, to the relevant address set forth below, or to such other address as the recipient of such notice or communication will have specified to the other party hereto in accordance with this Section 12(a):
Notices
 
If to Company, to:
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas 77515
Attn: Corporate Secretary
Fax No.: 979/848-5269
 
If to Employee, to:
 
Gayla J. Delly
1203 Woodbank Drive
Seabrook, Texas 77586
 
(b) .  All payments required to be made by the Company under this Agreement to the Employee will be subject to the withholding of such amounts, if any, relating to federal, state and local taxes as may be required by law.  No payment under this Agreement will be subject to offset or reduction attributable to any amount of obligation the Employee may owe or be liable for to the Company or any other Person.
Withholding; No Offset
 
(c) .  Each of the parties hereto acknowledges and agrees that upon any breach by the Employee of her obligations under any of Sections 7 and 8 hereof, the Company will have no adequate remedy at law, and accordingly will be entitled to specific performance and other appropriate injunctive and equitable relief.
Equitable Remedies
 
(d) .  If any provision of this Agreement is held to be illegal, invalid or unenforceable, such provision will be fully severable and this Agreement will be construed and enforced as if such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision never comprised a part hereof; and the remaining provisions hereof will remain in full force and effect and will not be affected by the illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision or by its severance herefrom.  Furthermore, in lieu of such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision, there will be added automatically as part of this Agreement a provision as similar in its terms to such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision as may be possible and be legal, valid, and enforceable.
Severability
 
9
 
 
(e) .  No delay or omission by either party hereto in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder will impair such right, power or privilege, nor will any single or partial exercise of any such right, power or privilege preclude any further exercise of any other right, power or privilege.
Waivers
 
(f) .  This Agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, and all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument
Counterparts
 
(g) .  The captions in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and will not limit or otherwise affect any of the terms or provisions hereof.
Captions
 
(h) .  Use of the words herein, hereof, and hereto and the like in this Agreement refer to this Agreement only as a whole and not to any particular Section, subsection or provision of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.  Any reference to a Section or subsection shall refer to a Section or subsection of this Agreement, unless otherwise noted.
Reference to Agreement
 
(i) .  The Company shall require any successor (whether direct or indirect, by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company, by agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Employee, expressly to assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent the Company would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company and any successor to the Company, including without limitation any Persons acquiring directly or indirectly all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Company whether by purchase, merger, consolidation, reorganization, or otherwise ( and such successor shall thereafter be deemed the Company for the purposes of this Agreement), but shall not otherwise be assignable, transferable, or delegable by the Company.  Without limiting the foregoing, the surviving or transferee corporation or other person in any such transaction (whether by merger, consolidation, reorganization, transfer of business or assets, or otherwise) shall be subject to the provisions of Section 7 hereof and shall be deemed to be the Company for purposes of such provisions, regardless of whether such transaction itself constituted a Change of Control of the Company.
Successors and Binding Agreement
 (j) .  This Agreement contains the entire understanding of the parties, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between them, relating to the subject matter hereof including the Prior Agreement.  This Agreement may not be amended or modified except by a written instrument hereafter signed by each of the parties hereto, and may not be waived except by a written instrument hereafter signed by the party granting such waiver.  The Company has not made any promise or entered into any agreement that is not expressed in this Agreement, and the Employee is not relying upon any statement or representation of any agent of the Company.  In executing this Agreement, the Employee is relying solely on her judgment and has been represented by the legal counsel of her choice in connection with this Agreement who has read and explained to the Employee the entire contents of this Agreement, as well as explained the legal consequences.  No agreements or representation, oral or otherwise, express or implied, with respect to the subject matter hereof have been made by either party which are not set forth expressly in this Agreement.
Entire Agreement; Amendments and Waivers
 
(k) .  This Agreement and the performance hereof shall be governed and construed in all respects, including but not limited to as to validity, interpretation and effect, by the laws of the State of Texas, without regard to the principles or rules of conflict of laws thereof.
Governing Law
(l) .  This Agreement is intended to satisfy, or be exempt from, the requirements of section 409A of the Code, including current and future guidance and regulations interpreting such provisions (collectively, Code Section 409A), and should be interpreted accordingly. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, if any amount payable pursuant to this Agreement constitutes a deferral of compensation subject to Code Section 409A, and if such amount is payable as a result of the Employees separation from service at such time as the Employee is a specified employee (within the meaning of those terms as defined in Code Section 409A), then no payment shall be made, except as permitted under Code Section 409A, prior to the first business day after the date that is six months after the Employees separation from service.   Except for any tax amounts withheld by the Company from the payments or other consideration hereunder and any employment taxes required to be paid by the Company, Employee shall be responsible for payment of any and all taxes owed in connection with the consideration provided for in this Agreement.
Section 409A
 
10
 
 
Executed as of the date and year first above written.
 
 
 
11
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20111223171524.txt.gz
TIME:20111223171524
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01.   Other Events.
In addition, the Company issued another press release on December 21, 2011 announcing that it was resuming its 2010 stock repurchase program that was suspended in October due to the significant uncertainty regarding the ultimate impact of the flooding in Thailand. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.2 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
                                      
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit
                                           
Number
Description
            Exhibit 99.1                                                  Press release dated December 21, 2011
            Exhibit 99.2                                                  Press release dated December 21, 2011
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, December 21, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), announced today that its Ayudhaya, Thailand facility has restarted operations a week ahead of our planned schedule. The factory, located in the Hi-Tech Industrial Estate in Ayudhaya, sustained damage to its buildings and equipment as a result of floodwaters breaching the levee protecting the industrial park, and the Company ceased production at the factory in October until the floodwaters receded and operational safety could be confirmed.
Benchmarks factory was the first to reopen in the Hi-Tech Industrial Estate. This rapid recovery was made possible because of the effectiveness of the Companys Emergency Management Business Continuity Plan. Going forward, the Company will continue operations in both Ayudhaya and its recently restarted Korat facility.
Its remarkable that this facility could be up and running and producing product for our customers a week ahead of our aggressive schedule. It is a testament to the quality of our employees and to all the Thailand people, said Cary T. Fu, Chief Executive Officer. Also and very importantly, the Thai government has vowed to invest in new infrastructure to ensure that such a disaster will not be repeated, including the creation of new floodways to more efficiently channel water through the central region and Chao Phraya river basin to the Gulf of Thailand, and increasing the levee system around the Hi Tech Industrial Park to a level exceeding the 100 year flood plan which is well in excess of the flood levels recently experienced.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 concerning the impact of flooding in Thailand on Benchmarks operations. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to the extent of damage to the Companys facilities and uncertainties about the effectiveness of planned flood-control measures. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, December 21, 2011  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced today that it is restarting its 2010 stock repurchase program. The Company has repurchased 4.2 million shares totaling $64 million and has $36 million remaining under the 2010 repurchase program. The Company suspended the repurchase of its common shares in October due to the significant uncertainty regarding the ultimate financial impact of the flooding in Thailand.
 
About Benchmark Electronics
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20120109113957.txt.gz
TIME:20120109113957
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
                                      
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit
                                           
Number
Description
            Exhibit 99.1                                                  Press release dated January 9, 2012
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
ANGLETON, TX, JANUARY 9, 2012  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced today that it expects to report revenue and earnings per share modestly above the high end of guidance for the fourth quarter 2011. The Company provided fourth quarter revenue guidance of $475 million to $525 million, with corresponding diluted earnings per share, excluding restructuring charges and the impact of Thailand flood costs, of $0.00 to $0.11 on October 27, 2011.
 
These results are preliminary and therefore subject to the Companys completion of its fourth quarter closing and review procedures. At this time, the Company is finalizing its financial results for the fourth quarter of 2011 and will report those results on February 2, 2012. A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held on February 2, 2012 at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 20 facilities in ten countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions, including but not limited to the extent of damage to the Companys facilities and the ultimate financial impact the flooding in Thailand will have on the Company. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20120202175801.txt.gz
TIME:20120202175801
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    February 2, 2012
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 2.02.   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
                                      
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
Exhibit
                                           
Number
Description
 
               Exhibit 99.1                                        Press release dated February 2, 2012
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
Press Release
For More Information, Call:
 
ELLEN M. DYLLA
(979) 849-6550
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER AND YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2011
 
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 2, 2012  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced sales of $559 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2011, compared to $627 million for the same quarter in the prior year. The Company reported fourth quarter net income of $3 million, or $0.05 per diluted share. In the comparable period in 2010, the Company reported net income of $19 million, or $0.31 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring and Thailand flood related charges, net of insurance, the Companys net income would have been $10 million, or $0.17 per diluted share, in the fourth quarter of 2011 and $23 million, or $0.37 per diluted share, in the same quarter of 2010.
Sales for the year ended December 31, 2011 were $2.3 billion, compared to $2.4 billion in 2010. The net income for the year ended December 31, 2011 was $52 million, or $0.87 per diluted share, which includes discrete income tax benefits of $12 million, or $0.20 per diluted share. In the prior year, the net income was $80 million, or $1.27 per diluted share. Excluding restructuring and Thailand flood related charges, net of insurance, the Companys net income would have been $60 million, or $1.00 per diluted share, in 2011, compared to net income of $84 million, or $1.35 per diluted share, in 2010.
Our fourth quarter revenues and earnings per share exceeded the high-end of our guidance. Customer demand levels were strong across each of our industry sectors in the fourth quarter, said Gayla J. Delly, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. In addition, we are pleased with the phenomenal recovery in Thailand, made possible by the tremendous support of our global teams and our customers. We expect to return to full production levels by the end of March.
Fourth Quarter 2012 Financial Highlights
 
 
 
 
First Quarter 2012 Outlook
 
Sales for the first quarter of 2012 are expected to range from $550 million to $590 million. Diluted earnings per share for the first quarter, excluding restructuring and Thailand flood related charges, net of insurance, are expected to be between $0.17 and $0.23.
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
 
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance.
 
The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
 
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, statements related to the impact of the flooding of our manufacturing facilities in Ayudhaya, Thailand, and the potential related effects on our future revenues, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the first quarter of 2012, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
the potential recovery of insurance proceeds ,
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
Additional Information
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated electronics manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment, which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry, testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
###
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Financial Results
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Consolidated Statements of Income
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 
The results for the year ended December 31, 2010 reflect corrections to the Companys prior period financial statements, related to inventory and accounts payable balances, that the Company deems immaterial. The aggregate impact of these corrections on earnings per share was $0.02 for the year ended December 31, 2010.
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet
December 31, 2011
(Amounts in Thousands)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20120426171137.txt.gz
TIME:20120426171137
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    April 26, 2012
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
 
 
Item 9.01.   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
                                      
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
Exhibit
                                           
Number
Description
 
               Exhibit 99.1                                        Press release dated April 26, 2012
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER ENDED MARCH 31, 2012
 
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 26, 2012  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, today announced financial results for the first quarter which ended March 31, 2012.
 
First Quarter 2012 Results
 
 
First Quarter 2012 Highlights
 
We are extremely pleased with the improvement in the operating margin this quarter. Our margin increase was achieved through revenue growth driven by new program ramps, the Thailand recovery and the diligent focus of our global operations team, said Gayla J. Delly, the Companys President and CEO. We have made great progress, consistent with our plans, in the ongoing recovery from the Thailand flood. We are appreciative of the contributions from our global teams in this effort. In the second quarter, the favorable impacts of new program ramps and end market demand stability are expected to continue.
 
 
 
First Quarter Industry Sector Update
The following table sets forth revenue by industry sector for the quarters ended March 31, 2012, December 31, 2011 and March 31, 2011.
 
 
Second Quarter 2012 Outlook
 
Conference Call Details
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
About Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or lisa.weeks@bench.com
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance. The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement in the second quarter, the favorable impacts of new program ramps and end market demand stability are expected to continue, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the second quarter of 2012, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: the impact of the flooding of our manufacturing facilities in Ayudhaya, Thailand, and the potential related effects on our future revenues; future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
the potential recovery of insurance proceeds,
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
###
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Financial Results
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Consolidated Statements of Income
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
The results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011 reflect corrections to the Companys prior period financial statements, related to inventory and accounts payable balances, that the Company deems immaterial. The aggregate impact of these corrections on earnings per share was $0.01 for the quarter ended March 31, 2011.
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet
March 31, 2012
(Amounts in Thousands)
(UNAUDITED)
  
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20120510185000.txt.gz
TIME:20120510185000
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): May 9, 2012
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
 
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 9, 2012, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) held an annual meeting of its shareholders. There were three proposals acted upon at that meeting. All proposals were approved. The following is a description of each proposal and the votes cast with respect to such proposal:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20120614145458.txt.gz
TIME:20120614145458
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): June 13, 2012
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
  
Item 8.01. Other Events.
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 Exhibit 99.1     Press release dated June 14, 2012
 
  
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
  
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
 
 

  
Exhibit 99.1
  
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
  
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS BOARD OF DIRECTORS AUTHORIZES
AN ADDITIONAL $100 MILLION SHARE REPURCHASE PROGRAM
 
ANGLETON, TX, JUNE 14, 2012  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced today that its Board of Directors approved the repurchase of up to $100 million of the Companys outstanding common shares. This repurchase program is in addition to the current, active 2010 repurchase program in which the Company is authorized to purchase up to $100 million of the Companys outstanding common shares. Share repurchases under both programs may be made in the open market, in privately negotiated transactions or block transactions, at the discretion of the Companys management, and as market conditions warrant. During 2012, the Company has repurchased 1,345,000 shares totaling $19.5 million. The timing and amount of specific repurchases are subject to the requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission, market conditions, alternative uses of capital and other factors. The Company may enter into Rule 10b5-1 plans to facilitate repurchases under the program. A Rule 10b5-1 plan would generally permit the Company to repurchase the shares at times when it might otherwise be prevented from doing so under certain securities laws. Purchases will be funded from available cash and may be commenced, suspended or discontinued at any time without prior notice. Shares repurchased under the program will be retired.
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks common shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or lisa.weeks@bench.com
 
###
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20120727060407.txt.gz
TIME:20120727060407
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 26, 2012
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
  
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER ENDED JUNE 30, 2012
 
ANGLETON, TX, JULY 26, 2012  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, today announced financial results for the second quarter which ended June 30, 2012.
 
Second Quarter 2012 Results
 
Second Quarter 2012 Highlights
 
in a weakening environment. Notably, our revenue and margin improvements were achieved while supporting numerous program ramps from previous quarters bookings as well as the ongoing Thailand recovery efforts. Looking forward, the second quarter business development efforts provided strong bookings which is meaningful as these upcoming program launches together with the programs recently introduced will drive positive momentum in the face of a challenging macro environment
President and CEO Gayla J. Delly commented, We are very pleased with the solid execution of our team for the second quarter
.
 
Second Quarter Industry Sector Update
The following table sets forth revenue by industry sector for the quarters ended June 30, 2012, March 31, 2012 and June 30, 2011.
 
 
Third Quarter 2012 Outlook
 
Conference Call Details
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
About Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
 
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or lisa.weeks@bench.com
 
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the Companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance. The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement these upcoming program launches together with the programs recently introduced will drive positive momentum in the face of a challenging macro environment, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the third quarter of 2012, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: ; future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
the potential recovery of insurance proceeds
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
###
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Financial Results
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Consolidated Statements of Income
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
  
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet
June 30, 2012
(Amounts in Thousands)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20120803161151.txt.gz
TIME:20120803161151
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 30, 2012
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
  
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
  
On July 30, 2012, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) entered into a $200 million Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the Credit Agreement) by and among the Company and the following Banks: JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as administrative agent, issuing lender and swingline lender; and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. and Compass Bank as co-syndication agents. This agreement amends and restates the Companys existing $100 million secured credit agreement, and is a five year revolving credit facility for general corporate purposes with a maturity date of July 30, 2017. The Credit Agreement includes an accordion feature under which total commitments under the facility may be increased by an additional $100 million, subject to satisfaction of certain conditions.
 
The foregoing summary of the terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement is not complete and is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the full text of the Credit Agreement which is attached to this Current Report as Exhibit 10.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
Item 9-01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
Exhibit
 
  
* Certain schedules and exhibits to this agreement have been omitted from the filing. Any such exhibits or schedules shall be furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
 
 

 
 
 
  
 
$200,000,000
 
FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT
 
dated as of
 
July 30, 2012
 
among
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.,
 
The Borrowing Subsidiaries,
 
The Lenders Party Hereto,
 
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent
 
and
 
WELLS FARGO BANK, N.A. and COMPASS BANK, as Co-Syndication Agent
 
* * * * *
 
J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES LLC, as Lead Arranger
 
 
 
 
  
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULES:
 
 
EXHIBITS:
 
 
 
FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT (this ) dated as of July 30, 2012 (the ), among Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation (the ), the Borrowing Subsidiaries party hereto, the Lenders party hereto, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. and Compass Bank, as Co-Syndication Agent.
Agreement
Effective Date
Company
 
PRELIMINARY STATEMENT:
 
WHEREAS, on August 24, 1999, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent entered into the Credit Agreement (the ) whereby, upon the terms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to make term loans and revolving loans to the Company up to the aggregate amount of $225,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in Section 5.10 of the Original Credit Agreement; and
Original Credit Agreement
 
WHEREAS, on June 23, 2000, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Agent amended the Original Credit Agreement and entered into Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (as subsequently amended, hereinafter called the ) whereby, upon the terms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to increase the aggregate amount of the revolving loans to $175,000,000, increasing the aggregate amount of the credit facility to $268,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in Section 5.10 of the Amended and Restated Agreement; and
Amended and Restated Agreement
 
WHEREAS, on January 20, 2005, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent amended the Amended and Restated Agreement and entered into a Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (as subsequently amended, hereinafter called the ) whereby, upon theterms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to reduce the amount of the credit facility to $100,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in Section 5.10 of the Second Amended and Restated Agreement; and
Second Amended and Restated Agreement
 
WHEREAS, on December 21, 2007, the Company, the lenders party thereto and the Administrative Agent amended the Second Amended and Restated Agreement and entered into a Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (as subsequently amended, hereinafter called the ) whereby, upon the terms and conditions therein stated, such lenders agreed to extend the credit facility in the amount of $100,000,000, to be used by the Company for the purposes set forth in Section 5.10 of the Third Amended and Restated Agreement; and
Third Amended and Restated Agreement
 
WHEREAS, the Company, the Lenders and the Agent mutually desire to amend and restate certain aspects of the Third Amended and Restated Agreement;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the mutual covenants set forth herein, the Company, the Borrowing Subsidiaries, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders agree to amend and restate the Third Amended and Restated Agreement in its entirety as follows:
 
 
ARTICLE I
 
Definitions
 
. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Section 1.01         
Defined Terms
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
 
 means any acquisition permitted under .
Acquisition
Section 6.04(f)
 
 means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive Fiscal Quarters ended on such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a Fiscal Quarter, ended on the last day of the Fiscal Quarter most recently ended prior to such date).
Adjusted Leverage Ratio
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
 
 means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1% and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate for a one month interest period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1%. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
 
 means, for any day, the applicable per annum percentage set forth at the appropriate intersection in the table shown below, based on the Adjusted Leverage Ratio for the most recently ended four consecutive Fiscal Quarter period with respect to which the Company is required to have delivered the financial statements pursuant to or hereof, as applicable (as such Adjusted Leverage Ratio is reflected in the compliance certificate delivered under by the Company in connection with such financial statements):
Applicable Margin
Section 5.01(a)
(b)
Section 5.01(c)
 
 
 
Each change in the Applicable Margin shall take effect on each date on which such financial statements and compliance certificate are required to be delivered pursuant to , commencing with the date on which such financial statements and compliance certificate are required to be delivered for the Fiscal Quarter ending June 30, 2012. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for the period from the Effective Date through the date on which the financial statements and related compliance certificate are required to be delivered pursuant to for the Fiscal Quarter ending June 30, 2012, the Applicable Margin shall be determined at Category V. In the event that any financial statement or certificate delivered pursuant to , or , as applicable, is shown to be inaccurate when delivered (regardless of whether this Agreement or the Commitments are in effect when such inaccuracy is discovered, but in any event not to exceed three (3) years past the Maturity Date), and such inaccuracy, if corrected, would have led to the application of a higher Applicable Margin for any period (an ) than the Applicable Margin applied for such Applicable Period, and only in such case, then the Company shall immediately (i) deliver to the Administrative Agent corrected financial statements for such Applicable Period, (ii) determine the Applicable Margin for such Applicable Period based upon the corrected financial statements, and (iii) pay to the Administrative Agent the accrued additional interest owing as a result of such increased Applicable Margin for such Applicable Period, which payment shall be promptly applied by the Administrative Agent in accordance with . This provision is in addition to rights of the Administrative Agents and Lenders with respect to and their other respective rights under this Agreement. If the Company fails to deliver the financial statements and corresponding compliance certificate to the Administrative Agent at the time required pursuant to , then, at the option of the Administrative Agent or at the request of the Required Lenders, effective as of the date such financial statements and corresponding compliance certificate were required to be delivered pursuant to , the Applicable Margin shall be determined at Category I and shall remain at such level until the date such financial statements and corresponding compliance certificate are so delivered by the Company.
Section 5.01
Section 5.01
Section 5.01(a)
(b)
(c)
Applicable Period
Section 2.17
Section 2.12(c)
Section 5.01
Section 5.01
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lenders Commitment. If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
 
 means any of the Republic of Ireland, Scotland, the Kingdom of Sweden or the Republic of Singapore.
Approved Jurisdiction
 
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by ), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Section 9.04
Exhibit 1.01A
 
 means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
 
 means each and any of the following bank services provided to the Company or any Subsidiary by a Lender or any of its Affiliates: (a) commercial credit cards, (b) commercial checking accounts, (c) stored value cards and (d) treasury management services (including, without limitation, controlled disbursements, automated clearinghouse transactions, return items, overdrafts and interstate depository network services).
Bank Products
 
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
 
 means the Board of Directors of the Company or any committee thereof duly authorized to act on behalf of such Board.
Board of Directors
 
 means the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary.
Borrower
 
 means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect or (b) a Swingline Loan.
Borrowing
 
 means a request by a Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with , substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Request
Section 2.03
Exhibit 1.01B
 
 means, at any time, each Restricted Subsidiary incorporated or organized in a State of the United States of America or an Approved Jurisdiction that has been designated as a Borrowing Subsidiary by the Company pursuant to and that has not ceased to be a Borrowing Subsidiary as provided in such Section.
Borrowing Subsidiary
Section 2.20
 
 means a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement
Exhibit 1.01C
 
 means a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination substantially in the form of .
Borrowing Subsidiary Termination
Exhibit 1.01D
 
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; provided that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term  shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
Business Day
 
 
 means, for any period, all expenditures (whether paid in cash or accrued as a liability, including the portion of Capital Lease Obligations originally incurred during such period that are capitalized on the consolidated balance sheet of the Company) by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries during such period, that, in conformity with GAAP, are included in capital expenditures, additions to property, plant or equipment or comparable items in the consolidated financial statements of the Company, but excluding (a) expenditures for the restoration, repair or replacement of any fixed or capital asset that was destroyed or damaged, in whole or in part, in an amount equal to any insurance proceeds received in connection with such destruction or damage and (b) expenditures for Acquisitions that for GAAP purposes are treated as capital expenditures up to an aggregate amount of $20,000,000 during the term of this Agreement.
Capital Expenditures
 
 of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP and any obligations of such Person under any synthetic lease financing whether or not such obligation is classified as a capital lease under GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
 
 means, to pledge and deposit with or deliver to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of one or more of the Issuing Lender or the Lenders, as collateral for the LC Exposure at such time or obligations of the Lenders to fund participations in respect of Letters of Credit, cash or deposit account balances or, if the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender shall agree, in their sole discretion, other credit support, in each case pursuant to documentation in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender.  shall have a meaning correlative to the foregoing and shall include the proceeds of such Cash Collateral and other credit support.
Cash Collateralize
Cash Collateral
 
 means, for any period, the sum of all cash payments of interest and prepayment charges, if any, including, without limitation, all net amounts payable (or receivable) under interest rate protection agreements and all imputed interest in respect of Capital Lease Obligations paid by the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries on all consolidated basis during such period.
Cash Interest Expense
 
 means (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission thereunder as in effect on the Effective Date), of Equity Interests representing more than 50% of either the aggregate ordinary voting power or the aggregate equity value represented by the issued and outstanding Equity Interests in the Company; (b) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the Board of Directors by Persons who were neither (i) nominated by the current Board of Directors nor (ii) appointed by directors so nominated; or (c) a Change of Control or similar event, however denominated, under any Subordinated Indebtedness or any other Material Indebtedness.
Change in Control
 
 
 means the occurrence after the Effective Date or, with respect to any Lender, such later date on which such Lender becomes a party to this Agreement) of any of the following: (a) the adoption or taking into effect of any law, rule, regulation or treaty, (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation, implementation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority or (c) the making or issuance of any request, rule, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority
Change in Law
;
provided
that, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a Change in Law, regardless of the date enacted, adopted or issued.
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans or Swingline Loans.
Class
 
 means Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. and Compass Bank, each in their capacity as Co-Syndication Agent.
Co-Syndication Agent
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
 
 means any and all Collateral, as defined in any applicable Security Document.
Collateral
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as collateral agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Collateral Agent
 
 means, at any time, that the following requirements shall be satisfied (to the extent such requirements are stated to be applicable at the time under clause (a) or (b) below):
Collateral and Guarantee Requirement
 
(a)          at all times on and after the Effective Date:
 
(i)          the Guarantee Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by the Company and each Material Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time, shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect;
 
(ii)         one or more Pledge Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each Material Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time and directly owning any outstanding Equity Interests or any Indebtedness, and there shall have been duly and validly pledged to the Collateral Agent thereunder, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties (A) all the outstanding Equity Interests (other than Equity Interests in any Foreign Subsidiary) owned directly by the Company or any Material Domestic Subsidiary, (B) 65% of the outstanding voting Equity Interests, and 100% of the outstanding non-voting Equity Interests (or, in each case, such lesser percentages as shall be owned by the Company and the Material Domestic Subsidiaries) in each Foreign Subsidiary owned in whole or in part directly by the Company or any Material Domestic Subsidiary and (C) all Indebtedness that is owed to the Company or any Material Domestic Subsidiary; and any certificates, promissory notes or other instruments representing the Equity Interests or Indebtedness pledged or subjected to a charge under the Pledge Agreements, accompanied by stock powers or other instruments of transfer endorsed in blank, shall be in the actual possession of the Collateral Agent and all other steps required under applicable law or requested by the Collateral Agent to ensure that the Pledge Agreements create valid, first priority, perfected Liens (subject to Permitted Encumbrances) on all the Collateral subject thereto shall have been taken;
 
 
(iii)        one or more Security Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and each Material Domestic Subsidiary existing at such time and there shall have been subjected to security interests thereunder securing the Obligations all the assets of each such Person in which a security interest can be created under the UCC, and all documents and instruments, including UCC financing statements, required by law or reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to create the security interests intended to be created by the Security Agreements and perfect such Liens to the extent required by, and with the priority required by, the Security Agreements, shall have been filed, registered or recorded (or arrangements satisfactory to the Collateral Agent for such filing, registration or recording shall have been made);
 
(iv)         the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by the Company and each Material Domestic Subsidiary party to the Guarantee Agreement, any Pledge Agreement or any Security Agreement, shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect; and
 
(v)          each Loan Party shall have obtained all consents and approvals required to be obtained by it in connection with the execution and delivery of all Security Documents to which it is a party, the performance of its obligations thereunder and the granting by it of the Liens thereunder; and
 
(b)          at all times when there shall be one or more Foreign Borrowers under this Agreement:
 
(i)          the Guarantee Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by each Foreign Parent (it being understood that each Foreign Parent will guarantee only the Obligations of Foreign Borrowers that are its subsidiaries), shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and shall be in full force and effect;
 
(ii)         one or more Pledge Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by each Foreign Borrower and each Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower existing at such time, and there shall have been duly and validly pledged to the Collateral Agent under the Pledge Agreement, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, (A) all the Equity Interests in such Foreign Borrower, each Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower and each Subsidiary directly owned in whole or in part by such Foreign Borrower or any such Foreign Parent, including any such Equity Interests owned by the Company and the Domestic Subsidiaries that are not pledged pursuant to clause (a)(ii) above and (B) all the Indebtedness that is owed to such Foreign Borrower or a Foreign Parent (it being understood that the Equity Interests and Indebtedness referred to in this clause (ii) will secure only the Obligations of such Foreign Borrower); and any certificates, promissory notes or other instruments representing such Equity Interests or Indebtedness, accompanied by stock powers or other instruments of transfer endorsed in blank, shall be in the actual possession of the Collateral Agent and all other steps required under applicable law or requested by the Collateral Agent to ensure that the Pledge Agreements create valid, first priority, perfected Liens (subject to Permitted Encumbrances) on all the Collateral subject thereto shall have been taken; and
 
 
(iii)        one or more Security Agreements (or supplements thereto) shall have been duly executed and delivered by each Foreign Borrower or Foreign Parent of such Foreign Borrower existing at such time and there shall have been subjected to security interests thereunder securing the Obligations of such Foreign Borrower (but not any obligations of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary) all the personal property or fixtures (within the meaning of the UCC) of such Person in which a security interest can be created under the laws of each applicable jurisdiction, with such exceptions as the Collateral Agent may approve in its sole discretion, and without liability to any party hereto, taking into account the cost and difficulty involved in creating or perfecting any such security interest and the benefits to the Lenders that would result therefrom, and all documents and instruments required by law or reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to create the security interests intended to be created by the Security Agreements and perfect such Liens to the extent required by, and with the priority required by, the Security Agreements, shall have been filed, registered or recorded (or arrangements satisfactory to the Collateral Agent for such filing, registration or recording shall have been made).
 
Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this definition, if the Company or any Material Domestic Subsidiary shall be using commercially reasonable efforts to create or perfect any pledge of Equity Interests in or Indebtedness of any Foreign Subsidiary, the failure to have created or perfected such pledge shall not, in and of itself, prevent the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement from being satisfied until (x) the later of (1) the 90th day after the Effective Date and (2) the 90th day after the acquisition of such Collateral by the Company or a Material Domestic Subsidiary or the designation of a Foreign Borrower or (y) if, in the judgment of the Collateral Agent, the Company is endeavoring in good faith to satisfy the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement, the 180th day after the acquisition of such Collateral by the Company or a Material Domestic Subsidiary or the designation of a Foreign Borrower.
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lenders Revolving Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to or and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to . The initial amount of each Lenders Commitment is set forth on , or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders Commitments is $200,000,000.
Commitment
Section 2.08
Section 2.19
Section 9.04
Schedule 2.01
 
 
 means a Commitment Increase Agreement substantially in the form of among the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent and a Lender.
Commitment Increase Agreement
Exhibit 1.01E
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Commitment Increase Notice
Section 2.19
 
 means Benchmark Electronics, Inc., a Texas corporation.
Company
 
 means Other Connection Taxes that are imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated) or that are franchise Taxes or branch profits Taxes.
Connection Income Taxes
 
 means, for any period, the EBITDA of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis, to the extent deducted in determining Consolidated Net Income (a) restructuring expenses incurred during the fiscal year of the Company ended December 31, 2011 in an amount not to exceed $4,515,000 and (b) losses directly related to the 2011 flooding in Thailand, net of estimated insurance recoveries; that (i) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio and Adjusted Leverage Ratio, but not for any other purpose, Consolidated EBITDA for any period of four consecutive Fiscal Quarters during which an Acquisition shall have occurred shall be computed on a pro forma consolidated basis to include the EBITDA of such Acquisition, (ii) solely for purposes of calculating the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio but not for any other purpose, Consolidated EBITDA shall include distributions from Unrestricted Subsidiaries to the extent actually received by the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary, and (iii) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio but not for any other purpose, all references to Restricted Subsidiaries in this definition and in the definitions referred to herein shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
Consolidated EBITDA
plus
provided
 
 means, for any Person for any period, the net income (or loss) of such Person and its subsidiaries during such period, calculated and consolidated or combined in accordance with GAAP; that there shall be excluded from such net income (to the extent otherwise included therein) the following: (a) any non-cash, non-recurring charges, (b) gains or losses attributable to Property sales not in the ordinary course of business, and (c) the cumulative effect of a change in accounting principles and any gains or losses attributable to writeups or writedowns of assets.
Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
 means the total assets of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries less, without duplication, (a) intangible assets including, without limitation, goodwill, research and development costs, trademarks, trade names, patents, franchises, copyrights, licenses and like general intangibles, experimental or organizational expense, unamortized debt discount and expense carried as an asset, all reserves and any write-up in the book of value of assets made after the Effective Date (other than write-ups of assets of a going concern business made within 12 months after the acquisition of such business), net of accumulated amortization and (b) all reserves for depreciation and other asset valuation reserves (but excluding reserves for federal, state and other income taxes).
Consolidated Net Tangible Assets
 
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.  and  have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
 means, for any period, the sum of (a) Cash Interest Expense for such period and (b) scheduled principal payments on Total Indebtedness for such period.
Debt Service
 
 means the Bankruptcy Code of the United States of America, and all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization or similar debtor relief Laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect.
Debtor Relief Laws
 
 means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means, subject to , any Lender that (a) has failed to (i) fund all or any portion of its Loans within two Business Days of the date such Loans were required to be funded by it hereunder unless such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent and the Company in writing that such failure is the result of such Lenders determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding (each of which conditions precedent, together with any applicable default, shall be specifically identified in such writing) has not been satisfied, or (ii) pay to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder (including in respect of its participations in Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans) within two Business Days of the date when due, (b) has notified the Company, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations hereunder or has made a public statement to that effect (unless such writing or public statement relates to such Lenders obligation to fund a Loan hereunder and states that such position is based on such Lenders determination that a condition precedent to funding (which condition precedent, together with any applicable default, shall be specifically identified in such writing or public statement) cannot be satisfied, (c) has failed, within three Business Days after written request by the Administrative Agent or the Company, to confirm in writing that it will comply with its prospective funding obligations hereunder ( that such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (c) upon receipt of such written confirmation by the Administrative Agent and the Company), or (d) has, or has a direct or indirect parent company that has, (i) become the subject of a proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law or (ii) had appointed for it a receiver, custodian, conservator, trustee, administrator, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with reorganization or liquidation of its business or assets, including the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other state or federal regulatory authority acting in such capacity; that a Lender shall not be a Defaulting Lender solely by virtue of the ownership or acquisition of any equity interest in that Lender or any direct or indirect parent company thereof by a Governmental Authority so long as such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Lender with immunity from the jurisdiction of the courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Lender (or such Governmental Authority) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made by such Person.
Defaulting Lender
Section 2.22(b)
provided
provided
 
 
 means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in .
Disclosed Matters
Schedule 3.06
 
 or  refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
 means all Subsidiaries that are U.S. Persons.
Domestic Subsidiaries
 
 means, for any Person for any period, without duplication, the Consolidated Net Income of such Person for such period , to the extent deducted in determining such Consolidated Net Income, Cash Interest Expense, depreciation, amortization, other non-cash, non-recurring charges and income tax (including state franchise taxes based upon income) expense.
EBITDA
plus
 
 has the meaning in the preamble of this Agreement.
Effective Date
 
 means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
 
 means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of the Company or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
 
 means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any such equity interest.
Equity Interests
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
 
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Company, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
 
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30 day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of any unpaid minimum required contribution (as defined in Section 430 of the Code or Section 303 of ERISA), whether or not waived, or with respect to a Multiemployer Plan, any accumulated funding deficiency (as defined in Section 431 of the Code or Section 304 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(c) of the Code or Section 302(c) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Company or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Company or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Company or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in ARTICLE VII.
Event of Default
 
 means any of the following Taxes imposed on or with respect to a Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to a Recipient: (a) Taxes imposed on or measured by net income (however denominated), franchise, taxable margin or similar Taxes and branch profits Taxes, in each case, (i) imposed as a result of such Recipient being organized under the laws of, or having its principal office or, in the case of any Lender, its applicable lending office located in, the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (or any political subdivision thereof) or (ii) that are Other Connection Taxes, (b) in the case of a Lender, U.S. federal withholding Taxes imposed on amounts payable to or for the account of such Lender with respect to an applicable interest in a Loan or Commitment pursuant to a law in effect on the date on which (i) such Lender acquires such interest in the Loan or Commitment (other than pursuant to an assignment request by the Company under ) or (ii) such Lender changes its lending office, except in each case to the extent that, pursuant to , amounts with respect to such Taxes were payable either to such Lenders assignor immediately before such Lender became a party hereto or to such Lender immediately before it changed its lending office, (c) Taxes attributable to such Recipients failure to comply with and (d) any U.S. federal withholding Taxes imposed under FATCA.
Excluded Taxes
Section 2.18(b)
Section 2.16
Section 2.16(f)
 
 has the meaning set forth in .
Executive Order
Section 3.21
 
 means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the Effective Date (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
 
 
 means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
 means the letter agreement dated June 4, 2012, among the Company, the Administrative Agent and the Lead Arranger.
Fee Letter
 
 means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Company.
Financial Officer
 
 means the fiscal quarter of the Company, ending on the last day of each March, June, September and December of each year.
Fiscal Quarter
 
 means, for any period, the ratio of (i) Consolidated EBITDA plus Lease Expense and less cash taxes of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period to (ii) the Debt Service plus Capital Expenditures plus Lease Expense of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for such period.
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
 means any Borrowing Subsidiary that is a Foreign Subsidiary.
Foreign Borrower
 
 means (a) if a Borrower is a U.S. Person, a Lender that is not a U.S. Person and (b) if a Borrower is not a U.S. Person, a Lender that is resident or organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which such Borrower is resident for tax purposes.
Foreign Lender
 
 means a Foreign Subsidiary that is a direct or indirect parent of a Foreign Borrower.
Foreign Parent
 
 means any Subsidiary that is not a U.S. Person.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
 means, at any time there is a Defaulting Lender, (a) with respect to the Issuing Lender, such Defaulting Lenders Applicable Percentage of the LC Exposure at such time other than LC Exposure as to which such Defaulting Lenders participation obligation has been reallocated to other Lenders or Cash Collateralized in accordance with the terms hereof and (b) with respect to the Swingline Lender, such Defaulting Lenders Applicable Percentage of the Swingline Exposure at such time other than Swingline Exposure as to which such Defaulting Lenders participation obligation has been reallocated to other Lenders.
Fronting Exposure
 
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
 means (a) any authorization, consent, approval, license, waiver, ruling, permit, tariff, rate, certification, exemption, filing, variance, claim, order, judgment, decree, sanction or publication of, by or with; (b) any notice to; (c) any declaration of or with; or (d) any registration by or with, or any other action or deemed action by or on behalf of, any Governmental Authority.
Governmental Approval
 
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including any supra-national bodies such as the European Union or the European Central Bank).
Governmental Authority
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
 means the Guarantee Agreement dated as of August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Guarantors from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Guarantee Agreement
 
 means all the Material Domestic Subsidiaries and the Foreign Parent of each Foreign Borrower who is required to execute a Guarantee Agreement pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of the definition of Collateral and Guarantee Requirement.
Guarantors
 
 means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
 
 
 means, as to any Lender or the Issuing Lender, the maximum nonusurious rate of interest that, under applicable law, may be contracted for, taken, reserved, charged or received by such Lender on the Loans or under the Loan Documents at any time or from time to time. If the maximum nonusurious rate of interest which, under applicable law, any of such Lenders are permitted to charge the Borrowers on the Loans shall change after the Effective Date, to the extent permitted by applicable law, the Highest Lawful Rate shall be automatically increased or decreased, as the case may be, as of the effective time of such change without notice to the Borrowers or any other Person.
Highest Lawful Rate
 
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty and (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers acceptances. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Persons ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.
Indebtedness
 
 means (a) Taxes, other than Excluded Taxes, imposed on or with respect to any payment made by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document and (b) to the extent not otherwise described in (a), Other Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
 
 means the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement dated as of August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Domestic Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
 
 means any indebtedness of the Company or any Subsidiary owed to and held by the Company or any Wholly Owned Subsidiary; that any subsequent issuance or transfer of any Equity Interest which results in any such Wholly Owned Subsidiary ceasing to be a Wholly Owned Subsidiary or any subsequent transfer of such indebtedness (other than to the Company or another Wholly Owned Subsidiary) shall be deemed, in each case, to constitute a new incurrence of Indebtedness other than Intercompany Indebtedness by the issuer thereof.
Intercompany Indebtedness
provided
 
 
 means a request by a Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with .
Interest Election Request
Section 2.07
 
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months duration after the first day of such Interest Period and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid.
Interest Payment Date
 
 means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter, as a Borrower may elect; provided, that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
 
 means the United States Internal Revenue Service.
IRS
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as the issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in . The Issuing Lender may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of the Issuing Lender, in which case the term Issuing Lender shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Lender
Section 2.05
 
 means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreement dated as of the Effective Date by and among the Company, all Material Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Parents of all Foreign Borrowers and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreement
 
 means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement dated as of the Effective Date by and among the Company, all Material Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
 
 means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement dated as of the Effective Date by and among the Company, all Material Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Parents of all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement
 
 
 means that certain Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement dated as of the Effective Date by and among the Company, all Material Domestic Subsidiaries of the Company as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Parents of all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date, all Foreign Borrowers as of the Effective Date and Administrative Agent.
Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement
 
 means all laws, statutes, treaties, ordinances, codes, acts, rules, regulations, Government Approvals and Orders of all Governmental Authorities, whether now or hereafter in effect.
Law
 
 means a payment made by the Issuing Lender pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
 
 means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrowers at such time. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
plus
 
 means J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, in its capacity as Lead Arranger.
Lead Arranger
 
 for any period shall mean gross operating lease obligations of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries for any relevant period for which such calculation is being utilized.
Lease Expense
 
 means the Persons listed on and any other Person that shall have become a Lender hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context requires otherwise, the term Lenders includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
Schedule 2.01
 
 means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
 
 means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Indebtedness as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive Fiscal Quarters ended on such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a Fiscal Quarter, ended on the last day of the Fiscal Quarter mostly recently ended prior to such date); , that for purposes of determining the Leverage Ratio, all references in the definitions of Total Indebtedness and Consolidated EBITDA (and in the definitions used therein) to Restricted Subsidiaries shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
Leverage Ratio
provided
 
 
 means, (a) with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 page (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the  with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period and (b) with respect to the calculation of clause (c) in the definition of Alternate Base Rate, the LIBO Rate determined in accordance with the methods specified in clause (a) above but at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, on each Business Day for delivery on such Business Day.
LIBO Rate
LIBO Rate
 
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities. For the purposes of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, the Company or any Subsidiary shall be deemed to be the owner of any Property which it has acquired or holds subject to a conditional sale agreement, financing lease or other arrangement pursuant to which title to the Property has been retained by or vested in some other Person for security purposes.
Lien
 
 means this Agreement, each Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement, each Borrowing Subsidiary Termination, the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement, any applications for Letters of Credit and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, the Security Documents and any promissory note issued pursuant to .
Loan Documents
Section 2.09
 
 means each Borrower and each Subsidiary that is party to any Loan Document.
Loan Parties
 
 means the loans (including Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans) made by the Lenders to the Borrowers pursuant to this Agreement.
Loans
 
 means any event, development or circumstance that has had or could reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, property or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, or (b) the validity or enforceability of any of the Loan Documents or the rights or remedies of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders.
Material Adverse Effect
 
 means a Domestic Subsidiary that either (a) generates 5% or more of the EBITDA of the Company and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis or (b) holds assets that constitute 5% or more of the all assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries as a whole.
Material Domestic Subsidiary
 
 
 means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $25,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the principal amount of the obligations of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Company or such Restricted Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
 
 means July 30, 2017.
Maturity Date
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
 
 means, with respect to any event, the proceeds received in respect of such event net of all brokerage commissions, reasonable fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid by the Company to third parties (other than Affiliates) in connection with such event.
Net Proceeds
 
 has the meaning set forth in .
New Lender
Section 2.19(b)
 
 means an agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and a New Lender in substantially in the form of or a form that is reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
New Lender Agreement
Exhibit 1.01F
 
 means any Lender that does not approve any consent, waiver or amendment that (a) requires the approval of all affected Lenders in accordance with the terms of and (b) has been approved by the Required Lenders.
Non-Consenting Lender
Section 9.02
 
 means, at any time, each Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender at such time.
Non-Defaulting Lender
 
 means (a) the due and punctual payment by the Borrowers or the applicable Loan Parties of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrowers under this Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements, interest thereon and obligations to provide cash collateral and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Secured Parties under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (b) the due and punctual payment and performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Loan Parties, monetary or otherwise, under or pursuant to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (c) the due and punctual payment of all obligations of the Company under each Swap Agreement entered into (i) prior to the Effective Date with any counterparty that is a Lender (or an Affiliate thereof) on the Effective Date or (ii) on or after the Effective Date with any counterparty that is a Lender (or an Affiliate thereof) at the time such Swap Agreement is entered into and (d) the due and punctual payment of all obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary in respect of Bank Products.
Obligations
 
 
 means Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States Department of the Treasury.
OFAC
 
 means an order, writ, judgment, award, injunction, decree, ruling or decision of any Governmental Authority or arbitrator.
Order
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statement.
Original Credit Agreement
 
 means, with respect to any Recipient, Taxes imposed as a result of a present or former connection between such Recipient and the jurisdiction imposing such Tax (other than connections arising from such Recipient having executed, delivered, become a party to, performed its obligations under, received payments under, received or perfected a security interest under, engaged in any other transaction pursuant to or enforced any Loan Document, or sold or assigned an interest in any Loan or Loan Document).
Other Connection Taxes
 
 means any and all present or future stamp, court or documentary, intangible, recording, filing or similar Taxes that arise from any payment made under, from the execution, delivery, performance, enforcement or registration of, from the receipt or perfection of a security interest under, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document, except any such Taxes that are Other Connection Taxes imposed with respect to an assignment (other than an assignment made pursuant to ).
Other Taxes
Section 2.18(b)
 
 has the meaning set forth in .
Participant
Section 9.04(c)
 
 has the meaning set forth in .
Participant Register
Section 9.04(c)
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
 
 means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
(a)          Liens imposed by law for Taxes that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with ;
Section 5.05
 
(b)          carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, repairmens and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 90 days or are being contested in compliance with ;
Section 5.05
 
 
(c)          pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
 
(d)          deposits to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(e)          judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under of ;
clause (k)
Article VII
 
(f)          easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not materially detract from the value of the affected property or interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Company or any Subsidiary;
 
(g)          any obligations or duties affecting any of the property of the Company or the Subsidiaries to any municipality or public authority with respect to any franchise, grant, license or permit which do not materially impair the use of such property for the purposes for which it is held;
 
(h)          Liens arising from precautionary UCC financing statements regarding operating leases; and
 
(i)           Liens arising out of consignment or similar arrangements for the sale of goods entered into by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business.
 
that the term Permitted Encumbrances shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
 
 means investments in certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances and time deposits maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by any office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of any jurisdiction outside of the United States of America.
Permitted Foreign Investments
 
 means:
Permitted Investments
 
(a)          direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
 
(b)          investments in commercial paper maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, the highest credit rating obtainable from S&P or from Moodys;
 
 
(c)          investments in certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances and time deposits maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which (i) has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000 and (ii) has short-term credit ratings of at least A1 and P1 by S&P and Moodys, respectively;
 
(d)          fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above; the Company shall take possession of all securities purchased by the Company or any Subsidiary under repurchase agreements and shall adhere to customary margin and mark-to-market procedures with respect to fluctuations in value; and
provided
that
 
(e)          money market funds that (i) comply with the criteria set forth in Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 2a-7 under the Investment Company Act of 1940, (ii) are rated AAA by S&P and Aaa by Moodys or invest solely in the assets described in through above and (iii) have portfolio assets of at least $5,000,000,000;
clauses (a)
(d)
 
(f)          municipal (tax-exempt) investments with a rating of AAA or equivalent rating from at least two of Moodys, S&P and Fitch, and a maximum maturity of one year (for securities where the interest rate is adjusted periodically (e.g. floating rate securities), the interest rate reset date will be used to determine the maturity date); and
 
(g)          variable rate notes issued by, or guaranteed by, any state agency, municipality or domestic corporation rated A-1 (or the equivalent thereof) or better by S&P or P-1 (or the equivalent thereof) or better by Moodys and maturing within 364 days from the date of acquisition (the interest rate reset date will be used to determine the maturity date).
 
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
 means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Company or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
 
 means (a) the Pledge Agreement dated August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent and (b) in connection with pledges of shares of or other equity interests in Foreign Subsidiaries, other pledge agreements or similar agreements in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Pledge Agreements
 
 means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
 
 means any Person (a) listed in the Annex to the Executive Order or identified pursuant to Section 1 of the Executive Order; (b) that is owned or controlled by, or acting for or on behalf of, any Person listed in the Annex to the Executive Order or identified pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of the Executive Order; (c) with whom a Lender is prohibited from dealing or otherwise engaging in any transaction by any terrorism or anti-laundering law, including the Executive Order; (d) who commits, threatens, conspires to commit, or support terrorism as defined in the Executive Order; (e) who is named as a Specially designated national or blocked person on the most current list published by the OFAC at its official website, at or any replacement website or other replacement official publication of such list; or (f) who is owned or controlled by a Person listed above in clause (c) or (e).
Prohibited Person
http://www.treas.gov/offices/enforcement/ofac/sdn/t11sdn.pdf
 
 means a Domestic Subsidiary that does not own any assets other than, or engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of, Equity Interests of one or more Foreign Subsidiaries and that does not have any Indebtedness or liabilities other than (a) liabilities incidental to its ownership of such Equity Interests and (b) liabilities as a Guarantor of the Obligations.
Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company
 
 means the last day of each March, June, September and December in each year.
Quarterly Dates
 
 has the meaning set forth in .
Re-Allocation Date
Section 2.19(e)
 
 means (a) the Administrative Agent, (b) any Lender and (c) the Issuing Lender, as applicable.
Recipient
 
 has the meaning set forth in .
Register
Section 9.04(b)
 
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Persons Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
 means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Exposures and unused Commitments representing at least 51% of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures and unused Commitments at such time. The Revolving Exposures and unused Commitments of any Defaulting Lender shall be disregarded in determining Required Lenders at any time.
Required Lenders
 
 means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Company or any Subsidiary, or any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in the Company or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests in the Company.
Restricted Payment
 
 
 means any Subsidiary that is not an Unrestricted Subsidiary.
Restricted Subsidiary
 
 means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the (a) outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Revolving Loans and (b) such Lenders LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure, in each case at such time.
Revolving Exposure
 
 means a Loan made pursuant to .
Revolving Loan
Section 2.01
 
 means Standard & Poors Rating Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. and any successor thereto.
S&P
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statement.
Second Amended and Restated Agreement
 
 means the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, each Lender, the Issuing Lender and each other Person to which any of the Obligations is owed.
Secured Parties
 
 means (a) the Security Agreement dated August 24, 1999 and executed in connection with the Original Credit Agreement among the Company, the Domestic Subsidiaries from time to time party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties and (b) in connection with the creation of security interests in the assets of Foreign Subsidiaries, other security agreements or similar agreements in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, as the same may be ratified, amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the provisions hereof.
Security Agreements
 
 means the Security Agreements, the Pledge Agreements, the Guarantee Agreements, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Guarantee Agreements, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Pledge Agreement, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of Security Agreement, the Joinder to, Ratification and Amendment of the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement and each other security document or pledge agreement delivered pursuant to or to secure any of the Obligations or in accordance with applicable local or foreign law to grant a valid, perfected security interest in any property, and all UCC or other financing statements or instruments of perfection required by this Agreement or any security agreement to be filed with respect to the security interests in property and fixtures created pursuant to the Security Agreement and any other document or instrument utilized to pledge as collateral for the Obligations any property of whatever kind or nature.
Security Documents
Section 5.11
Section 5.13
 
 means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentage (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject with respect to the Adjusted LIBO Rate, for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency Liabilities in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentage shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
 
 
 means subordinated debt securities issued by the Company that (a) are subordinated to the Obligations pursuant to subordination provisions approved by Administrative Agent, (b) contain covenants, events of default and mandatory redemption, repayment, prepayment or repurchase requirements approved by Administrative Agent, and (c) do not mature, and are not subject to any scheduled amortization, redemption, repayment, prepayment or repurchase requirement, prior to the date one year after the Maturity Date.
Subordinated Indebtedness
 
 means, with respect to any Person (the ) at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parents consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which Equity Interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
 
 means any subsidiary of the Company.
Subsidiary
 
 means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of the Company or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
 
 means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder.
Swingline Lender
 
 means a Loan made pursuant to .
Swingline Loan
Section 2.04
 
 means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, withholdings (including backup withholding), assessments, fees or other charges imposed by any Governmental Authority including any interest, additions to tax or penalties applicable thereto.
Taxes
 
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Preliminary Statement.
Third Amended and Restated Agreement
 
 means, as of any date, the sum of (a) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date, in the amount that would be reflected on a balance sheet prepared as of such date on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, plus (b) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries outstanding as of such date that is not required to be reflected on a balance sheet in accordance with GAAP, determined on a consolidated basis; that, (i) for purposes of clause (b) above, the term Indebtedness shall not include contingent obligations of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty unless such letter of credit or letter of guaranty supports an obligation that constitutes Indebtedness and
Total Indebtedness
provided
(ii) solely for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio but not for any other purpose, all references to Restricted Subsidiaries in this definition and in the definitions referred to herein shall be deemed references to Subsidiaries.
 
 means the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrowers of this Agreement, the execution, delivery and performance by the Loan Parties of the other Loan Documents, the borrowing of Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
 
 means the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effect in the State of Texas or, where applicable as to specific Collateral, any other relevant state.
UCC
 
 means (i) any Foreign Subsidiary of the Company that at the time of determination shall have been designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary by the Company in the manner provided below (and shall not subsequently have been designated as a Restricted Subsidiary) and (ii) any subsidiary of an Unrestricted Subsidiary. The Company may from time to time designate any Foreign Subsidiary (other than a Foreign Subsidiary that, immediately after such designation, shall hold any Indebtedness of or Equity Interest in the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary) as an Unrestricted Subsidiary, and may designate any Unrestricted Subsidiary as a Restricted Subsidiary so long as, immediately after giving effect to such designation, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing. Any designation by the Company pursuant to this definition shall be made in an officers certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent and containing a certification that such designation is in compliance with the terms of this definition. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Borrowing Subsidiary shall at any time be an Unrestricted Subsidiary. contains a list of the Subsidiaries that are or have been designated by the Company as Unrestricted Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date.
Unrestricted Subsidiary
Schedule 1.01
 
 has the meaning set forth in .
USA PATRIOT Act
Section 9.16
 
 
 means a United States person within the meaning of Section 7701(a)(30) of the Code.
U.S. Person
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
Section 2.16(f)(ii)(B)(3)
 
 means any Subsidiary of the Company all the Equity Interests of which (other than directors qualifying shares and Equity Interests held by other than the Persons to the extent such Equity Interests are required by applicable law to be held by a Person other than the Company or one of its Subsidiaries) is owned by the Company or one or more Wholly Owned Subsidiaries.
Wholly Owned Subsidiary
 
 means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation. The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall. Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (c) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Section 1.02         
Terms Generally
 
. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Company notifies the Administrative Agent that the Company requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the Effective Date in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Company that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith. Notwithstanding any other provision contained herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed, and all computations of amounts and ratios referred to herein shall be made (i) without giving effect to any election under Accounting Standards Codification 825-10-25 (or any other Accounting Standards Codification or Financial Accounting Standard having a similar result or effect) to value any Indebtedness or other liabilities of the Company or any Subsidiary at fair value, as defined therein and (ii) without giving effect to any treatment of Indebtedness in respect of convertible debt instruments under Accounting Standards Codification 470-20 (or any other Accounting Standards Codification or Financial Accounting Standard having a similar result or effect) to value any such Indebtedness in a reduced or bifurcated manner as described therein, and such Indebtedness shall at all times be valued at the full stated principal amount thereof.
Section 1.03         
Accounting Terms; GAAP
provided
 
 
. For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (e.g., a ) or by Type (e.g., a ) or by Class and Type (e.g., a ). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (e.g., a ) or by Type (e.g., a ) or by Class and Type (e.g., a ).
Section 1.04         
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
Revolving Loan
Eurodollar Loan
Eurodollar Revolving Loan
Revolving Borrowing
Eurodollar Borrowing
Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing
 
ARTICLE II
 
The Credits
 
. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to any Borrower from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in (i) such Lenders Revolving Exposure exceeding such Lenders Commitment or (ii) in the case of any Foreign Borrower, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans of all Foreign Borrowers exceeding $20,000,000. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, any Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Section 2.01         
Commitments
 
Section 2.02         
Loans and Borrowings
.
 
(a)          Each Revolving Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lenders failure to make Loans as required.
provided
 
(b)          Subject to , each Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as such Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the applicable Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 2.13
provided
 
 
(c)          At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $1,000,000. At the time that each ABR Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000; that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to (i) the entire unused balance of the total Commitments, (ii) that which is required to repay a Swingline Loan or (iii) that which is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by . Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of eight Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
Section 2.05(e)
provided
 
(d)          Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, no Borrower shall be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
 
. To request a Borrowing, the applicable Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request signed by the applicable Borrower. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with :
Section 2.03         
Requests for Borrowings
Section 2.02
 
(i)          the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
 
(ii)         the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)        whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
 
(iv)        in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term ;
Interest Period
 
(v)         the Borrower requesting such Borrowing; and
 
(vi)        the location and number of the Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of .
Section 2.06(a)
 
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the applicable Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
 
 
Section 2.04         
Swingline Loans
.
 
(a)          Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans to the Company from time to time during the Availability Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $10,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the total Revolving Exposures exceeding the total Commitments; that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Company may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans. Each Swingline Loan shall be in an amount that is not less than $100,000.
provided
 
(b)          To request a Swingline Loan, the Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by telecopy), not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested date (which shall be a Business Day) and amount of the requested Swingline Loan. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Company. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Company by means of a credit to the general deposit account of the Company with the Swingline Lender (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in , by remittance to the Issuing Lender) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
Section 2.05(e)
 
(c)          The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Lenders will participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the Company (or other party on behalf of the Company) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear; that any such payment so remitted shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or to the Administrative Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment is required to be refunded to the Company for any reason. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the Company of any default in the payment thereof.
Section 2.06
Section 2.06
mutatis
mutandis
provided
 
 
Section 2.05         
Letters of Credit
.
 
(a)          . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Company may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account or for the joint and several account of the Company and a Borrowing Subsidiary in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender, at any time and from time to time during the Availability Period. Such Letters of Credit may be used for the benefit of any Subsidiary and may identify such Subsidiary in the text thereof so long as either the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary is the account party thereon. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Company to, or entered into by the Company with, the Issuing Lender relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
General
 
(b)          . To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Company shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the Issuing Lender) to the Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by the Issuing Lender, the Company also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Lenders standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Company shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $20,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Exposures shall not exceed the total Commitments.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions
 
(c)          . Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Maturity Date; , , that any Letter of Credit with a one-year tenor may provide for the renewal thereof for additional one-year periods (which shall in no event extend beyond the date referred to in clause (ii) above).
Expiration Date
provided
however
 
 
(d)          . By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Lender or the Lenders, the Issuing Lender hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Lender, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Lender, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Lender and not reimbursed by the Company on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Company for any reason. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations
 
(e)          . If the Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Company shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Company shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Company prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the Business Day immediately following the day that the Company receives such notice; that, if such LC Disbursement is not less than $100,000, the Company may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with or that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Loan or a Swingline Loan in an equivalent amount, and to the extent so financed, the Companys obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan. If the Company fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Company in respect thereof and such Lenders Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Company, in the same manner as provided in with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Company pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Lender or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Lender, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Lender as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Lender for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Company of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement
provided
Section 2.03
Section 2.04
Section 2.06
Section 2.06
mutatis mutandis
 
 
(f)          . The Companys obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Lender under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Companys obligations hereunder. Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Lender, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Lender; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Lender from liability to the Company to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Company to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Company that are caused by the Issuing Lenders failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Lender (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Lender shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Lender may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
Obligations Absolute
provided
 
(g)          . The Issuing Lender shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Company by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any demand for payment under a Letter of Credit and whether the Issuing Lender has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Company of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Lender and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures
provided
 
(h)          . If the Issuing Lender shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Company shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Company reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Company fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Lender, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Lender shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest
provided
Section 2.12(c)
 
 
(i)          . The Issuing Lender may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Company, the Administrative Agent, the replaced Issuing Lender and the successor Issuing Lender. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Issuing Lender. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Company shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Lender pursuant to . From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of the Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term Issuing Lender shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Lender, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Lenders, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Lender hereunder, the replaced Issuing Lender shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Lender under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of the Issuing Lender
Section 2.11(b)
 
(j)          . If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Company receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Company shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount of Cash Collateral equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such Cash Collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in or of . The Company also shall deposit Cash Collateral pursuant to this paragraph as and to the extent required by . Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Company under this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Companys risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Lender for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Company for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Company under this Agreement. If the Company is required to provide an amount of Cash Collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Company within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived. If the Company is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder pursuant to , such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Company as and to the extent that, after giving effect to such return, the Company would remain in compliance with and no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Cash Collateralization
provided
clause (h)
(i)
ARTICLE VII
Section 2.10(b)
Section 2.10(b)
Section 2.10(b)
 
 
(k)          . In the event that the Company terminates the Commitments pursuant to and there are outstanding Letters of Credit at such time, the Company shall pledge to, and deposit in an account with, the Issuing Lender an amount of Cash Collateral equal to the aggregate face amount of such Letters of Credit.
Cash Collateralization upon Termination of Commitments
Section 2.08
 
Section 2.06         
Funding of Borrowings
.
 
(a)          Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders; that Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in . The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the applicable Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower maintained with the Administrative Agent and designated by such Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that ABR Revolving Loans or Swingline Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Issuing Lender.
provided
Section 2.04
provided
Section 2.05(e)
 
(b)          Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the applicable Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the applicable Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to such Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the applicable Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing.
 
Section 2.07         
Interest Elections
.
 
(a)          Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the applicable Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. Each Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Loans, which may not be converted or continued.
 
 
(b)          To make an election pursuant to this Section, the applicable Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under if the Borrower were requesting a Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the applicable Borrower.
Section 2.03
 
(c)          Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with :
Section 2.02
 
(i)          the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
 
(ii)         the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)        whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
(iv)        if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the applicable Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.
 
(d)          Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lenders portion of each resulting Borrowing.
 
(e)          If the applicable Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent so notifies the Company, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
 
 
Section 2.08         
Termination and Reduction of Commitments
.
 
(a)          Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
 
(b)          The Company may at any time terminate or from time to time reduce the Commitments; provided that (i) each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $5,000,000 and (ii) the Company shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Loans in accordance with , the sum of the Revolving Exposures would exceed the total Commitments.
Section 2.10
 
(c)          The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Company pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Company may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Company (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
provided
 
Section 2.09         
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
.
 
(a)          Each Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan of such Lender on the Maturity Date. The Company hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Swingline Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Swingline Loan on the earlier of the Maturity Date and the fifteenth day of the calendar month after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made, the Company shall repay all Swingline Loans then outstanding.
provided
 
(b)          Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of each Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
(c)          The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrowers to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
 
(d)          The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of any Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
 
(e)          Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the applicable Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and the Company. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to ) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
Section 9.04
 
Section 2.10         
Prepayment of Loans
.
 
(a)          Each Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to prior notice in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
 
(b)          In the event and on each occasion that the sum of the Revolving Exposures exceeds the total Commitments, the Borrowers shall prepay Borrowings (or, if no such Borrowings are outstanding, deposit cash collateral in an account with the Administrative Agent pursuant to ) in an aggregate amount equal to such excess.
Section 2.05(j)
 
(c)          The Company shall notify the Administrative Agent (and in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment, (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment or (iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of optional prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by , then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with . Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in . Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by .
provided
Section 2.08
Section 2.08
Section 2.02
Section 2.12
 
 
Section 2.11         
Fees
.
 
(a)          The Company shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Margin on the daily amount of the unused Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which such Commitment terminates. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the third Business Day following the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). For purposes of calculating the unused Commitment of each Lender, Swingline Loans made by or deemed made or attributable to such Lender shall not count as usage.
 
(b)          The Company shall pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Margin used to determine the interest rate applicable to Eurodollar Loans on the average daily amount of such Lenders LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lenders Commitment terminates and the date on which it ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to the Issuing Lender a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 0.125% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as the Issuing Lenders standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; provided that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Lender pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
 
(c)          The Company shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times set forth in the Fee Letter.
 
(d)          All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the Issuing Lender, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
 
 
.
Section 2.12         
Interest
 
(a)          The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Margin.
 
(b)          The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Margin.
 
(c)          Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by a Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
 
(d)          Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and, in the case of Loans, upon termination of the Commitments; provided that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Loan prior to the end of the Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
 
(e)          All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Section 2.13        
Alternate Rate of Interest
 
(i)          the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
 
(ii)         the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Company and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Company and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing; that if the circumstances giving rise to such notice affect only one Type of Borrowings, then the other Type of Borrowings shall be permitted.
provided
 
.
Section 2.14         
Increased Costs
 
(a)          If any Change in Law shall:
 
(i)          impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, compulsory loan, insurance charge or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by or participated in, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or the Issuing Lender;
 
(ii)         subject any Recipient to any Taxes (other than (A) Indemnified Taxes, (B) Taxes described in clauses (b) through (d) of the definition of Excluded Taxes and (C) Connection Income Taxes) on its loans, loan principal, letters of credit, commitments, or other obligations, or its deposits, reserves, other liabilities or capital attributable thereto; or
 
(iii)        impose on any Lender or the Issuing Lender or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense (other than Taxes) affecting this Agreement or Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender or to such other Recipient of making, converting to, continuing or maintaining any Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender, the Issuing Lender or such other Recipient of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit (or of maintaining its obligation to participate in or to issue any Letter of Credit) or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender, the Issuing Lender or such other Recipient hereunder (whether of principal, interest or any other amount), then, upon the request of such Lender, the Issuing Lender or such other Recipient, the Company will pay to such Lender, the Issuing Lender or such other Recipient, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender, the Issuing Lender or other Recipient, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b)          If any Lender or the Issuing Lender determines that any Change in Law affecting such Lender or the Issuing Lender or any lending office of such Lender or such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders holding company, if any, regarding capital or liquidity requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders capital or on the capital of such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Lender, to a level below that which such Lender or the Issuing Lender or such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders policies and the policies of such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Company will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender or such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
 
(c)          A certificate of a Lender or the Issuing Lender setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the Issuing Lender or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section shall be delivered to the Company and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Company shall pay such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
(d)          Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the Issuing Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders right to demand such compensation; that the Company shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the Issuing Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, notifies the Company of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lenders or the Issuing Lenders intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
 
. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Revolving Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the applicable Borrower pursuant to , then, in any such event, the applicable Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the applicable Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The applicable Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Section 2.15         
Break Funding Payments
Section 2.10(c)
Section 2.18
 
 
.
Section 2.16         
Taxes
 
(a)          . Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of any Loan Party under any Loan Document shall be made without deduction or withholding for any Taxes, except as required by applicable law. If any applicable law (as determined in the good faith discretion of an applicable withholding agent) requires the deduction or withholding of any Tax from any such payment by a withholding agent, then the applicable withholding agent shall be entitled to make such deduction or withholding and shall timely pay the full amount deducted or withheld to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law and, if such Tax is an Indemnified Tax, then the sum payable by the applicable Loan Party shall be increased as necessary so that after such deduction or withholding has been made (including such deductions and withholdings applicable to additional sums payable under this ) the applicable Recipient receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deduction or withholding been made.
Payments Free of Taxes
Section 2.16
 
(b)          . The Loan Parties shall timely pay to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law, or at the option of the Administrative Agent timely reimburse it for, Other Taxes.
Payment of Other Taxes by the Loan Parties
 
(c)          . The Loan Parties shall jointly and severally indemnify each Recipient, within 10 days after demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes (including Indemnified Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) payable or paid by such Recipient or required to be withheld or deducted from a payment to such Recipient and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to the Company by a Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
Indemnification by the Loan Parties
 
(d)          . Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent, within 10 days after demand therefor, for (i) any Indemnified Taxes attributable to such Lender (but only to the extent that any Loan Party has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such Indemnified Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Loan Parties to do so), (ii) any Taxes attributable to such Lenders failure to comply with the provisions of relating to the maintenance of a Participant Register and (iii) any Excluded Taxes attributable to such Lender, in each case, that are payable or paid by the Administrative Agent in connection with any Loan Document, and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Administrative Agent shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Each Lender hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender under any Loan Document or otherwise payable by the Administrative Agent to the Lender from any other source against any amount due to the Administrative Agent under this paragraph (d).
Indemnification by the Lenders
Section 9.04(c)
 
 
(e)          . As soon as practicable after any payment of Taxes by any Loan Party to a Governmental Authority pursuant to this , such Loan Party shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Evidence of Payments
Section 2.16
 
(f)          .
Status of Lenders
 
(i)          Any Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding Tax with respect to payments made under any Loan Document shall deliver to the Company and the Administrative Agent, at the time or times reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent, such properly completed and executed documentation reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate of withholding. In addition, any Lender, if reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent, shall deliver such other documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Company or the Administrative Agent as will enable the Company or the Administrative Agent to determine whether or not such Lender is subject to backup withholding or information reporting requirements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding two sentences, the completion, execution and submission of such documentation (other than such documentation set forth in , and below) shall not be required if in the Lenders reasonable judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Lender.
Section 2.17(f)(ii)(A)
(ii)(B)
(ii)(D)
 
(ii)         Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, in the event that the Borrower is a U.S. Person,
  
(A)         any Lender that is a U.S. Person shall deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent on or prior to the date on which such Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of IRS Form W-9 certifying that such Lender is exempt from U.S. Federal backup withholding tax;
 
(B)         any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent), whichever of the following is applicable:
 
 
(1)         in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party (x) with respect to payments of interest under any Loan Document, executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the interest article of such tax treaty and (y) with respect to any other applicable payments under any Loan Document, IRS Form W-8BEN establishing an exemption from, or reduction of, U.S. Federal withholding Tax pursuant to the business profits or other income article of such tax treaty;
 
(2)         executed originals of IRS Form W-8ECI;
 
(3)         in the case of a Foreign Lender claiming the benefits of the exemption for portfolio interest under Section 881(c) of the Code, (x) a certificate substantially in the form of to the effect that such Foreign Lender is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code, a 10 percent shareholder of the Borrower within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(B) of the Code, or a controlled foreign corporation described in Section 881(c)(3)(C) of the Code (a ) and (y) executed originals of IRS Form W-8BEN; or
Exhibit 2.16A
U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate
 
(4)         to the extent a Foreign Lender is not the beneficial owner, executed originals of IRS Form W-8IMY, accompanied by IRS Form W-8ECI, IRS Form W-8BEN, a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of or , IRS Form W-9, and/or other certification documents from each beneficial owner, as applicable; that if the Foreign Lender is a partnership and one or more direct or indirect partners of such Foreign Lender are claiming the portfolio interest exemption, such Foreign Lender may provide a U.S. Tax Compliance Certificate substantially in the form of on behalf of each such direct and indirect partner;
Exhibit 2.16B
Exhibit 2.16C
provided
Exhibit 2.16D
 
(C)         any Foreign Lender shall, to the extent it is legally entitled to do so, deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (in such number of copies as shall be requested by the recipient) on or prior to the date on which such Foreign Lender becomes a Lender under this Agreement (and from time to time thereafter upon the reasonable request of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent), executed originals of any other form prescribed by applicable law as a basis for claiming exemption from or a reduction in U.S. Federal withholding Tax, duly completed, together with such supplementary documentation as may be prescribed by applicable law to permit the Borrower or the Administrative Agent to determine the withholding or deduction required to be made; and
 
 
(D)         if a payment made to a Lender under any Loan Document would be subject to U.S. Federal withholding Tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent as may be necessary for the Borrower and the Administrative Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lenders obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this clause (D), FATCA shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the Effective Date.
 
Each Lender agrees that if any form or certification it previously delivered expires or becomes obsolete or inaccurate in any respect, it shall update such form or certification or promptly notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent in writing of its legal inability to do so.
 
(g)          . If the Administrative Agent, a Lender or the Issuing Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Company or with respect to which any Loan Party has paid additional amounts pursuant to this , it shall pay over such refund to the Company (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Company under this with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); , that the Company, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Company (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender in the event the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. This Section shall not be construed to require the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes that it deems confidential) to the Company or any other Person.
Treatment of Certain Refunds
Section 2.16
Section 2.16
provided
 
(h)          . Each partys obligations under this shall survive the resignation or replacement of the Administrative Agent or any assignment of rights by, or the replacement of, a Lender, the termination of the Commitments and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of all obligations under any Loan Document.
Survival
Section 2.16
 
(i)          For purposes of this , the term Lender includes the Issuing Lender.
Section 2.16
 
 
.
Section 2.17         
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs
 
(a)          Each Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under , or , or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, Houston time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 712 Main Street, Houston, Texas, except payments to be made directly to the Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to , , and shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments hereunder shall be made in dollars.
Section 2.14
2.15
2.16
Section 2.14
2.15
2.16
9.03
 
(b)          If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
 
(c)          If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans, or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans, resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans, and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by a Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Company or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). Each Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of such Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
 
(d)          Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Lender hereunder that such Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if such Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the Issuing Lender, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Lender with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
(e)          If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to , or , , or , then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lenders obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
Section 2.05(d)
(e)
2.06(b)
2.17(d)
9.03(c)
 
.
Section 2.18         
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders
 
(a)          If any Lender requests compensation under , or if a Borrower is required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , then such Lender shall (at the request of the Borrower) use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to or , as the case may be, in the future and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrowers shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Section 2.14
Section 2.16
Section 2.14
2.16
 
 
(b)          If any Lender requests compensation under , or if a Borrower is required to pay any Indemnified Taxes or additional amounts to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to , and, in each case, such Lender has declined or is unable to designate a different lending office in accordance with paragraph (a) above, or if any Lender is a Defaulting Lender or a Non-Consenting Lender, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in ), all its interests, rights (other than its existing rights to payments made pursuant to and ) and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and if a Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Lender), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts), (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under or payments required to be made pursuant to , such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments and (iv) in the case of any assignment resulting from a Lender becoming a Non-Consenting Lender, the applicable assignee shall have consented to the applicable amendment, waiver or consent. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
Section 2.14
Section 2.16
Section 9.04
Sections 2.14
2.16
provided
Section 2.14
Section 2.16
 
.
Section 2.19         
Increase of Commitments
 
(a)          If no Default, Event of Default or Material Adverse Effect shall have occurred and be continuing and all of the conditions described in and are satisfied, the Company may at any time and from time to time request an increase of the aggregate Commitments by notice to the Administrative Agent in writing of the amount of such proposed increase (such notice, a ); , however, that (i) each such increase shall be at least $10,000,000, (ii) the cumulative increase in Commitments pursuant to this shall not exceed $100,000,000, (iii) the Commitment of any Lender may not be increased without such Lenders consent, and (iv) the aggregate amount of the Lenders Commitments shall not exceed $300,000,000. Following any Commitment Increase Notice, the Company may, in its sole discretion, but with the consent of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Swingline Lender as to any Person that is not at such time a Lender (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), offer to any existing Lender or to one or more additional banks or financial institutions the opportunity to participate in all or a portion of such unsubscribed portion of the increased Commitments pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) below, as applicable, by notice to the Administrative Agent.
Section 4.02(a)
(d)
Commitment Increase Notice
provided
Section 2.19
Promptly and in any event within ten (10) Business Days after receipt of notice from the Company of its desire to offer such unsubscribed commitments to certain existing Lenders, to the additional banks or financial institutions identified therein or such existing Lenders, additional banks or financial institutions identified by the Administrative Agent and approved by the Company, the Administrative Agent shall notify such proposed lenders of the opportunity to participate in all or a portion of such unsubscribed portion of the increased Commitments.
 
(b)          Any additional bank or financial institution that the Company selects to offer participation in the increased Commitments shall notify the Administrative Agent of its agreement to participate in the increased Commitments within ten (10) Business Days of the date the Administrative Agents notice described in paragraph (a) above is sent and shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent a New Lender Agreement setting forth its Commitment, and, upon the effectiveness of such New Lender Agreement, such bank or financial institution (a ) shall become a Lender for all purposes and to the same extent as if originally a party hereto and shall be bound by and entitled to the benefits of this Agreement, and the signature pages hereof shall be deemed to be amended to add the name of such New Lender and the definition of Commitment in hereof shall be deemed amended to increase the aggregate Commitments of the Lenders by the Commitment of such New Lender, that the Commitment of any New Lender shall be an amount not less than $5,000,000 (or any remaining portion of the increased Commitments not subscribed to by the Lenders).
New Lender
Section 1.01
provided
 
 
(c)          Any Lender that accepts an offer to it by the Company to increase its Commitment pursuant to this shall, in each case, execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent a Commitment Increase Agreement setting forth its Commitment, and, upon the effectiveness of such Commitment Increase Agreement, such Lender shall be bound by and entitled to the benefits of this Agreement with respect to the full amount of its Commitment as so increased, and the definition of Commitment in hereof shall be deemed to be amended to reflect such increase.
Section 2.19
Section 1.01
 
(d)          The effectiveness of any New Lender Agreement or Commitment Increase Agreement shall be contingent upon receipt by the Administrative Agent of such corporate resolutions of the Company and legal opinions of counsel to the Company as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request with respect thereto, in each case in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(e)          If any bank or financial institution becomes a New Lender pursuant to or any Lenders Commitment is increased pursuant to , additional Loans made on or after the effectiveness thereof (the ) shall be made pro rata based on their respective Commitments in effect on or after such Re-Allocation Date (except to the extent that any such pro rata borrowings would result in any Lender making an aggregate principal amount of Loans in excess of its Commitment, in which case such excess amount will be allocated to, and made by, such New Lender and/or Lenders with such increased Commitments to the extent of, and pro rata based on, their respective Commitments), and continuations of Loans outstanding on such Re-Allocation Date shall be effected by repayment of such Loans on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto and the making of new Loans pro rata based on the respective Commitments in effect on and after such Re-Allocation Date.
Section 2.19(b)
Section 2.19(c)
Re-Allocation Date
 
(f)          If on any Re-Allocation Date there is an unpaid principal amount of Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans, such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans shall remain outstanding with the respective holders thereof until the expiration of their respective Interest Periods (unless the Company elects to prepay any thereof in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Agreement), and interest on and repayments of such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans will be paid thereon to the respective Lenders holding such Eurodollar Loans or ABR Loans pro rata based on the respective principal amounts thereof outstanding.
 
 
. On or after the Effective Date, the Company may designate any Restricted Subsidiary of the Company as a Borrowing Subsidiary by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement executed by such Restricted Subsidiary and the Company, and five (5) Business Days following (i) such delivery and (ii) receipt of documentation reasonably requested by the Lenders in order to comply with the USA PATRIOT Act, such Restricted Subsidiary shall for all purposes of this Agreement be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement until the Company shall have executed and delivered to the Administrative Agent a Borrowing Subsidiary Termination with respect to such Restricted Subsidiary, whereupon such Restricted Subsidiary shall cease to be a Borrowing Subsidiary and a party to this Agreement. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, no Borrowing Subsidiary Termination will become effective as to any Borrowing Subsidiary at a time when any principal of or interest on any Revolving Loan to such Borrowing Subsidiary or any Letter of Credit issued for the account of such Borrowing Subsidiary shall be outstanding hereunder; that such Borrowing Subsidiary Termination shall be effective to terminate such Borrowing Subsidiarys right to make further Borrowings or to request Letters of Credit under this Agreement. As soon as practicable upon receipt of a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement, the Administrative Agent shall send a copy thereof to each Lender.
Section 2.20         
Borrowing Subsidiaries
provided
 
At any time that there shall exist a Defaulting Lender, within one Business Day following the written request of the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Lender (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), the Company shall Cash Collateralize the Issuing Lenders Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender (determined after giving effect to and any Cash Collateral provided by such Defaulting Lender) in an amount equal to the LC Exposure as of such date.
Section 2.21         
Cash Collateral
.
Section 2.22(a)(iv)
 
(a)          . The Company, and to the extent provided by any Defaulting Lender, such Defaulting Lender, hereby grants to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Issuing Lender, and agrees to maintain, a first priority security interest in all such Cash Collateral as security for the Defaulting Lenders obligation to fund participations in respect of Letters of Credit, to be applied pursuant to clause (b) below. If at any time the Administrative Agent determines that Cash Collateral is subject to any right or claim of any Person other than the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender as herein provided, or that the total amount of such Cash Collateral is less than the LC Exposure as of such date, the Company will, promptly upon demand by the Administrative Agent, pay or provide to the Administrative Agent additional Cash Collateral in an amount sufficient to eliminate such deficiency (after giving effect to any Cash Collateral provided by the Defaulting Lender).
Grant of Security Interest
 
(b)          . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, Cash Collateral provided under this or in respect of Letters of Credit shall be applied to the satisfaction of the Defaulting Lenders obligation to fund participations in respect of Letters of Credit (including, as to Cash Collateral provided by a Defaulting Lender, any interest accrued on such obligation) for which the Cash Collateral was so provided, prior to any other application of such property as may otherwise be provided for herein.
Application
Section 2.21
Section 2.22
 
(c)          . Cash Collateral (or the appropriate portion thereof) provided to reduce the Issuing Lenders Fronting Exposure shall no longer be required to be held as Cash Collateral pursuant to this following (i) the elimination of the applicable Fronting Exposure (including by the termination of Defaulting Lender status of the applicable Lender), or (ii) the determination by the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Lender that there exists excess Cash Collateral; that, subject to , the Person providing Cash Collateral and the Issuing Lender may agree that Cash Collateral shall be held to support future anticipated Fronting Exposure or other obligations and that to the extent that such Cash Collateral was provided by the Company, such Cash Collateral shall remain subject to the security interest granted pursuant to the Loan Documents.
Termination of Requirement
Section 2.21
provided
Section 2.21
provided
further
 
 
.
Section 2.22         
Defaulting Lenders
 
(a)          . Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then, until such time as such Lender is no longer a Defaulting Lender, to the extent permitted by applicable law:
Defaulting Lender Adjustments
 
(i)          . Such Defaulting Lenders right to approve or disapprove any amendment, waiver or consent with respect to this Agreement shall be restricted as set forth in the definition of Required Lenders and the last sentence of .
Waivers and Amendments
Section 9.02
 
(ii)         . Any payment of principal, interest, fees or other amounts received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Defaulting Lender (whether voluntary or mandatory, at maturity, pursuant to Article VII or otherwise) or received by the Administrative Agent from a Defaulting Lender pursuant to shall be applied at such time or times as may be determined by the Administrative Agent as follows: , to the payment of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Administrative Agent hereunder; , to the payment on a pro rata basis of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender hereunder; , to Cash Collateralize the Issuing Lenders Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender in accordance with ; , as the Company may request (so long as no Default or Event of Default exists), to the funding of any Loan in respect of which such Defaulting Lender has failed to fund its portion thereof as required by this Agreement, as determined by the Administrative Agent; , if so determined by the Administrative Agent and the Company, to be held in a deposit account and released pro rata in order to (x) satisfy such Defaulting Lenders potential future funding obligations with respect to Loans under this Agreement and (y) Cash Collateralize the Issuing Lenders future Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender with respect to future Letters of Credit issued under this Agreement, in accordance with ; , to the payment of any amounts owing to the Lenders, the Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by any Lender, the Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lenders breach of its obligations under this Agreement; , so long as no Default or Event of Default exists, to the payment of any amounts owing to the Company as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by the Company against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lenders breach of its obligations under this Agreement; and , to such Defaulting Lender or as otherwise directed by a court of competent jurisdiction; that if (x) such payment is a payment of the principal amount of any Loans or LC Disbursements in respect of which such Defaulting Lender has not fully funded its appropriate share, and (y) such Loans were made or the related Letters of Credit were issued at a time when the conditions set forth in were satisfied or waived, such payment shall be applied solely to pay the Loans of, and LC Disbursements owed to, all Non-Defaulting Lenders on a pro rata basis prior to being applied to the payment of any Loans of, or LC Disbursements owed to, such Defaulting Lender until such time as all Loans and funded and unfunded participations in LC Obligations and Swingline Loans are held by the Lenders pro rata in accordance with the Commitments hereunder without giving effect to . Any payments, prepayments or other amounts paid or payable to a Defaulting Lender that are applied (or held) to pay amounts owed by a Defaulting Lender or to post Cash Collateral pursuant to this shall be deemed paid to and redirected by such Defaulting Lender, and each Lender irrevocably consents hereto.
Defaulting Lender Waterfall
Section 9.08
first
second
third
Section 2.21
fourth
fifth
Section 2.21
sixth
seventh
eighth
provided
Section 4.02
Section 2.22(a)(iv)
Section 2.22(a)(ii)
 
 
(iii)        .
Certain Fees
 
(A)         No Defaulting Lender shall be entitled to receive any commitment fee pursuant to for any period during which that Lender is a Defaulting Lender (and the Company shall not be required to pay any such fee that otherwise would have been required to have been paid to that Defaulting Lender).
Section 2.11(a)
 
(B)         Each Defaulting Lender shall be entitled to receive participation fees pursuant to for any period during which that Lender is a Defaulting Lender only to the extent allocable to its Applicable Percentage of the stated amount of Letters of Credit for which it has provided Cash Collateral pursuant to .
Section 2.11(b)
Section 2.21
 
(C)         With respect to any participation fees not required to be paid to any Defaulting Lender pursuant to clause (B) above, the Company shall (1) pay to each Non-Defaulting Lender that portion of any such fee otherwise payable to such Defaulting Lender with respect to such Defaulting Lenders participation in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans that has been reallocated to such Non-Defaulting Lender pursuant to clause (iv) below, (2) pay to the Issuing Lender the amount of any such fee otherwise payable to such Defaulting Lender to the extent allocable to the Issuing Lenders Fronting Exposure to such Defaulting Lender, and (3) not be required to pay the remaining amount of any such fee.
 
(iv)         . All or any part of such Defaulting Lenders participation in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans shall be reallocated among the Non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages (calculated without regard to such Defaulting Lenders Commitment) but only to the extent that (A) the conditions set forth in are satisfied at the time of such reallocation (and, unless the Company shall have otherwise notified the Administrative Agent at such time, the Company shall be deemed to have represented and warranted that such conditions are satisfied at such time), and (B) such reallocation does not cause the aggregate Revolving Exposure of any Non-Defaulting Lender to exceed such Non-Defaulting Lenders Commitment. No reallocation hereunder shall constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder against a Defaulting Lender arising from that Lender having become a Defaulting Lender, including any claim of a Non-Defaulting Lender as a result of such Non-Defaulting Lenders increased exposure following such reallocation.
Reallocation of Participations to Reduce Fronting Exposure
Section 4.02
 
 
(v)          . If the reallocation described in clause (iv) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Company shall, without prejudice to any right or remedy available to it hereunder or under law, (A) first, prepay Swingline Loans in an amount equal to the Swingline Lenders Fronting Exposure and (B) second, Cash Collateralize the Issuing Lenders Fronting Exposure in accordance with the procedures set forth in .
Cash Collateral, Repayment of Swingline Loans
Section 2.21
 
(b)          . If the Company, the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Lender agree in writing that a Lender is no longer a Defaulting Lender, the Administrative Agent will so notify the parties hereto, whereupon as of the effective date specified in such notice and subject to any conditions set forth therein (which may include arrangements with respect to any Cash Collateral), that Lender will, to the extent applicable, purchase at par that portion of outstanding Loans of the other Lenders or take such other actions as the Administrative Agent may determine to be necessary to cause the Loans and funded and unfunded participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans to be held pro rata by the Lenders in accordance with the Commitments (without giving effect to , whereupon such Lender will cease to be a Defaulting Lender; that no adjustments will be made retroactively with respect to fees accrued or payments made by or on behalf of the Company while that Lender was a Defaulting Lender; and , , that except to the extent otherwise expressly agreed by the affected parties, no change hereunder from Defaulting Lender to Lender will constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder arising from that Lenders having been a Defaulting Lender.
Defaulting Lender Cure
Section 2.22(a)(iv)
provided
provided
further
 
(c)          . So long as any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, (i) the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loans unless it is satisfied that it will have no Fronting Exposure after giving effect to such Swingline Loan and (ii) the Issuing Lender shall not be required to issue, extend, renew or increase any Letter of Credit unless it is satisfied that it will have no Fronting Exposure after giving effect thereto.
New Swingline Loans/Letters of Credit
 
ARTICLE III
 
Representations and Warranties
 
Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders that:
 
. As of the Effective Date, each of the Company and its Subsidiaries (i) is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, (ii) has the requisite power and authority to conduct its business as it is presently being conducted, and (iii) is duly qualified or licensed to conduct business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction listed in . The Company and its Subsidiaries are qualified and licensed in all jurisdictions where they are required to be so qualified or licensed to operate their business and where the failure to so qualify or be in good standing, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. No proceeding to dissolve any Loan Party is pending or, to the Companys knowledge, threatened except for any merger, consolidation, liquidation, or dissolution permitted under .
Section 3.01         
Organization
Schedule 3.01
Section 6.03
 
 
. The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Partys corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrowers and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Borrowers or such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Section 3.02         
Authorization; Enforceability
 
. The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect, (ii) filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents and (iii) those the failure to obtain or make which, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any indenture, material agreement or other material instrument binding upon the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or their respective assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, except Liens created under the Loan Documents.
Section 3.03         
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
 
.
Section 3.04         
Financial Statements; No Material Adverse Change
 
(a)          The Company has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, reported on by KPMG LLP, independent certified public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the Fiscal Quarter and the portion of the current fiscal year ended March 31, 2012, certified by a Financial Officer. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
 
(b)          Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of the Company or its Subsidiaries has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities, unusual long-term commitments or unrealized losses.
 
 
(c)          Since December 31, 2011, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, property, condition (financial or otherwise), of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
 
. Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that (i) do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes and (ii) individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 3.05         
Properties
 
.
Section 3.06         
Litigation and Environmental Matters
 
(a)          There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
 
(b)          Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
 
(c)          Since the Effective Date, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
. Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries is in compliance with all Laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, material agreements and other material instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Section 3.07         
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
 
. The Company and each of its Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all patents, trademarks, trade names, service marks, copyrights, technology, know-how and processes (together with all applications therefor and licenses granting rights therein, ) reasonably necessary for the conduct of its business as currently conducted, except for those the failure to own or be licensed to use which could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. To the knowledge of the Company, (a) the use of Intellectual Property by the Company and its Subsidiaries does not infringe on the rights of any person, (b) no Intellectual Property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is being infringed upon by any person, and (c) no claim is pending or threatened in writing challenging the use or the validity of any Intellectual Property of the Company or any Subsidiary, except for infringements and claims referred to in the foregoing clauses (a), (b) and (c) that, in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 3.08         
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property
 
 
. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is an investment company as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
Section 3.09         
Investment Company Status
 
. Each of the Company and its Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) any Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Company or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 3.10         
Taxes
 
. No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $10,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
Section 3.11         
ERISA
 
. As of the Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened. The hours worked by and payments made to employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries have not been in violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other Law dealing with such matters in any manner that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. All payments due from the Company or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against any of them, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of the Company and its Subsidiaries except to the extent non-payment could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is bound.
Section 3.12         
Labor Matters
 
. lists all policies or binders of fire, liability, workers compensation, vehicular or other insurance held by or for the benefit of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (specifying the insurer, the policy number or covering note number with respect to binders) as of the Effective Date. As of the Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid. All insurance required by is in full force and effect, is with financially sound and reputable insurers and is in amounts and provides coverage that are reasonable and customary for Persons engaged in businesses similar to those conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries.
Section 3.13         
Insurance
Schedule 3.13
Section 5.07
 
 
. Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date, and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Effective Date and after giving effect to the application of the proceeds of such Loans, (a) the fair market value of the assets of each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinate, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities; (c) each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinate, contingent or otherwise as they become absolute and mature; and (d) each Loan Party (individually and on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries) will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct its business as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
Section 3.14         
Solvency
 
. sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Company in, each Subsidiary of the Company and identifies each Subsidiary that is a Domestic Subsidiary, each that is a Material Domestic Subsidiary and each that is a Foreign Subsidiary, in each case as of the Effective Date. As of Effective Date, there are no Borrowing Subsidiaries or any Unrestricted Subsidiaries and no Person has executed a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement (as defined in the Third Amended and Restated Agreement) or obtained a Loan under of the Original Credit Agreement, as amended.
Section 3.15         
Subsidiaries
Schedule 3.15
Section 2.01
 
. The Company has disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which it or any of its Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to it, that, individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any Loan Document or delivered hereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contain any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, taken as a whole in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, the Borrowers represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Section 3.16         
Disclosure
provided
 
. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is engaged principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of buying or carrying margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board). The proceeds of the Loans and the Letters of Credit will not be used, directly or indirectly, immediately, incidentally or ultimately, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any margin stock or for the purpose of reducing or retiring any Indebtedness which was originally incurred to purchase or carry margin stock or for any other purpose which might cause any of the Loans or the Letters of Credit under this Agreement to be purpose credit within the meaning of Regulation U or Regulation X of the Board.
Section 3.17         
Margin Stock
 
 
. The proceeds of the Loans shall be used only for working capital and other general corporate purposes, including without limitation, Acquisitions. Each Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent that all Loans will be for business, commercial, investment or other similar purpose and not primarily for personal, family, household or agricultural use, as such terms are used in the Texas Finance Code.
Section 3.18         
Use of Proceeds
 
. Except as set forth in , the Company and its Subsidiaries have no liabilities or obligations of any nature (whether known or unknown, and whether absolute, accrued, contingent or otherwise) except for (i) liabilities or obligations reflected or reserved against in the financial statements most recently delivered by the Borrower pursuant to , (ii) current liabilities incurred in the ordinary course of business since the date of such financial statements, (iii) liabilities or obligations that are not required to be included in financial statements prepared in accordance with GAAP, (iv) liabilities or obligations arising under Governmental Approvals or contracts to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or otherwise subject and (v) liabilities or obligations incurred after the most recently delivered financial statements and specifically permitted to be incurred under this Agreement.
Section 3.19         
No Undisclosed Liabilities
Schedule 3.19
Section 5.01
 
.
Section 3.20         
USA PATRIOT Act
 
(a)          Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any of their respective Affiliates over which any of the foregoing exercises management control (each, a ) is a Prohibited Person, and the Company, its Subsidiaries and, to the knowledge of the Company, such Controlled Affiliates are in compliance with all applicable orders, rules and regulations of OFAC.
Controlled Affiliate
 
(b)          Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any of their respective Affiliates (i) is targeted by United States or multilateral economic or trade sanctions currently in force; (ii) is owned or controlled by, or acts on behalf of, any Person that is targeted by United States or multilateral economic or trade sanctions currently in force; or (iii) is named, identified or described on any list of Persons with whom United States Persons may not conduct business, including any such blocked persons list, designated nationals list, denied persons list, entity list, debarred party list, unverified list, sanctions list or other such lists published or maintained by the United States, including OFAC, the United States Department of Commerce or the United States Department of State.
 
. None of Companys assets constitute property of, or are beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, by any Person targeted by economic or trade sanctions under US law, including but not limited to, the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, 50 U.S.C.  1701 et seq., The Trading with the Enemy Act, 50 U.S.C. App. 1 et seq. (the ), any of the foreign assets control regulations of the Treasury (31 C.F.R., Subtitle B, Chapter V, as amended) (the ) or any enabling legislation or regulations promulgated thereunder or executive order relating thereto (which includes, without limitation, (a) Executive Order No. 13224, effective as of September 24, 2001, and relating to Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transaction With Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit, or Support Terrorism (66 Fed. Reg. 49079 (2001)) (the ) and (b) the USA PATRIOT Act, if the result of such ownership would be that any Loan made by any Lender would be in violation of law (). No Embargoed Person has any interest of any nature whatsoever in the Company if the result of such interest would be that any Loan would be in violation of law. The Company has not engaged in business with Embargoed Persons if the result of such business would be that any Loan made by any Lender would be in violation of law. Neither the Company nor any Controlled Affiliate (a) is or will become a blocked person as described in the Executive Order, the Trading With the Enemy Act or the Foreign Assets Control Regulations or (b) engages or will engage in any dealings or transactions, or be otherwise associated, with any such blocked person. For purposes of determining whether or not a representation is true or a covenant is being complied with under this , the Borrower shall not be required to make any investigation into (a) the ownership of publicly traded stock or other publicly traded securities or (b) the beneficial ownership of any collective investment fund.
Section 3.21         
Embargoed Person
Trading With the Enemy Act
Foreign Assets Control Regulations
Executive Order
Embargoed Person
Section 3.21
 
 
ARTICLE IV
 
Conditions
 
. The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with ):
Section 4.01         
Effective Date
Section 9.02
 
(a)          The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy or email transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
 
(b)          The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Latham & Watkins LLP, counsel for the Company, and of Fees & Burgess, P.C., local Alabama counsel for the Company, both in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and Required Lenders, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions as the Required Lenders shall reasonably request. The Company hereby requests such counsel to deliver such opinion.
 
(c)          The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of each Loan Party, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, this Agreement or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
(d)          The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable legal fees) required to be reimbursed or paid by any Loan Party hereunder or under any Loan Documents.
 
 
(e)          All material governmental and third party approvals necessary or, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, advisable in connection with the financing contemplated hereby and the continuing operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries shall have been obtained and be in full force and effect.
 
(f)          The Lenders shall have received (i) audited consolidated financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries for the two most recent fiscal years ended prior to the Effective Date as to which such financial statements are available and (ii) satisfactory unaudited interim consolidated financial statements of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for each Fiscal Quarter ended subsequent to the date of the latest financial statements delivered pursuant to clause (i) of this paragraph as to which such financial statements are available which financial statements shall not be materially inconsistent with the financial statements or forecasts previously provided.
 
(g)          The Administrative Agent shall have received (i) promissory notes for each of the Lenders and (ii) each of the Security Documents and they shall constitute satisfactory security documentation to create first priority security interests in the Collateral (free and clear of all Liens, other than Liens permitted by ).
Section 6.02
 
(h)          The Collateral and Guarantee Requirement shall have been satisfied.
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Company and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to ).
Section 9.02
 
. The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of the Issuing Lender to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Section 4.02         
Each Credit Event
 
(a)          The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be deemed to have been made as a part of said request for a Borrowing and shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable except to the extent that such representations and warranties specifically refer to an earlier date, in which case they shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
 
(b)          No Material Adverse Effect shall have occurred since the date of the most recent Borrowing by the Company.
 
(c)          The Administrative Agent shall have received a request for a Borrowing as required by or the Issuing Lender and the Administrative Agent shall have received a request for the issuance of a Letter of Credit as required by ;
Section 2.03
Section 2.05(b)
 
 
(d)          At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrowers on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (d) of this Section.
 
. The obligation of the Lenders to make Loans to any Borrowing Subsidiary and the obligations of the Issuing Lender to issue Letters of Credit for the account of any Borrowing Subsidiary are subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Section 4.03         
Initial Credit Event for each Borrowing Subsidiary
 
(a)          The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received a Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement duly executed by such Borrowing Subsidiary and the other parties thereto.
 
(b)          The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion of counsel for such Borrowing Subsidiary, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Administrative Agent and Required Lenders, and covering such other matters relating to such Borrowing Subsidiary and its Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably request.
 
(c)          The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of such Borrowing Subsidiary, the authorization of the Transactions insofar as they relate to such Borrowing Subsidiary, the satisfaction of the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement insofar as it relates to the assets of such Borrowing Subsidiary and any other legal matters relating to such Borrowing Subsidiary, its Borrowing Subsidiary Agreement or such Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
ARTICLE V
 
Affirmative Covenants
 
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
. The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Section 5.01         
Financial Statements and Other Information
 
(a)          within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, the audited consolidated balance sheet and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries as of such year, all reported on by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
 
 
(b)          within 45 days after the end of each of the first three Fiscal Quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, the consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such Fiscal Quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, of the Company and the consolidated Subsidiaries and Company and the Restricted Subsidiaries as of such year, all certified by one of the Companys Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Subsidiaries or the Company on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)          concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Company (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with and , (iii) setting forth in a reasonably detailed schedule, a comparison of the consolidated results under clause (a) or (b) above with the financial condition and results of operations of the Company and its consolidated Restricted Subsidiaries, and (iv) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
Section 6.16
6.17
Section 3.04
 
(d)          concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, any management letter delivered to the management of the Company by the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements;
 
(e)          promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by the Company or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by the Company to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
 
(f)          promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Company or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of this Agreement, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request;
 
(g)          within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year, a summary description of the insurance policies of the Company and its Subsidiaries; and
 
 
(h)          promptly following any request thereof, all information and/or documentation necessary to comply with the USA PATRIOT Act or for Administrative Agent to confirm compliance with the USA PATRIOT Act.
 
Documents required to be delivered pursuant to may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date (i) on which the Company posts such documents, or provides a link thereto on the Companys website on the Internet at or (ii) on which such documents are delivered to the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent shall post such documents on the Companys behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative Agent have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent); that the Company shall deliver such documents in a form acceptable to the Administrative Agent; that Company shall be obligated to pay for all start-up and on-going maintenance costs associated with such Internet or intranet website. Except for such compliance certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Company with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
Section 5.01
www.bench.com
provided
provided
further
 
. The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt and, in any event, within five Business Days, written notice of the following:
Section 5.02         
Notices of Material Events
 
(a)          the occurrence of any Default;
 
(b)          the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect or that in any manner questions the validity of the Loan Documents;
 
(c)          the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Company and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties);
 
(d)          the occurrence of any event or any other development by which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) fails to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) becomes subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) receives notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) becomes aware of any basis for any Environmental Liability and in each of the preceding clauses, which individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; and
 
(e)          any other development (including the termination of any material contract) that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Company setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
 
. The Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change (a) in any Loan Partys corporate name or in the ownership of its properties, (b) in any Loan Partys identity or corporate structure or (c) in any Loan Partys Federal Taxpayer Identification Number and, at the time of the delivery of the financial statements required under , the Company will furnish to the Administrative Agent written notice of any change in the location of any office or facility at which Collateral is located or in which any Loan Party maintains books or records relating to Collateral owned by it. The Company agrees not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the UCC or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral. The Company also agrees promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
Section 5.03         
Information Regarding Collateral
Section 5.01(a)
 
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under .
Section 5.04         
Existence; Conduct of Business
provided
Section 6.03
 
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other obligations, including Tax liabilities, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (b) the Company or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.05         
Payment of Obligations
 
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.06         
Maintenance of Properties; Insurance
 
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies (a) insurance in such amounts (with no greater risk retention) and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies of established repute engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations and (b) all insurance required to be maintained pursuant to the Security Documents.
Section 5.07         
Insurance
 
 
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all material dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested, all at the Administrative Agents or such Lenders expense, except with respect to any inspection or examination and related discussions during a Default or Event of Default, in which case, the provisions of shall apply.
Section 5.08         
Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights
Section 9.03
 
. The Company will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all Laws (including Environmental Laws) and Orders applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 5.09         
Compliance with Laws
 
. The proceeds of the Loans will be used only for working capital and other general corporate purposes, including, without limitation, Acquisitions. No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations T, U and X.
Section 5.10         
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
 
. If any additional Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Effective Date, the Company will, no more than thirty days after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired, notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof and cause the Collateral and Guarantee Requirement to be satisfied (to the extent applicable) with respect to such Subsidiary and with respect to any Equity Interest in or Indebtedness of such Subsidiary owned or to be owned by or on behalf of the Company or any other Subsidiary.
Section 5.11         
Additional Subsidiaries
 
.
Section 5.12         
Ownership of Subsidiaries
 
(a)          The Company will, and will cause each of the Subsidiaries to, ensure that all Equity Interests in Domestic Subsidiaries are owned directly or indirectly at all times only by the Company or one or more other Domestic Subsidiaries.
 
(b)          The Company will, and will cause each of the Subsidiaries to, ensure that any Foreign Subsidiary (including each Foreign Subsidiary acquired in connection with an Acquisition), is owned directly or indirectly at all times by the Company or a Qualified Foreign Subsidiary Holding Company.
 
(c)          The Company will, and will cause each of the Subsidiaries to, ensure that all Equity Interests in Material Domestic Subsidiaries are owned directly or indirectly at all times only by the Company or one or more Material Domestic Subsidiaries.
 
 
. The Company will, and will cause each Subsidiary to, at its own cost and expense, execute, acknowledge and deliver any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments and take all such further actions, (including the filing and recording of financing statements, and other documents) which may be required under any applicable Law, or which may from time to time be reasonably necessary or as the Required Lenders may from time to time reasonably request in order to carry out the intent and purpose of the Loan Documents and the Transactions, including all such actions to establish, preserve, protect and perfect the estate, right, title and interest of the Lenders, or the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, to the Collateral (including Collateral acquired after the Effective Date) and preserve, protect and perfect first priority Liens (subject to Liens permitted by ) in favor of the Lenders, or the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, on any and all assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries, now owned or hereafter acquired, that are Collateral.
Section 5.13         
Further Assurances
Section 6.02
 
ARTICLE VI
Negative Covenants
 
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Section 6.01         
Indebtedness
 
(a)          the Obligations;
 
(b)          Subordinated Indebtedness;
 
(c)          Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or shorten the maturity or the weighted average life thereof;
Schedule 6.01
 
(d)          Intercompany Indebtedness (to the extent permitted by );
Section 6.04
 
(e)          Guarantees by the Company or any Subsidiary of Indebtedness of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary which Indebtedness is permitted under this Section, , in no event shall the Company or any Subsidiary guarantee the Indebtedness of any Unrestricted Subsidiary or any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party hereunder other than guarantees of trade payables of Unrestricted Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business not to exceed $10,000,000 at any time outstanding.
provided
 
(f)          Indebtedness of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiary or any Foreign Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations, and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 90 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (f) shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
 
(g)          Indebtedness of any Person that becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower after the Effective Date; that (i) such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower, as the case may be, and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (g) shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of pro forma Consolidated EBITDA for the four consecutive Fiscal Quarter period ending on the last day of the immediately prior Fiscal Quarter at the time such Person becomes a Domestic Subsidiary or a Foreign Borrower;
provided
 
(h)          Indebtedness of Unrestricted Subsidiaries for which neither the Company nor any Restricted Subsidiary shall be liable as obligor, under any Guarantee or otherwise;
 
(i)          other unsecured Indebtedness so long as, after giving effect thereto, the Company is in proforma compliance with the financial covenants in and ; and
Section 6.16
Section 6.17
 
(j)          other secured Indebtedness incurred by Foreign Subsidiaries that are Restricted Subsidiaries for working capital purposes in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding twenty-five percent (25%) of Consolidated EBITDA for the four consecutive Fiscal Quarter period ending on the last day of the immediately prior Fiscal Quarter at the time such Indebtedness is incurred.
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Section 6.02         
Liens
 
(a)          Liens created under the Loan Documents;
 
(b)          Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(c)          any Lien on any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary existing on the Effective Date and set forth in ; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the Effective Date, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
Schedule 6.02
provided
 
(d)          any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Company or any Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that is merged or consolidated with or into the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person is so merged or consolidated or becomes a Subsidiary; provided that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
 
 
(e)          Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Company or any Subsidiary, including Liens deemed to exist in respect of assets subject to Capital Lease Obligations; that (i) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by clause (f) of , (ii) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 90 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (iii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (iv) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary;
provided
Section 6.01
 
(f)          Liens securing Intercompany Indebtedness permitted under ;
Section 6.01(d)
 
(g)          Extensions, renewals or replacements of any Lien referred to in clauses (c), (d) and (e) of this Section; that the principal amount of the Indebtedness or obligations secured thereby is not increased and that any such extension, renewal or replacement is limited to the assets originally encumbered thereby;
provided
 
(h)          Liens on the assets of Unrestricted Subsidiaries securing Indebtedness permitted under ;
Section 6.01(h)
 
(i)          Liens securing Indebtedness permitted under ; and
Section 6.01(j)
 
(j)          additional Liens incurred by the Company and its Subsidiaries so long as the value of the property subject to such Liens, and the Indebtedness and other obligations secured thereby do not exceed $5,000,000 at any time.
 
.
Section 6.03         
Fundamental Changes
 
(a)          The Company will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (in one transaction or in a series of transactions) all or substantially all of its assets, or all or substantially all of the Equity Interests of any of its Subsidiaries (in each case, whether now owned or hereafter acquired), or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing
 
(i)          any Person may merge into the Company in a transaction in which the Company is the surviving corporation;
 
 
(ii)         any Person may merge with or into any Subsidiary in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary; that (A) if any party to such merger is a Loan Party the surviving Person must also be a Loan Party and must succeed to all the obligations of such Loan Party under the Loan Documents and (B) if any party to such merger is a Restricted Subsidiary the surviving Person shall also be a Restricted Subsidiary unless designated as an Unrestricted Subsidiary pursuant to the definition of such term;
provided
 
(iii)        any Subsidiary (other than a Loan Party) may liquidate or dissolve if the Company determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Company and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders; and
 
(iv)         sales permitted by ;
Section 6.05
 
that any such merger involving a Person that is not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by .
provided
Section 6.04
 
(b)          The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Company and its Subsidiaries on the Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto.
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests in or evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person (all of the foregoing being collectively called ), or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person (other than inventory acquired in the ordinary course of business) constituting a business unit or are substantial in relation to the consolidated assets of the Company, except:
Section 6.04         
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions
Investments
 
(a)          Permitted Investments by the Company and any Subsidiary and Permitted Foreign Investments by any Foreign Subsidiary, to the extent such Permitted Foreign Investments are either (i) generated by a Foreign Subsidiary organized in the same jurisdiction of organization of the commercial bank with which such Investment is maintained or (ii) consist of capital contributions made to such Foreign Subsidiary for the purpose of operations in the ordinary course of business;
 
(b)          Investments existing on the Effective Date and set forth on ;
Schedule 6.04
 
(c)          Investments existing on the Effective Date in Subsidiaries;
 
(d)          additional Investments in Persons that, immediately prior to such investments, are Restricted Subsidiaries;
 
(e)          Investments by Unrestricted Subsidiaries in Persons that, immediately prior to such investments, are Unrestricted Subsidiaries;
 
 
(f)          Investments consisting of all the issued and outstanding capital stock, or all or substantially all the assets, of Persons engaged in lines of business permitted under ; that (i) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing at the time any such Investment is made or would occur as a result thereof, and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such Investment, the proforma Leverage Ratio shall not exceed 2.75 to 1.0; , , that if the proforma Leverage Ratio shall be greater than 2.25 to 1.0 but less than or equal to 2.75 to 1.0 immediately after giving effect to such Investment, such Investment shall be paid for with cash consideration only in an amount, when combined with the aggregate cash consideration for all other Investments made pursuant to this clause (f) at times when the proforma Leverage Ratio shall be greater than 2.25 to 1.0 but less than or equal to 2.75 to 1.0, not to exceed $50,000,000 in the aggregate over the term of this Agreement;
Section 6.03(b)
provided
provided
further
 
(g)          Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by ; that a Subsidiary shall not Guarantee any Subordinated Indebtedness;
Section 6.01
provided
 
(h)          investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(i)          accounts receivable arising in the ordinary course of business;
 
(j)          Investments held by any Subsidiary at the time it becomes a Subsidiary in a transaction permitted by this Section;
 
(k)         reasonable advances to officers and employees of the Company and any Subsidiary for travel arising in the ordinary course of business;
 
(l)          loans to officers and employees of the Company or any Subsidiary, not to exceed $1,000,000 in the aggregate at any one time outstanding;
 
(m)        promissory notes and other noncash consideration received by the Company and its Subsidiaries in connection with any asset sale permitted hereunder;
 
(n)         advances in the form of prepayments of expenses, so long as such expenses were incurred in the ordinary course of business and are paid in accordance with customary trade terms of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
 
(o)         Guarantees by the Company of obligations of Restricted Subsidiaries incurred in the ordinary course of business and not constituting Indebtedness; and
 
(p)         other Investments made by the Company, any Domestic Subsidiary or any Foreign Subsidiary at times when no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing or would occur as a result thereof and that, taken together with all other investments made after the Effective Date under this clause (p) would not exceed $25,000,000.
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interest, except:
Section 6.05         
Asset Sales, etc
 
 
(a)          sales of inventory, used or surplus equipment, Permitted Investments and Permitted Foreign Investments in the ordinary course of business or as expressly permitted elsewhere in this Agreement;
 
(b)          sales, transfers and dispositions to the Company or a Restricted Subsidiary;
 
(c)          sales, transfers and dispositions to any Unrestricted Subsidiary; that such sales, transfers and dispositions are in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Company or such Unrestricted Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arms-length basis from unrelated third parties; and
provided
 
(d)          sales, transfers and other dispositions of other assets (other than transfers of less than 100% of the Equity Interests in any Subsidiary); that (i) the aggregate proceeds from such sales, transfers and other dispositions during any fiscal year shall not exceed the greater of (A) 10% of Consolidated Net Tangible Assets as of the beginning of such fiscal year and (B) 10% of Consolidated Net Income of the Company (excluding Unrestricted Subsidiaries) for such fiscal year and (ii) not more than 25% of the aggregate proceeds from such sales, transfers and other dispositions shall be received in noncash proceeds during any fiscal year.
provided
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Restricted Subsidiaries to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereinafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property that it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property sold or transferred.
Section 6.06         
Sale and Leaseback Transactions
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which the Company or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of the Company or any Subsidiary.
Section 6.07         
Swap Agreements
 
.
Section 6.08         
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments in Respect of Indebtedness
 
(a)          The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, or incur any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to do so, except that (i) Restricted Subsidiaries may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their capital stock and (ii) if no Default or Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or would occur as a result thereof, the Company may make any Restricted Payment if after giving effect to such Restricted Payment the proforma Leverage Ratio would not exceed 2.25 to 1.0.
 
 
(b)          The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, make or agree to make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) of or in respect of the principal of or interest on any Subordinated Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, defeasance, cancellation or termination of any Subordinated Indebtedness, except scheduled and other mandatory payments of interest and principal in respect of Subordinated Indebtedness; provided that no payment shall be made in respect of Subordinated Indebtedness that is prohibited by the subordination provisions applicable to such Subordinated Indebtedness.
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Company or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arms-length basis from unrelated third parties, (b) transactions between or among the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries not involving any other Affiliate, (c) transactions among or between Unrestricted Subsidiaries and (d) any Restricted Payment permitted by .
Section 6.09         
Transactions with Affiliates
Section 6.08
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiaries to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Restricted Subsidiary (i) to declare or make any Restricted Payment, (ii) to make or repay loans or advances to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary, (iii) to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary, or (iv) sell, lease or transfer any of its Property to the Company or any other Restricted Subsidiary; that (A) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by this Agreement, (B) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (C) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Restricted Subsidiary pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Restricted Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (D) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness and (E) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases and other contracts restricting the assignment thereof.
Section 6.10         
Restrictive Agreements
provided
Schedule 6.10
 
. The Company will not change the end of its fiscal year to a date other than December 31.
Section 6.11         
Change in Fiscal Year
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, amend its charter or by-laws or other constitutive documents in any manner which could adversely and materially affect the rights of the Lenders under this Agreement or their ability to enforce the same, except as otherwise permitted pursuant to or .
Section 6.12         
Constitutive Documents
Sections 6.03
6.04
 
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, sell or assign, with or without recourse, for discount or otherwise, any income or revenues, including notes and accounts receivable.
Section 6.13         
Sales and Assignments of Income, Revenues and Receivables
 
. The Company will not, and will not permit any Restricted Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive in any respect materially adverse to the Company or to the rights or interests of the Lenders any of its rights under any document evidencing or governing Subordinated Indebtedness.
Section 6.14         
Amendment of Material Documents
 
. The Company will not permit (a) the EBITDA of Domestic Subsidiaries that are not Material Domestic Subsidiaries to exceed 10% of EBITDA of the Company and the Domestic Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis or (b) the combined assets of Domestic Subsidiaries that are not Material Domestic Subsidiaries to exceed 10% of the assets of the Company and the Domestic Subsidiaries taken as a whole.
Section 6.15         
Required Material Domestic Subsidiaries
 
.
Section 6.16         
Adjusted Leverage Ratio; Leverage Ratio
 
(a)          The Company will not permit the Adjusted Leverage Ratio as of the end of any Fiscal Quarter to exceed the ratio of 2.75 to 1.00.
 
(b)          The Company will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of the end of any Fiscal Quarter to exceed the ratio of 2.75 to 1.00.
 
. The Company will not permit the Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio as of the end of any Fiscal Quarter to be less than the ratio of 1.20 to 1.00.
Section 6.17         
Fixed Charge Coverage Ratio
 
ARTICLE VII
 
Events of Default and Remedies
 
. If any of the following events () shall occur:
Section 7.01         
Events of Default
Events of Default
 
(a)          any Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)          any Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this ) payable under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five days;
Section 7.01
 
 
(c)          any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Company or any Subsidiary in or in connection with this Agreement or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver hereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement, Loan Document or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver hereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
(d)          the Company or any Subsidiary shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in , (with respect to the existence of any Borrower) or or in ;
Section 5.02
5.04
5.10
Article VI
 
(e)          any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article) or in any other Loan Document, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the earlier of (i) the Companys obtaining knowledge thereof or (ii) written notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Company (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
 
(f)          the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable after giving effect to any applicable grace period;
 
(g)          any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
 
(h)          an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i)          the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
 
 
(j)          the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
(k)          one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $25,000,000 shall be rendered against the Company, any Restricted Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to attach or levy upon any assets of the Company or any Restricted Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
 
(l)          an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Company and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $10,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) in any year or (ii) $25,000,000 (inclusive of fees and penalties) for all periods;
 
(m)          any Loan Document or any material provision thereof shall at any time cease to be in full force and effect, or a proceeding shall be commenced by any Loan Party or any other Person seeking to establish the invalidity or unenforceability thereof (exclusive of questions of interpretation thereof), or any Loan Party shall repudiate or deny that it has any liability or obligation for the payment of principal or interest or other obligations purported to be created under any Loan Document;
 
(n)          any Lien created by any of the Security Documents shall at any time fail to constitute a valid and (to the extent required by the Security Documents) perfected Lien on any material portion of the Collateral purported to be subject thereto, securing the obligations purported to be secured thereby, with the priority required by the Loan Documents, or any Loan Party shall so assert in writing; or
 
(o)          a Change in Control shall occur;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Company, take any or all of the following actions, at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers; and in case of any event with respect to the Company described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrowers accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrowers, and (iii) exercise any or all of the remedies available to it under the Security Documents, at law or in equity.
 
 
. Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default, the Company shall, if requested by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, pay to the Administrative Agent an amount in immediately available funds (which funds shall be held as collateral pursuant to arrangements satisfactory to the Administrative Agent) equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon under all Letters of Credit then outstanding at such time; provided that, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default specified in or , the Company shall pay such amount forthwith without any notice or demand or any other act by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders.
Section 7.02         
Cash Collateral
Section 7.01(h)
(i)
 
ARTICLE VIII
 
The Administrative Agent
 
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Company or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated hereby that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing as directed by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Company or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with this Agreement, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered hereunder or in connection herewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth herein, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Section 9.02
Article IV
 
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Company), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
 
In addition, each of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender hereby indemnifies the Administrative Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrowers), ratably according to its respective pro rata share of the total of the Commitments, or if no Commitments are outstanding, the respective pro rata share of the total of the Commitments immediately prior to the time Commitments ceased to be outstanding held by each of them, from and against any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, penalties, actions, judgments, suits, costs, expenses or disbursements of any kind or nature whatsoever which may be imposed on, incurred by, or asserted against the Administrative Agent in any way relating to or arising out of this Agreement or any action taken or omitted by the Administrative Agent under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents (including any action taken or omitted under Article II of this Agreement); that such indemnity shall not be available to the extent such liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, penalties, actions, judgments, suits, costs, expenses or disbursements are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and non-appealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Administrative Agent. Without limitation of the foregoing, each Lender and the Issuing Lender agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent promptly upon demand for its respective pro rata share of the total of the Commitments of any out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred by the Administrative Agent in connection with the preparation, execution, administration or enforcement of, or legal advice in respect of rights or responsibilities under, this Agreement or the other Loan Documents to the extent that the Administrative Agent is not reimbursed for such expenses by the Borrowers. The provisions of this section shall survive the termination of this Agreement and the payment of the Obligations.
provided
 
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Lender and the Company. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, with the consent of Company unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, to appoint a successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Lender, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Company to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Company and such successor. After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Section 9.03
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
It is expressly understood that the Co-Syndication Agent shall not have any duties or responsibilities under this Agreement.
 
ARTICLE IX
 
Miscellaneous
 
.
Section 9.01         
Notices
 
(a)          Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
 
 
(i)          if to the Company or any Borrowing Subsidiary, to it, or to it in care of the Company:
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
3000 Technology Drive
Angleton, Texas 77515
Attention: Kenneth S. Barrow
Telecopy No.: 979-848-5225
Telephone No.: 979-849-6550 (ext. 1247)
 
(ii)         if to the Administrative Agent, to
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
712 Main St, 8th Floor North
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention: Tony Eastman
Telecopy No.: 713-216-6710
Telephone No.: 713-216-4943
 
with a copy to:
 
JPMorgan Chase, N.A.
10 South Dearborn, Floor 7
IL1-0010
Chicago, Illinois 60603-2003
Attention: Maribel Lorenzo
Telecopy No.: 312-385-7096
Telephone No.: 312-732-5548
 
with a copy to:
 
Andrews Kurth LLP
600 Travis, Suite 4200
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention: Martha Marty Smith DeBusk
Telecopy No.: 713-220-4372
Telephone No.: 713-220-7202
 
 
(iii)        if to the Issuing Lender, to
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
712 Main St, 8th Floor North
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention: Tony Eastman
Telecopy No.: 713-216-6710
Telephone No.: 713-216-4943
 
with a copy to:
 
JPMorgan Chase, N.A.
10 South Dearborn, Floor 7
IL1-0010
Chicago, Illinois 60603-2003
Attention: Maribel Lorenzo
Telecopy No.: 312-385-7096
Telephone No.: 312-732-5548
 
(iv)         if to the Swingline Lender, to
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
712 Main St, 8th Floor North
Houston, Texas 77002
Attention: Tony Eastman
Telecopy No.: 713-216-6710
Telephone No.: 713-216-4943
 
with a copy to:
 
JPMorgan Chase, N.A.
10 South Dearborn, Floor 7
IL1-0010
Chicago, Illinois 60603-2003
Attention: Maribel Lorenzo
Telecopy No.: 312-385-7096
Telephone No.: 312-732-5548
 
(v)          if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
(b)          Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; provided that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender. The Administrative Agent or the Company may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
Article II
provided
 
 
(c)          Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
 
.
Section 9.02         
Waivers; Amendments
 
(a)          No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders hereunder are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Agreement or consent to any departure by the Loan Parties therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
 
(b)          Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Company and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan Documents, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders; provided that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change or in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of Required Lenders or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, (vi) release all or substantially all the Guarantors from their Guarantees under the Guarantee Agreement except as expressly provided in the Guarantee Agreement or , or limit the liability of the Guarantors in respect of their Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender or (vii) release all or substantially all of the Collateral without the written consent of each Lender, , that nothing herein shall prohibit the Administrative Agent from releasing any Collateral, or require the consent of the other Lenders for such release, in respect of items sold to the extent such sale is permitted or not prohibited hereunder; that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any provision of this Agreement may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by the Company, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent (and, if their rights or obligations are affected thereby the Issuing Lender) if (i) by the terms of such agreement the Commitment of each Lender not consenting to the amendment provided for therein shall terminate upon the effectiveness of such amendment and (ii) at the time such amendment becomes effective, each Lender not consenting thereto receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by it and all other amounts owing to it or accrued for its account under this Agreement. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, no Defaulting Lender shall have any right to approve or disapprove any amendment, waiver or consent hereunder, except that the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender may not be increased or extended without the consent of such Defaulting Lender.
Section 2.17(b)
(c)
Section 9.14
provided
provided
further
 
 
.
Section 9.03         
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
 
(a)          The Company shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel and consultants for the Administrative Agent and such Affiliates, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, due diligence undertaken by the Administrative Agent with respect to the financing contemplated by this Agreement, the preparation and administration of this Agreement or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions hereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Issuing Lender in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or, after the occurrence and during the continuance of any Default, any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel and consultant for the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with this Agreement, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
 
 
(b)          The Company shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ) against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement, the Commitment Letter dated June 4, 2012, among the Company, the Administrative Agent and the Lead Arranger, or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the Issuing Lender to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property currently or formerly owned or operated by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto ; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses (A) are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee, (B) result from a claim brought by the Company or any other Loan Party against an Indemnitee for breach in bad faith of such Indemnitees funding obligations hereunder, if the Company or such Loan Party has obtained a final and nonappealable judgment in its favor on such claim as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction or (C) disputes arising solely between Indemnitees and (1) not involving any action or inaction by the Company or any Subsidiary or (2) not relating to any action of such Indemnitee in its capacity as Administrative Agent or Lead Arranger. This shall not apply with respect to Taxes other than Taxes that represent losses, claims or damages arising from any non-Tax claim.
Indemnitee
and whether or not caused by the ordinary, sole or contributory negligence of any Indemnitee
provided
Section 9.03(b)
 
(c)          To the extent that the Company fails to indefeasibly pay any amount required under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or any Related Party of the foregoing, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender, the Swingline Lender or such Related Party, as the case may be, such Lenders Applicable Percentage (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought based on each Lenders Applicable Percentage of the Revolving Exposure at such time) of such unpaid amount (including any such unpaid amount in respect of a claim asserted by such Lender); that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such, or against any Related Party of any of the foregoing acting for the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or Swingline Lender in connection with such capacity.
provided
 
(d)          To the extent permitted by applicable Law, each party to this Agreement agrees not to assert, and each such party hereby waives, any claim against any other party, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof; that nothing in this paragraph (d) shall relieve the Company of any obligation it may have to indemnify an Indemnitee against special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages asserted against such Indemnitee by a third party. No Indemnitee referred to in paragraph (b) above shall be liable for damages arising from the use by unintended recipients of any information or other materials distributed by it through telecommunications, electronic or other information transmission systems in connection with this Agreement or the other Loan Documents or the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, except to the extent any such damages are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
provided
 
 
(e)          All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
 
(f)          Each partys obligations under this Section shall survive the termination of the Loan Documents and payment of the obligations thereunder.
 
.
Section 9.04         
Successors and Assigns
 
(a)          The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) a Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by a Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement, other than rights, remedies or claims in favor of the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Lender that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders.
 
(b)          (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
 
(A)         the Company, that the Company shall be deemed to have consented to an assignment unless it shall have objected thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within five Business Days after having received notice thereof; that no consent of the Company shall be required for an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or, if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee;
provided
provided
further
Article VII
 
(B)         the Administrative Agent; that no such consent shall be required for an assignment of any Commitment to an assignee that is a Lender with a Commitment immediately prior to giving effect to such assignment; and
provided
 
(C)         the Issuing Lender and the Swingline Lender.
 
(ii)         Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
 
(A)         except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Commitment, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Company and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Company shall be required if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of has occurred and is continuing;
provided
Article VII
 
(B)         each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement;
 
(C)         the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500;
 
(D)         the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire;
 
(E)         no assignment shall be made to (1) a natural Person, (2) the Company or any of the Companys Affiliates or Subsidiaries or (3) to any Defaulting Lender or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Person who, upon becoming a Lender hereunder, would constitute any of the foregoing Persons described in this clause (3); and
 
(F)         in the case of an assignment to a CLO (as defined below), the assignment Lender shall retain the sole right to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provisions of this Agreement, provided that the Assignment and Assumption between such Lender and such CLO may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of such CLO, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to that affects such CLO.
Section 9.02(b)
For the purposes of this , the term  has the following meaning:
Section 9.04(b)
CLO
 
 means any entity (whether a corporation, partnership, trust or otherwise) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
CLO
 
 
(iii)        Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of , , and ). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
Section 2.14
2.15
2.16
9.03
Section 9.04(b)
 
(iv)         The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrowers, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrowers, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by any Borrower, the Issuing Lender and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(v)          Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register; that if either the assigning Lender or the assignee shall have failed to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to , or , , or , the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information therein in the Register unless and until such payment shall have been made in full, together with all accrued interest thereon. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
provided
Section 2.04(c)
2.05(d)
(e)
2.06(b)
2.17(d)
9.03(c)
 
 
(c)          Any Lender may, without the consent of the Company, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to any Person (other than any Person described in paragraph (b)(ii)(E) of this Section) (a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (i) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (iii) the Company, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to that affects such Participant. The Company agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of , and (subject to the requirements and limitations therein, including the requirements under (it being understood that the documentation required under shall be delivered to the participating Lender)) to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section; that such Participant (i) agrees to be subject to the provisions of Section 2.18 as if it were an assignee under paragraph (b) of this Section and (ii) shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under or , with respect to any participation, than its participating Lender would have been entitled to receive, except to the extent such entitlement to receive a greater payment results from a Change in Law that occurs after the Participant acquired the applicable participation. Each Lender that sells a participation agrees, at the Companys request and expense, to use reasonable efforts to cooperate with the Company to effectuate the provisions of with respect to any participant. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of as though it were a Lender; that such Participant agrees to be subject to as though it were a Lender. Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Company, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participants interest in the Loans or other obligations under the Loan Documents (the ); that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participants interest in any commitments, loans, letters of credit or its other obligations under any Loan Document) to any Person except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such commitment, loan, letter of credit or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United Stated Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary. For the avoidance of doubt, the Administrative Agent (in its capacity as Administrative Agent) shall have no responsibility for maintaining a Participant Register.
Participant
provided
provided
Section 9.02(b)
Section 2.14
2.15
2.16
Section 2.16(f)
Section 2.16(f)
provided
Section 2.14
2.16
Section 2.18(b)
Section 9.08
provided
Section 2.17(c)
Participant Register
provided
 
(d)          Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
 
 
. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties herein and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of , , and and shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Section 9.05         
Survival
Section 2.14
2.15
2.16
9.03
Article VIII
 
. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and the Fee Letter constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in , this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopy, emailed pdf or any other electronic means that reproduces an image of the actual executed signature page shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Section 9.06         
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
Section 4.01
 
. Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Section 9.07         
Severability
 
. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender, the Issuing Lender and each of their respective Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held, and other obligations at any time owing, by such Lender, the Issuing Lender or any such Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of any Borrower against any and all of the Obligations of any Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement or any other Loan Document to such Lender, the Issuing Lender or their respective Affiliates, irrespective of whether or not such Lender, the Issuing Lender or such Affiliate shall have made any demand under this Agreement or any other Loan Document and although such obligations may be unmatured; that in the event that any Defaulting Lender shall exercise any such right of setoff, (x) all amounts so set off shall be paid over immediately to the Administrative Agent for further application in accordance with the provisions of and, pending such payment, shall be segregated by such Defaulting Lender from its other funds and deemed held in trust for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender, and the Lenders, and (y) the Defaulting Lender shall provide promptly to the Administrative Agent a statement describing in reasonable detail the Obligations owing to such Defaulting Lender as to which it exercised such right of setoff. The rights of each Lender, the Issuing Lender and their respective Affiliates under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) that such Lender, the Issuing Lender or their respective Affiliates may have. Each Lender and the Issuing Lender agrees to notify the Company and the Administrative Agent promptly after any such setoff and application; that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such setoff and application.
Section 9.08         
Right of Setoff
provided
Section 2.22
provided
 
 
.
Section 9.09         
Governing Law; Consent to Service of Process
 
(a)          This Agreement and the Loan Documents shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of Texas.
 
(b)          The Company and each other Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the court of the State of Texas sitting in Harris County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of Texas, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such Texas State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement against any Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)          Each Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
Without limitation of the foregoing, nothing in this Agreement, or in the Notes or in any other Loan Document shall be deemed to constitute a waiver of any rights which any Lender, or the holder of any Note may have under applicable federal legislation relating to the amount of interest which such Lender or holder may contract for, take, receive or charge in respect of the Loan and the Loan Documents, including any right to take, receive, reserve and charge interest at the rate allowed by the law of the state where any Lender is located. The Administrative Agent, each Lender and each Borrower further agree that insofar as the provisions of Chapter 303 of the Texas Finance Code, as amended, are applicable to the determination of the Highest Lawful Rate with respect to the Notes and the Obligations hereunder and under the other Loan Documents, the indicated rate ceiling of such Article shall be applicable; provided, however, that to the extent permitted by such Article, the Administrative Agent may from time to time by notice to the Company revise the election of such interest rate ceiling as such ceiling affects the then current or future balances of the Loans. The provisions of Chapter 346 of the Texas Finance Code, as amended, do not apply to this Agreement, any Note issued hereunder or the other Loan Documents.
 
 
. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
Section 9.10         
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Section 9.11         
Headings
 
. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the enforcement of rights hereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to any Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Company or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than the Company. For the purposes of this Section,  means all information received from the Company relating to the Company or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Lender or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by the Company; that, in the case of information received from the Company after the Effective Date, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
Section 9.12         
Confidentiality
Information
provided
 
 
. Each provision in this Agreement and each other Loan Document is expressly limited so that in no event whatsoever shall the amount paid, or otherwise agreed to be paid, to the Administrative Agent or any Lender or charged, contracted for, reserved, taken or received by the Administrative Agent or any such Lender, for the use, forbearance or detention of the money to be loaned under this Agreement or any Loan Document or otherwise (including any sums paid as required by any covenant or obligation contained herein or in any other Loan Document which is for the use, forbearance or detention of such money), exceed that amount of money which would cause the effective rate of interest to exceed the Highest Lawful Rate, and all amounts owed under this Agreement and each other Loan Document shall be held to be subject to reduction to the effect that such amounts so paid or agreed to be paid, charged, contracted for, reserved, taken or received which are for the use, forbearance or detention of money under this Agreement or such Loan Document shall in no event exceed that amount of money which would cause the effective rate of interest to exceed the Highest Lawful Rate. Anything in any Note or any other Loan Document to the contrary notwithstanding, the Borrowers shall not be required to pay unearned interest on any Note and the Borrowers shall not be required to pay interest on the Obligations at a rate in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate, and if the effective rate of interest which would otherwise be payable under such Note and such Loan Documents would exceed the Highest Lawful Rate, or if the holder of such Note shall receive any unearned interest or shall receive monies that are deemed to constitute interest which would increase the effective rate of interest payable by the Borrowers under such Note and the other Loan Documents to a rate in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate, then (a) the amount of interest which would otherwise be payable by the Borrowers shall be reduced to the amount allowed under applicable law and (b) any unearned interest paid by the Borrowers or any interest paid by the Borrowers in excess of the Highest Lawful Rate shall in the first instance be credited on the principal of the obligations of the Borrowers (or if all such obligations shall have been paid in full, refunded to the Borrowers). It is further agreed that, without the limitation of the foregoing, all calculations of the rate of interest contracted for, reserved, taken, charged or received by any Lender under the Notes and the Obligations and under the other Loan Documents are made for the purpose of determining whether such rate exceeds the Highest Lawful Rate, and shall be made, to the extent permitted by usury laws applicable to such Lender, by amortizing, prorating and spreading in equal parts during the period of the full stated term of the Notes and this Agreement and all interest at any time contracted for, charged or received by such Lender in connection therewith.
Section 9.13         
Interest
 
. In the event that the Company or any Subsidiary sells, transfers or otherwise disposes of all or any portion of any of the Equity Interests, assets or property owned by the Company or such Subsidiary in a transaction not prohibited by this Agreement, the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent shall promptly (and the Lenders hereby authorize and instruct the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent to) take such action and execute any such documents as may be reasonably requested by the Company and at the Companys expense to release any Liens created by any Loan Document in respect of such Equity Interests, assets or property, including the release and satisfaction of record of any mortgage or deed of trust granted in connection herewith, and, in the case of a disposition of all or substantially all the Equity Interests or assets of any Subsidiary that is a Loan Party, terminate such Subsidiarys obligations under the Guarantee Agreement and each other Loan Document. In addition, the Administrative Agent and the Collateral Agent agree to take such actions as are reasonably requested by the Company and at the Companys expense to terminate the Liens and security interests created by the Loan Documents when all the Obligations have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit and Commitments terminated.
Section 9.14         
Release of Liens and Guarantees
 
 
. The execution, delivery and effectiveness of this Agreement shall not extinguish the obligations for the payment of money outstanding under the Original Credit Agreement, as amended, or discharge or release the Lien or priority of any Security Document or any other security therefor. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the obligations outstanding under the Original Credit Agreement, as amended or any agreements securing the same, which shall remain in full force and effect, except as modified hereby or by agreements executed concurrently herewith. Nothing expressed or implied in this Agreement or any other document contemplated hereby shall be construed as a release or other discharge of Company under the Original Credit Agreement, as amended, or any Guarantor under any Loan Document from any of its obligations and liabilities thereunder. Each of the Amended and Restated Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall remain in full force and effect until and except as expressly modified hereby.
Section 9.15         
No Novation
 
. Each Lender hereby notifies the Borrowers that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001) (the ), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrowers, which information includes the name and address of any Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify any Borrower in accordance with the Act.
Section 9.16         
USA Patriot Act
USA PATRIOT Act
 
. The Obligations of the Company and each of its Domestic Subsidiaries that are Borrowing Subsidiaries hereunder and under the Loan Documents are joint and several and the obligations of the Domestic Subsidiaries that are Guarantors under the Loan Documents are joint and several. The Obligations of the Foreign Borrowers hereunder and under the Loan Documents are joint and several. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein or under the Loan Documents, no Foreign Borrower shall have any liability whatsoever in respect of the Obligations of the Company or any of its Domestic Subsidiaries.
Section 9.17         
Joint and Several Liability
 
The Company represents and warrants to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent that as of the Effective Date, Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., Benchmark Electronics Delaware Corp. and Benchmark Electronics Services, Inc. are not Material Domestic Subsidiaries. In reliance upon the foregoing, the Lenders and the Administrative Agent hereby release Benchmark BV Holdings, Inc., Benchmark Electronics Delaware Corp. and Benchmark Electronics Services, Inc. from their respective obligations under the Security Documents to which they are a party from and after the Effective Date.
Section 9.18         
Release of Non-Material Domestic Subsidiaries
.
 
 
. THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING THE SCHEDULES AND EXHIBITS HERETO), THE NOTES AND OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS CONSTITUTE A LOAN AGREEMENT AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26.02(a) OF THE TEXAS BUSINESS AND COMMERCIAL CODE, AND REPRESENT THE FINAL AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES RELATING TO THE SUBJECT MATTER HEREOF AND THEREOF AND MAY NOT BE CONTRADICTED BY EVIDENCE OF PRIOR, CONTEMPORANEOUS OR SUBSEQUENT ORAL AGREEMENTS OF THE PARTIES. THERE ARE NO UNWRITTEN ORAL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
Section 9.19         
FINAL AGREEMENT OF THE PARTIES
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 2.01
 
Commitments
 
 
Schedule 2.01
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20121025175346.txt.gz
TIME:20121025175346
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
  
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): October 25, 2012
  
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On October 25, 2012, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012. A copy of the press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 hereto and is hereby incorporated herein by reference. The information in this Form 8-K is being furnished under Item 2.02 and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act), or otherwise subject to the liabilities of such section, nor shall such information be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER ENDED SEPTEMBER 30, 2012
 
ANGLETON, TX, OCTOBER 25, 2012  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, today announced financial results for the third quarter which ended September 30, 2012.
 
Third Quarter 2012 Results
*Includes a discrete income tax benefit of $9 million ($0.16 per diluted share)
 
Benchmark delivered another strong quarter of results, having achieved our revenue and operating margin targets, said Gayla Delly, the Companys President and CEO. These results were accomplished through the strong performance of our global teams and our continued focus on customers even with the ongoing challenging macroeconomic environment. Looking ahead, given the continuing market uncertainty we will remain flexible and cautious with a continued commitment to growth, operational excellence, and our customers.
 
Third Quarter 2012 Highlights
 
 
 
Third Quarter Industry Sector Update
The following table sets forth revenue by industry sector for the quarters ended September 30, 2012, June 30, 2012 and September 30, 2011.
 
 
Fourth Quarter 2012 Outlook
 
Conference Call Details
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
About Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or lisa.weeks@bench.com
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the Companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance. The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement looking ahead, given the continuing market uncertainty we will remain flexible and cautious with a continued commitment to growth, operational excellence, and our customers, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the fourth quarter of 2012, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: ; future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
the potential recovery of insurance proceeds
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
###
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Financial Results
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Consolidated Statements of Income
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
 
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet
September 30, 2012
(Amounts in Thousands)
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20121121110142.txt.gz
TIME:20121121110142
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): November 21, 2012
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
(b) On November 21, 2012, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the retirement of Cary T. Fu as Chairman of the Board effective December 31, 2012 and the appointment of Peter G. Dorflinger to succeed Mr. Fu as Chairman of the Board, effective January 1, 2013.
 
Mr. Dorflinger, general partner of MAD Capital Partners, has been a director of the Company since its initial public offering in 1990. He has served on all three board committees  Audit, Nominating/Governance and Compensation  and will continue to serve on the Nominating/Governance and Audit Committees. Mr. Dorflinger received a J.D. degree from the University of Houston and is also a director of several privately held companies. Mr. Dorflinger qualifies as an independent director under the rules of the New York Stock Exchange and Item 407(a) of Regulation S-K promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
 
The press release announcing the retirement of Mr. Fu and the appointment of Mr. Dorflinger is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Exhibit 99.1 Press release dated November 21, 2012
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
FOR
IMMEDIATE
RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS APPOINTS PETER DORFLINGER AS
NON-EXECUTIVE CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD
 
ANGLETON, TX, NOVEMBER 21, 2012  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), announced today its succession plan for Chairman of the Board, appointing current board member Peter G. Dorflinger to serve as non-executive chairman, subject to his re-election as a Company director by shareholders at its annual meeting in May 2013. Mr. Dorflinger succeeds Company founder Cary T. Fu, who plans to retire from the Companys Board of Directors on December 31, 2012. This chairman succession represents the culmination of a well-planned leadership transition that began more than two years ago.
 
Mr. Dorflinger, general partner of MAD Capital Partners, has been a director of Benchmark since its initial public offering in 1990. He has served on all three board committeesAudit, Nominating/Governance, and Compensationand will continue to serve on the Nominating/Governance and Audit committees. Upon his appointment and election, Mr. Dorflinger will become the Companys first independent chairman.
 
Mr. Dorflinger brings the experience of more than two decades of service as a director of the Company and has an intimate understanding of the Company and its business, said Gayla Delly, Benchmarks President and CEO. He has been our longest serving director, and his insight and leadership are extremely valuable to Benchmark, our employees and our shareholders.
 
Cary Fu set the bar high and inspired tremendous performance while serving as Chairman of the Board of Directors. I am honored to be named the next chairman of Benchmarks board, said Peter Dorflinger. Benchmark is always focused on bringing top-notch, on-time delivered products and services to our customers, and that is something I am very proud to be a part of. Mr. Dorflinger will begin his service as Non-Executive Chairman of the Board beginning on January 1, 2013, when Mr. Fu retires. Mr. Fu will continue to provide consulting services for the Company through 2013 and will serve the Board in the honorary position of Chairman Emeritus through 2014.
 
 
About Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or
lisa.weeks@bench.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20130205104610.txt.gz
TIME:20130205104610
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 4, 2013
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas
77515
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code)
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
(17 CFR 230.425)
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act
(17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the
Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Exhibit 99.1 Press release dated February 4, 2013
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER AND YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2012
 
ANGLETON, TX, FEBRUARY 4, 2013  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, today announced financial results for the fourth quarter and year which ended December 31, 2012.
 
 
 
Our results for the fourth quarter and full year 2012 finished a very successful year for Benchmark, said Gayla J. Delly, the Companys President and CEO. Our teams executed well in a weak environment, delivering strong revenue and earnings growth and solid cash flow generation. We are well-prepared to meet the macroeconomic challenges in 2013 as we continue to focus on operational excellence and cost-effective solutions for our customers.
 
Fourth Quarter 2012 Highlights
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter Industry Sector Update
The following table sets forth revenue by industry sector for the quarters ended December 31, 2012, September 30, 2012 and December 31, 2011.
 
 
First Quarter 2013 Outlook
 
Ms. Delly continued: We believe the increased orders in the fourth quarter contribute to our softer revenue expectations for the first quarter. However, with robust recent bookings, we anticipate rebounding our revenue in 2013 despite the current market headwinds.
 
Conference Call Details
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
About Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or lisa.weeks@bench.com
 
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the Companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance. The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statements we are well-prepared to meet the macroeconomic challenges in 2013 as we continue to focus on operational excellence and cost-effective solutions for our customers and we anticipate rebounding our revenue in 2013 despite the current market headwinds, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the first quarter of 2013, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: ; future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
the potential recovery of insurance proceeds
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
###
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
                       
 
Reconciliation of GAAP to Non-GAAP Financial Results
 
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
 
(UNAUDITED)
 
 
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
                       
 
Consolidated Statements of Income
 
(Amounts in Thousands, Except Per Share Data)
 
(UNAUDITED)
   
 
 
 
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. and Subsidiaries
               
 
Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets
 
December 31, 2012
 
(in thousands, except par value)
 
(UNAUDITED)
               
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20130425143558.txt.gz
TIME:20130425143558
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 25, 2013
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
3000 Technology Drive, Angleton, Texas
77515
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code)
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
EXHIBITS INDEX
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THE
QUARTER ENDED MARCH 31, 2013
 
ANGLETON, TX, APRIL 25, 2013  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, today announced financial results for the first quarter which ended March 31, 2013.
 
 
First quarter revenues and earnings were in line with our expectations, said Gayla J. Delly, the Companys Chief Executive Officer. These results were driven by our teams continued ability to execute effectively in the current uncertain global economic environment. Against these headwinds, contributions from new program ramps, operational excellence and strength in new program wins provide good momentum for future growth. As we look ahead, we expect second quarter revenues in the range of $560 million to $590 million and diluted earnings per share (excluding restructuring and Thailand flood related items) between $0.25 and $0.30.
 
First Quarter 2013 Highlights
 
 
First Quarter Industry Sector Update
The following table sets forth revenue by industry sector for the quarters ended March 31, 2013, December 31, 2012 and March 31, 2012.
 
 
Second Quarter 2013 Outlook
 
Conference Call Details
A conference call hosted by Benchmark management will be held today at 10:00 am (Central time) to discuss the financial results of the Company and its future outlook. This call will be broadcast via the Internet and may be accessed by logging on to our website at www.bench.com.
 
About Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 21 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or lisa.weeks@bench.com
 
 
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This press release includes financial measures for earnings and earnings per share that exclude certain items and therefore are not in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). A detailed reconciliation between the GAAP results and results excluding special items (non-GAAP) is included at the end of this press release. By disclosing this non-GAAP information, management intends to provide investors with additional information to further analyze the Companys performance and underlying trends. Management utilizes a measure of net income and earnings per share on a non-GAAP basis that excludes certain items to better assess operating performance and to help investors compare our results with our previous guidance. The non-GAAP information included in this press release is not necessarily comparable to non-GAAP information of other companies. Non-GAAP information should not be viewed as a substitute for, or superior to, net income or other data prepared in accordance with GAAP as measures of our profitability or liquidity. Users of this financial information should consider the types of events and transactions for which adjustments have been made.
 
Forward-Looking Statements
This news release contains certain forward-looking statements within the scope of the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The words expect, estimate, anticipate, predict, and similar expressions, and the negatives of such expressions, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Our forward-looking statements may be deemed to include, among other things, the statement against these headwinds, our contributions from new program ramps, operational excellence and strength in new program wins provide good momentum for future growth, our sales and diluted earnings per share (excluding special items) guidance for the second quarter of 2013, as well as other statements, express or implied, concerning: ; future operating results or the ability to generate sales, income or cash flow; and Benchmarks business and growth strategies, including expected internal growth and performance goals. Although Benchmark believes that these statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, such statements involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Should one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying assumptions prove incorrect, actual outcomes may vary materially from those indicated.
the potential recovery of insurance proceeds
 
All forward-looking statements included in this release are based upon information available to Benchmark as of the date of this release, and Benchmark assumes no obligation to update any such forward-looking statements. Persons are advised to consult further disclosures on related subjects in Benchmarks Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, in its other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission and in its press releases.
 
###
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20130510121430.txt.gz
TIME:20130510121430
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): May 8, 2013
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrants telephone number, including area code:
(979) 849-6550
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
On May 8, 2013, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) held an annual meeting of its shareholders. There were four proposals acted upon at that meeting. Shareholders voted to (1) reelect all the incumbent directors, (2) approve the advisory vote on named executive officer compensation and (3) ratify the appointment of KPMG, LLP as the independent registered public accounting firm of the Company for 2013. Shareholders did not approve the Companys proposal to amend the Rights Agreement between the Company and Computershare Trust Company, N.A. The following is a description of each proposal and the votes cast with respect to such proposal:
 
Proposal #1. With respect to the election of directors, the voting was as follows:
 
 
Proposal # 2. With respect to the advisory vote on named executive officer compensation, the voting was as follows:
 
 
Proposal # 3. With respect to the ratification of the appointment of KPMG LLP as the independent registered public accounting firm of the Company, the voting was as follows:
 
 
Proposal # 4. With respect to the amendment and approval of the Rights Agreement between the Company and Computershare Trust Company, N.A., the voting was as follows:
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BHE/BHE-8K-20130612104558.txt.gz
TIME:20130612104558
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): June 11, 2013
 
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
  
 
Item 5.02.  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On June 11, 2013, Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing the appointment of Kenneth T. Lamneck as an independent director to the Board of Directors of the Company effective June 11, 2013. Mr. Lamneck is President and Chief Executive Officer of Insight Enterprises, Inc., a global provider of information technology hardware, software and service solutions to businesses and public sector clients in over 190 countries. He also serves as a director of Insight. Prior to joining Insight, from 2004 through 2009, Mr. Lamneck served as President, the Americas, at Tech Data Corporation, a wholesale distributor of technology products, where he led operations in the United States, Canada and Latin America. From 1996 to 2003, he held various executive management positions at Arrow Electronics, including President of Arrow/Richey Electronics and President of Arrows Industrial Computer Products business. Mr. Lamneck received a Masters of Business Administration from the University of Texas at El Paso and a Bachelors of Arts in Engineering from the United States Military Academy at West Point.
 
For his service as a non-employee director of the Company, Mr. Lamneck will receive (a) $60,000 per annum; (b) $1,000 per Board meeting attended and (c) $1,000 per Committee meeting attended as a member of such committee. On June 11, 2013, Mr. Lamneck received a restricted stock unit award grant of 4,615 Common Shares of the Company under the Companys 2010 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan.
These restricted stock units will vest in equal quarterly installments over a one-year period following the date of grant.
 
The press release announcing the appointment of Mr. Lamneck is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
  
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
 
BENCHMARK ELECTRONICS APPOINTS
KENNETH T. LAMNECK TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS
 
ANGLETON, TX, JUNE 11, 2013  Benchmark Electronics, Inc. (NYSE: BHE), a leading integrated contract manufacturing provider, announced today the appointment of Kenneth T. Lamneck as an independent director to the Board of Directors of the Company effective June 11, 2013. Mr. Lamneck is President and Chief Executive Officer of Insight Enterprises, Inc., a global provider of information technology hardware, software and service solutions to businesses and public sector clients in over 190 countries. He also serves as a director of Insight. Prior to joining Insight, from 2004 through 2009, Mr. Lamneck served as President, the Americas, at Tech Data Corporation, a wholesale distributor of technology products, where he led operations in the United States, Canada and Latin America. From 1996 to 2003, he held various executive management positions at Arrow Electronics, including President of Arrow/Richey Electronics and President of Arrows Industrial Computer Products business. Mr. Lamneck received a Masters of Business Administration from the University of Texas at El Paso and a Bachelors of Science in Engineering from the United States Military Academy at West Point.
 
About Benchmark Electronics, Inc.
Benchmark Electronics, Inc. provides integrated manufacturing, design and engineering services to original equipment manufacturers of computers and related products for business enterprises, medical devices, industrial control equipment (which includes equipment for the aerospace and defense industry), testing and instrumentation products, and telecommunication equipment. Benchmarks global operations include 23 facilities in nine countries. Benchmarks Common Shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol BHE.
 
For More Information, Please Contact:
Lisa K. Weeks, VP of Strategy & Investor Relations
979-849-6550 (ext. 1361) or lisa.weeks@bench.com
 
 
 
 
 
###


</DOCUMENT>
